{u'tt1675434': [u'Do not look at this through the prism of "Foreign Films". You\'d be wasting your time and miss something far too important.\n\nHollywood does scale like nobody else, leaving the competition gasping in its wake. France does intimacy, and brutality. Nothing is sacred. And rather than try to revive the New Wave or emulate Hollywood like most widely seen French films of late, "Intouchables" harnesses its core strengths - ease with intimacy, willingness to ridicule anything and brutal honesty - and delivers one of the funniest, most honest and touching films I have ever seen.\n\nSy is a failed robber, going through the motions and playing the stereotypical jobless \xe9migr\xe9. Cluzet is a romantic and melancholy mind trapped in a useless body. The circumstances that bring them together are too funny to spoil here, but meet they do, and an awkward relationship quickly blossoms as they bring out the best in each other.\n\nThe film\'s simplicity is delightfully misleading: the script is a masterpiece of comedy writing, and however good the rest of the cast is, the central duo is magical. Sy\'s comic timing will have you in stitches, but it is his honesty and vulnerability that make you fall in love with the character. Cluzet isn\'t your typical sad-sack, instead, much of the finest pleasures in the film consist in watching him use his keen mind to mess with the world around him (a subplot about an abstract painting really takes the biscuit, you\'ll know it when you see it).\n\nThis is one of the most unique, beautiful and honest friendships ever committed to film. It will make you laugh, it will make you cry... a delightful celebration of everything in life that makes it worthwhile.', u'0.248335', u"I am now trying to find words to describe this movie for an hour. I couldn't.\n\nYou've seen it, or you haven't. It's monumental and outrageously good.\n\nThe cast is brilliant. The jokes lovely. The story and the idea behind the movie is beautiful. Especially when you've worked/lived with handicapped people. The music is such a perfect choice, it is unbelievable.\n\nI hope this movie makes a plenty of people think about how good their life is and how bad it could have been.\n\nBottom line: Oscar-worthy. Period.", u'0.0213673', u'Being french and a film maker myself, I have high standards for ratings, and this one definitely deserves in 10/10. I\'ve not seen a film showing our world with such humour in a long time. The jokes are absurd and possibly, with a touch of British humour to them. The directing is beautiful, the acting is incredible, the shots are somehow truthful, if I can say that about a shot. It may be Omar Sy\'s first time in a leading role, for a major production, but he really delivered, and not just in the funny parts, the delivery of emotions was just spotless. Francois Cluzet was also just as brilliant, as he usually is. I will be recommending this film to everyone, and seriously hoping it will be released in the UK soon enough for me to see it again! Only negative aspect... the Americans are thinking of doing a remake... why do they always have to? I mean would you reconsider remaking the "Joconde" or the Sixtine Chapel to American standards? Film is an art like any other, it travels the world as it is... no need for remakes...', u'0.168288', u"This movie surprised us. We checked on IMDb and saw 8/10 for a french movie, without hesitation we went to the movie theatre to watch the movie.\n\nThe subject is hard but the movie is really funny. In a few seconds you are fully projected within the film from the beginning to the end. There is no special effet but the actors are playing very well and the movie is based on a real story.\n\nIf you are skeptical for French movie don't be for this one ... it is a must see movie.\n\nEnjoy the movie.", u'0.32676', u'In less than two months, "Untouchable" became the second most successful French film by number of spectators, such an event by itself that people went then to see it, not because they thought it was good but to see what was so good in it: that\'s the virtual circle of success. \n\nMy biggest disappointment in 2011 was with "The Tree of Life", a movie I sincerely wanted to love but couldn\'t, and I left the theater before it ended with a bitter taste of frustration. Proportionally, my greatest positive surprise came with "Untouchable" because it was the opposite expectation: I was sure I would dislike it, figuring the movie manipulated viewers through the overused device of the improbable friendship. Why such preconceived negativity? Well, when a young black guy from French suburbs, darkly depicted in Mathieu Kassovitz \'Hate\' and infamous for its occasional riots, befriends a rich quadriplegic, I immediately think of \'good feelings\', \'mainstream populism\' \x85 unaware that I apply to myself a cynical judgment that can undermine my very way to enjoy not just this film, but any film. After all, why getting ready for hatred when it\'s so relieving to give the benefit of the doubt and get ready for appreciation? Especially since more than 15 millions of French people, from different ages and backgrounds liked it. \n\nSo, I saw it \x85 and loved it.\n\nThe story of "Untouchable" is the kind of unintentional masterpiece that only movies can provide every once in a while, it has no other pretension than to depict a magnificent and inspiring friendship story starting as a simple job. A young man with a Senegalese background, Omar Sy as Driss, only needs a signature to prove that he attended an interview for a live-in carer job. For some strange reason, Paul, the rich man, played by a wonderful Fran\xe7ois Cluzet, gives him the job, with a one-month trial period. The reason of this choice is smoothly handled by the script: the film starts with all the job applicants, every one of them unnaturally posing and getting mixed in prepared answers. Then, Driss casually enters, without waiting for his turn or knocking on the door, he\'s got enough problems to deal with, unemployment, an experience in jail, being a pariah for society, and undesirable even in his own family, especially her adoptive aunt. Driss\' attitude pleases Paul, because after his paragliding accident, he can\'t feel his body from neck to toes, and needs caring almost 24 hours per days and 7 days per week, so he really doesn\'t have time for bullshit either. \n\nAnd this is a remarkable aspect in the script written by the two directors Eric Toledano and Olivier Nakache: it doesn\'t waste time cementing the friendship, the two leads rapidly get fond of each other, a feeling illustrated in the poster with both posing with natural smiles. The film shows Omar\'s struggle to learn how \'needy\' Paul is, which provides some priceless comedic moments, but "Untouchable" goes immediately to the core, an eye-opening message about the life endured by a handicapped person, making all the wealth in the world pointless and the richness of heart and mind, priceless. Through Driss and Paul\'s interaction, the film explores the real needs of people in life, respect and understanding, acceptance and love. Maybe if it was handled by other directors, it would have been predictable but in "Untouchable", the complicity between the two heroes feels absolutely real. There\'s one scene when Driss shave the bushy beard of Paul,\x85 well, I won\'t spoil it for you, but the part was a clever mix of realism and comedy because anyone would have done what Driss did at one moment, and that\'s the secret of the film: it feels real.\n\nSome movies can work with a good story but they need good performances, in "Untouchable", it\'s almost impossible to determine who carried the film, both Cluzet and Sy were great. And I don\'t get the complaints: why they didn\'t respect the original story where the carer was an Arab, or how they \'sugarcoated\' the handicap? I even heard that in America, they were accusing the film of racism because Driss was portrayed as a sort of (I quote) \'helper monkey\'? Seriously, this is getting old \x85The way handicap is approached never flirts with an exaggerated pathos, nor the opposite, which is the most intelligent achievement. There\'s a sort of heart\'s intelligence in the way Omar teases Cluzet with his own handicap, and the film provides the extraordinary message that pleasure and thrills have unlimited media, whether they come from pot, an ear-massage or even paragliding. \n\nMany of Paul\'s friends criticizes the presence of Driss in Paul\'s life, but Paul doesn\'t care: Omar is a man full of life, big, tall and strong, and when he uses violence to teach a man the respect of a parking sign, Paul admits this is the right method. Both are in the same wavelength. I wondered if the title "Untouchable" referred to the lowest caste in India, echoing the two men\'s conditions, both outcasts physically and socially, but I guess, their relationship evolves into a friendship precisely because they\'re both strong-minded, and together, they become even stronger, until getting untouchables ... in the noblest meaning of the word.\n\nThere are real people in "Untouchable", nothing works as plot devices even if some situations are so cinematically appealing: Omar inviting everybody to dance during Paul\'s birthday, his learning of the aristocratic world, the art of abstract painting, and the way he breaks the conventions with an unconventional charisma reaches a level of energetic comedy that reminds of the greatest days of Eddie Murphy, with Cluzet as a perfect straight-man not deprived from a sense of humor. "Untouchable" is simply an inspiring story of friendship with whatever defines this beautiful virtue. \n\nAnd yes, it\'s one of the best French films ever, and certainly one of the best of 2011.', u'0.189746', u'Well, I\'ve just got out of the theater and i must say that all the reviews are right. this is an amazing film! The actors are simply the best, Omar is not only a great comic but also a great actor.\n\nThe filming has a certain touch that brings to mind "What\'s Eating Gilbert Grape" in the way the director was able to capture not only the suffering of Phillip but also the joy.\n\nNot wanting to spoil the film for others, i highly recommend seeing this in the theaters and with a loved one.\n\nIt is also a good film for teenagers as it holds a few wonderful life lessons.\n\nEnjoy.', u'0.727772', u'It\'s not because I\'m French that I appreciated this movie which I\'ve seen twice. Too give the really infamous appreciation of the reader from Toronto to the French public, qualifying us of a segregationist country is difficult to gulp especially coming from north America which has not a very glorious past on the matter even in recent years. Perhaps the commentator should see the movie "The help" to refresh his memory... But what I\'d like to say here apart of praising the fabulous interpretation of both leading actors is to remind that this is a true story, it did not come out from the directors and scriptwriter heads.\n\nPhilippe Pozzo Di Borgo born in 51, got a dramatic para-glider accident in the French Alps in 1993 being totally deprived of movements from the base of his neck to the tip of his feet. 3 Years later his wife died and he was helped out of his depression by Abdel Sellou his life-aid assistant. He published his terrible story in 2001 under the title "the second breath" (in French "Le second souffl\xe9"). The directors have had the compliments of Di Borgo for the way they adapted his story. If in any way this was biased he would never had accepted the film to be left in that state. The Di Borgo family is a very old and wealthy family whose origins goes far back in the history of France, and their residence in Paris is considered to be one the jewels of the capital at the same level as The Hotel de Sully in Paris. What is shown in the film is exactly what happens everywhere in the world as far as handicapped are concerned: tendency to overwhelm them with pity which is more diminishing them as if their fate is not enough for them to swallow every minute or second each day. The way the racial problem is viewed is properly demonstrated. The police behaves in different ways depending of the color of your skin or your country\'s origin and sorry to say North America is a very good example of this so perhaps is not a proper judge on this matter.The authors had the courage to state this straightforwardly. The film shows on the contrary how a man with a very limited education at the beginning, a former convict, is capable progressively to change his views, and find in himself at the same time the good Samaritan aspects and help with humor and punch, his handicapped boss to find a new belief in his shattered life at 42! At the same time the boss demonstrates an open-mindedness which was not obvious to get not only because of his handicap but because of his origins and his wealth at first. Let\'s not illusion ourselves on the matter, everywhere in the world few wealthy people would accept to have as an aid an ex convict whichever color his skin should be! It\'s a fantastic lesson of tolerance, and friendship. For just those reason this movie would deserve an Oscar or Golden Globe awards.\n\n09/07/2013 : I\'ve just seen that under "Crazy credits" is mentioned that 5% of the revenues of the film will go to an institutions caring for disabled persons. I just don\'t see what\'s crazy about that! I find this kind of remark particularly shocking and insulting both for the producers and the actors especially in this case where the story told is a true one.I suggest the administrator to delete that remark or change its qualification.', u'-0.000911471', u'Just seen last night, amazing movie, great performances from actors, particularly from Omar, and Cluzet is great as usual. Photography of images are great, supported by good choice of locations supporting actors are all good and natural so doing a great job to give a great solid base to the story. RIch of emotions on a simple story where ordinary people become extraordinary. Good representation of social differences in France without being too heavy on it. Simple, beautiful, efficient, like a good French cuisine, making a great dish full of tastes magically mixed :) Most to be watched and even more emotional when you know its based on true story !', u'0.928864', u'It has been 9 weeks now since Intoucblaes has come to the movie theaters. I did not give it much thought at first, but the universal acclaim I have heard convinced me to go see it. I don\'t over-stating the universality of the acclaim, people of various races, classes, colors & countries told me it was a must see. I had no expectations, and I was floored. \n\nIntouchables, directed by Eric Toledano and Olivier Nakache, starring Francois Cluzet and Omar Sy is possibly the best French movie of the year. This is not because of a lack of worthy contenders, but truly because Intouchables is that profound. It touches on themes of presumptions, social class difference, health, and as na\xefve as it may sound, the universality of humanity. \n\nThe story is not as important as is the relationship that is displayed between the two protagonists. Philippe (played by Cluzet) a rich aristocrat that loves adrenaline rushes finds himself a paraplegic after a paragliding incident. Driss (played by Sy) is, in appearance a typical hoodlum from the ghetto. The two are brought together and wonders happen. \n\nThe audience then sees how the men affect one another as they engage in a truly honest relationship. Driss is charismatic, lighthearted and funny, helping make Philippe\'s life enjoyable again. In the process the traditionally cold French aristocracy around Philippe warms up and lightens. He is like a hot knife through cold butter. \n\nAgain, it is not so much the story that is important as is the social commentary. The commentary is not judgmental and is very subtle, revealed only in the contrasts the director chose in the story and its contexts. His method reminded me of a sort of Zen approach to comedy. One example you can catch from the trailer alone is the contrast between the able bodied black Driss and t the crippled white man, etc. \n\nThe audience is also given wonderful sights of Paris and France as we go through the Pyrenees, Cabourg and the various streets of Paris. \n\nOn paper the review does not make the movie justice. It is hilarious in a way that is true, honest and by which anyone can relate to. Most importantly it is revealing and comforting in its reminder of the essential in life : love. It\'s approach is simple, pure and honest and that makes it worthy of the title of "best movie of the year". \n\nI cannot say more; the film must be experienced. My friends tried, they failed, so I trusted them and I saw it. It floored me. Go and be floored. \n\nPS - I heard American studios have purchased the rights for the film. They will need a brilliant director, screenwriters and perfect actors to make the original justice in the way "The Departed" did for "Infernal Affairs".', u'0.299627', u'I have seen this movie tonight at a preview session as the official french national release is set on 2011, November 2nd. Eric Toledano and Olivier Nakashe, accompanied by the lead actor Omar Sy were meeting the audience and cheerfully answering questions.\n\nThe movie is very well written. Although opening on a flash-forward, it is fairly classic comedy about the meeting of two opposite people who were very unlikely to meet. The first one is a paraplegic white middle aged very rich and lonely man, the other one is a young black, poor, unemployed, coming from poor suburbs and a very large family.\n\nWhat makes the quality of the film, beside the humour present in every scene in which Omar Sy appears (actually most of the film), is the emotion you can feel, through increasingly attaching characters.\n\nThe story is based upon a true story, and real characters.\n\nIf you want to watch and enjoyable comedy, with very touching moments, this is a must go.\n\nThere are interesting insights about arts as well (paintings, classical music, and funk music). What is art? What is its use?', u'0.487729', u'I CANNOT BELIEVE that "Bridesmaids" is nominated for an Oscar, just like Brad Pitt for his completely boring and not convincing part in "Moneyball", when in 2011 such a great movie was made!!! Did the Academy even see this?\n\nIt\'s a shame and in my opinion proves that the "Academy Awards" are just ridiculous and have nothing to do with good film and acting. \n\nFrancois Cluzet\'s performance is outstanding, as is Omar Sy and the story is just lovely and touching in a wonderful non-Hollywood way. (REMAKE? ARE YOU KIDDING ME?)\n\nSpread the word and enjoy this beautiful movie!!!', u'0.0724153', u"First of all, excuse my French. But kind of bull***t are North American viewers seeing when they see that movie?\n\nSorry to disappoint the people who think that movie offensive to Black people, but French people are far from dumb and racist. Are you saying that all these people with all kind of origins who laughed out loud at the screening are wrong? So are the Japanese jury who gave it 2 awards.\n\nYes, The original guy was Arabic and Omar is black. But the directors knew him and wanted to work with him again (his show on the Canal + channel is quite hilarious), maybe they shouldn't have. Yes, they should have taken a white guy, so Omar wouldn't have played the part because of the colour of his skin and American viewers wouldn't be shocked what do you think? \n\nFrom the NA reviews I've read, the fact that the Black guy serves the white one is shocking. From what I saw a lot of white people didn't feel the the position to be demeaning. \n\nAs for me I didn't see a Black guy but a guy from the poor suburbs of Paris. The clich\xe9s are unfortunately true, in Paris suburb 10% of the population are living in overcrowded accommodations. Life can be pretty hard when you have nothing to look forward to. So yes, Driss enjoys the fact that he's got his own bathtub, he likes playing the tough guy, and so on. He won't become a fan of classical music and ballet. It's real life, not Disneyland!! I think this is the way the American remake will be (can't wait not to see it!)\n\nPersonally when I watched the movie, I just wanted a laugh and I did!! Non-stop laughing is what we need when every time you turn the radio or the TV on, news are so bleak...", u'-0.131674', u"Intouchables is a true story of Philippe ,a rich aristocrat who is paralyzed from neck down and Driss ,an unemployed man coming from a poverty stricken family..\n\nFrancois & Omar as the lead cast give a superb performance .. The charismatic Omar (Driss) is just amazing..His very presence on screen is powerful as he juggles between rib-tickling comedy and some serious drama...Francois (Philippe) is on par with Omar...He gives a very controlled performance and is able to hold strong against Omar's contrasting character.Considering,Francois had to act as a quadriplegic, he has done an amazing job..His expressions itself substitute any needs of dialogues.. The bond the two develop is pure gem.\n\nStory is smooth and never drags..It could have been an intense drama movie,but the directors usage of comedy made it stand out from other similar stories..Direction is sharp & the movie doesn't rely on any over the top scenes..\n\nThe music is beautifully blended into the movie and it enhances the effectiveness of many scenes...\n\nThe Intouchables can be described by one word..Beautiful...The movie is a must watch for all..\n\nActing- 5/5 Story- 5/5 Direction- 5/5 Comedy- 5/5 Drama- 5/5", u'0.407692', u"Sometimes u pick a movie and straight away u feel it is going to be a special one. I had that feeling with intouchables ,The story of poor meets rich is not a new one ,but this story is in a strange way different. This movie shows we basically are all human, no matter what \n\n.Due to the very big contrast of differences on almost everything it is very unlikely they would meet each other ,but they met each other on the right moment for both .As i don't want to spoil everything, i would like to add this is in my honest opinion the best movie from 2011 along with incendies.The acting was tremendous and i liked every second of it .\n\nThis movie is very funny and laughable but there are a lot messages in it ,it has the right balance of funny and serious so it doesn't turn in to a comedy enjoy and don't doubt to watch it.", u'0.52443', u'This was for sure one of the Top5 or Top10 movies I\'ve ever seen. The actors, the ambiente, the story ... simply everything was in a perfect combination. This film is for me in a league with films like "The Elephant Man", but for a much wider audience. And as the title say, after this film I really have to consider to reduce my ratings for several films, because it seems a bit unfair to put them on the same level as this film, although I don\'t have anything to criticize on them at all. All the persons in the film are very authentic played. And both main characters surprised me with a brilliant performance. I would say, that both actors are really what they are playing in the film. If I would see Fran\xe7ois Cluzet in the street, I would be surprised not seeing him in a wheelchair. The emotions shown in the last sequence of the film are so brilliant.', u'0.310856'], u'tt0047478': [u'\nThe archetypal action film, Seven Samurai is also one of the richest works to ever be committed to celluloid. Each of its characters is extraordinarily realized; each has his or her own arc, his or her own vital part to play in the film\'s slow progression towards its dramatic finale. Typically, Kurosawa has put the film together using an exceeding degree of artistry; each and every shot, each action sequence, is exquisitely composed; and yet none seems contrived or out-of-place within the overall fabric of the work. Everything is beautifully conceived and in focus, both literally and figuratively.\n\nWhen watching Seven Samurai, movie lovers will immediately recognize that several of its key elements can be readily detected in countless similar films made during the last half-century. The audition scenes, in which several samurai are recruited for the difficult task of defending a farming town from a group of bandits, strikes a particularly familiar chord, as do those showing the samurai training the lowly villagers to fight and use weapons. Indeed, the theme of a highly experienced group of "tough guys" taking up the cause of the disenfranchised has become something of an action film cliche, portions of which echo throughout the American western, as well as its progeny (think The Dirty Dozen, The Road Warrior or even television\'s The A Team).\n\nBut what really stands out in Seven Samurai are its characters. They run the gamut, from elder teacher to hopeful youth, stoic warrior to undisciplined brigand. Kurosawa even finds room for a youthful romance, not to mention the mix of poor and beleaguered townspeople he depicts within the setting of the town. Perhaps its no wonder the enemy bandits are virtually faceless-- there is so much conflict and passion present within the group of protagonists, the villains need not be more than a vague threat. \n\nThrough it all Kurosawa never forgets who these people are and where they stand in comparison to one another. Obviously, the samurai are, for the most part, samurai, while the townspeople are merely peasants, lacking even in funds to pay their noble defenders. Kurosawa deftly illustrates these class differences by having one peasant fear horribly for the honor of his daughter, who he suspects will be lured by the wealth of the samurai; and also by giving us one samurai who is no samurai at all, but merely a peasant himself whose own farming village was in his youth destroyed by marauding warriors. The film thus wraps a a portrait of class conflict in a cloak of solidarity. The samurai unite to defend the poor peasants, but the ending is not exactly happy for them. Nor are the peasants completely honorable. We learn, for instance, that they have in the past murdered defeated samurai and looted their bodies, and it becomes apparent late in the film that their claims of poverty are perhaps not as truthful as at first seemed apparent.\n\nSo why do the samurai defend them so valiantly? For honor? For love of adventure? The answer to this question is left intentionally vague; it is up to each viewer to draw his or her own conclusions. It is to the film\'s credit that it forces such questions upon us while never allowing them to cause the motivations of its characters to seem untrue.\n\nModern viewers will find the action sequences of Seven Samurai to be restrained. There are, for instance, no "Gladiator" or "Braveheart" moments in which limbs are visibly hacked off, blood flies and speakers pound with booming audio. But the action is wonderfully filmed and there is some early use of slow motion to accentuate key moments. The 3 1/2 hour running time may also deter some, but I find the length to be one of the film\'s charms; it takes its dear sweet time in exposing its riches, and no single moment feels underdeveloped or awkward. Don\'t miss it.\n\n10/10', u'-0.00716681', u"\nAkira Kurosawa's masterpiece... The Japanese equivalent to Orson Welles' Citizen Kane.. I say it's just as good, if not even better. Not only Kurosawa's most well known film, but the most widely recognized Japanese film ever made. This movie will forever be known as a milestone in motion picture history.\n\nThe story revolves around a village that has become a group of bandits' common looting and pillaging ground. The villagers cannot take this any longer and go to town to hire warriors to defend the village from the bandits. A wandering ronin, Kambei (Takashi Shimura) agrees to help them and with his help, they recruit six others that agree to take the job. The seven samurai teach the villagers how to stand up to the bandits and defend themselves. Finally, when the time comes, they engage in a fierce battle with the attacking bandits.\n\nAbout once in every 20 years or so we are gifted with a film that has the meaning, power, richness, and technique that The Seven Samurai has. I cannot urge anyone enough to see this film, the images are true cinematic poetry rich with so much emotion that I cannot even describe them in words. If you have never seen any of Kurosawa's works, then please see Seven Samurai... you will witness the true beauty, excellence and magic that the art form known as film is capable of.", u'0.059903', u"I discovered 16 of Kurosawa's best known films before returning to the one which is commonly thought of as his masterpiece. Seven Samurai is unlike any other grand classic ever produced. It's basic plot can be summed up in a single easy sentence, yet its refinement and execution rival any movie you've ever seen. \n\nThe premise: in chaotic 16th century Japan, as marauders threaten raid villages, one village hires samurai to defend it from a group of bandits. Yet Kurosawa (also co-writer) developed these characters in a way unheard of for what might pass as an epic action film. To its astonishing credit, through all of its 207 minutes running time, Seven Samurai never falters or bores. And if the script is a marvel in itself, the acting and production design than derive from it are nothing short of superlative. It is said that Kurosawa forced the villagers (from supporting role to mere extra) to live together as a community during production and be their characters, each and every one of which he had drawn out specifically. This unusual technique gave Seven Samurai a feel of authenticity unparalleled in film history.\n\nThe samurai themselves are so richly given life to in the screenplay that little more would have been needed to make them memorable characters, yet the main cast pay off at every turn, and though every one of the seven main actors give in perfect performances (never as I had feared before watching it do you confuse them, even in the chaotic battle scenes), two immortal roles have a particularly resounding effect: Takashi Shimura (Kambei Shimada), who plays the leader of the ragged band of samurai, gives his sage and venerable warrior a god-like intensity that makes the magnetic charisma of his character unquestionable. One of the easiest leaders to root for in all the history of film-making. Stealing the show however, albeit by a very thin margin, is longtime Kurosawa favorite coworker Toshiro Mifune (Kikuchiyo) as the rogue seventh, the black sheep of the herd, giving the bravura ultimate performance of a lifetime paved throughout with great roles. \n\nThe story follows them and the villagers, equally nuanced and developed, through their encounter, training, eventual bonding and the big inevitable fight for survival. Unlike subsequent very successful remakes (i.e. Magnificent Seven), seven Samurai transcended excellency by having many layers (nothing or no one is white or black: everything exists in shades of gray) and thus being very real and human. Even without the menace, its interpersonal dynamics would have made it perfect human drama, subtle, balancing comedy, intensity, realism, drama and a deep philosophy with astonishing ease, yet the menace does materialize and thus Seven Samurai unleashes its violence in a series of action scenes crafted with such vision and ingenuity as has ever reached an action film (the frenetic battle scenes at the end rather evoke Saving Private Ryan in their relentlessness).\n\nIn the end, what made this into solid gold was, at the core, Akira Kurosawa, who would, despite directing many further masterpieces (Throne of Blood, Yojimbo, Red Beard, Dersu Uzala, Kagemusha, Ran), would never top this one. Throughout his life, Kurosawa kept confirming his status as perhaps the greatest director ever. If so, Seven Samurai is the ultimate proof of that truth. One of the very best films ever made and personal all-time favorite.", u'0.47123', u"\nIn 1954, Kurosawa made foreign film history with Seven Samurai. Everything about this film is just absolutely terrific. The film lasts around 3 1/2 hours, and every minute of it is unbelievable filmmaking. Kurosawa's blend of stellar craft, captivating cinematography, ravishing art direction, and unforgettable characters makes this one of the most intelligent films ever made. The first hour is devoted to devoloping the many four-dimensional characters which inhabit the film throughout. When watching the film, the audiece cares for, trusts, mourns and ultimately believes every single attribute the characters have. Samurai set up the way that many action films are made today; films like Predator and Alien still work within it's boundaries. The battle scenes are terrific and the fast-paced editing is ground-breaking. If people have a problem with subtitles and long movies, then see this and your opinions will change. The sheer filmmaking of Kurosawa will not disappoint. Also see Yojimbo and High & Low.", u'0.426822', u'\nHaving seen Kurosawa\'s Seven Samurai at least 10 times, I still see something new every time I watch it.  I don\'t see how anyone, especially a non-Japanese, could possibly absorb this movie in less than 2 or 3 viewings.  I\'ve always been surprised at how each of the 7 samurai can make such an individual impression on you even if you can\'t understand Japanese.  Although Toshiro Mifune is often considered the star, for me its Takashi Shimura who is firmly fixed at the center of the movie.  He is the guiding moral force from the moment of his appearance in the film and can capture the viewer\'s attention in a way similar to Alec Guinness.  Mifune\'s character can be annoying at first in his loutish behavior, but he gains stature throughout the film and eventually becomes a unifying force second only to Shimura.  Minoru Chiaki as the woodcutting samurai provides a subtle humor and the others look to him to boost their morale.  Daisuke Kato is another very familiar face to Japanese movie fans and provides an excellent foil to Shimura as his second in command.  Yoshio Inaba is very good as the samurai who is recruited by Shimura and quickly builds a strong rapport with him.  Seiji Miyaguchi as the "expert" warrior, dedicated to honing his skill as a swordsman is a very low key yet likeable character.  Ko Kimura as the young hero-worshipping samurai, as well as the love interest of the peasant girl, wishes to be a great samurai, but is easily distracted by a field of flowers or a pretty face.  The peasants in the village being defended by the samurai each have their own defining characteristics as well.\n\nIn addition to the wealth of interesting characters, we have a terrific action plot--the defending of the village from 40 marauding bandits by the small troop of samurai--, and a more subtle secondary plot involving the distrust of the samurai by the villagers due to the historical interaction of these two classes in feudal Japan.  All of these plot and character elements are woven together into an unforgettable epic, but, at least in my opinion, its not one that can be absorbed in a single sitting.  While it\'s similar in this sense to another of my favorite epics, Leone\'s Once Upon a Time in the West, it is more complex given the number of characters.\n\nI can only say that your patience with this film will probably be well rewarded if you take the time to give it multiple viewings.  You will also have the pleasure of seeing many of the samurai and villagers pop up in other Kurosawa films and films of other Japanese directors.  If you like Mifune and Shimura in this one, catch them in Stray Dog and Drunken Angel in very different settings and parts.  \n\nThis one is 10 out of 10 without a doubt.', u'0.31122', u'Well, if you haven\'t seen Seven Samurai then you\'re not really \r qualified to call yourself a film fan, basically. One of the most \r influential movies of all time, that still holds up extremely well \r nearly 50 years later.\r \r\nAkira Kurosawa\'s epic tale of heroism and barbarism set the standard in \r so many ways it\'s hard to imagine that any modern film does not show \r its influence in some way or other. A great script, great characters, \r mostly great acting, splendid cinematography and action sequences that \r wrote the book about how these things should be filmed. Even now, after \r so many have tried to imitate or beat it, Seven Samurai remains a \r totally gripping 3.5 hour experience.\r \r\nAkira Kurosawa is one of the gods of Cinema - men who seem to have been \r born to make films, who have it in their blood. People like Alfred \r Hitchcock, Stanley Kubrick, King Hu and Steven Spielberg, who make it \r look easy... who so obviously "get it". In this pantheon, Kurosawa is \r perhaps the daddy of them all, however, and Seven Samurai is one of his \r finest moments.\r \r\nThe scale of the production is remarkable - to undertake making such an \r epic in post-war Japan was a feat in itself. The cast of dozens of \r inhabitants of a village specially built for the movie, the 40 bandits \r and their horses, all the costumes, the armour, the weapons. Few \r directors could have brought all of this together and still paid such \r attention to the smallest of details in script and scene. Credit must \r go to the team Kurosawa worked with too, I presume \r \r\nThe movie\'s setup became the template for many movies to follow, the \r most recentl example that comes to mind being the excellent Korean \r period movie MUSA (The Warrior), for example. A motley band of \r characters is assembled and placed in a situation where the odds are \r seemingly stacked against them, and each gets there chance to really \r shine, prove themselves and become something more than a normal man.\r \r\nKurosawa\'s Samurai movies all share a little bit in common, which is \r the depiction of the Samurai as some noble beast, different from the \r common and pathetic rabble of ordinary man. In Seven Samurai the \r farmers are a base lot, cowardly, selfish, vain, pathetic and \r treacherous. How he found actors with such miserable looking faces is a \r mystery in itself. In contrast, the Samurai embody all the qualities \r that humanity would generally like to believe define it (us). Brave, \r righteous, honest, strong and heroic. Toshiro Mifune\'s character stands \r in the middle and represents this difference - perhaps meant to suggest \r that mankind can strive to rise above his flaws, but mostly suggesting \r to me that the common man is basically a mess and we should learn to \r respect our betters. Kurosawa was definitely not a socialist, unless \r I\'m mis-reading him wildly.\r \r\nI\'m sure many out there wonder, does a 50 year old black and white \r movie about Samurai really have any interest or relevance to us in the \r 21st century? The answer is a definite "Yes!". Seven Samurai shows us \r what cinema can be, what cinema is *meant* to be. It is moving picture \r as art in a way that the multiplex-fillers of today cannot possibly \r claim to be. It\'s a film that satisfies on many different levels, and \r still provides a bench mark which today\'s film makers could and should \r use to evaluate their own contributions. True, few out there will ever \r be able to claim they\'ve made a film that rivals Seven Samurai in scope \r or beauty, but this *is* what every director should aspire to! The sad \r thing is, I just can\'t see a project like this ever coming out of the \r Hollywood studio system, where art is just another commodity and \r marketing is the new god', u'0.28253', u'\nStory-telling at its finest, "Seven Samurai" is a terrific film not because of a handful of memorable scenes or lines, but rather because scene-by-scene, frame-by-frame, it tells an interesting story as well as it is possible to tell it.  The story and characters are developed carefully, and everything about the movie, from the settings and props to the musical score, is done carefully and expertly.\n\nMifune grabs the attention in most of his scenes, and Shimura\'s more restrained character is a nice balance.  Those two have the best parts, but all seven of the samurai are memorable characters.  The sequence of events that collects the seven together occupies the first part of the movie, and forms a perfect foundation for the rest.  A few of the villagers are also portrayed nicely, although they are naturally overshadowed when the samurai are around.\n\nThe story always moves along nicely, with many ups and downs.  It has enough unpredictability to keep you interested the whole time, without ever losing its credibility.  There is plenty of action, but there is also substance behind the action to give it more significance.  The only possible drawback is the long running time (you can always split it up into two installments, but it\'s more satisfying if you can watch the whole story through at once), but there is little that you could cut out, even if you wanted to.  It holds your attention the entire time with a good story and great technique, not by resorting to sensational or sordid details.\n\nThis movie well deserves its reputation for excellence, and is one that everyone who appreciates classic cinema will want to see and enjoy.\n', u'0.548931', u'Though its biblical connotation is not the happiest one ("Seven Deadly Sins") number seven, omnipresent in our (7 days a) weekly cycles, seems to have been a lucky number in the world of cinema. Several very solid and some great movies have this number in their title, starting with gag-wise incredibly inventive Seven Chances (1925) from genius of silent era Buster Keaton, Frank Borzage\'s silent version of classic melodrama 7th Heaven (1927), Walt Disney\'s first feature-length animated movie, Snowhite and Seven Dwarfs (1940), recognized as an instant classic and remained so ever after, Stanley Donen\'s ear-pleasing, eye-riveting musical Seven Brides for Seven Brothers (1954), staged in western milieu, with an outstanding dance sequence, Ingmar Bergman\'s literally Death-defying, answers-to-reasons-for-human-misfortune-seeking masterpiece, Det sjunde inseglet ("The Seventh Seal") (1957), Billy Wilder\'s Seven Year Itch (1957), a clever and amusing first collaboration with incomparable Marilyn Monroe (a worm-up for their second, bigger if not decisive step in taboos-of-the-motion-picture-production-code-breaking, brilliant comedy Some Like It Hot (1959)), up to newer examples like David Fincher\'s disturbing drama Se7en (1995), one of the finest Hollywood movies of the 90\'s, as well as Tsui Hark\'s Chat Gim ("Seven Swords") (2005), a stunner in the department of action sequences from the often under-appreciated genre Wuxia, originating from Chinese literature.\n\nHowever, even among such illustrious examples of movie-making par excellence, one movie holds a special place, Shichinin no samurai ("Seven Samurai") (1954) from the legendary Japanese director Akira Kurosawa. This movie doesn\'t seem to lack anything that an avid movie consumer, in particular samurai genre admirer, might be wishing for.\n\nIt is not easy to say anything new about the one of the most analyzed and scrutinized movies of the film history. Nevertheless, and despite being eventually only repeated, it shall be mentioned that movie has a simple but very engaging story - a group of peasants, representing a village, periodically stormed by gang of bandits, looting their crops and other possessions, hires several wandering ronins (masterless samurai) to help them protect the village - not without lucid observations on the possibility of social interaction between members of different classes during the almost seven centuries long feudal history (1185\x961868) of Japan.\n\nCharacterization is excellent, and though having clear stand-outs in samurai\'s true leader, Kambei (Takashi Shimura), a wise tactician of the exceptional valor, as well as in the exuberantly uncontrollable Kikuchiyo (Toshiro Mifune), messy in its appearance and blustering in its manner, yet, a peasant descendant himself, making for a perfect link between the samurai and their employers, all other samurai are memorable, as well, sporting wide variety of personality traits. In joining the village protection campaign, hired for nothing more than a regular meal for as long as providing a service, thus primarily hoping to finally fill their starving stomachs, each one of them was driven by different additional motives, whether they were challenged to test their bravery, fighting skills and tactics, seeking for excitement and recognition, trying to regain pride and glory of the past days, just reaching out for that human touch (cross-class communication, even mere courtship promising relationship) they have been deprived of, or simply interested in its noble cause.\n\nTogether with true highlights in realistically choreographed battle scenes, showing all the pain and misery of excessive violence on the reverse of heroism, that even defenders cannot avoid resorting to, sadly announcing inevitable decline of the samurai and their ways exposed to new artless technology, unbecomingly dying ambushed by distant shots from the muskets, while ingloriously stuck in the village muds... it all makes for a compelling narrative.\n\nThough triumphant in their common task to protect the village, unlikely alliance between samurai and peasants is ultimately doomed to fail. In the short run, it gives expected results, but in the long run, does not stand the chance. That is so loudly, although in fact silently, expressed at the end, when peasants don\'t even care to join the surviving samurai in their mourning over the fallen ones, not even giving the last well deserved respect to those who have helped them withstand fierce attacks, prevail and ultimately defeat bandits, and, in doing so, most of them given their lives. Peasants simply continue with their daily chores, while surviving samurai have to leave the village, like they have never existed, sadly symbolizing their ultimate destiny: slowly but surely stepping off the future pages of the history books.\n\nSeven Samurai, the movie, is rightfully considered as the one that has redefined samurai film in its contemporary perception, and dawned almost two decades long string of successes, instantly becoming the brightest example of thus revived, uniquely provocative and entertaining sub-genre, unknown as such in the country of its origin, classified there within a broader genre, jidaigeki (a period drama, often describing events from pre-modern era of the Edo period, marking the governance of Tokugawa shogunate (1603-1868), relatively peaceful times for Japan\'s long history of civil wars, as opposed to gendaigeki, films treating contemporary matters), and by IMDb standards, as an action drama, occasionally historical, when based on real events.\n\nOriginating in the Edo-era Far East, it has inspired equally successful, star-studded (Y. Brynner, S. McQueen, C. Bronson, J. Coburn, E. Wallach, R. Vaughn, H. Buchholz, B. Dexter) Hollywood remake, The Magnificent Seven (1960), conveniently situated in the U.S. West of 19th century, as well as three lesser sequels, Return of... (1966), Guns of... (1969), and ...Ride! (1972).', u'-0.00695184', u"Akira Kurosawa was and is considered the master of east-western film-making (in that he made his Japanese films accessible for fans of American westerns while still making the movies his country found popular), and out of the few Kurosawa movies I've had the pleasure of viewing (Hidden Fortress, Rashomon, and this) I'd have to say that while Rashomon is still my favorite, I nevertheless had a blast during this one. The story has become quite influential to filmmakers from the likes of John Sturges (The Magnificent Seven) to John Lasseter (A Bug's Life): a small village has been terrorized by bandits for far too long, amid times of civil war in the nation, and so on the advice of Grand-Dad, they decide to hire four - which soon becomes seven - samurai for the job. There's no money, just food and honor, even though the village isn't exactly pleased to have samurai back in their village. Each character is drawn and executed compellingly, though for my money Toshiro Mifune proves why he became one of Japan's most notorious film actors. His work as the brave, bold outcast of the seven is awe-inspiring practically all the way through, like the hero of a western that anyone can root for since he's a true rebel at heart within a group of men with a task at hand. \n\nKurosawa directs his tale and main and supporting players like a grand composer, orchestrating a vivid story and extracting from great actors like Takashi Shimura (the old, wise Samurai), Ko Kimura (the disciple Samurai), Daisuke Kato (Schichiroji), and Mifune (Kikuchiyo, which isn't his real name) just the right touches of humanity, humor, tragedy, romance, and intensity. The overall intensity, by the way, isn't over-estimated; its long length (almost 3 1/2 hours) isn't distracting in the slightest since Kurosawa's editing and photography (the later helmed by Asakazu Nakai) are extraordinary. Not to compare the two films, but one thing I saw in common with Seven Samurai and a Lord of the Rings film is that, if anything else, it definitely isn't a boring experience. Along with a score by Fumio Hayasaka that gives the film just a bit more of a pulse, and a showdown that is relentless with excitement, this is one of the must-see action films for film buffs, or anyone with an serious interest in having fun with an epic.", u'0.386433', u"\nThis is one of those great epic films that stands the test of time. I only saw this film for the first time in 2000, almost 50 years after it was made, and was astounded by it. It was an epic that truly told the whole story. Whereas most movies today manage to skirt around huge chunks of what would happen, this movie manages to show them all, and not in a boring way. The samurai don't even reach the village in danger until more than 30 minutes into the film, all that time being spent getting to know each of the characters and the motivation and history behind them. We get to truly learn what it takes to be a samurai, and what truly sets them apart. By the time we arrive at the village we have become attached to some of the samurai in a very personal way, respecting each of them in their own way. The rest of the movie progresses as if it were a documentary, not a fictional film, where we see each and every piece of the grand puzzle that happens in this village. I can't recommend this film enough, though I must throw a disclaimer out that if you're not a fan of epic movies with subtitles you may not be as interested. It is a 3 1/2 hour long movie! But if you can find the time to sit down and watch it, I doubt you'll be very disappointed.", u'-0.0199611', u'\nThis is my favorite Kurosawa film, the man was a true master of the cinematic arts.  If you have never seen a Kurosawa film definetly make this your first.  Though extremely long at about 3 1/2 hours it is well worth the time spent.\n\nTo quickly summarize, a poor Japanese village hires 7 Samurai to protect it from being raided by bandits.  Don\'t get me wrong there is way more to it than that, I just dont want to give anything away.  This is an intense and emotional movie that hooks you from the first scene and keeps you on the line till it is all over.  The battle scene at the end is in true Kurosawa form.  The acting is outstanding by everyone involved from the main characters all the way down to the very last extra.  Of course the best way to see any film, especially a Kurosawa film is on the big screen if you are able to.  Beautifully filmed, in black and white, anyone familiar with Kurosawa\'s work has to wonder visually how much more gorgeous it could have been had Kurosawa had the option of color in 1954.\n\nThe camera use is brilliant and every scene is balanced visually.  This film is also the first one to use "the wipe" as a way of changing from one scene to another.  This technique was later used by George Lucas in his Star Wars movies.  I would also recommend the DVD version that has the commentary option by the Japanese cinema expert if anyone is interested in a deeper understanding of the "hows" and "whys" of Kurosawa\'s film making.  Any man, woman, boy or girl who just wants to see a really, really great movie, THIS IS THE ONE!  An A+++ in my book.', u'0.456469', u'Donald Richie thought it was Kurosawa\'s finest, and suggested that it might the best Japanese film ever made. \n\nIt is a film that rewards casual viewing and careful viewing and repeated viewing and viewing over time. Isn\'t that rather like a wonderful book, that rewards you every time you pick it up? I suppose that is the definition of greatness. \n\nHow was this greatness achieved? (This is not a rhetorical question. It truly astonishes me how this film creates meaning...cutting across all boundaries of nationality, language, and culture to become a meaningful personal experience for those who view it). This creation of greatness may be a mystery, but we can point to the some features of the film\'s excellence: \n\nThe artistic achievement: The music, the cinematography, the extensive set design, the editing and the acting in the service of a moving story all conspire to create a world that becomes ours on a deeply personal level. It is a film which influences later films and filmmakers. \n\nThe narrative achievement: Based on an original concept of Kurosawa\'s which began as a "day in the life" documentary of a samurai\'s existence, Kurosawa developed the idea into this breathtaking film of samurai who save a village. This simple but complexly nuanced human story involves us in different social classes in an historical framework. We come to know individual peasants and samurai, and feel that we know significant things about them, their motivations, hopes and fears.\n\nThe achievements of the actors: These are characters you will love, people you need to have in your life: the characters of Kyuzo, Heihachi and the unforgettable Bokuzen Hidari as a bewildered peasant..! Takeshi Shimura, as the leader of the samurai, Gambei, is the embodiment of wisdom, and calm in the storm. And, saying that Toshiro Mifune has star power is like saying the noonday sun sheds a little warmth. \n\nToshiro: It\'s the cut of his jawline when he asks the village patriarch, "Got a problem, grandad?", and the most charming look of confusion and embarrassment playing over his face when he is told by Heihachi that he is the triangle on the samurai flag. It\'s his energy, speed and agility and power and intelligence. Mifune sniffing out the fuse of a gun in the woods, bouncing through the brush half-naked in an abbreviated set of armor, or carrying his ridiculously oversize sword on one shoulder, Mifune crying over a baby, and the incomparable scene of his embarrassment that turns to rage when Mifune accuses the samurai of creating the farmer\'s condition. \n\nToshiro Mifune represents with extraordinary physicality the spirit of a man desperate to prove his worth: Mifune\'s got the animal sexuality, the physical response to emotional situations, the expressive face, the humorous and varied vocalisms to make us feel deeply what his character experiences: his struggles, his growth.(His drunken burblings as the last "samurai" to audition are nothing short of hilarious, and his "fish singing" is eerie and funny, too...also the grunted "eh?" that he often uses to show confusion, and the "heh" of disgust..such wonderful sounds, and so expressive!) Mifune\'s acting is wild and alive, even more than 50 years after the film\'s original release. \n\nTakashi Shimura: You will trust him with your life. His great, open heart, his mature calm, his honesty and compassion make him one of the greatest of all samurai on film.\n\nFumio Hayasaka\'s music: Kuroasawa was lucky to have such a brilliant composer as collaborator. Themes introduce characters, and the samurai theme is surprising and memorable. If you have viewed the film, chances are, the samurai theme is playing in your mind with just a mention of the music. Hayasaka\'s music is muscular and nuanced: creating humor, or a counterpoint to the action, or deepening our sympathy for and understanding of the characters. \n\nMuraki\'s scenography: There is no doubt that the places shown in the film are real. The achievement of Kurosawa\'s longtime collaborator provide a real world for the action.\n\nThe filmography is ground-breaking: the multiple cameras, slow-motion and attention to light and composition make each frame worthy of an 8X10 glossy. How can individual moments of such beauty be sustained throughout the movement of the film? It is an astonishing feat. And, best of all, no image degenerates into interior design or vacuous prettiness...everything forwards the movement of the cinematic experience. When the film ends, we feel as if we have lived it! \n\nIt is with great respect and humility that I offer my thanks to the memory of Mr. Kurosawa. His great work leads us to treasure humanity and its struggles, to develop our own abilities to feel compassion, encourages us to try to make good choices, to be socially and morally responsible, to embrace life.', u'0.576922', u'\nIt is hard to know exactly where to begin when talking about a film of such utter quality.  What must be said at the start is that "The Seven Samurai" is flawless.  It\'s characters are brought to life by some of the finest and most committed acting I have ever seen. It is a compelling story of courage, duty, honor, respect and change.\n\nI could echo Roger Ebert\'s commentary, in which he noted that Kurosawa\'s film set the standard for the modern action film. It was he notes the first film to assemble a team of hardened men to undertake a mission.  But I say read Eberts review if you want to get his take.\n\nI have watched the film several times and what is truly amazing about "The Seven Samurai" is the way in which Kurosawa choses to tell his tale, which is, I think, truly innovative and subtle.\n\nGrowing up on action fare as we have "Seven Samurai" should really hold no magic for us.  We have the formula (in many forms) before.  Countless times. However it is not old to us and magic it carries. I make the case (now anyway) that this comes largely from Kurosawa\'s knack,  his amazing gift, for photographic composition.  Most filmmakers today in the action genre have some flare for flashy cinematography.  We get sharp angles, dramatic poses  (most favorably lighted), and fast cuts.  I guess this is to involve us in the high emotion of the situation.  But Kurosawa has patience and while I think he gave the blocking of his shots, and their composition a great deal of thought, it comes across as if he did not.  His camera moves as though it were simply following the characters through the story.  The camera work in "Seven" is so much more subtle and so much more compelling than almost any action fare today.  His camera allows, we the viewer, to be, at various times, all of the major characters in the film.\n\nToshiro Mifune\'s emotional explosion at his "fellow" Samurai is probably the most obvious example of this.  He gets up and at first appears to agree with the Samurai sentiment that killing all of the villagers is a good idea, but when he turns and his anger is directed at them the scene and our place in it change.  We are no longer passive viewers watching heated exchange between two factions.  The angry Toshiro is yelling at us, looking down at us.  For we are looking up at him as his fellow samurai would see him. By the end of his out burst he angrily leaves the room but before he goes he turns slightly to look at us, but we don\'t see his face, for now we are looking (in one of the great shots of the film) at his feet.  The Samurai are ashamed and so are we because we identified with them at first and Kurosawa had the guts to show us that we are wrong to do so.\n\nI could go on, and on about his film, but I leave you with this, watch  it.\n', u'0.120025', u"Shichinin no samurai is a quintessential Kurosawa movie, and probably his greatest lagniappe to the world of cinema. Shichinin no samurai is a classic example of a profound character study well complemented by some ingenious direction and breathtaking cinematography. The world of cinema owes a colossal debt to the master movie-maker and plethora of his sui generis works such as this one. The movie depicts penury with sheer brilliance and uncanny resplendence. \n\nThe inexorable resolve exhibited by the destitute villagers to fight the rapacious bandits can be inspiring even to the most pessimistic. The fidelity shown by the samurai to the villagers, each hired for a bowl of rice, accentuates the very essence of humanity. The movie's slow pace and its poignant background score enriches it with a sense of melancholy, thereby making it truly mesmerizing to watch. The entire cast has performed really well, taking care of the nuances with utmost precision and incredible conviction. Kurosawa's plaintive storytelling, coupled with his subtle brilliance, makes the movie a truly ineffable experience for the viewer. \n\nPS. Though not meant for everyone, the movie is sine qua non for cineastes and avid lovers of pristine cinema. It's also a great means to get acquainted with Kurosawa's oeuvre before exploring his more personal works like Rashomon, Ikiru, Ran, etc.\n\nhttp://www.apotpourriofvestiges.com/", u'0.731482', u'Much has been said here about why would anyone bother reviewing a film they didn\'t like. I almost didn\'t. But then I thought about the emperor\'s new clothes. Somebody\'s got to cry "Foul!"\n\nAnd "Foul" it was. Mind you, this is only my opinion. I respect your right to fall in with the majority who evidently think this film is the Cat\'s Pajamas. I did give it a 2 because it does have some good lines. And, after all, Shakespeare did say "The play\'s the thing." The story is a good story, though it too is not believable. We want to believe that hard-bitten professionals in any field of endeavor beneath it all have a heart of gold. And we might have too, had any of the character been believable. Not a one. I wanted to call it "overacting", but alas, it was just bad acting. Should I mention "whiney-face"? Could an actual person have carried that expression around permanently?\n\nThere were those who suggested that detractors didn\'t like the film because it was "old" or in "black and white". I watched this ponderous film last night because I thought I should. I was prepared to be enthralled. James Coburn said he watched this film 12 times in 12 days. That was enough for me. By the time the film was mercifully over, I wondered who had been holding a gun to his head for those 12 days.\n\nI like old. I like black and white. I don\'t like bad. I especially don\'t like bad that so many have told me is good. So after I watched this last night, tonight I watched Jean Simmons in "Home Before Dark". Made in 1958 (only 4 years newer) and also in black and white. A ways into the movie, I suddenly realized that these two films could be compared on a basic filmmaking level. Jean Simmons can actually act. In fact, all of the supporting cast can act, too. The characters were believable. Maybe not in an actual sense but at least in the sense of "suspended disbelief". Can\'t do that with Seven Samurai. Much has been said of the fine score of Seven. No. Other than tribal drums, nothing seemed to fit. Just the opposite for Home. It had a score that really fit what was going on on the screen at the time.\n\nI could go on, but my rant is assuaged and I\'m too tired to write more.\n\nFor those of you who have not seen the film, the following is for you: DON\'T WASTE YOUR TIME. EVERYBODY ELSE IS WRONG.', u'-0.265888'], u'tt0114369': [u'\nThe movie, "Se7en", starring Brad Pitt, Morgan Freeman, and Gwyneth Paltrow, is by far one of the most inventive, well-written, and cerebral films in recent history. The film, blending a well put together combination of dark visual style, intense plot development, and polished acting, remains tight and focused throughout, from beginning to end, never straying outwards into unimportant issues, or resorting to typical Hollywood clich\xe9s. Se7en is uniquely on its own for suspense dramas as it both fuels the need of the audience to be drawn in and entertained by the events unfolding, and remain uncompromising and shocking, thus satisfying the initial vision of the director, David Fincher.\n\nThe story surrounds the hunt for a serial killer, who, inspired by Dante Alighieri\'s seven deadly sins from "The Divine Comedy", sets out to, "preach" about man\'s impurity, and does so by targeting victims, then torturing them by pitting their own underlining sins against them. Se7en seemingly starts out as a typical cat and mouse detective story, however, it quickly develops into of a sort of modern-myth, with good and evil taking centre stage. The story is original on all counts, and thrilling on all levels. The most important aspect of Se7en, however, is that it keeps the audience numerous steps behind its story, as oppose to other thrillers, which become predictable and bland by the end. By keeping the audience in the dark, the film remains fresh and original as it progresses. Se7en even dramatically turns the tide at one point, just as the audience is finally getting comfortable and asserted into the gloomy atmosphere, thus creating as much as fear and uncertainty in the audience as it is with the characters involved. By the film\'s conclusion, the audience is as much apart of the film as the characters themselves, and arrive at Se7en\'s surprise ending without a single clue of it, prior to it occurring. Se7en\'s poetic ending(which will not be given away) says a lot for the people behind the movie, showing they are not afraid of going against the grain. A rarity with films so nowadays.\n\nDirected brilliantly by David Fincher, and skillfully written by Andrew Kevin Walker, Se7en is well crafted and ingeniously clever, making it one of the greatest films of the 90\'s. While Se7en may not have garnered critical acclaim as such films as Silence of the Lambs, Se7en is, undoubtedly, as influential as any film to date.\n\nScore 10/10\n', u'0.445098', u'\nSeven\'s quality puts it so far beyond most of the "cops on trail of deranged killer" genre that it comes out as a true jewel of cinema. Everything about seven is perfect. It is art captured on film. This movie is a bright spot for all of the stars who worked on it. \n\nBrad Pitt never gets the credit he deserves for his acting because he\'s a pretty boy and the press is a lot more interested about how he and Jennifer are doing. That\'s a shame because he is a talented actor that isn\'t afraid to take chances with both the roles that he picks and the characters that he plays. That is quite rare in the A-list world. Morgan Freeman is a great actor. You can always count on him to do what he does best which is play a wise veteran that has seen it all. Kevin Spacey is another great actor that has great range and really puts life and personality into his characters.\n\n\nThe real talent of this movie, excluding the actors that brought it to life, is the director David Fincher and the writer Andrew Kevin Walker. Fincher\'s talents for making a visually stunning film are now well known and he often brings a dark patina to his work. Andrew Kevin Walker must have some incredible demons living inside him. Either that or one hell of an imagination for bringing the intricate story of Seven and the plan of John Doe to life. \n\nJohn Doe\'s plan really is twisted and I won\'t be spoiling it here. Suffice to say I have never seen so evil and complicated a plan in a movie before or since. The cinematography of the film is dark but beautiful and throughout the film it is either night or raining or both except for two very brief moments. It is such an emotional movie that you can\'t keep from being caught up in what is happening. Do you understand and sympathize with what John Doe is doing or do you think him a mad killer that must be stopped.\n\nBottom Line: If you haven\'t had the opportunity to see Seven yet then you must at least rent it. It is so damn good that I know you will like it. The only reason you wouldn\'t is because you\'re just too damn fragile to take something this hardcore. ', u'0.283667', u'\nSeldom does a film elucidate the culpability of our culture,of our society, in the mayhem and madness we often find in everyday life. According to Se7en, our culture is drifting through darkness. The mouthpiece for this thematic undercurrent is Somerset, a literate man who also happens to be a detective, a man who can read a clue ("This isn\'t going to be a happy ending") or Dante\'s Inferno with equal aplomb. He even provides the film\'s final thematic statement with a quote from Hemingway. His quirkiness, perhaps the outgrowth of a brilliant mind, is no worse than that of any prophet or seer of old, those harbingers of Biblical insight whom others always find kooky and offbeat. He is not well loved for his cynical, pessimistic outlook (such that his consuming motivation is to retire and get out of town). However, by the end it becomes clear that it is Somerset who sees our dark world with the prophet\'s particular clarity. (It is left to his partner Mills to find this out the hard way).\n\nWorking on us to reinforce this world as Somerset sees it is the film\'s astounding mise-en-scene, a disturbing film-noir setting developed by director David Fincher and cinematographer Darius Khondji. Flashlights barely illuminate the slimy walls of the roach-infested tenement of one victim and the dark bedroom of another. Rain pours down in buckets. Bird\'s-eye-view shots of downtown (the city is never named- a generic, everyman\'s kind of place) show dingy, sooty rooftops and grimy streets. Only the film\'s closing scene is in bright sunlight, which by then only serves as ironic counterpoint to what we see happening.\n\nThis is Somerset\'s vision; both inhabited and described by him. He finds a surprising fellow traveler in, not his partner, but the elusive killer John Doe. Doe shares the vision and provides an unsettling echo to the rumblings and teachings of Somerset. If one looks at life through the Somerset lens, one must admit that John Doe has a valid point. He and Somerset have arrived at the same conclusion, the difference between them being how they have responded. (Somerset longs to escape to some otherworldly realm in the country. Doe has taken action.)\n\nThough gripping and fast moving, this is not an action film. It holds our interest through the workings of horror and mystery: a stark, film-noir detective piece. Except for one tense pursuit through halls and alleys in pouring rain, as well as the bit of ending action, there is surprisingly little violence. We see each murder, save two, after the fact, as a crime scene. This only makes the final act that much more suspenseful.\n\nThis is a very tight film. Elements within: dialogue, actions, lighting, setting, all of these tend to reinforce one another to paint a solid picture. It is a perverse logic that makes the final and seventh sin complete perfectly the circle of events begun with the first.\n', u'0.108725', u"\nGothic, shocking, suspenseful, disturbing and clever, `Seven' marked a new beginning for director David Fincher's career. This dark tale of murder and crime revolves around two detectives in present New York city played by two brilliant actors `Brad Pitt' and `Morgan Freeman' who are paired together to solve a puzzle of murder that is at the hands of a man who kills regarding to the seven deadly sins. Both actors displayed striking performances that are so sharp and realistic sometimes you have to remind yourself that's its all acting.\n\n David Fincher's masterpiece really gives us an opportunity of a lifetime, maybe it's one that we don't all wish to share, but by seeing this movie you will experience a glimpse of the horrors that this world is filled with, and a small piece of mind of a man who you only prey you never have to meet.\n\nBrad Pitt successfully proves to us that he's not just a pretty face on screen, and that he sinks into his character so well, that you can walk off after the film finishes classifying him as a pretty darn good actor.\n\nYou wouldn't expect anything else from Morgan Freeman because it's perfectly obvious that this guy was born to play the roles of the smart detective.\n\nDavid Fincher's timeless directing and memorable filming captures all the goods that this film has to offer and will undoubtedly leave you shocked and begging for more films like this. Seven is a step into the harsh realities of life, a realistic portrayal of two detectives investigation into the un-describable horrific world murder, and the darkest realms of the human soul.\n\nWe can only prey for more classic memorable work from Mr. Fincher and for those future directors who are intent on making a gothic, psychological thriller, make sure you sit down and watch Seven with a pen and paper ready to take notes.\n", u'0.588125', u'Rarely there has been a movie with such a good dark and chilling \r atmosphere. I even see this movie more as an horror movie than as a \r thriller because of that.\r \r\n"Se7en" is unique in many ways. The movies mood is already set right \r from the beginning on. The movie starts dark, intense, chilling and \r mysterious, a mood that is present throughout the entire movie. It\'s \r very depressing to watch and I mean that in a positive way of the \r meaning of the word. The mood is set by good camera work and lighting, \r or better said, the lack of it. The music from acclaimed composer \r Howard Shore also adds to the chilling atmosphere.\r \r\nUnlike many other movies from the same genre, the movie is slow paced \r and takes it time to develop the characters without falling into some \r obvious clich\xe9\'s. The two main characters played by Morgan Freeman and \r Brad Pitt are presented as an unlikely police-couple that are different \r in many ways from each other but in a way that is also what makes them \r such a great couple. Brad Pitt for once has the opportunity to play \r more than just the pretty boy and he does it with success. Kevin Spacey \r truly plays a bone chilling character, almost just as legendary and \r chilling as Hannibal Lecter. I would very much like to see the two of \r them put in the same room, just to see who would make it out alive. \r Further more it was great to see R. Lee Emrey again as the police \r captain.\r \r\nThe movie is filled with some truly gross, sickening and horrifying \r scene\'s, this seriously ain\'t no kids stuff! The movie has some of the \r most sickening murders I have ever seen featured in a movie. But it \r aren\'t just only the gross scene\'s that are good, there are also some \r scene\'s that are made with lot\'s of beauty and profession such as the \r library scene.\r \r\nDark and chilling movie that you will never forget also thanks to the \r ending which I will not spoil for you. A real must see.\r \r\n10/10\r \r\n', u'0.358792', u'\nThis movie is from start to finish a well produced and directed film.  The performances in this movie are outstanding. Brad Pitt, once again, makes his role a stand-out performance by putting his versatile acting skills into his interpretation of Detective David Mills. Morgan Freeman is well-cast. His brooding acting style fits the character (Detective William Somerset) like a\nglove, and Gwyneth Paltrow gives her best performance EVER in the role of Brad Pitt\'s supportive wife/lover (Tracy Mills). And of course, Kevin Spacey who plays the diabolical yet misunderstood serial killer.\n\nThe movie is suspenseful and in parts very exciting.  There is a "Pseudo-Noir" quality to this movie that really fits in well with the content of the film (Serial Killing). It has it\'s philosophical moments that anyone who thinks a lot about the state of the world today can appreciate. It makes subtle moral judgements without insulting any beliefs that the viewer may have and it also generates debate for any post-film coffee/drinks gathering.\n\nAndrew Kevin Walker (Screenplay) has taken the subject of the Seven Deadly Sins and he really puts a great new twist on these themes.  As a writer, I really could appreciate the depth that he goes into with these ideas. The movie gives us just enough information to be entertained and informed yet not bombarded and made bored with too much philosophy.  In this respect, the film doesn\'t "preach" any special meaning even though the film\'s moral statements are still maintained.  This film can be enjoyed on so many levels and I really enjoyed the third act. One of the best pieces of storytelling and scriptwriting ever.\n\nOutstanding performances from everyone involved (And yes, of course, David Fincher does a wonderful job) Say no more. *****\n\n', u'0.659546', u'It is a rarity for a film to be completely unsettling and yet unrelentingly gripping.\n\nDavid Fincher\'s story takes place in a bleak and constantly raining city (never named) where urban decay and sleaze in all forms are rampant. Coming up to his retirement from the police force is Detective Lieutenant Somerset (Morgan Freeman) who is tasked with breaking in his replacement, Detective Sergeant Mills (Brad Pitt) before leaving. Somerset is world weary, under no illusions about the futility of the daily role he plays and (initially) wants nothing more than to escape the grime and violence of the city. Mills on the other hand is convinced that he is going to make a real difference having voluntarily transferred to this precinct, bringing his wife to the city with him. Before Somerset can move on, a homicide comes in which he and Mills are assigned to investigate. But its only the first of a string of ritual murders that will be committed by a killer who is basing his crimes on the seven deadly sins as depicted in Dante\'s "The divine comedy".\n\nTo begin with, Se7en appears to be a standard "cops on the trail of a killer" story which shouldn\'t be too difficult for the audience to get comfortable with. But as we descend along with the characters into the merciless, brutal world without hope that they inhabit, you are left reeling at the events that unfold.\n\nThe two detectives enjoy an uneasy relationship with no real friendship ever striking up between them. The older Somerset is educated, astute and gives the impression of being emotionally burnt out. Mills, who has no respect for Somersets methodical investigating gets excited at the thought of solving a murder and firmly believes that the good guys will win eventually. The further we get into the action, the might of the evil that they face pushes both men beyond their limits.\n\nThis film draws heavily on biblical themes and you can certainly see similarities with such films as "The Seventh Seal" (1957). Both films show the price that good men have to pay when they fight evil and the unsettling truth that the rule book goes straight out the window when you are dealing with something so diabolical that it has no boundaries or limits at all.\n\nSe7en shows us a world which has been destroyed by its own sins, a wasteland in which values are minimal. The killer, having nothing but contempt for this world, sees it as his mission to expose the faults and show everyone what they have become. It is a fascinating twist that when the killers motives become clearer, Somerset with his greater understanding actually feels some degree of empathy with him. This is lost on Mills though, whose level of clarity never reaches the same point.\n\nA previous reviewer mentioned that you begin to expect the unexpected whilst watching Se7en and i completely agree. Eventually if you think of the most obvious outcome in any situation and predict that the opposite will happen, it usually does. Even the finale itself became kind of predictable because by then you are conditioned not to have any hope. This is a minor flaw though because the story is so well and so shockingly told.\n\nDirector David Fincher didn\'t pick up another script for 18 months, such was his exhaustion and frustration following the completion of Alien 3. Apparently he agreed to direct se7en after one reading of Andrew Kevin Walkers screenplay because he was drawn to its hard hitting delivery about inhumanity. He stated: "It\'s psychologically violent. It implies so much, not about why you did but how you did it". For the camera work specially altered film stock was used to make the visuals look as dark and unsettling as possible which is complemented well by Howard Shores music score.\n\nThe Most disturbing message that Se7en puts across, is that the fight against evil is destined to be a Pyrrhic victory. But regardless the only thing we can do is fight on whatever the cost. We have no other choice.\n\n"The World is a fine place and worth fighting for." I agree with the second part.', u'-0.123675', u'\nDavid Fincher\'s bleak, relentless, and ultimately terrifying crime thriller Seven transcends other films of the genre with incredible plotting (the sort Hitchcock might employ were he alive and making films in the 1990s) and scalding intelligence.  With only a small handful of minor flaws -- the overly familiar retiring cop/young cop pairing; the awful "I\'m taking you off the case!" cliche seemingly required by the genre; one giant lapse in logic in the downward spiral toward the conclusion that cannot be revealed without ruining the script\'s gruesome surprise -- Seven typically keeps its viewers imprisoned in their seats with a combination of morbid fascination and abject fear.  Despite attempts by studio executives to alter Andrew Kevin Walker\'s ending, the filmmaking team prevailed and audiences experienced that rare treat of mainstream cinema: an uncompromising vision.', u'0.364895', u"\nSe7En Se7en is just one of those movies that burrows deep under your skin and festers. Director David Fincher and screenwriter Andrew Kevin Walker have created a bleak, desolate world where there are no real heroes, only sinners. An uncompromising story, filthy, grainy visuals and terrific performances make Se7en a modern classic. Det. William Sommerset (Morgan Freeman) has seen the human spirit at its worst throughout his 34 years of police service. He finally realises he has had enough of the horrors of the world and he becomes ready for retirement. David Mills (Brad Pitt) is a brash, hot-headed rookie cop who believes his big break lies in the murky, seedy unnamed metropolis. Amidst some cynicism, Sommerset takes on Mills as a partner for his last days. When two murders occur within two days of each other the duo realize that a serial killer is murdering his victims in accordance with the seven deadly sins: gluttony, greed, sloth, lust, pride, envy and wrath. What follows is a terrifying and disturbing story of the dark side of human nature. Fincher's Noir York with endless rain, rain that fails to wash (to quote Travis Bickle) the filth off the streets, is a harsh look into urban life where decency is a rarity. Along with his cinematographer Darius Khondji, paints the screen with dark greys, blacks and yellow to hint at the rotting core of this environment. Freeman gives the film its most complex performance and moral core. His detective has grown weary of apathy and he slightly suggests an understanding of the despicable killer. On that note, Kevin Spacey delivers a chilling portrayal, a killer with a blankly human face and disturbing conviction. Writer Walker has written a cop-genre film with impeccable substance. Rather than a whodunit or an action movie, he has given birth to a story that pokes and prods at our psychic. It forces us to confront ourselves and question the next time we eat too much, or take too much time gelling our hair or even lash out in road rage. He questions our day-by-day apathy and ignorance to the savagery of human existence in a time of war, poverty, cynicism and most importantly sin.\n", u'-0.0537695', u'A stand out film dealing with a particularly unpleasant Serial Killer, "Se7en" (along with "Silence of the Lambs"), is something of a milestone in this genre. An intelligent script, and admirable actors including the excellent Morgan Freeman, Prad Pitt, Gwenth Paltrow and Kevin Spacey, with a cinema noir style, and very grisly murders representing the Seven Deadly Sins. It is the performances however that lifts this movie above the average, Morgan Freeman as the older world wise detective, Pitt almost manic as his young enthusiastic sidekick, Poltrow plays the wife with a fine degree of sensitivity, and Spacey does his usual brilliant psycho routine. There is a pivotal scene with Freeman and Paltrow in a caf\xe9 which shows the depth of performances here. They are believable characters in a dark disturbing world wherein it always seems to be raining. An effective thriller with tight direction and atmospheric photography.', u'0.249941', u'Despite clich\xe9s, and a very depressing finale, this is one of the best-made films of its era and genre.\n\nThe strengths of the film include an odd relationship between the two lead cops, who seem loosely based on the two lead cops of the "Lethal Weapon" series, but who (thankfully) never play for laughs, and never really become "buddies" - the young cop is too arrogant, and the older cop has too much experience, which the young cop refuses to acknowledge. The two characters are also brilliantly acted by Morgan Freeman and Brad Pitt (probably his best performance).\n\nThere\'s one odd flaw in the film - about half-way through, I found that I had learned to "expect the unexpected" from the film, which meant that the rest of the film was predictable in a bizarre way - simply decide where the expected move would be, and then expect the unexpected move instead. The most obvious instance of this is in the finale itself, which could be guessed at least 5 minutes ahead of time.\n\nNormally, this would be a formula for disaster - but fortunately, the high quality of the film-making twists the film into an edge-of-the-seat suspenseful waiting game as we watch with horror the one cop\'s encounter with the insanity of pure evil.\n\nI didn\'t want to admire this film (to be honest, I dislike Brad Pitt something fierce), but I\'m afraid I must - very professionally made, it delivers its promised suspense all the way.', u'-0.0507763', u"After the Alien-debacle Fincher proved all the critics wrong. This film is one of the best in a genre that hasn't been very innovative for a long time.\n\nEveryone know's the story by now, so I won't waste time telling it. This film was trend setting with it's dark, gritty look and opening sequence. We still see it copied in movies and TV-series today. Everything is great about this film. I guess if anything, the weakest link in the film is Pitt, who is grossly overshadowed by Freeman. But let's not look for flaws when there really aren't any. The script is intelligent and uncompromising. The direction is innovative en daring. The production-design and cinematography are top-notch.\n\nFincher is one of the big boys in Tinseltown these days. Seven is the reason why.", u'0.180503', u"This is one of those dark movies, where it's constantly raining and wet and where the light always seems to be dim. Appropriately enough, this changes to bright and shimmering heat in the very end. As a kid, I hated dark movies. But perhaps it is appropriate in this case, because Seven attempts to be a statement about humanity: no one is without sin.\n\nThe seven deadly sins are gluttony, greed, sloth, pride, lust, envy, and wrath. Prime examples of people committing these are being punished one by one, brutally and efficiently, by a psychopathic killer. Detectives, and reluctant partners, William Somerset (Morgan Freeman) and David Mills (Brad Pitt) are assigned to track down the killer. Needless to say, the job gets accomplished. While some might argue it is done surprisingly, I'd argue otherwise.\n\nFor once, I wasn't impressed with Pitt's acting. I thought Freeman did a great job. As usual, the villain, John Doe played by Kevin Spacey, provides a chilling performance, even though he is not given as much center stage as, say, Anthony Hopkins was in Silence of the Lambs. In fact, the whole movie seems to hurry through without giving key characters enough time to build up their emotional worth, particularly Mills' wife Tracy (Gwyneth Paltrow).\n\nIn the end, Seven does manage to get its point across effectively. While watching the movie itself, I thought it a bit anti-climatic, but when mulling it over later, the images echo very strongly in my mind. One of the most disturbing films I've seen.", u'-0.0269971', u"I love psychological thrillers and this is one of the best I've seen. Morgan Freeman was elegant and convincing as a burnt out cop who wanted to retire but found the fascination of the job tough to let go of. Brad Pitt made the transition from cocky new guy to serious cop vry convincingly. And what can I say about Kevin Spacey who is always excellent. (Except to wonder why his name doesn't appear in the opening credits - I looked three times.) And Gwyneth Paltrow as Pitt's wife was as fresh and charming as ever. I truly enjoyed the performances of all the main cast members.\n\nThe best part of this film is that even when the killer is caught the suspense isn't over. In fact - it may be just beginning.", u'0.458483', u'Se7en is a very complex and deep movie, while also being quite disturbing. Andrew Kevin Walker created one of the most original spec screenplays of all time, but it is the kind of story traditionally used more as a writing sample than actually made into a movie. But the creative team of director David Fincher believed in this extremely dark, uncompromising story, and made it just the way Walker wrote it.\n\nThe story revolves around two extremely well-drawn characters, David Mills (Brad Pitt) and William Somerset (Morgan Freeman). In one sense their relationship is the ultimate clich\xe9 -- the old veteran cop paired up with the brash rookie (though Mills is not actually a rookie, just new to the unnamed city where the movie takes place). But the contrast between these two characters is played out not for laughs or cheap drama but as the real working out of a moral question. Somerset, the lonely, cynical older detective, cares about people but has seen too much of the dark side of life to have much hope for society. Mills is not as intelligent as Somerset (kudos to Pitt for being willing to play a character that frequently looks foolish), and he lives by a simplistic belief in the power of law enforcement to change the world.\n\nThroughout the movie, the two characters struggle with this conflict -- is human society basically rotten, and can one person do anything to make a difference? Somerset, an intelligent, well-read man, is smart enough to recognize the truth, however painful that is. Mills is the kind of person who has never truly questioned the simple "values" he was raised with. Somerset tries to educate him, tries to warn him, but ultimately fails.\n\nIn the end, it is only John Doe, the serial killer, who can teach Mills (and by extension the audience) the truth -- that this world is very often shockingly vicious and senselessly cruel. Doe and Somerset actually have similar views of society and the world, up to a point. But while Somerset still cares about his fellow human beings, Doe hates them, and takes out his rage in a series of gruesome murders based on the seven deadly sins.\n\nThis movie is about the investigation Mills and Somerset undertake of Doe\'s murders, his "sermon" to the world through serial killing. Ultimately, Mills and Somerset can only do so much to try to stop Doe; the killer always seems at least one step ahead of them, and stays that way until the very end of the movie. In a normal Hollywood film, Mills and Somerset would "win" in the end by catching Doe and setting the world right again. But Andy Walker had a quite different ending in mind, and Fincher and his team take the shocking conclusion all the way to the limit of tension and drama.\n\nThis movie, like Fincher\'s "Fight Club," was controversial for being violent and gruesome. Certainly there are a number of gruesome and disturbing images of murder victims\' bodies, and many aspects of the story are very troubling, to say the least. But only one person is shown being killed on screen, and by far the worst of what happens in this story happens in the viewer\'s imagination. Unlike most films that have high levels of violence -- including, for example, Reservoir Dogs or Silence of the Lambs -- this movie genuinely attempts to grapple with the moral implications of what is being shown on screen. In direct contrast with, say Quentin Tarantino, who uses extreme violence for shock effect and to gain notoriety, Fincher actually shows less violence on screen and raises far more probing moral questions in the viewer\'s mind. I cannot think of any movie that contains as much genuine debate and discussion among the characters about crime and human morality as this one does -- while never becoming dull or preachy for a moment.\n\nI cannot finish this review without a word about Mr. Fincher\'s extraordinary visual talents. This is a man who ranks with the top handful of directors of all time in his knowledge and grasp of film-making technique. Everything from set design to lighting, selection of film stock and processing techniques, camera movement, frame composition, and editing work together to create an entirely new level of visual brilliance. Fincher\'s use of technique brings to mind nothing more than the work of Steven Spielberg in the 1970s, the last time a director this extraordinary burst onto the Hollywood scene. A whole generation has passed since then, and there is a new wave of techniques and tools available to the filmmaker of the nineties. Fincher uses every one of these tools to their utmost. The technical work and supporting actors are uniformly superb. This is a movie that works on every level. Andy Walker, having written a mind-blowing screenplay, must have been stunned when he saw the finished film. This movie will rock you to the core.', u'0.186909'], u'tt0133093': [u"\nThe story of a reluctant Christ-like protagonist set against a baroque, MTV backdrop, The Matrix is the definitive hybrid of technical wizardry and contextual excellence that should be the benchmark for all sci-fi films to come.\n\nHollywood has had some problems combining form and matter in the sci-fi genre.  There have been a lot of visually stunning works but nobody cared about the hero. (Or nobody simply cared about anything.)  There a few, though, which aroused interest and intellect but nobody 'ooh'-ed or 'aah'-ed at the special effects.  With The Matrix, both elements are perfectly en sync.  Not only did we want to cheer on the heroes to victory, we wanted them to bludgeon the opposition.  Not only did we sit in awe as Neo evaded those bullets in limbo-rock fashion, we salivated.\n\nBut what makes The Matrix several cuts above the rest of the films in its genre is that there are simply no loopholes.  The script, written by the Wachowski brothers is intelligent but carefully not geeky.  The kung-fu sequences were deftly shot -- something even Bruce Lee would've been proud of.  The photography was breathtaking.  (I bet if you had to cut every frame on the reel and had it developed and printed, every single frame would stand on its own.)  And the acting?  Maybe not the best Keanu Reeves but name me an actor who has box-office appeal but could portray the uneasy and vulnerable protagonist, Neo, to a T the way Reeves did.  But, come to think of it, if you pit any actor beside Laurence Fishburne, you're bound to confuse that actor for bad acting.  As Morpheus, Mr. Fishburne is simply wicked!  Shades of his mentor-role in Higher Learning, nobody exudes that aura of quiet intensity than Mr. Fishburne.  His character, battle-scarred but always composed Morpheus, is given an extra dose of mortality (He loves Neo to a fault.) only Mr. Fishburne can flesh out.\n\nPeople will say what they want to say about how good The Matrix is but the bottomline is this: finally there's a philosophical film that has cut through this generation.  My generation. The Wachowski brothers probably scribbled a little P.S. note when they finished the script saying: THINK FOR A MOMENT ABOUT YOUR EXISTENCE.  What is the Matrix, you ask?  Something that's closer to reality than you think.\n\nEither that or it's my personal choice for best film of all-time.\n\n", u'-0.0421253', u'Writing a review of The Matrix is a very hard thing for me to do because this film means a lot to me and therefore I want to do the film justice by writing a good review. To tell the truth the first time I saw the film I was enamored by the effects. I remember thinking to myself that this was one of the most visually stunning films I had ever seen in my life. Also having always been a comic book fan and a fan of films that were larger than life, the transitional element of the story was very appealing to me and this probably heightened my enjoyment of the film very much. It wasn\'t until some time later (and after having seen the film a few times more) that I started to think about the film. I recognized the Christian elements quite quickly but it wasn\'t until I wrote an actual 15-page essay on the film that I tapped into some of the philosophical and religious elements and that made me appreciate the film even more. I won\'t say that I have recognized all elements because the film is quite literally packed with them.\n\nActing wise the film works excellently. I won\'t say that there aren\'t any issues because there are but overall the acting is pretty flawless. Keanu Reeves plays the main character, Neo, or Thomas A. Anderson and while he is not the perfect actor I think he does a pretty good job in The Matrix (and the sequels). He doesn\'t have the longest of lines which was probably a deliberate choice from the directors and it works because this gives him a better opportunity to work on posture and facial expressions and I must say that overall his body language is very good. Very clear and well defined. Laurence Fishbourne plays Neo\'s mentor Morpheus and he does an excellent job of it. His lines flow with a certain confidence and style that makes his character somewhat unique and interesting. Carrie-Anne Moss does a good job as well and succeeds in looking both cool and sexy in her leather outfit. Joe Pantoliano, a critically underrated actor does a brilliant job of bringing his character, Cypher, to life. I can\'t say much about him because his character is pretty essential to the plot and I certainly don\'t wan\'t to spoil it for anyone. Gloria Foster appears in a relatively small role that will have greater significance in the following films and she does a very good job. The best acting is provided by Hugo Weaving, however, in his portrayal of Agent Smith. It is really something to watch him act out the changes in his character. Agent Smith gains some human traits like anger, sense of dread, hate and eventually even a sly sense of humor (mostly in the sequels). Two thumbs way up to Weaving who has created one of the finest screen villains of all time.\n\nEffects wise the film is simply stunning and it deservedly was awarded the Oscar for best effects (and was regrettably cheated out of a nomination in the Best Film category) ahead of even Star Wars. The reason that I think The Matrix deserves the Oscar for best effects is simply that the effects in The Matrix are more innovative than the ones in Star Wars. Just take a look at how many times the effects have been spoofed and you\'ll probably agree. The effects also help in the symbolism of the film and in creating a very dystopian atmosphere not unlike the one seen in Blade Runner and this works brilliantly. The film looks beautiful at all times and today 6 years later (my God has it already been 6 years?) the effects still hold their ground against new science fiction films. Add the effects to the brilliant editing and you have a visual masterpiece on your hands. Very well done.\n\nThe reason that I think The Matrix is more reviewable than pretty much any other film is the story and the philosophical and religious elements of the story because with every viewing I catch something I didn\'t see the previous time I watched it. Without spoiling the film I think I can mention a few of the more obvious elements. Obviously the film draws on the Messiah myth as Neo is a clear reference to Jesus with the analogy of his name (Neo = one, as in The One) but also hidden in his other name, Thomas A. Anderson. The first part of his last name, Anderson comes from the Greek Andros meaning "man" and combine this with the second part of his last name "son" and add a little creativity you will come up with the combination "son of man" which was a title Jesus came up with about himself. Also the first time we meet Neo a man calls him (and I quote): "You\'re my Saviour man. My own personal Jesus Christ." It doesn\'t get any more obvious than that. Aside from the Christianic elements the film also gets its inspiration from Budhism, Gnosticism (Gnosis = knowledge) but is also inspired by Plato and his analogy of the Cave and Jean Baudrillard\'s essay, Simulacra and Simulations. Explaining these elements would make this review go on forever so aside from mentioning them I will not comment on them further.\n\nTo all the people who doubt the profound nature of The Matrix I can only give one advice: Free your mind and watch the film again. You won\'t regret it. If I had to choose a favorite all time film my choice would probably fall on either The Matrix (obviously I don\'t expect people to agree but if they do thats great) or The Lord of the Rings: The Return of the King and I recommend it to all fans of sci-fi and people who like philosophy.\n\n10/10 - on my top 3 of best films.', u'0.515532', u'\nThe Matrix...when I first heard about it, I expected just another sci-fi action thriller.  Good and filled with insane stunts, but not terribly intelligent.\n\nBoy, was I wrong.  Oh, the stunts are there in spades, all right, and yes, they are awesome.  And the special effects are absolutely amazing (even if similar ones have been used in other movies as a result- and not explained as well).\n\nBut the movie has plot as well.  It has characters that I cared about.  From Keanu Reeves\' excellent portrayal of Neo, the man trying to come to grips with his own identity, to Lawrence Fishburne\'s mysterious Morpheus, and even the creepy Agents, everyone does a stellar job of making their characters more than just the usual action "hero that kicks butt" and "cannon fodder" roles.  I cared about each and every one of the heroes, and hated the villains with a passion.  It has a plot, and it has a meaning...and lo and behold, a plot does help the fight scenes!  Just try it, if you haven\'t seen the movie before.  Watch one of the fight scenes.  Then watch the whole movie.  There\'s a big difference in the feeling and excitement of the scenes- sure, they\'re great as standalones, but the whole thing put together is an experience unlike just about everything else that\'s come to the theaters.  Think about it next time you\'re watching one of the more brainless action flicks...think how much better it COULD be.\n\nAll I can say is WATCH THIS MOVIE.  If you haven\'t, you\'re missing out on one of the best films of all time.  It isn\'t just special effects, folks.', u'0.0592524', u'\nIt\'s been a while since a movie has generated enough interest in me for me to watch it.  "The Matrix" looked exciting enough in the trailers, so I decided to give it a look.  What I found was an amazing movie, with some of the greatest special effects I\'ve ever seen.  The camera angles really work for the action sequences and the choreographed fight scenes made me yearn for more.  Say what you want about Keanu Reeves\' acting.  He may not deliver the best dialogue, but his look can carry a film.  He was a great choice for the role of Neo.  Carrie Anne Moss was great as was the underrated Laurence Fishburne.  I highly recommend this film for those who are a fan of visually stunning movies.  It will blow away your senses...\n', u'0.285356', u'\nThe Wachowski Brothers vision of a possible future takes the visual and sound aspects of filmmaking to a new high. Incorporating older still photography with computer enhancement to the degree that appears on the screen has raised the genre to a level that will be very hard-pressed by filmmakers for a number of years. Acting was wonderful, script, visual, sound, everything about this film is a tribute to a usually overlooked genre.', u'0.585237', u"\nThe Wachowski brothers really did excel themselves with this movie. It's a brilliant movie on a number of different levels - the directing is excellent, the camera work is great, the visuals are stunning, the kung-fu is A+, acting is executed with style and conviction, and the plot is truly inspired. It's really hard to use enough superlatives on this movie!\n\nIt'd be a 10/10, except for the ending. Having Neo do what he does at the end really lets it down, in my opinion. However, there's a couple of sequels on the way, so let's see what the Wachowskis can do to make up for it.\n\nOther than that, (and like I said above) the movie is operating on so many different levels that each time you watch it, you pick up something new... this isn't by accident, either. The Wachowski brothers had the actors read a\nnumber of definitive works (Simulation & Simulcra was one I believe) in modern literature and psychology, and applied liberal dashings of aspects of the major religions to provide the best sci-fi movie of the decade, if not ever.\n\nI'm yet to meet somebody who hasn't enjoyed it. It's my favourite movie to watch on a good cinema system, too.", u'0.286925', u'** May contain spoilers **\n\nThere aren\'t many movies I watched in the theatre twice \x96 let alone on the same day - but immediately after the credits had rolled (and still pumped up by \'Rage against the Machine\'), I queued up for the next screening of \'The Matrix\'. I was so blown away by that film, I feared - and probably rightly so - that I hadn\'t caught every detail of what I\'d just seen. I later found out that many of my friends had had a similar reaction to the film, and I know virtually no one who liked the film and didn\'t watch it at least twice. It\'s simply one of those rare films that are so rich you just have to watch them several times.\n\nIn structure, style and concept, \'The Matrix\' was ground-breaking; it marked the first time the visual style of Manga comic books and Anime such as \'Akira\' or \'Ghost in the Shell\' had been successfully translated to a live-action film. Apart from \'Blade Runner\', which has a totally different mood and pace (but is also a masterpiece and visionary film-making), there simply hadn\'t been anything even remotely like it. The jaw-dropping action sequences have such a raw, gripping energy they feel like an adrenalin overdose, but unlike most action films, they never overshadow the story; on the contrary - they enhance it and make complete sense within that universe.\n\nAs for the story itself, I think this is one of the most original, fascinating Sci-Fi tales you\'ll likely ever see on screen. Clearly inspired by Japanese Anime and Manga yet also by authors like Isaac Asimov or Philip K. Dick, the story about humanity\'s war against its own creation, machines of an artificial intelligence that have evolved to the point where they have become the dominant \'species\' and vastly superior to their creators, could take place in the same world as \'Blade Runner\' or \'The Terminator\' - albeit several hundred years later. But there is also a mythical, even religious undercurrent to the story; the themes of a prophecy, a "liberator" or even a "messiah" make \'The Matrix\' transcend the Science-Fiction genre and become even more unique.\n\n\'The Matrix\' was a watershed moment in filmmaking \x96 in every respect \x96 and even though two inferior sequels have left a bit of a stain on the film, they can\'t distract from what an uncompromising and hugely influential masterpiece this is. Sci-Fi movies that were released after \'The Matrix\' have tried very hard to achieve a similar look and tone, but the original still owns them all. 10 stars out of 10.\n\nFavorite films: http://www.IMDb.com/list/mkjOKvqlSBs/\n\nLesser-known Masterpieces: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls070242495/\n\nFavorite TV-Shows reviewed: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls075552387/\n\nIn an ideal world, movies would be made without the aim for a certain rating. This article sums up why this is so important:\n\nwww.the-fanboy-perspective.com/the-importance-of-the-r-rating.html', u'0.372328', u"\nYou walk into this film not knowing what the Matrix is. You take your seat and watch the trailers. The green Warner Brothers (green? you ask) trademark comes up, and without warning you are thrust into the Wachowski brothers grand vision. 2 hours of excitement later, you stumble out of the cinema, knowing what the Matrix is.\n\nThis is one great movie. Keanu Reeves is cooler than cool as Neo. The Wachowski brothers skilful direction is brilliant. The special effects sequences will blow you away, did I mention the government lobby scene?\n\nThe film starts off with a 'what is real?' first half, and then the first kung-fu sequence makes way for an action- packed, John Woo-esque second half with slomo and style cranked up all the way to the top. Did I mention the government lobby scene?\n\nKeanu becomes Cool Keanu, Carrie-Anne Moss is a real find and Hugo Weaving is perfect in his against typecasting role as the evil Agent Smith.\n\nYou may notice in this review that I have not revealed what the Matrix is. Like the trailer says, 'You have to see it for yourself.'\n\nExcellent. Best film of '99. 9/10. ", u'0.299291', u'In the year 1999, "The Matrix" and "Fight Club" were undoubtedly the best films of the year. The Matrix was truly revolutionary in special effects, specifically in CGI (Computer-Generated-Imaging) technology. The still cameras that were used to capture multiple angles of a single shot, in bullet-time technology, was a creative new approach. The film is initially suspenseful with people not knowing quite what was happening until Morpheus (Lawrence Fishburne) reveals that Neo\'s (Keanu Reeves) reality was actually a fabricated world that is an elaborate simulation created by machines. Neo and the majority of the world\'s inhabitants have been stuck in simply a mental simulation prison. \n\nThe magnitude of philosophy in sync with special effects make "The Matrix" a one-of-a-kind movie masterpiece. College classes show this movie in their philosophy class, and at the same time can prove to be one of the best special effects movies ever. Supplementally, "The Matrix" also provides endless action and a pretty solid storyline that influences the philosophical ideas in the movie. \n\nThere are so many great things in this movie, it is just crazy.\n\nThe color palette along with the time and effort put into stunts also accelerates this movie on all filming levels. "The Matrix" leaves the viewer a sense of pride in the world he/she can live in to just know that people are capable of creating at this level. Unfortunately, monetary and timing motives offset the potential quality of the sequels. "The Matrix Reloaded" and "The Matrix Revolutions" were just a waste of time and weren\'t carefully thought out, as was the first Matrix. \n\n10/10', u'0.183287', u"\n\nWho is to say what is real or not? We are defined by our view of reality, no matter how twisted or demented it is in comparison to 'normal' people. *evil eye* Yes, I see you all, looking in the mirror, trying to decipher whether or not your view is the reality we all share.\n\nThe Matrix not only supplies the world with a whole new level of special effects mixed with style and substance, it also brings a whole new meaning to the word 'paranoria'. This is one of those great epics that becomes a milestone in our present day world, a mark for which just about everybody can appreciate. Not since the original Starwars trilogy has a science fiction film reached across almost the entire population and gripped it with awesome special effects, great sound, and a overall feel of ground breaking movie making magic. It also serves up a good dose of paranoid delusions we all need in our lives every now and then.\n\nWith that, I leave you with the fact that I've seen more different types of people liking this one film than most other films to date. Move over George Lucas, you may have just met your match... :)", u'0.244622', u"\nRight there with Seven and Silence of the Lambs for me.  I love this film, and rate it a notch above some of the other great action films of our time (i.e., Terminator, Predator) because it has a really well thought out (although moderately unbelievable) story line.  A lot of thought provoking material, and some interesting subtleties. I've seen it 10 times (I don't usually watch a movie more than once), and I'll watch it a few more.  Enjoy!", u'0.502119', u'......................................................from Pasto,Colombia...Via: L.A. CA...and ORLANDO, FL \n\nThe Wachowski brothers certainly have a handle on the art of film making for the new millennium! 20 or 30 years in the future, a plethora of both historical and imaginary virtual world venues available at your fingertips, via your virtual reality headgear, you won\'t be asking yourself, once immersed in the world of your choosing, "Wait, how did I get here and why am I here?" \n\nMATRIX illustrates just how insightful and prophetic Marshall McLuhan\'s assertion "The Medium is the Message" has proved to be! Does Matrix glorify violence? Is it really original? Does it border on blasphemous? Most of the discussion and critique of MATRIX really seem to miss the point entirely. MATRIX is the essence and epitome of style...not substance.\n\nThrough a seamless symbiotic blending of diverse visual and auditory elements, most notably the 360\xba sequential surround photography of artfully choreographed and precisely executed human action scenes, the Wachowski\'s have achieved a true re-definition of the cinematic experience, on their own terms.\n\nEngaging, engrossing and bombarding your senses with their signature style, ultimately transporting you to a virtual world much more convincing than any drug-induced one. MATRIX clearly speaks to us in a newly formatted cinematic language. My recommendation: Put aside any negative preconceived notions and just listen....\n\n10*STARS*....ENJOY/DISFRUTELA! \n\nAny comments, questions or observations, in English or Espa\xf1ol, are most welcome!', u'0.256638', u'Spoilers Ahead:\n\nThe brothers obviously have read a lot of Rene Descartes, his first meditation you hear Morpeus quote from: how could you tell a dream from the real world? This was the problem of answering empirical skepticism which he spent the whole work pursuing. The movie\'s writing, its philosophical depth, is often lost amidst the excellent action movie surrounding it. Why it works so well is even the first showing you never are sure who is right The Oracle or Morpheus? It plays with you all the way until the end with Neo apparently dying from Smith emptying a whole clip into him. I would like to point out to you the moments I loved as a philosopher. My favorite: when Neo sees the Matrix, notice this proceeds his invincibility: what an excellent existential metaphor for human existence. Yes, my friends, see the phenomenal matrix about you it is just as unreal. He stares at everything eyes filled with astonishment everything is an illusion. This is what Morpheus had been trying to get him to understand the entire movie. "You think that is real air you are breathing?" The philosophical power of the movie is why it resonates by the way. This epiphany of seeing the Matrix as the phenomenal construct of his mind has implications that are quite transposable to the \'real world\' our minds construct for us.\n\nThe red or the blue pill? How many people do you know that are like Cypher? They want the blue pill oblivious to it being a world of deceit and illusion, again, what a metaphor for so many people, they prefer a happy lie to an unhappy truth. I love the movie for it conveys the struggle of Neo; we wish it for him as he fights and fails. This is the core of its success in contrast to the sequels. He fails the building jump, the fight with Morpeus and the subway showdown with Agent Smith. When I saw this there was an audible gasp when The Oracle says that Morpheus is mistaken and delusional. Even by this point, the audience is so wrapped up in rooting for Neo to be The One that it showed how well it had grabbed hold of the viewers. You never know until the very end when he resurrects and stands back up. Action movies\' fate are predicated upon the strength or weakness of their villains: find me a better villain than Agent Smith,"Human beings are a disease; we are the cure." He looks upon us as loathsome, bad smelling, meat sacks which he destroys whenever he gets the chance. \n\nThe battle to be The One, his many failings and our doubts followed by his majestic rise up from the floor, this is why this became a masterpiece. The action is breathtaking with state of the art effects that still are great to see. This can be said for many bad modern films; what differentiates this is the Quest Motif of the Hero Archetype. Within the movie are profound questions of epistemology: What is Truth and would you prefer a pleasure filled illusion to a stark, cold and dangerous world of truth? How can I tell what is real from what is illusion? Also, how controllers use pleasureful lies to control their slaves. See if you can find another movie so deeply filled with the central questions of philosophy? Descartes\' solution was that he had certain \'clear and distinct\' ideas the negation of which was a contradiction. God would never have made his mind oppose itself like this, such as 2 plus 2 equals four, ergo, the phenomenal world must be real. I know, if you desire better answers read Immanuel Kant\'s Critique Of Pure Reason. This is a stand alone masterpiece with great philosophical depth. Almost twenty years old and it still resonates as well as it did when it was released. I never blame the brothers for the sequels, this film can never be part of a series; it is a one of a kind classic. Enjoy! Q.E.D.\n\n"For Any Test We Can Devise We Could Also Dream Of Taking." Rene Descartes\n\n"Interiority Exteriorizes Itself In Order To Interiorize Exteriority." Jean Paul Sartre', u'0.240641', u"What made The Matrix special was the ground breaking visual effects such as 'Bullet Time' that have been often imitated in other films and video games. The Wachowski's simply knocked it out of the park.\n\nKeanu Reeves is Mr Anderson an ordinary computer programmer by day and secret hacker called Neo at night who is suddenly pursued by government agents led by a sinister Agent Smith (Hugo Weaving) after he is contacted by computer hacker Morpheus (Laurence Fishburne.) \n\nMorpheus believes Neo is the 'One.' Humans lives in a false reality that controls humans and Neo will lead the harvested humans to rebel against the machines creating the false reality.\n\nThe film mixes cyberpunk science fiction with Hong Kong style martial arts and elements of Japanese manga type animation as inspiration.\n\nKeanu Reeves is in his element is a world where he does not understand the world around him. He looks cool and does well in the martial arts sequences. I guess revisiting this genre made up for the failure of Johnny Mnemonic.\n\nLaurence Fishburne is even more cooler as Morpheus guiding Neo in this hostile new reality and how to take down the system. Carrie-Ann Moss is kick ass sexy in black leather as Trinity who displays superhuman powers.\n\nThe film has philosophical underpinnings as the Wachowski's ask us to thing about the world around us and our existence within it.\n\nThe film is cool, it is hip but I felt slightly too long and little bit to po faced. However the Wachowski's did manage to catch lightning in a bottle which they did not manage to do with the sequels.", u'-0.270728', u"The Matrix (1999) is basically the idea of The Matrix, an ultra- computerized sci-fi film by Andy and Larry Wachowski that has an excellent concept but squanders it by falling back on the same old tired action movie conventions. The Wachowski siblings have given us an hour's worth of excellent cinema, filled with fascinating ideas. \n\nThe film begins where We start with a woman named Trinity (Carrie- Anne Moss), who seems to be on the run from a gang of Men In Black- types led by Agent Smith (Hugo Weaving). Luckily, she can leap tall buildings in a single bound, run around on the walls, and so on. So she gets away, but not before contacting a computer hacker named Neo (Reeves) by sending him a cryptic message on his monitor. Following her directions, Neo meets up with Morpheus (Fishburne), who is in charge of a ragtag team of humans from the late 22nd century. And why did Morpheus seek out Neo and bring him up to speed? Because Neo is The One; he's the messiah. He's going to save us all.", u'0.139491'], u'tt0245429': [u"\n'Spirited Away' is the first Miyazaki I have seen, but from this stupendous film I can tell he is a master storyteller. A hallmark of a good storyteller is making the audience empathise or pull them into the shoes of the central character. Miyazaki does this brilliantly in 'Spirited Away'. During the first fifteen minutes we have no idea what is going on. Neither does the main character Chihiro. We discover the world as Chihiro does and it's truly amazing to watch. But Miyazaki doesn't seem to treat this world as something amazing. The world is filmed just like our workaday world would. The inhabitants of the world go about their daily business as usual as full with apathy as us normal folks. Places and buildings are not greeted by towering establishing shots and majestic music. The fact that this place is amazing doesn't seem to concern Miyazaki. \n\nWhat do however, are the characters. Miyazaki lingers upon the characters as if they were actors. He infixes his animated actors with such subtleties that I have never seen, even from animation giants Pixar. Twenty minutes into this film and I completely forgot these were animated characters; I started to care for them like they were living and breathing. Miyazaki treats the modest achievements of Chihiro with unashamed bombast. The uplifting scene where she cleanses the River God is accompanied by stirring music and is as exciting as watching gladiatorial combatants fight. Of course, by giving the audience developed characters to care about, the action and conflicts will always be more exciting, terrifying and uplifting than normal, generic action scenes. \n\nThrough Chihiro, Miyazaki is clearly (but non-patronisingly) talking to youth of Japan. There's a certain sense of revile about the youth of Japan at the moment. Many people consider them to be ill-mannered and baring no respect for their elders or their forefathers. They are simply bi-products of their material world and consumerism. 'Spirited Away' taps into this. At the start Chihiro is a selfish, spoiled, whiny brat. But as she plunges deeper into the spirit world, she becomes more independent, more assured, more respectful and learns some manners. No Face, a black figure with a white mask, is the catalyst behind Chihiro's transformation. Once he is let into the bathhouse, we are no longer tourists \x96 the story propels forth. Watching No Face prey on the greed of the workers is a terrifying delight. The three main characters in Miyazaki's youth allegory are Chihiro, No Face and B\xf4. All of these characters are disconnected with their world. They are lonely, misunderstood and largely ignored. But when they go on their journey together, they united and become stronger individuals.\n\nMiyazaki also talks about the ecology of Japan. What was once a beautiful; grassland has now turned into the Asian New York. That The Last Samurai had to be filmed in New Zealand to get a turn of the century Japanese look speaks volumes. The River God sequence is an unsubtle but unpretentious commentary on pollution. While these two themes are very much current in Japan, they are also universal themes \x96 which makes 'Spirited Away' a universal story that most of us can connect with. I'm willing to bet everyone reading this has at some time seen bicycles lying on a lake bed or have had a child talk to them disrespectfully. Sure these themes aren't advanced philosophy. They are everyday issues told in an inventive, fun way.\n\nThe animation is wonderful, if not as smooth as Disney's works \x96 but there's something superior to that. 'Spirited Away's imperfect, but detailed world is far more fascinating than the perfected blandest of Disney's latest offerings. The animators successfully balanced the tight-rope between not-enough animation on characters and too much animation on characters. No Ralph Balski ADD antics here! The film is full of vivid images \x96 both beautiful and horrifying. The line between those two extremes is crossed over seamlessly. From Chihiro and Haku running through an opening flower field to Haku's dragon snarling with a bloody mouth, both extremes seem to belong in the film. It's also excellently done with the characters. Kamaji can be seen as a scary, daunting figure at the beginning, but soon he seamlessly changes into a humble, wise figure. Yubaba also seems to be able to turn from kind to witch with the snap of a finger. \n\nThe sound on the film was expertly done. The sounds perfectly match the on screen actions and objects. My sub woofer got a wonderful workout when Haku swoops Chihiro past the bridge at the beginning. And while I don't speak Japanese, I think the voice actors did a wonderful job of conveying their personality and emotions true their voice. Joe Hisaishi's music is sublime, definitely one of my favourite scores. His main piano theme is simple and evocative. His thunderous action music hits the viewers on the chest like a hammer. Like all great scores it heightens the greatness of a scene about three times. The score, unlike many American composers', is unobtrusive. It plays excellently with the scenes, but never overbears them. A lot of the time the it is barely noticeable, a sole piano plays softly in the background evoking a dreamlike/lullaby quality. \n\n'Spirited Away' is a simply a modern masterpiece, easily one of the Top 10 films of the new millennium. It works on a multitude of levels; a social commentary on Japan, a homage to ancient Japanese/Russian mythology, a moral film for both children and adults. But most importantly, it is a simple story brilliantly told by a great filmmaker who appears to be at the top of his game. 'Spirited Away' works much like a relaxing journey. Pop in the DVD; leave this world for two hours and when you will be almost certainly enriched and ready to take the trip again.\n", u'0.357014', u"\nThere is simply no denying that Miyazaki is the Godfather of Japanese Animation, time and time again delivering unto the public works of such incredible beauty, such stunning visual and sensory delights, such mastery of storytelling, that one can only be left speechless. Overwhelmed. Intoxicated with wonder. Such is the magic of Spirited Away.\n\nMuch like Miyazaki's previous feature Princess Mononoke, Spirited Away is an epic fairytale fantasy that deserves no better medium than the stunning animation work of Studio Ghibli. This multiple award-winning masterpiece has grown to become the largest grossing film in Japanese history, and rightly so. From the moment our child heroine Chihiro enters the bath houses we are literally bombarded with an overwhelming sense of detail and rich, lavish colours rarely - if ever - seen in western animation. Scenes such as Chihiro running through the field of flowers, the marvellous landscapes seen from the train, Haku and Chihiro soaring the skies above, and Chihiro running across the pipe to climb the walls of the bath house are nothing short of breathtaking, and undoubtably some of the most lavish animation ever to hit the screen.\n\nThe world of Spirited Away is simply bustling with life; unique, quirky, instantly lovable creatures jostling about their daily activities and tasks in the bath houses, dancing across the screen like leaves caught in a playful summer breeze. The inventiveness of Miyazaki's character designs, much like in Mononoke, is wonderful to behold, in fact not since classic tales like Lewis Carroll's Alice In Wonderland and The Neverending Story have we been able to fall hopelessly in love with such original, quirky, magical, even fantastical characters. The viewer is plunged headfirst into another world for nearly two hours and one cannot help but be completely and utterly captivated.\n\nThe music and original score is stunningly beautiful, the original Japanese language track of such high quality that one wonders why someone could insult the work by producing a dub track at all. With a plot differing in its complexity on so many levels, from the basic storyline, to the omnipresent universal themes, to the riddling of Japanese history and fable throughout, children and adults alike will be mesmerised from start to end. A magical, awe-inspiring, tearful, laughter-filled, heartfelt journey through a land of sweeping fantasy and dreams.\n\nPrepare to be Spirited Away........................\n\n", u'0.6554', u"Last year I saw Spirited Away on it's UK release. I've never been a particular fan of anime, and it didn't really occur to me that I was watching a foreign language film dubbed into English (or 'American'). I can't imagine seeing a live action foreign language film dubbed into another language, but hey, this is a kids cartoon, what does it matter? Up to a point it didn't, because I loved the film. I enjoyed it so much I set about digging up the Studio Ghibli/Miyazaki back catalogue, in the process Sprited Away was filed away as one of the lesser Ghibli's - still great, but compared to Laputa, Grave of the Fireflies and a few others, it seemed a little weak. \n\nBUT... I recently re-watched it on DVD with the subtitles and found the difference unbelievable. The film came alive like the other Miyazaki's I've seen. It seemed infinitely more layered, detailed, intelligent and witty than I remembered. Could it be that retaining the intended performances (even if the words are unintelligible) can make that much difference? Maybe the dub was just poorly done? Or was it just because I was now versed in the language of Ghibli? As a little experiment I decided to re-watch some of the film with both the English subtitles and English language dub in order to compare, I ended watching the whole thing out of morbid fascination. It's simply amazing what a difference there is. Entire scenes change. It's not just that subtle emphasis is shifted or the same points are made in a different manner - in the dub, the subject of whole conversations and scenes are changed, and often to some flat and uninteresting hokum. Relationships between characters are changed, their motivations and personalities are changed, the difference is shocking. \n\nI appreciate western, and particularly American audiences can be put off by subtitles. And cinemas are less likely to show the film anyway. It's pointless to be all righteous when, fundamentally, you just want people to see the film. Unless they do, this treasure trove will remain undiscovered, and maybe finding it will encourage people to conquer the 'subtitle demon' (as Miyazaki might call him). But the problem is the quality of these dubs, and the liberties taken with the source material. Of course, without speaking Japanese, who can say it's not the subtitles that are way off? They're probably written by westerners too. But the dub just stinks of Disneyfication. Saturday morning generic nonsense. The challenging, uncompromising and emotionally ambitious nature of the film is severely watered down.\n\nA fair question might be, 'if it's so bad why was it so successful?' The success is evidence of the films staggering quality. Even so, it hardly challenged whatever Jerry Bruckheimer movie was showing at the time. In Japan it's the biggest grossing film in history. 'Go figure,' as Chihiro wouldn't say.", u'-0.101515', u'Actually I dislike his or her comments badly. If you didn\'t get it watch it again. This is not a piece to just entertain, the creator has put his own feeling and I believe life experience and the fear always buried in children\'s mind into it. It is a comely tale that express the creator\'s thoughts in some way, whilst shining as a attractive animation piece with so many details that you might have ignore if you were careless. It is a rich story and I can see the efforts creators put into it in many spots and frames.\n\ne.g. While Chihiro was walking towards the garden where Haku told her to meet him, she passed some stairs where she can see an island, there are some house on it, she stopped for it for a little while, that, represents her longing to human world, her own world, this kind of details can be ignored by many people but they don\'t mind putting it in to make the whole story richer, more truthful, full of power of humanity.\n\nApart from that, did you ever notice that some "camera language" was used very well to tell the story in a more entertaining and better pace.e.g. When Kamaji was telling Chihiro how Haku turned up to this world before just like what she did, the "camera" panned to where the little rat(changed from the fat baby)was showing off to soots by putting his foot into the spell melted print while Kamaji\'s introduction about Haku\'s background is also getting across to the audience. This is just one of the details that shows how much story telling skills and rhythm control of plots.\n\nThere\'re many other things like this, shouldn\'t be ignored if you want to make a nice comment, even though as an American viewer you might miss a lot of the story by lack of the culture background, but that\'s not the reason that you can comment it as anyway you want without even really READ the film.\n\nI am a visual effects person and film maker but I can\'t tell where the jerking of the footage and the stopping of character\'s movement are in the film. could Gazzer please enlighten us? As also a fan of Pixar I hope I don\'t have bias on either American animations or Japanese ones, but as a Chinese who might have some resistance towards Japanese products for national esteem or historic reason, I still admires Ghibli Studio\'s work. "Spirited Away" is a masterpiece of elegant picture and touching story, if Gazzer-2 knows what that means.\n\n"Ice Age" was a pretty cute one of Fox productions, but not good enough to compete with "Spirited Away" I\'m afraid. And I\'d laugh at the opinion that the story of "Ice Age" is much simpler hence Oscar committee didn\'t recognise it, actually I believe "Spirited Away" was beautifully hand-painted frame by frame while "Ice Age" had a giant crew in 3d animation and visual effects. I\'m afraid Ice Age was the much more complicated one.', u'0.0333999', u"\nSpirited Away is one of the most perfect movies I have ever seen. The least I can say about it is that there was not a single moment during it that my attention wasn't completely focused. The plot was fantastic and full-bodied. Each character was given so much personality, even the little soot spiders weren't treated as two-dimensional.\n\nIn a way the whole film felt like a dream, in that it is seamless. It flows, effortlessly, from scene to scene, from emotion to emotion - straight from terror and tragedy to comedy - without the subtle bump that wakes you up, that lets you know that the makers of the movie and the creator of the script had wanted you to be crying but now you really should be laughing. It was so LIFELIKE. Sometimes in real life the most grim moments contain honest elements of comedy that do not seem out-of-place. But trying to put that sort of convoluted emotion into a film creates a very thin line that too many have fallen off of.\n\nThere was no part of the film that felt fake, or rushed, or shaky; the intensity of the story line and the determination of the lead character was obvious throughout. More than causing interest, this movie made me FEEL. I was sucked into the drama. I can rarely say that a movie made me laugh and cry without feeling like an idiot, but the caliber of this picture is so high that I don't even feel embarrassed. I laughed. I cried. And you will too.", u'0.0198718', u"\nI really enjoyed this film-everything about it glows and shines in a gentle luminosity. This film, if you have seen some of Miyazaki's other work, is quite light. The characters are beautifully and lovingly created and the colouring and setting of this film is absolutely superb. This is a beautiful little film and I can't wait for the next feature from Hayao Miyazaki-he is better than Walt Disney.\n\nMiyazaki blends the characters and the environment very well together, and I can see that this would be enjoyed for people at many different levels. Miyazaki enjoys creating female heroines and I was pleased that Chihiro lived up to the expression and beauty of her predecessors-like Nausicaa from the Valley of the Wind. This is beautiful and I would advise anyone to take a look at it's scope and serenity, along with it's fast paced plot and of course, the dreamlike settings that make it truly wonderful.\n", u'0.861257', u"\nThis is a wonderfully imaginative and fantastical children's fantasy. It is easy to see why it was perhaps the critical hit of 2002. The film is glorious to look at. It is a testament to old fashioned animation techniques that seem to be resigned to foreign animations. Of course there is some use of computer imagery for certain shots but they blend seamlessly and the overall artistry involved is superlative.\n\nThis is the first Hayao Miyazaki film I have seen and I will certainly watch his others. The story plays on many elements successful with kids films, that transport you back to your own childhood and also allows the young audience to connect with the themes in the movie too. The story centres around Chihiro, a young girl about to move into a new place and who feels insecure about the new environment she will be living in. These fears become a part of her encounter with a strange abandoned amusement park that she and her parents find when they reach a dead end in their car. At the park they find that their is a stall that is seemingly open, with glorious displays of mouth watering food. There are no people about but Chihiros parents decide to gorge themselves on this bounty and pay later. As Chihioro explores she comes across a strange boy who warns her to get out before dark. It is too late however, because as night falls, ghosts are awakened, and then by the time she gets back to her parents they are turned into pigs. She then finds that the route she came from is gone and she is now trapped in this place, her only allie being the boy she met earlier. She is told to get a job at the centre piece of the park, a bath house run by Yubaba, an evil power mad witch. This is a bath house for the spirits and Chihiro has to find a job there before she is found and turned into an animal herself, then unable to save her parents.\n\nThe story is imaginative and the characters and animations endlessly unique and strange. This is just so much more creative than Hollywood. The characters are likeable and we become engrossed with Chihiros adventures inside this bathhouse, and the characters she comes into contact with as she tries to get her parents back as humans and whilst trying to get back to the human world. What I also loved in this film is that the animation gives it a real sense of cinematography, the drawing makes the film stand out in a way that American animations rarely do. Another film I think of that looked really good was Bellville Rendezvous. Another great point in fact the best part of it, is the fantastic score. It really is uplifting and very original. This is just great film making. ***** \n\n\n", u'0.399753', u'\nGood morning. Last night I was able to catch the Disney US Release of Spirited Away ( originally The Spiriting Away of Sen and Chihiro). This is another  Disney purchase of a Japanese hit. For those that don\'t know, Disney has a nasty habit of importing titles from Japan and then changing the story when dubbing films or creatively editing the endings or plot to "suit American audiences". Personally I think that\'s a travesty. So  whenever you go see the Disney release of a foreign film, realize the film you are watching may not be the \'same film\' the rest of the world sees.\n\nOK, that aside, was it a good film? I deliberately did no research before seeing this film as I prefer to go into films with little or no expectations. All I knew was that the film was directed and written by Hayao Miyazaki, the same man responsible for Princess Mononoke ( a film released a few years back that I also enjoyed). In the case of Spirited away, I\'m glad I did not know what I was getting myself into, otherwise I might not have come (and surprisingly, not for the reasons you likely assume).\n\nThe film concerns a young girl and her parents who find an odd tunnel in the side of a hill while moving to their new home. Upon investigating the tunnel, they find a strange "theme park" on the other side devoid of inhabitants. Upon investigating the theme park, things are obviously very "wrong" (at least to the little girl- her parents seem woefully oblivious) and as it gets closer to sunset, things just get worse. Unfortunately, this is all the plot I am able to reveal without spoiling the uniqueness of this film.\n\nThis is an \'adult-oriented\' movie. It has some rather disturbing images and ranks among the weirdest films I have seen in my life. It\'s a bizarre amalgam of Wizard of Oz,The Neverending Story, Alice in Wonderland, My Friend Totoro, Chitty Chitty Bang Bang and The City of Lost Children (just to name a few). This film is interesting from beginning to end even though the plot advances rather slowly. There is always some new thing to see or some truly bizarre thing to witness. The animation is above average but not as impressive as Mononoke (and even features several gratuitous CGI sequences).\n\nThere is a great story and some great humor. I laughed more in this film than I have at any Hollywood \'comedy\' in the last 5 years (and Spirited Away is not a comedy, it just has several good comedic breaks). No nudity. No Profanity. No \'gratuitous\' violence. Some rather disturbing scenes of characters getting eaten alive (and some threats thereof) but even the eaten characters return unharmed later in the film.\n\nThis is not really a \'family film\' (and definitely NOT a "kiddee film") but it is something you can take the whole family to. Smaller children will not understand the story, but they\'ll like the visuals and enjoy the humor. Mid-teens might be a bit "weirded out" by the subject matter and the visuals and older teens and adults may be too jaded by American cinema to enjoy the film for what it is- a lavish fairytale from a foreign country. This film runs about 2 hours so leave the "kidney-buster" sodas at the snack bar. If you have to take a bathroom break, you WILL miss something and I assure you no friend nor helpful audience member will likely be able to adequately convey what it is you DID just miss.\n\nIf you enjoy Anime or the bizarre, make an effort to see this film. Even if you don\'t normally like "cartoon movies", you might give this one a chance. It is not a \'casual moviegoer\' film by any means and does rely on some thought from the audience to enjoy it. It will also likely be the oddest film you\'ll see this decade and you\'ll be sure to remember this film long after all the other \'disposable movies\' have faded from your recollection. This film is receiving almost no advertising. I didn\'t even know it existed until I saw the poster tucked away in a corner at the theatre earlier this week. I hope Disney puts a little more effort into advertising this film\'s release because it is truly an original film and worthy of a large audience. Hopefully positive word-of-mouth will get this film the attendance it deserves.\n', u'-0.107901', u'\nMystical. Enchanting. A key to another world. There are so many ways to describe this movie. The movie focuses on a young girl who is trapped in a sort of "spirit world". When her mother and father are turned into pigs, young Chihiro has to save her parents before they\'re cooked and eaten. It may sound silly, but this tale has more to it than farm animals. When Chihiro is frightened, she runs off. When a boy finds her, he tells her that she must get a job at "The Bath House". A sort of retreat for spirits. But to do this, she must speak with Yubaba. The witch who rules The Bathhouse. After Yubaba agrees to give Chihiro some work. She takes her name away from her. And she is then called "Sen". While shes at the bath house, she is put under very hard work. I could say more, but that would be foolish of me. This is a great movie that I think people of all ages should see for themselves. Its an enchanting and heartwarming story that I\'ve watched over and over again and have never gotten sick of it. It has been another inspiring movie from Haiyo Miazaki that is above all his best yet. A 10 out of 10 for this wonderful movie.\n', u'0.145065', u'Personally, I\'ve never seen anything as original in an animated film as in this deeply mythical fairytale. What a surreal idea for a movie! It\'s hard to find an adequate description (because I also don\'t want to spoil this in the slightest way) but this film has a sense of "otherness" to it - for lack of a better word - like none I\'ve ever seen. And the strange, mythical nature of this film - apart from the amazing artwork - is probably one of the main reasons for its appeal to me. \n\nMaybe the themes of the story don\'t feel quite as strange to an eastern audience because they fit to a certain degree with some eastern/Asian mythologies - to me, this beautiful piece of wonder was something new. And a profoundly moving experience. \n\nOutstanding animation; funny, weird, scary and touching at the same time, this unique work of art is one I can\'t recommend enough. 10 out of 10.\n\nFavorite films: http://www.IMDb.com/list/mkjOKvqlSBs/\n\nLesser-known Masterpieces: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls070242495/\n\nFavorite TV-Shows reviewed: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls075552387/\n\nFavorite Low-Budget and B-Movies: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls054808375/', u'0.553861', u'\nThe art work alone is worthy of the engulfment one experiences when watching the big screen, making me wish I had seen it on the big screen.  That is, unless the major release in the US was the English language version. \n\n\nWe ended up renting the DVD and watching it in English.  The sound, the voice of Chihiro in particular, grated our ears like nails on a chalk board.  After watching it, we played around with the DVD and found the original Japanese soundtrack with English subtitles. Far more subtle and simply put, an AMAZING difference.\n\nSo, I would suggest watching it in both languages.  English so that you can concentrate on the scenery (with the sound turned down low.  Really, the screeching and shouting in English is annoying). Then watch it in Japanese for the color and mood the dialog provides.', u'0.111728', u"The most Beautiful, endearing stories I've ever had the privilege of watching...If you haven't seen it...Please do so\n\nChirio is a young spoiled girl, who is taken a magical journey through the most interesting of places. She is forced to find herself and get her priorities in check if she hopes to rescue her parents from becoming dinner. A story of love, friendship, and determination is Miyasaki's best work.\n\nMy 3 year old son and 6 Year old Daughter love all of Miyazaki films but this on is their favorite by far.\n\nAll I can say is do yourself the favor and watch this movie..again..and again:0)", u'0.853158', u'\nI was surprised when "Sprited Away" turned out to be every bit as wonderful as everyone said it was \x96 one of the world\'s rare "worth queueing for" films \x96 because "Princess Mononoke" decidedly wasn\'t. Yet behold! And my partner, who\'s somewhat harsher than me in referring to Miyazaki\'s previous film as "Princess Monotony", was as enchanted as I was.\n\nI don\'t know how Miyazaki did it, exactly. He\'s created an altogether fresh fantasy world that doesn\'t come across merely as an all-too-laboured attempt to create an altogether fresh fantasy world. Describe it in words, and it sounds self-consciously quirky enough to put anyone off: it\'s a bath house for the spirits on the site of what appears to be a disused amusement park, presided over by an eccentric, mean-spirited old wizardess who\'s mother to a brat of an infant ten times larger than herself, the fires of which (the bath house, I mean) are stoked by a many-armed spider of a man who animates the soot particles to work for him ... and so on. It sounds like too much, too forced; but it unfolds on the screen naturally and magically, as though the world had simply been lying there, waiting to be discovered. And we discover it in exactly the right way (Miyazaki is a master story-teller, although I\'d never thought so until now), through exactly the right protagonist: a girl who grows believably from a timid and clumsy outsider entirely reliant on the help and goodwill of others, to a confident (but still, no doubt, frightened) insider, able to help others in turn.\n\nSince this seems to be an issue, I should say that it was the dubbed version I saw. But I don\'t see why this should be an issue. I think that all the anime fans, in whose eyes Disney can do nothing right, who moan incessantly about how awful the dubbed version is, are having us all on. Don\'t get me wrong: I loathe dubbing. I think that, in general, subtitles are much to be preferred. But I also know that none of the arguments against dubbing, good though they are in general, happen to apply here. Dubbing is bad because it prevents the actors from really acting, from projecting their own words with their own bodies and vocal chords; but this can\'t happen in a cartoon in any case. Dubbing is bad because the match of mouth movements to words is never quite good enough; but this isn\'t live action, and it isn\'t even a Disney-style cartoon, with every sibilant, every quiver of the lip, lovingly captured by the animators in 24-drawings-per-second detail: Japanese animation is not and was never meant to be detailed in that kind of way, and I\'ll wager that the English soundtrack matches the lip movements about as well as the Japanese soundtrack ever did. Dubbing is sometimes bad because it\'s possible to dub something into a language that just doesn\'t fit, which MIGHT have happened here had it been an important part of the story that it take place in, say, Tokyo; but in fact it\'s set in an uncertainly located, almost surreal fantasy bath house; under the circumstances it doesn\'t matter in the least what language everyone is speaking. In short: just this once, you can go with the dubbed version (which, I might add, has been dubbed with both love and skill), and you needn\'t feel embarrassed about doing so.', u'-0.0945056', u'My sister lent me this movie over my winter break in December 2013. I had heard a lot of great things about it ever since I saw in it a Hollywood video store when was around eight or nine years old. On IMDb, it had an 8.7/10 back then, and the back of the DVD case had quotes like "A masterpiece, pure and simple" and "Spectacularly inventive." So, as you can imagine my expectations for this film were very high. I will start off by saying that I love anime and animation to their core. I grew up watching shows like Pokemon, Digimon, Avatar the Last Airbender, Dragonball Z, and cartoons on Nickelodeon and Cartoon Network. Many times the creators of these delicate experiences are able to submit excellent messages of friendship, honor, perseverance, bravery, physical and mental strength, etc. Mr. Miyazaki is well-known in many anime fans\' minds as a "master storyteller" or "brilliant animator." Unfortunately, in "Spirited Away", the hype undershoots the expectations.\n\nFirst problem: character development. When people in movies are not given enough background, emotion, and basic traits, the concern from the audience toward the characters tends to decrease or pique at a certain level. Sadly, the main character, Chihiro, is never really given any sufficient background outside of being the clich\xe9d, bratty, spoiled child that is moving to a new house. Granted, throughout the movie, she does grow out of that, but the story never gives her time to expand on why she was like the way she was. As I was watching, I kept having a feeling of being completely disinterested in most of the actions and decisions that were taken and made by Chihiro.\n\nSecond problem: plot and pacing. The story is not exactly the most original idea ever. The best way to sum up the story is like this: main character must persevere in order to get back home by using the power and strength they never knew they had. This plot hinders the overall message that is trying to be conveyed. Also, the story calls for plenty of problems and scenarios that seem very impeding to be solved all within a small time frame. In other words, they will all be dealt with in very convenient, rushed, unexplained, and ridiculous ways. For example, in a dream Chihiro has one night, she is in a barn screaming at the pigs (her parents), but she can\'t pick out which two pigs are her parents due to them all looking the same. Then, at the end of the movie, the antagonist gives her a test to pick out which pigs are her parents, and Chihiro is able to conclude in about ten seconds that NONE of them are her parents and, wouldn\'t you know it, she\'s right! This was the scene that made me pause the movie, stand up and say, "Um, excuse me! Previous scene, anyone? She couldn\'t tell the differences between any of them in her dream. So, how is she just able to do the exact opposite after about a day or two?" I guess this was intended to show how she\'s "grown" or "matured" since the beginning of the film, but it\'s really just a cold slap in the face of continuity and logic. In fact, many scenes don\'t seem to have any real bearing on the story or character development; they are just filler for any dorky fool out there looking for some eye-candy. It\'s almost like the movie is saying, "Hey, we could delve more into our characters\' stories, emotions, and motives, but we\'re just going to splash something pretty on the screen. It doesn\'t have to make sense or connect at all with the rest of the movie, so long as you are filled with a sense of awe." Unfortunately, this leads into my next and final problem with this film.\n\nThird problem: the logic of the spirit world and the human world. In the beginning of the movie, Chihiro and her family get stuck in the spirit world because they apparently venture in at the wrong time or when the sun sets and night falls. Afterward, Chihiro can\'t escape for some reason. But, this raises several questions like "Did she ever try to escape during the day?", "How can humans wander into the spirit world no problem, but once the sun sets, can\'t exit at all?", "Have any spirits gone out and entered the human world if there is no clear gateway between the two worlds?", and "Why do the spirits only come out at night when Chihiro first enters, but they are all up and at it during the day throughout the rest of the movie?" I kept feeling like the writers of the film sat down and decided to make a by-the-numbers anime film, or just hit the points they needed to hit. For example, hit the beginning, character does this and that, magical junk in between, bad-guy-is-bad moment, weird-thing-or-obstacle-protagonist-has-to-deal-with moment, more magical junk here and there, all-problems-somehow-wrapped-up-toward-the-end moment, and character-reunites-with-family-and-lives-happily-ever-after moment. There is no flow nor segue of story; stuff just happens the way it\'s either supposed to or how it\'s written. This was by far my biggest gripe of all with the movie.\n\nTo conclude, "Spirited Away" was alright, it wasn\'t great or terrible but average. The plot was incoherent, the characters were shallow and uninteresting, and the "logic" of the settings was completely ludicrous. It definitely won\'t be finding its way into my DVD/Blu-ray player anytime soon or even again, that\'s for sure. This movie could have been so much better if they had taken the time to putting thought in the right areas. It suffers so much from the reasons listed above and, in the end, fails to impress or even entertain at a decent level. It\'s a shameful predicament that will cast itself in the anime universe forever.', u'-0.426581', u"The beautiful looking work of Spirited Away will catch you breathless from the get go, but sadly the story will neither entice nor enthrall you enough to stay focused on what's happening. The films story feels rather surreal and incoherent, giving no indication to what and why characters do certain actions. It also fails at being anything near original, muddling up previously used stories and creating one big jumbled mess.\n\nWhilst the story of Spirited Away may be hard for some to understand, one cannot leave the film without praising the artwork. It almost makes up for a lack of a coherent storyline, but for the most part the story does leave you wanting to know more; but to know more about what's happening, not about what's going to happen.", u'-0.861814'], u'tt0407887': [u'Now I know that \'The Departed\' is based off of the Hong Kong movie \'WuJianDao\', but Scorsese really grabs hold of a great story and brings it to the American Screen. My father grew up in Boston and when we walked out of the theater he couldn\'t stop talking about how authentic the environment and attitude was. Then there\'s the acting in which the lead actors (Nicholson, DiCaprio, Damon) not only give stunningly entertaining performances, but you become engulfed in each one\'s perspective and dilemmas. The smaller roles that of (Baldwin, Walberg, Sheen) are supporting roles that remind me of Jesus Quintana from \'The Big Lebowski\', by this I mean that their screen time is limited but they make lasting impressions that you cherish each and every scene they are in, Alec Baldwin especially. The story itself starts off with the basic intro of the players and the setting, but you\'ll find yourself slowing following each and every plot twist and rooting back and forth for the good guys and for the bad guys. If you\'re a Scorsese fan, which I am, I think you will appreciate this film. You can clearly see the Scorsese touch ranging from the cinematography and of course the music, it\'s great to hear "Gimme Shelter" again, but "Comfortably Numb" played in so well. It\'s another gangster flick from Scorsese, yet this one stands alone because feels so fresh and most would agree Scorsese does gangster films the best; so why not let him. Oscar worthy, the acting I certainly hope; this is DiCaprio\'s best role since \'The Aviator\' which was his best role since \'Gangs of New York\', am I seeing a pattern here. But my lasting impression wasn\'t concerned with the politics of the golden statue; my lasting impression was that I had sat through 2 and half hours of brilliant and especially entertaining storytelling. Thank you Mr. Scorsese.', u'0.661925', u"Please don't make negative comments like some of the aforementioned people have been doing if you haven't seen the film yet! I have seen it, at a press screening last week. Not only is it the best film of the year so far, it marks a return to form for Martin Scorsese, and ranks with the likes of GOODFELLAS as being one of the best in his canon of films.\n\nI'm a fan of the Hong Kong film, INFERNAL AFFAIRS, upon which this is based. While THE DEPARTED keeps the basic structure of the original, it is very much its own movie, so much so that the screenwriter, William Monahan, didn't even watch the original film while adapting its screenplay, thus enabling him to infuse the script with his, and Scorsese's, respective visions.\n\nAll the actors are first-rate (yes, even Leo, for all you DiCaprio bashers out there), and turn in some of their best performances to date. THE DEPARTED is sure to garner a host of Oscar nods, if not wins, including (hopefully) Scorsese's long-overdue statuette for Best Director. Plus, with actors like Martin Sheen and Alec Baldwin playing supporting roles, that says a lot about the quality of the film they signed up for! THE DEPARTED is tough stuff, not for the faint-of-heart. That said, it is a must-see for adult viewers who long for intelligent, gritty stories to grace our movie screens once again.", u'0.270514', u"Ever since I have seen Infernal Affairs (IA), I said to myself that Hollywood would not pass up on a story like this. And true enough, I heard Brad Pitt bought the rights to the show and that he and Tom Cruise are slated to act in it. When I heard that the whole ensemble changed, I still was looking forward to the film. IA, with a much smaller budget, looks more expensive than The Departed (TD).\n\nCharacter development -IA, is all about heart. It is about how the mole in the police, Ming, is torn between his identity as a mole, and his conscience, and the mole in the mafia/gangland, Yan, is torn between doing right for the police and his own dilemma about his identity. Ming is not bad, nor is Yan good. TD, like all other Hollywood cop movies, is about black and white. Costigan is wholesomely good, and Sullivan is utterly bad. Their characters are so one-dimensional, it's almost like the screenwriter doesn't trust his audience to be intelligent enough to know that good and evil are degrees of grey.\n\nTimeframe - The time frame is just ridiculous in TD. Are we expected to believe that in the short span of 4 months, Costigan is able to infiltrate the mafia and become Costello's left hand man, given that everyone (so 'cleverly' explained by Queenan) knows that he was a cop and that Costello doesn't trust people easily? Are we also to believe that Sullivan can rise through the ranks of the police force so fast, considering that (also 'cleverly' explained by Ellerby) they don't trust people with perfect records? In IA, it is a convincing many years. Both characters are allowed to grow into their environment enough to be torn. TD just throws it in our face.\n\nActing - How can people say that the acting is superb? Matt Damon doesn't emote at all. Leo Dicarprio is so whiny, if he isn't whining to Queenan, he is whining to the shrink, or Costello and Mr. French. Martin Sheen is like a vase, so weak and wimpy, he doesn't have the air befitting of a Captain. Mark Wahlberg's character, sarcastic as hell, for what? It's a wonder that he is even there, he has no role to play at all. An omission of his character wouldn't have made the movie any less. The shrink sleeps with both Costigan and Sullivan, and we are expected to feel sorry for her? And Jack Nicholson, so painful to watch. Even the extras are so miscast-ed. The Mainland Chinese characters are so obviously 3rd generation Cantonese speakers, with the American accents, I am not a native Cantonese speaker and even I know it's all wrong.\n\nScreenplay - This has to be one of the worst screenplays ever.\n\na. Costello, if he is a big time gangland boss, and that he is dealing with international crime lords, why is he and his right hand man still going round the hood to collect protection money? The writers cannot decide if he is a big-time crime lord or a smalltime mafia boss.\n\nb. the time-line.\n\nc. Costigan sends the tape to Madolyn, gets Sullivan to meet him at the building Queenan died, and expects to do what? It is just a cheap shot at trying to mirror IA's intelligent rooftop scene.\n\nd. The fact that the cast says F*** every other second makes the movie cheap and crude instead of realistic.\n\ne. the subplots are so unnecessary and so poorly intertwined. The double crossing of the mainland Chinese, the FBI informer subplot, the letter that was never heard of again, the love triangle between moles & shrink, the time in cadet school. All these subplots should be omitted, then maybe the director can concentrate on the real story.\n\nf. What's up with the ending? First Costigan is shot (Which is a ripped off from the original), and then everyone else gets shot in the head except Sullivan. Is there a need for all that gore? Or is it just cheap thrill? And then Dignam kills Sullivan. Does Dignam have a great enough agenda to do what he did? \n\ng. Did I mention that a lot of scenes of the movie are ripped off from the original? Even the dialog of some of the scenes is directly translated from the original. I read that the writer claims that he didn't see the original. Is he trying to claim the great parts of the movies as his own? Isn't that plagiarism? Which brings me to \n\nProduction value - Scorsese bombed, big time. He has ran out of tricks, the movie started out good, but the ending seemed so rushed, like he has ran out of time, or interest. I love GoodFellas, and his style and techniques at that time seem fresh and ingenious. But the second time he used the pinhole effect in TD, I realize that Scorsese has ran out of ideas. There are even scenes that he took from the original shot by shot, making it seem like he cannot make his own out of the material.\n\nOver all I am very MAD. MAD at the people who say this movie is brilliant. It is brilliant only because the original is brilliant and they had taken almost every element of it. I am MAD because of the disregard of respect on the part of Scorsese's team, not giving the credits when credits are due. Is he going to get an academy award for something that is not his? Something that he so blatantly took from someone else and did not even bother to credit? That would say a lot about Hollywood and their disregard for anyone else. I am MAD at the way the movie ended and I am just disappointed that the audiences are treated like idiots and they don't know it.", u'-0.309466', u"Just came back from watching the movie so it's still fresh in my mind. Overall the movie was good but it could have been shorter. Good movie but nothing extraordinary, not a master-piece, not a classic. In this period filled with really bad movies it's a movie you have to watch.\n\nSome things are better than in the original (Infernal Affairs) like character development. It is especially true for DiCaprio's character (not really for other character). However the scene, when Wahlberg cites all of DiCaprio's family connection to the mob, takes too much time. They take a long time establishing how DiCaprio sells drugs with his cousin and finally get into Nicholson's gang. However after that it doesn't take long for Nicholson to give his total trust (in one year and a half to two years), which bothered me. This takes the first hour of the movie and i think it could have been cut by at least 20min.\n\nSome scenes have a lot more impact in Infernal Affairs than in The Departed. I'm gonna cite 3 scenes which are some of the most important in the story in my opinion: \n\n-The death of Wong/Queenan: in IA, Wong falls suddenly, lands on a taxi cab taking Yan by surprise. When Yan realizes Wong is dead you can feel the suffering Yan goes through by the loss of the only person who knows he's a cop but also/mainly by the loss of his friend. \n\nIn The Departed we see Sheen falls in slow-mo until he hits the ground in a splash of blood. There's absolutely no connection, no friendship between DiCaprio and Sheen. We see DiCaprio almost on the verge of crying. But Why ? He's not his friend and there's still Wahlberg to prove he's a cop.\n\n-The death of Sam/Costello: In IA, Ming seems to show a desire to redeem himself and become a good man for his girlfriend. When he confronts Sam in the parking lot during the raid, he kills Sam to remove any evidence he's a mole and restart on a blank slate.\n\nIn The Departed, although Damon slightly mentions starting anew in another city, when he kills Costello he does it just to cover his a-s-s. Never after he seems like he might become good.\n\n-The elevator and final scene: In IA, the meeting on the rooftop is between two men on each side of the law but sharing so much in common. You can even sense that Ming has some respect for Yan. There's no violence until what happens in the elevator. When Yan dies you can see Ming didn't want this to end like that. Yan's death is really emotional, all sounds are drawn off and only an opera piece is playing. When the second mole gets killed by Ming you only hear gunshots.\n\nIn The Departed The final scenes are a mess. Damon and DiCaprio just hate each other's gut, the token black guy shows up, the 2nd mole shows up and everybody executes everybody. They just stand there to get shot. The scene seems really rushed.\n\nAnd when Damon open his door at the end of the movie to see Wahlberg waiting for him, it was the cherry on top of the cake. Everybody was cracking up. How many shots to the head do we need to see ? Was it really necessary to kill Damon and provide the audience with a happy ending ? \n\nAlthough The Departed is a good movie I felt a lot more satisfied with Infernal Affairs. They have very different feel to them. One is over-the-top street violence while the other one is more subdued, concise and nuanced.\n\nFor those who says that The Departed is way more psychological than IA I would have to disagree. Infernal Affairs shows how two men struggle to know what defines if they're good or bad. Is it their actions or their allegiance to one side or the other of the law? In the end they're really similar. Yan tells the Psy he's a cop and lift that weight off his shoulder even if it's for just a second. Ming wants to redeem himself and prove his girlfriend but also himself that he's not that bad. Others before me have also commented on the buddhist notion of eternal hell so I won't talk about it :) \n\nThe Departed lacked in that department. There's no connection between the two main characters except for the fact they are moles. They're almost portrayed as black and white. Especially Damon who doesn't seem to have any nuance. He's just bad till the end.\n\nThe Departed 8/10 Infernal Affairs 9/10", u'-0.410912', u"Excellent. A great, great movie. I saw it last night at a special screening and must say it was a tour de force. Even though Boston is not really a gritty town Scorsese was able to capture a darker side of the city. Coming from that area, I am always concerned when actors put on the local accent as it tends to be distracting rather than supportive. However, with local pros like Damon and Wahlberg they were able to really grab hold of it and not go overboard... most of the time. The true stand out performance has to go to DiCaprio. He has really come into his since hooking up with Scorsese, having scored a number of original performances all of which have expanded his range. He really snagged onto a deep and tragic character and created something that will hopefully be recognized come awards season. One of my favorite aspects was the friendly hostility the characters had for each other. It is a specific trademark that I have never noticed in any other city. In Boston, when you are really close with someone (or not really) it is, more or less, a requirement to bust their balls and shoot cruel insults back and forth in rhythmic banter. That detail was extensively realized in THE DEPARTED and I doubt anybody who was raised outside of the metro Boston area, or at least visited at some point, would find it nearly as hilarious as those who were. As for Scorsese's direction, I think he scored big with this one. While many have criticized that his movies have become more commercial I believe that he has just evolved. There were some classic Scorsese moments here, my favorite being a scene where DiCaprio is alone and packing his things in his apartment. Beautifully cut and stylistically directed. Is it his best effort? No. But it still is truly mesmerizing. He has created something truly special from a city that is highly underrated.", u'0.40514', u'The Departed\n\nThe screenplay: Top Notch\n\nThe performances: all-star cast delivering all-star performances\n\nThe music: perfect\n\nThe Directing: Martin Scorsese at his finest and that is saying something.\n\nOnce again Scorsese delivers a film that meets or exceeds the expectations of its audience in nearly every way. There are moments of incredible tension, violence, and drama, moments where characters reveal their vulnerabilities and weakness. Comedic moments and moments of sadness and through it all a multi layered and brilliant story is told by an American film maker who once again proves Harvey Keitel correct when he said, "Maybe he (Scorsese) got what he deserves--exclusion from the mediocre." \n\nThis film is Scorsese\'s finest work since Raging Bull, but it is not simply about Martin Scorsese or the amazing screen play by William Monahan, it is more than an amazing score, and great cinematography. While many of the accolades for this film belong to those behind the scenes people who envisioned and directed this film. One would be remiss to not point out the great performances of an all-star cast, many of whom deliver the finest performances of long and storied careers. Martin Sheen, Alec Baldwin, Jack Nicholson, Leonardo DiCaprio and Matt Damon deliver incredible performances. \n\nHowever the performance that stood out for me was Wahlberg, Mark Wahlberg\'s Sgt. Dignam stole every scene he was in, and he shared screen time with each of the afore mentioned actors. He gets to deliver some of the best lines, and with every scene he leaves the audience wanting more, and anticipating his next scene.\n\nSince The Academy has had its collective heads stuck \x85 for so long, mentioning a Scorsese picture and Oscar in the same sentence seems to be a waste of time. That being said I can not say if he will finally win the Oscar that he has deserved for so long, as his major competition (Flags of our Fathers) has yet to be released, I will say that I expect to see Wahlberg nominated for best supporting, and Leo and Damon will be pitted against one another once more, this time for best actor, Monahan will be nominated for writing, and of course Scorsese will be nominated for director. Also, it goes without saying a best picture nomination will be in order for The Departed.\n\nThat was the long version; the short version is if you like a movie with incredible performances, direction, music and visuals. If you like a layered story that is not formulaic, in short if you appreciate film making and story telling at its finest then see this film. Even with the glowing reviews of myself and others, and the high expectations they will undoubtedly bring I assure you that you will not be disappointed.', u'0.436237', u'Idiots often say this: "Oh, yes, it\'s very good for Hollywood I suppose, but not a patch on the Uruguayan original." Well smack me in the face and call me an idiot, \'cos the 2002 Hong Kong crime thriller Infernal Affairs (Mou gaan dou) is aeons better than the Scorsese-directed, all-star Hollywood remake.\n\nThe original was 100 minutes long and so taught you could probably play it like banjo strings. Several of the scenes were filmed with such artistry that they set a new standard in beautifully realised intensity. The plotting was tight, the acting pitch-perfect, and you really felt for the protagonists.\n\nIt was, in short, the best cops and robbers thriller anyone had seen in years.\n\nSo of course it had to be remade.\n\nEnter Scorsese, Nicholson, DiCaprio, Damon, Sheen, Baldwin et al.\n\nWhat results is bloated competence.\n\nThe set-pieces from Infernal Affairs remain, but are slacker and less well-handled. People in the cinema were laughing where they should have been clutching their heart to keep it in their chest.\n\nThe precision camera-work gives way to run-of-the-mill shots. Consider the sloppy execution of the rooftop fall.\n\nThe film is considerably longer without any real cause (bar, perhaps, Nicholson\'s hammy imperative to overplay any role he takes on). Witness the affair storyline, which is an unnecessary sop to the need for a more prominent female role, or the FBI addition, which is completely superfluous.\n\nThe end result is simply a lot weaker than the tightly-budgeted, tightly-edited, subtler original.\n\nThe only improvement \x96 and I shudder to say this \x96 is Alec Baldwin\'s role as the wise-cracking police captain, which made me chuckle on many occasions.\n\nGet the original out instead. Please. You won\'t regret it.', u'-0.232637', u'Well, due to all the hype I went to see this one with great expectations, although I must admit without having seen the parent film Infernal Affairs. What a let down ! Setting the scene is great, and time taken to achieve this is well spent, but for me the film started to drag, with expectation and patience well run out by the time the plot strands began coming together. Yes, Jack Nicholson is a great actor, but no he didn\'t convince me in the role, even though most of the good lines and deliveries were his. But Boston Irish ? Everyone, including the deliverer of the line "I\'m Irish & can live with something wrong the rest of my life...." failed to convince me of Irish lineage. The accents, the faces, the attitudes were all wrong for souls in torment over doing what they believe they have to do, a basic for Irish/Catholic guilt and angst. \n\nThe film would have been much stronger with unknowns in several key positions, and for me once the disparate strands were established the rest of the film was very predictable and I wasn\'t kept guessing - crucial if we are to suspend disbelief and have pressure and tension build in the viewer.\n\nDeCaprio fails to convince as a tough guy, despite the convincing scars. He stills comes across as an adolescent fuming after his pocket money\'s been withheld. Matt Damon looks like an awkward schoolboy, and was even less convincing than DeCaprio about being a cop. Mark Wahlberg sounded like he\'d been taught to swear the week before, Martin Sheen was as hard bitten as a kitten and there were so many operational goofs the film became a comedy. A Federal agent running a State operation against his own informer? What a waste of time and budget monies. Only two people knowing about an undercover operation? BULL! Keep sending an undercover back after his nerve\'s gone ? Garbage ! Permanently deleting a full record (on a State Police computer no less!) without possibility of recovery ? Unbelievable - even children know data can be restored, and the system will keep a record of who deleted the information. For me, the film became a joke and I couldn\'t wait for the end to arrive so I could leave. By the time the end plays arrived and new players were falling like flies, the audience was laughing out loud at the inanity. Once again, Hollywood takes a good story and ruins it with poor crafting, no matter how well filmed. Very bad casting, a rushed and unfulfilling ending, far too much gore, not enough character substance, one dimensional players and an insult to the viewers intelligence.', u'-0.506145', u'First off, this is an American stylized remake of the Hong Kong hit, Infernal Affairs. I have to give credit to that, a good film. I have seen both Infernal Affairs and The Departed. I personally prefer The Departed, and I think because of one thing: Martin Scorsese. This is the master behind such greats as Taxi Diver, Raging Bull, Goodfellas, and he\'s at it again. The film has an all star cast with Leonardo DiCaprio, Matt Damon, Jack Nicholson, Mark Wahlberg, Martin Sheen, and Alec Baldwin.\n\nThe Direction was amazing. (maybe one of the reasons why he won the Oscar for it) I loved how some of the scenes were shot and set up. Especially regarding the Chinatown, and police interrogation scenes, among many others. The film is perfectly set up with intense, suspense scenes while adding in amounts humor at times. It works really well. The script is top notch. (Also Oscar winning) Realistic strong dialogue from scene to scene.\n\nAnother thing I liked more in The Departed, as opposed to Infernal Affairs, was the acting. DiCaprio really seemed to earn a lot of respect from this role. Here, he takes on the tough guy persona so well. Sure it was known he was a good actor from his Oscar nominated performances in What\'s Eating Gilbert Grape and The Aviator, but he really takes it to another level here. I can\'t see anyone else as the character, he fits so perfectly with it. Matt Damon and Mark Wahlberg, being Massachusetts natives, also give solid performances, with their natural accents. Nicholson works well in his role, as well. Everyone was extremely solid and everything seemed so real.\n\nSet in Boston, The Departed takes in all the Boston like atmosphere. Beautifully shot scenes of the Massachusetts Golden Dome State Capital building is just one part of the landscape. The Dropkick Murphys song "I\'m Shipping up to Boston" really fits, great use of songs. Scorsese usually works music into his films really well.\n\n"Cops or Criminals. When you\'re facing a loaded gun what\'s the difference?" This quote really represents the film." Matt Damon plays a state officer in the Police, working for the crime boss of the area, Frank Costello (Nicholson). While Damon\'s character can be described as a "bad guy," he is really misunderstood. As a kid, he is sort of mentored into crime business by Costello while Costello becomes the father figure Damon\'s character never had. Leonardo DiCaprio plays a young guy, coming from a bad, crime ridden family. He\'s decides to become a police officer to get away from the crime life he\'s been surrounded by. Taking all this into account, Captain Queenen (Sheen) and Seargent Dignam (Wahlberg) decide to send DiCaprio\'s character undercover to find out more about the criminal underworld and Costello. With his family\'s crime record, he fit\'s perfectly into the situation. Now you have a highly ranked officer working for bad guy, and an undercover cop in the criminal underworld working for the State Police. From here it\'s an all out suspenseful thrill ride. Who\'s who? Who\'s working for who? Who can you trust? Paranoia threatens everyone. Lies. Betrayal. Sacrifice. How far will you take it? \n\nAt the heart of this film is character development. We really feel for the characters. We feel like we know them. It\'s really amazing part of this story and film. Tremendous story telling here.\n\nThis is one of the most entertaining and suspenseful crime/drama\'s I have seen in a while. While Infernal Affairs, came first, I think The Departed expands on it in so many ways. Really solid crime/drama. Check both out when you get a chance. It\'s really worth it. 9/10', u'0.370484', u"Before seeing this, I knew I was in for a treat, given that it's a Scorsese movie, but The Departed was even better than I expected.\n\nThe acting is outstanding. Leonardo DiCaprio gives what is quite possibly the best performance of his career. Even the people who hate him admit he did a good job. It's turned some haters into fans and my brother who despises him even says he was great. Matt Damon and Jack Nicholson give their best performances since The Talented Mr. Ripley and As Good As It Gets. Mark Wahlberg almost steals the show with the best lines. Ray Winstone, Alec Baldwin, and Martin Sheen are good, too.\n\nDefinitely one of the best films of the 00's. And easily one of the best remakes of all time. It's intense, funny, exciting, suspenseful, superbly acted, violent, has great characters, and has one of the most shocking scenes I've ever seen. And there's not a boring moment in it's two and a half hour running time. \n\nThe film will most likely be nominated for picture, director and adapted screenplay, and in my opinion, it deserves all three of them. DiCaprio and Wahlberg also deserve nominations.\n\nSee this as soon as you can.", u'0.566344', u"Caught The Departed last night and I have to say, its one abject failure of a remake. I was expecting it to be good, and truth be told, I wanted it to be good because it is based on Hongkong's Infernal Affairs, quite possibly one of the best gang flicks of all time. It is one of my personal favorites due to its brilliantly conceived plot of gang versus police, replete with paranoia and deceit. It is also quite possibly, one of the most intelligent films I have ever seen (second to Memento).\n\nWhere do I even begin? There are just so many things to criticize about. Firstly, the utterly realistic characters in Infernal Affairs have been reduced to one dimensional vectors that merely carry the plot forward. Matt Damon's character was reduced to a bad ass villain and was almost gleefully ridding anyone who knew of his identity, with no hint of remorse even till the very end. In Infernal Affairs however, at the end of the film, Andy Lau truly wanted to be a good guy but obviously, circumstances did not allow him to, and therefore he was forced to kill the gang boss to protect his identity. He subsequently went crazy over the guilt of killing the police informant (Tony Leung, or Leornado in Departed). Infernal Affairs ended brilliantly because Andy Lau's character survived it all with no one knowing his true identity. He could therefore assume his role of a high-ranking police officer, but was ridden with guilt and constantly reminded of the people who died because of him. It was really tragic and you could almost sympathize with his character. And what's with the ending of The Departed?!! Do all Hollywood films have to have perfect fairy tale endings where the bad guy has to die? And even if he has to die, does it have to conclude with an abrupt scene that lasts 30secs, and not to mention, totally cheesy and lame. It seems like a quick way out to conclude the story. The climax at the lift in the abandoned building was also unintentionally funny as body counts skyrocketed as people just started dying ridiculously. The reaction that people had in that scene in Infernal Affairs was true shock\x85'Oh my god!'. The reaction in Departed was quite the opposite \x96 people started laughing.\n\nAlso, the strange and awkward friendship between the police informant's boss and the gang boss was completely removed in the Departed. It was so enjoyable watching how the 2 former friends who are currently on opposite ends of the law, try to outplay each other in a full-fledged war of wits and power, but with grace as a result of their friendship in the past. This was COMPLETELY omitted in the Hollywood version. And also, there was a lack of tension between the police force and the gangs. Martin Sheen seems almost weak and hapless against Jack Nicholson and Nicholson himself appears barely sinister and intelligent. Another stupid omission was the friendship between the police informant and his boss, which was meticulously staged in Infernal Affairs, and culminated in a tragic climax when the boss fell off the building and landed right in front of the informant. This scene was attempted in Departed but failed miserably when Leornado tried to look sad when his boss died. There was no friendship to speak of between these 2 characters in Departed!!!\n\nThe movie also tries way too hard to entertain. The crazy antics of Jack Nicholson is reminiscent of his character in Anger Management. Yes, Anger management, that rubbish of a comedy. And I do not understand why there are so much sexual references in the movie. There is sex, women and porno everywhere in the movie and is completely unnecessary and downright insulting. Gritty realism is not achieved by dumping sex scenes in the movie.\n\nI can go on and on and criticizing about almost every single aspect in the movie (like how unnecessary the role of the psychiatrist in the Departed was, but completely pivotal in Infernal Affairs etc.), and might as well write a thesis on this movie. To conclude, there was not a single scene of tension nor was it ever moving or exciting. In fact, i found it more funny than anything else. The acting was not particularly great as well despite a rather stellar cast. \n\nInfernal Affairs was an intricate and convoluted plot of deceit, lies, friendship, paranoia and love, at the hands of skillful directors who carefully stage memorable scenes and powerful climaxes \x96 almost everything that Departed was not, despite an almost identical script. The critics are REALLY WRONG on this one. It is a complete failure of a remake, and even without comparison to the original Hongkong version, it is still a ridicule of an otherwise excellent plot. The editing was also fragmented and confusing, and coupled with horrendous pacing, the film gets progressively frustrating. Martin Scorsese has effectively removed everything that was so good about the original. Trust me, save your money and time, and watch Infernal Affairs, even if you have watched it already.", u'-0.353402', u"The title clearly refers to Scorsese's talent, which vanished in a squirt of stage blood about 15 years back. He wasn't talented, he was brilliant -- but that was then. Today he should be making intelligent independent movies, elder statesmanly flourishes of wit and humanity, inspiring a younger generation. Instead, he's humiliating himself with overblown junk. His love affair with hoodlums is tiresome, his critique of Catholicism is ignorant and stupid -- I mean, I dislike Catholicism as an institution, and God knows it doesn't need me to defend it -- but any sociological or spiritual phenomenon with the history and complexity of Catholicism deserves better treatment than the head-kickings Scorsese metes out. And ironically, Scorsese has made his own Faustian pact with the Devil -- he had his years in the Hollywood wilderness and feels he won't get anything thoughtful financed -- so it's better to team up with a bankable but untalented actor and produce these lumbering, brainless sub-epics.\n\nMany people in their comments here have struggled to express quite how deeply bad this film is. I too am at a loss. It's intriguing for a while, then downhill races into one of the worst supposedly classy films EVER MADE. Jack does his Jack Show, because he is vain and because no one has the guts to tell him that it was already self-parody 20 years ago. Supposed hard man Leonardo looks as enraged as a poodle when the canine beautician has gone a bit to close to his ear with the electric clippers. Matt is actually OK in the light comedy bits, which makes one wonder why he has become Hollywood's current Brooding One. Wahlburg -- rubbish. Sheen looks like he's focusing all his energies on trying to deliver his lines without spitting out his dentures. By the way, I reckon the script originally developed the sexual thing a bit more -- as it implies that Damon is not as groovy between the sheets as Leo, and his homophobia and other things seem to hint at his being a gay in denial -- but they decided that audiences wouldn't buy a gay hero, or it scared Damon, or God knows what -- just another loose end in this spaghetti-plate of a movie.\n\nOverall, hardly anyone in this movie (Winstone is an exception) act-ually ACTS. They are all oh so boringly themselves. Consider Olivier in Marathon Man, how his characterisation of an ageing Nazi suggested all sorts of undercurrents of twisted psychotic nastiness -- and then look at Nicholson's leering, over-the-top gurning. Chortling as you pull the trigger on someone is not really quite enough to convince us we are witnessing evil, Jackie baby.\n\nBy the way, the film shows cutting-edge developments in cinematic blood-squirting technology. Instead of the wounds exploding using charges that produce a small cloud of smoke, they sort of vaporize -- it looks like it's done with compressed air. A great advance Scorsese can be proud of. \n\nThis film has been larded with praise -- by gaga members of the Hollywood money machine. Every year people say Scorsese deserves an Oscar, and it's usually because we remember his early films. Well, they have Lifetime Achievement Oscars if we want to reward a body of work. Now he has to go to his grave knowing he got the Oscar for a Turkey. Only he probably doesn't know. And do any of the egos involved in this mess care? Hollywood cynicism, parodied in Scorsese's last film, The Aviator! What a joke.\n\nRight -- my last word, if you're still reading. We are currently being told by our masters to hate Iran. It has one of the few cinemas in the world that sometimes try to show something true about the human condition. Whereas our civilization produces, as one of the top-billing cultural manifestations of the year, expensive to make, heaped with praise and awards, exported around the world and seen by multiple millions--something about as edifying as watching lions tortured or Christians having limbs lopped off at the Roman Colisseum two millennia ago. What does this say about us?", u'-0.200015', u"Oh my God.\n\nI can say without overstatement that I just saw the most gripping and entertaining American film to come out in at least the past ten years.\n\nI was lucky enough to get a pass to an advance screening of The Departed this past weekend in Boston. I wasn't sure what to expect and actually planned on being a little disappointed with all the expectations and hype of such an all-star cast.\n\nFrom the moment the opening credits came up, the movie grabbed me by the neck, ripped me out of my seat and didn't let go until the final scene.\n\nEach performance is more masterful than the next. Damon was a tour de force as the lead, tapping every ounce of his acting reservoir for this role. Nicholson creates another classic role to add to his already sterling resume. His mob boss would almost steal every scene he was in, if it not for every other actor being so fantastic However, the biggest surprise for me personally came from Leonardo DeCaprio.\n\nHaving never warmed up to any of his roles or movies, I found myself blown away by him in this. I'm not sure if it was the material he was given, or if DeCaprio has grown this much as an actor, or a combination of both, but he finally won me over with his role in this instant Scorsese classic. Every character is pitch perfect, every scene is right on the money. The plot builds to a crescendo of such dynamic proportions rarely seen on film. I don't want to give too much away, but I'm still shaken from the ride I was taken on.\n\nPeople go to the movies in the hopes that maybe once in a hundred times you get to experience storytelling so masterful and transcendent that it changes the way you view cinema. This is one of those spectacularly perfect times.\n\nForget Taxi Driver. Forget Raging Bull. Forget Goodfellas. As much as I LOVE those movies and as much as they have affected me in my lifetime, The Departed will hands down be Martin Scorsese's Master Work.", u'0.306255', u'He has made good musicals (New York, New York), surreal comedies (After Hours), satires (The King of Comedy) and biopics (The Aviator), but Martin Scorsese has never done better than the times he\'s dealt with life on the streets and gangsters. Mean Streets, Goodfellas and Casino (and, to some degree, Taxi Driver) are proof of that. It doesn\'t seem strange, then, that his finest film in over a decade (Goodfellas was released in 1990) sees him return to that familiar ground. With a few changes.\n\nThe Departed, based on Hong Kong thriller Infernal Affairs (2002), is Scorsese\'s first gangster film not to feature Italian-American criminals. In fact, this film is set in Boston, where the Irish rule. One of these "godfathers" is Frank Costello (Jack Nicholson), the man the State Police want the most. After years of investigation, they\'re finally getting close, thanks to undercover agent Billy Costigan (Leonardo Di Caprio). Because of his family (all Irish, all bad), becoming a member of Costello\'s crew isn\'t that difficult. Now all Costigan has to do is report to his superiors, Queenan (Martin Sheen) and Dignam (Mark Wahlberg), who will pass on the information to Ellerby\'s (Alec Baldwin) Special Investigations Unit. What they don\'t know is that Colin Sullivan (Matt Damon), the most promising element of said unit, has been on Costello\'s payroll since he was 12. Soon enough, both cops and crooks become aware of the situation, beginning a manhunt that\'s gonna make the already fragile Billy even more nervous and Costello increasingly crazier.\n\nBy moving from Hong Kong to Boston, Scorsese and screenwriter William Monahan have made the first step in ensuring this film will be quite different from its Chinese inspiration. Another significant factor is the running time: a mere 97 minutes for Infernal Affairs, 150 for The Departed. This is due to new characters (Dignam and Costello\'s henchman Mr French, played by Ray Winstone, were missing in the original) and subplots, such as the one concerning Madolyn (Vera Farmiga), a psychiatrist who gets emotionally involved with both of the moles. But the most crucial difference is in the depiction of the underworld: whereas IA was stylish without being excessive, Scorsese\'s vision comprises very colorful language (some insults are so creative one might expect Joe Pesci to show up) and, of course, buckets of blood, the last part of the movie proving to be particularly shocking. None of the scenes ever reach the gross-out level of Casino\'s head-in-the-vice scene, but in pure Scorsese tradition it remains unflinchingly violent (also notable is the music, perfectly setting the mood, scene after scene, alongside Thelma Schoonmaker\'s impeccable editing).\n\nAmidst these brutal surroundings, the director handles a spot-on cast: Baldwin, Sheen and Wahlberg (the latter finally back on form) make good use of their little screen time, Damon fine-tunes the edgier side he showed in The Talented Mr Ripley and the Bourne movies, and Nicholson, playing the villain again at last, delivers another OTT but classy turn (original choice Robert De Niro would probably have played the part with more calm and subtlety). A special mention is needed for Di Caprio: working with Scorsese for the third consecutive time, he has finally found a way to shake off his Titanic image, thanks to a vulnerable, gripping (and arguably career-best) performance.\n\nWith its clever plot, excellent acting and expert direction, The Departed is without doubt the year\'s best film so far. If this really is going to be his last gangster film (he has said so), as well as his last studio-endorsed picture, Scorsese can be proud, given the masterpiece he has given us. If only they gave him the Oscar in return...', u'0.283427', u'Make it long, add top star billing, and spend a zillion dollars, and I guess anything can receive an award. Silly me, I thought original, provocative, and at the very least, plausible story telling was needed for good drama.\n\nLet me start by adding, that "great" actors are useless when miss-cast. I\'m sorry, but Damon and DiCaprio\'s persona\'s and looks are both too soft to play hard edge characters. Wahlberg and Sheen were so absent of realism, they compromised important plot dialog. Baldwin\'s attempt to add some comic flare came across as more buffoonery then wit. Even Nicholson\'s part was more cartoon then character. (Quintisential Jack)! Costello should have been cast by a hungry unknown, (from Boston).\n\nWhat makes this very pretentious movie really bad, are the "holes". This movie leaked like a sieve. Allow me to address a few:\n\n1) The premise alone. You have a large police department investigating a large crime family, yet only three members, (one of which is not even out of the academy), will alone without the resources of the department infiltrate an organized mob presumably using a mole. 2) If costigan is suppose to have been dismissed from the force, then why is he being seen by a civil service police psychiatrist. 3) If costigan was pulled out of the academy specifically for the benefit of his anonymity, then why does everyone he meets, know him and his family. 4) Does the department acknowledge the existence of costigan or not? His entire identity can not be conveniently eliminated from all record and then later resurface for a meritorious award. 5) If Costello was an F.B.I. informant, were the hell were the F.B.I., and better yet, what bigger fish would the F.B.I. want, then Costello himself. 6) Speakng of other agencies, were the hell were the Boston police during all these inner city homicides going on inside their jurisdiction.\n\nThe ending alone was most pathetic due to the fact there was no feasible conclusion possible based on the story\'s lack of continuity. I don\'t mind the enigmatic challenge of a smart and sophisticated screenplay, but please don\'t mollify me with vapid subplots.\n\nToo much budget, and not enough substance. Unfortunately, I seem to find the latter in only foreign or independent films. Hollywood needs to to produce more movies that don\'t just rely on its marquee. Next time the director calls, "That\'s a wrap", there should be no loose ends..', u'-0.521254'], u'tt0120737': [u'\n...but oh was I thankful for it!!! All through the movie I kept on having this big large smile sculpted into my face. For the record, I\'m 25 years old, and I\'ve read "The Lord of the Rings" in three times for the first time when I was six or seven years old. Ever since then, I read it at least once or twice a year - therefore you can count me as a fan, for I follow the same cult fan procedure with "The Hobbit" and "The Silmarillion" as well. Now onto the movie... Gosh, I saw it more than one time, and I keep wanting more of it. It just never gets boring! I really enjoyed the little stuff that is found throughout the movie for fans of the books (the map on Bilbo\'s table in his house comes to mind, it is exactly as the one in "The Hobbit" book that I own), and I also incredibly enjoyed the intro sequence with the re-telling of the battle against Sauron from the Silmarillion, never has an ultimate evil being been so well depicted on the screen. It truly is Sauron.\n\n Those who argue the movie cuts too many parts or that it changes the story too much are totally wrong. This movie could not have shown the whole first time in its entirety - keep in mind that the audiobook version of \'Fellowship of the Ring\' lasts well over ten hours, making a movie this long would, well, make it way too long and besides, how would you financially sustain such a project? I\'ve read a reviewer saying he\'d make all three books with the time allowed for the first movie alone. I think it would be a very fast-forwarding experience of a movie with \'Alvin and the Chimpmunks\' kind of voices, incredibly stupid to say the least.\n\nOk, so there are changes in the movie - well, this is Jackson\'s vision of it. All of us have our own visions of the books, which may or may not be compatible with that of Jackson\'s, but I can safely assume that nobody can say they have a hundred percent the same vision of the story as Tolkien; that\'s the thing with books: each reader has a different vision of it. As for me, I was blown away. Never before have I felt so much at home in a movie, it is as if I had taken a walk in the town where I grew up, the Shire, Rivendell, Moria, Lorien, everything felt so much like home, I was moved. I cannot tell of another movie that had me shed tears just by seeing a landscape on screen.\n\nAs for the changes, well, I found good reasons behind all of them, and let me tell you right away, I was happy that Arwen saved Frodo, yes, maybe coming from a fan it will look like absolute heresy, but I enjoyed the scene a lot. I did not enjoy it because it was supposedly politically-correct to do so, or that I find Liv Tyler to be absolutely attractive; it was just because I felt like even though it was a big change from the book, it was a very good one indeed, it makes you discover the power, determination, and courage of elves and the fact that even elven women, although great in their beauty and seemingly fragile in appearance do not have anything to envy to their male counterparts. And beside, as Arwen is to become a Queen later on, it was pretty good to see her have a great first appearance.\n\nThe actors were great, they were a lot into their characters, and for the first time, I saw elves as they were, quick, agile, terrifyingly effective in battle - just look at how Legolas dealed with the hordes of enemies without a single hint of fear in his eyes - these are elves as they should be. Gimli was great too, I know people seem to think many characters were not developed enough, but by the actions you can learn a lot. With Gimli a lot can be learned about the dwarves, their pride, deep sense of honor and family, their mistrust of elves, their love for strong beer and a good fight against anything bigger, and their sheer hatred for orcs and the likes. Aragorn was totally the ranger character, the ending scene as he walked toward the horde of Uruk-Hai warriors was great, his attitude, his clothes, everything about him just cried "ranger". Boromir was very well depicted, desperate to save the people of Gondor, by any mean necessary, robbed of all hope, yet in the end he redeems himself by showing his true valour, deep down, he\'s willing to die to defeat evil, and when he recognizes his king in Aragorn, on his last breath, I felt like watching a hero die, it was moving. The hobbits were all great, Frodo is deeply sad and fatalist, and Sam is just the \'best friend\' everyone would like to have, just as it should be. Finally, we have Gandalf, quite frankly, he looks mighty, Ian IS Gandalf. The faceoff against the Balrog in the Moria is a memorable sequence, and just shows how strong he really is, to be able to vanquish such a foe. I can\'t wait for his return.\n\nQuite frankly, I can\'t wait for the two other movies... In the meantime, I\'ll watch this one over and over again. This movie has everything that a good movie needs to have, and more. Plus, it just might bring more people to actually read books that have more pages than the average little 25\xa2 novel that has no value in it, which is great. Parents, maybe some scenes will frighten your kids, but this movie has almost NO blood (even though it has a good share of battle) and the foes are undeniably evil, plus it has good values in it - friendship, courage, responsiblity, sacrifice for a good cause, and the belief that anyone can help to change things. This is worthy of Tolkien, this is a movie that will go down in history as being one of the best ever, for sure.', u'0.165965', u'\nStar Wars has been dethroned.  Although George Lucas\' movies are good in their own right (except for the juvenile elements he puts in to sell toys to finance the franchise), his scripts (which borrow heavily from J.R.R.Tolkien, mythology & religion) can\'t compare with the brilliance of the literary trilogy `The Lord of the Rings\'.  Granted, Lucas took on a herculean task in writing & directing his story himself, but Tolkien\'s words, along with Peter Jackson\'s faithful adaptation & inspired vision, have created something no one man could equal.\n\n Of course, it helps that Jackson insisted on at least a 2 picture deal, & New Line Cinema was brave enough to foot the bill up front for 3 movies. They spent $180 million to film all 3 simultaneously.  With the New Zealand exchange rate, that equals $360 million ($90 million ea.), but since they used many of the same sets, and FX development costs were spread throughout, we\'re seeing $120-$150 million on the screen.  This will ensure consistency in plot, casting, tone, etc.\n\nIn 3 hours, Jackson has crammed everything essential from the first novel & then some into the film, rewriting some scenes & dialogue with lesser characters for the leads, leaving out only what there wasn\'t enough time for.  Basically, you have two 90 min. movies running back to back.  There are no slow spots, just one climax after another.  From the opening 10 min. backstory where the Dark Lord Sauron is shown on the battlefield wiping out men & elves 10 at a time with each swing of his mace, I was blown away.  The romance between Aragorn, king in exile, and Arwen, daughter of the elf-lord, is played up for the "Titanic" quotient, but it\'s well done.\n\n The story, sets, costumes & FX are so rich, you\'ll have to see the film several times to absorb everything.  The unspoiled New Zealand locales are spectacular, providing a variety of environments to represent the different settings on the characters\' journey.  The location sets are imaginative, detailed & weathered, adding to their believability, while the studio sets match them in meticulousness.  The costumes are at once familiar & strange, drawing on both the medievil & the fantastic, but more important, they\'re also functional & practical.  The music by Howard Shore is appropriately sweeping, Celtic & folky in keeping with the novel, although it lacks the memorable themes of John Williams or Jerry Goldsmith, but neither would commit a year or more to a 3 picture project.  The FX are as they should be, unobtrusive & unnoticed most of the time, there only to support the story not draw attention away from it as in most Hollywood movies which try to coverup illogical plots & bad acting.\n\n I\'m particularly gratified by the casting of Viggo Mortenson as Aragorn which was a last minute stroke of luck when the actor first chosen for the part backed out due to differences with the director.  I\'ve always thought Mortenson had an intensity & striking but not pretty-boy looks that could portray a flawed, dangerous hero instead of the villains Hollywood always picked him for.\n\nA stellar cast giving some of their best performances, visuals that deliver beyond what I imagined, a perfect mix of humor, passion & tragedy, and a feeling of grandeur, scope & impending doom.  Perhaps as an ensemble piece with so many characters & the inability to concentrate on any one, it can\'t be measured against some of the classic character study films, but even the casual moviegoer can grasp the ideas & not get lost  As far as I\'m concerned, it\'s one of the greatest films of all time.\n', u'0.203468', u"\nIt is with no surprise that Peter Jackson's The Fellowship of the Ring film has received such mixed critics. Many viewers refer to it as being childish, boring and uninteresting. Seems to me that it is bound to the same fate of Tolkien's books, destined to be a target for the same type of misunderstandings that keep attacking this literary masterpiece many decades after it's first publication.\n\nHaving read the books several years ago, I went to see this `impossible' film when it came out with many doubts on my mind. I really liked it, but left the theater with as many doubts as I had before. Was it perfect? Well, maybe not, but what an achievement. After watching it a few times on DVD, and thinking about it for some time now, I find myself loving this film more and more. Let me tell you why...\n\nThe Lord of the Rings is a fairy-tale of myth and fantasy. Peter Jackson directed a film that was considered, for a very long time, impossible to make, and not only for technical reasons. The narrative roots are incredibly long and detailed, and the storyline is deeply connected with the creation of a fantastic continent from a time unknown called `Middle Earth'. It's author, Tolkien, dedicated a considerable part of his life developing this continent's background, it's mythology and origins, it's different kinds of people, cultures and languages, and therefore it's geographic references are determinant to the unfolding of the story of the One Ring.\n\nPeter Jackson went out to achieve the impossible and came out with a recreation of the original that is pure and true to the story in every detail. The first time the four hobbits meet a black rider on the road, for example, is absolutely faithful to the feeling of the book. The assault of the riders at Weathertop is another great example, and it captures that feeling of danger, density and atmosphere that are the main characteristics of the tale. Jackson also took some liberties with the story, and made some right choices along the way. If the so called `purists' may not approve the removal of Tom Bombadil altogether, it should be comprehensible that the travel from Hobbiton to Rivendel is a very long and detailed one and could easily make a movie on it's own. I felt more uneasy with how short the Council of Elrond was. In the book, the council is where the whole story of the rings is first explained, and many passages from the past ages of Middle Earth are unveiled. It is a fascinating moment of the story, that had to be shortened for obvious reasons. Still, after some consideration, I now agree with the options made by Peter Jackson, and think that the movie prologue narrated by Galadriel was the wisest choice. The magic is all there when Gandalf shuts his eyes the moment Frodo stands in the council and says `I will take the ring'. It is there at Moria's Gate, and at the fall of Boromir. It is a powerful film that doesn't fit the rhythm of the standard Hollywood action movie. It is a film that breeds, that takes time to unfold, it's tale branching in every direction.\n\nI could go on and on, talking about all the different elements that bring this film close to perfection, but I'll end saying that deep down, this is not about action, beards and big monsters. The greatest thing about this film, to me, is that it brought me back to a time when I was in love with a\ndifferent world where everything was possible. Reading The Lord of the Rings night after night, I came to understand what this thing of `mankind' really was all about. The corruption of absolute power, the importance and value of friendship, the inevitability of growing up, the strength of hope... That this film could capture that magic, and be a new bearer to it's message of humanism, is a statement to it's greatness. Gandalf's words, that even the smallest person may change the course of the world, and have a part to play in the destiny of all, are immortal.\n\nIn the end, this is a wonderful film, but that doesn't mean you are going to like it. I cannot tell you what it is like to see this film if you don't know or love the book. But I hope it may plant a seed on your heart to discover a great world of fantasy, beauty and humanity. I believe Tolkien would have liked that.", u'0.397766', u'\nWhen I first saw the trailers for "The Fellowship of the Ring," I had never had any interest in reading the lengthy tome of a trilogy.  But seeing the possibility of the movie, I immediately went out and read the whole thing, insisted on receiving it for Christmas, and enjoyed every minute of it. The feelings I had while reading the series were heightened seeing it come to life in the stunning movie.  I thought it was a fabulous work of art.\n\nI thought that having Galadriel tell what was basically the prologue of the book was a good idea, as it helped those who had never read the story.  It also immediately involved me in the film; I felt I had an insider\'s advantage on the rest of the audience.  Cate Blanchett has a wonderfully deep and emotional voice; the way she speaks Galadriel is almost as effective as her appearence as the Elven queen.  Also, showing the last battle of Isildur and Sauron helped unfog a part of the novel that had me a\ntrifle confused.\n\nThe entire movie is full of beautiful sets and landscapes.  The Shire was almost exactly as I\'d pictured it.  Hobbiton is cute and very whimsical. Mordor was frighteningly well done, extremely real.  Rivendell had a little bit of a European-tourist-trap look, but was beautiful all the same.  The entire backdrop of the movie (the mountains, Moria, Isengard) was perfect; it\'s amazing that "Fellowship" was filmed in one country.\n\nNow to the characters.  All I can say is, "Wow."  I was a little apprehensive about the casting at first; I\'d created such real images of the characters in my imagination, I almost didn\'t want them spoiled for me. However, I was not disapointed in the least.  Elijah Wood, though not one of my favorite actors, was believable.  You could tell from the first glimpse that Frodo was special; Wood\'s pale, sharp features contrast sharply with the more ruddy, robust look of the rest of the hobbits.  He also cries like a little girl.  But his weaknesses and strengths make his Frodo an apt choice for the starring character.  The rest of the Hobbiton gang was well-chosen, too.  Sean Astin ("Rudy" forever to me) was loyal and a bit bumbling, just like the Gamgee of Tolkien\'s telling.  Pippin and Merry were congenial, slow-witted lads, but very brave nonetheless.  Viggo Mortensen is outstanding.  He has the ability to make Aragorn both menacing and kind. He physically represents Strider to the nines with his strength and virility; the action sequences of his are very passionate and exciting.  Some may have complained about Arwen\'s character being slightly expanded; I thought it a good change.  In the books, you have to read the whole trilogy and then rifle through the appendix in "The Return of the King" to learn the history between Aragorn and Arwen.  Liv Tyler is ethereal and breathtaking, but at the same time displays the courage and magic that make the Elves the beings they are.  Speaking of Elves, I can\'t help but gush over the handsome and ever-so-talented Orlando Bloom as noble Legolas.  Bloom captured the archer\'s very movements; he treads lightly and fights fearlessly. Legolas\'s bowmanship was amazing; he looked so natural loosing his arrows machine-gun style.  He was my favorite character in the books, and his essence transcends the film.  Gimli was pompous and brave, as well.  He is well-represented in the movie.  Boromir was hopelessly lost, but at the same time valiant and strong.  Sean Bean gave an emotionally-charged performance as the tortured warrior.  Hugo Weaving was very good as Elrond.  He was noble and cold at the same time.  And Gandalf.  What more can be said of Ian McKellan\'s showcase portrayal of the wizard?  He was magnificent.  He could be Gandalf, the kind old conjurer who set off pyrotechnics for hobbit-children.  Then he could turn around and stun the life out of you with Gandalf the powerful wizard, facing the balrog with defiance and an iron will.  His Oscar nomination is well-deserved.\n\nPeter Jackson is a brave soul to take on a project that could have backfired in so many places.  Instead of bringing us uninspired kitsch, he serves up raw emotion, graphic battles of good and evil, chilling and wonderful characters, and enough special effects (realistic, mind you) to make John Cameron\'s mouth water.  Knowing that "The Two Towers" was my favorite of the books, I eagerly anticipate the second helping of "The Lord of the Rings."', u'0.442725', u'\nI think it is important to remember that Peter Jackson took up this film not in order just to make a film of `The Lord of the Rings\' but because he wanted to make a \'fantasy just like the `The Lord of the Rings\'" as he himself put it.  After repeating that phrase on a number of occasions the question popped into his mind: "Well, why not the `The Lord of the Rings\' itself?".  In doing this he, of course, set himself an enormous challenge: he had to make a really good `fantasy\' film, one which would stand on its own and be true to what he had originally wanted to do but he would also, and here the task he had set himself was enormous, be true to the original book and to make a film which the legions of people who have loved this book would feel happy with.  In the latter task he was certainly not helped by the author or the book: Tolkein, it would seem, hated cinema.  The book itself is `HUGE\': this was not going to be the kind of task that the James Ivory team set themselves, or Scorsese nor the kind of task facing Branagh with Hamlet; nor was it going to be like the puny task that faced Columbus with `Harry Potter\' who had the bigger budget ($130 million for one film as compared with Peter Jackson with $300m for three).\n\nI have just seen the first `volume\' and can say without hesitation that he has succeeded in both his goals.  It is not the book but a reading of the book which is inventive and fascinating.  It is the kind of experience that makes you want to go back and reread the whole thing in the light of the emphases that Jackson has brought to the story.  He focuses on the corrupting influence of the ring and, through this focus, the character of the chief protagonists of the story are revealed.  Clearly those most tempted by it are mortal men (Boromir and even, in one moment, Aragorn), those who already have power (Elrond - `The ring cannot stay here\'; Galadriel; Gandalf and Saruman),  and, of course, those who would not normally desire it but who by accident become ring bearers - Gollum, Bilbo, Frodo.  I can see why, in this reading, Jackson decided to leave out the Bombadil episode.  Bombadil, like the Balrog, is beyond the ring but the latter is important to the unfolding of the story of the fates of all the characters, Bombadil isn\'t.\n\nIt is a miracle of this reading of the first volume of the book that one can see where Jackson is going and one can get a feel of how the reading is going to unfold.  In a sense, Jackson\'s real trial - as far as those who know the books are concerned - will come with the second film in the series. He has lived up to our expectation by creating even bigger ones: how can he handle the story of the chase andrescue of Merry and Pippin, the storming of Isengard etc - stories which don\'t really add much to the core theme that is emerging.  Or is he now going to add the theme of the great contest of good versus evil to the unfolding reading?\n\nAll of this points to the fact that the film, even though it is a feast of special effects, focuses on character.  And this also explains why Jackson chose the actors he did for their roles: they are not `big\' names - no `Sean Connery\', no `Alan Rickman\', no `Brad Pitt\', no `Sam Neill\'etc.  He didn\'t want them getting in the way of the story of character.  Ian McKellan\'s talents, in particular, are used to tell a large proportion of the story: an enormous amount is conveyed simply through his facial expressions and even by the language of his body. The other miracle in all of this is Elijah Wood.  Like many others, when I first heard of Jackson\'s choice, I groaned: but Wood has been extraordinary.  He brings, as one friend said, a strange kind of androgyny to the role and this is just perfect. McKellan has already been knighted: give Wood the Oscar.\n\nAnd then there is Middle Earth: this is, as someone put it, another character in the story and the New Zealand landscape, digitally enhanced on occasion, lives up to its role too.\n\nEnough.  See this film!  Greatest film ever made?  How can one make a claim like that! Silly really; as silly as claiming that `The Lord of the Rings\' is the greatest book ever written.  Can\'t one simply love a story, enjoy reading it a number of times amd lose oneself in it.  One CAN claim that it is the greatest work in its genre as is the film.\n\n10/10\n', u'0.261736', u"\nBreathtaking.  Unique.  Captivating.  Enchanting.\n\nWithin minutes of the start of this first chapter of an undeniably epic trilogy, the audience was left gasping at the intensity of the images on the screen.  And we had nearly three hours to go.\n\nThe scope of Tolkien's masterpiece may have eluded film-makers for decades, but director Peter Jackson makes good on his promise: he has not only brought us the tale of Frodo and his bold companions, he has brought us Middle Earth.  And believe me, it is BIG.  Sweeping vistas and hang-onto-your-seat camera shots send us zooming through the towering cities and citadels of Tolkien's imagination.\n\nBut even more impressive than the stunning visuals and sound-effects-like-you've-never-heard-before are the actors who breathe life into the characters.  Ian McKellen's portrayal of Gandalf is nothing short of awe-inspiring, and Elijah Wood's Frodo is one of the most unexpectedly captivating performances I've seen in a long time.  The despair, terror, and determination of the Fellowship is all there, in spades.  I left the theater aching...from tensing every muscle during the fight and flight sequences--the breathless and compelling kind we haven't seen since Spielberg gave us a desperate charge onto the D-Day beaches of Normandy.\n\nThose unfamiliar with Tolkien's world may quickly find themselves lost in it, but happily so.  The depth of his creation cannot be grasped in a few hours, and it doesn't need to be; the struggle of good against evil explodes on the screen, and leaves little room for complaint.\n\nThe movie ended with a stunned audience sitting on the edges of their seats, feeling somewhat bereft.  We were exhausted, but no one wanted to wait a year for more.\n\nJackson's ambitious first chapter is truly unlike anything you've seen this year.  George Lucas and Chris Columbus take note: this is how you deliver on a cinematic promise.\n\nFor everyone else: don't you dare miss it.", u'0.400078', u"\nThere's a very obvious problem when transferring any book to the big screen, namely that some of us may already have seen it.\n\n It's not that the story holds no surprises (save for the occasional controversies that surround the fate of characters like Hannibal Lecter), it's just that many of us have already read the book, and thus we've already directed our own version of the story. We've already seen it in our mind's eye.\n\n And this is the problem that plagues The Fellowship of The Ring. You'll see a lot of reviews here proclaiming it as nothing short of the second coming of cinema, and a few that dare to knock its serious shortcomings. Let me clear this up right now.\n\n The first issue that many may raise is that this is not a faithful adaptation of the book. Quite right, while taking pains to ensure that they stayed faithful to the novel, Jackson et al have not simply been able to lift their screenplay directly from its pages without a few necessary changes. There is a great deal of mindfulness in the film about the portion of the audience (and it will be large) who are unfamiliar with the novels.\n\nAccordingly a great deal more emphasis has been placed upon pacing and storytelling more appropriate to a classic film narrative. Hence we need to see Gandalf's protracted bid to escape the clutches of Isenguard interspersed with the Hobbit's journey to Rivendell. It simply isn't appropriate to expect an audience to bear with the Hobbits' journey, no matter how good the actors are or how enthralling the story is, for upwards of an hour without constant reminders of the films other protagonists OR the threat of the evil they face. Having Gandalf just turn up at Rivendell and tell his story via CGI-filled flashbacks simply wouldn't have had the necessary effect.\n\n Secondly, the omission and reworking of characters. Yes, it was sad that Bakshi felt his animation didn't need Tom Bombadill, and given that he features strongly in Tolkien's other works this has to be frowned upon by the die-hard fanatics, but introducing diverting, but ultimately pointless episodes into the list of the challenges the Hobbits face is hardly going to keep you riveted to your seat is it? I mean, a man who stops the Hobbits being eaten, very slowly, by a tree with his power of song is just quite frankly ludicrous in this day and age. The film is already stretching the audience's suspension of disbelief as far as it can go. Hence the chaff of Bombadill is cut. He isn't relevant to the rest of the story so he can be done without. It's sad for Tolkien fans for him not to be there but there's only so much celluloid available, even with a film this long.\n\n And yes, Arwen Undomiel never saved Frodo from the Dark Riders, but please, remember your girlfriend needs to have something to sink her teeth into as well, not just midgets and men with beards looking mean or scared as they fight monsters. So, for gender representation and a bid to prevent half the potential market (please remember that like all film, this is a product to be packaged and sold) her character gets a drastic overhaul. Go sister!\n\n There are numerous other issues relevant to the faithfulness of the adaptation from novel to screenplay but please, let's be content with what we've got here. It's a hard task to do all this well and Jackson, along with the rest of the boys and girls at Wingnut and WETA, should be commended for what they have achieved.\n\n That said there are some definite flaws in the film, even those that can't be overlooked by justifying the needs to relate to the popcorn and nachos audience.\n\n Firstly, we've got the Fellowship itself. Now, Merry and Pippin, while not really being established as Frodo's friends and thus not having the same kind of bond with him as they do in the novel are moderately well integrated. However, at the arrival of Boromir, Gimili and Legolas we just get left in the dark. None of these three characters, all representing important races, cultures and locations of the world of Middle Earth are given no more than token arrival-shots to introduce them, and little or no back-story as to how they came to be where they are or why they feel compelled to join Frodo's quest. Offering their various weapons is noble, and it sounds fantastic in the trailer, but when we finally get down to it we just don't know who they are or what they're about. Accordingly we don't ever really have time to care about any of these three, save for Legolas whose fighting proficiency alone makes him stand out. Sadly, Sean Bean is allowed little more than to switch from foreboding bad guy to friendly companion and back again (thus betraying his characters ultimate fate from the first time he opens his mouth) and John Rhys Davis is left with little more to do than scowl and look short. It doesn't help that both these characters seem to get a pretty raw deal for screen time, especially Gimli, who is barely in the film at all. We won't even begin to go into the seemingly superficial relationship we see between Sam and Frodo.\n\n All of this is indeed a shame. The film's greatest strength after its story are its strong characters. However, whereas in the book they have the space to develop and flesh themselves out here they have little more to do than look in awe at Gandalf, perhaps not with a humble air so much as a wonder that he's being allowed to soak up all the screen time.\n\n And yes, what you've heard is true; the fight sequences are shockingly bad. Well, perhaps that IS an overstatement. The fight sequences aren't exactly bad, they're riddled with good ideas and clever moves, but the camerawork and editing is so erratic that you'll have a hard time picking out anything to inspire awe or respect. The problem here is that the benchmarks for on screen fighting have all been established nowadays by The Matrix, Crouching Tiger and The Phantom Menace, and all of these films use lengthy shots to allow us to soak up the fight imaginative fight choreography, rather than have us crane our necks and dart about the screen with our eyeballs trying to glimpse it like a rare bird or nipple-flash at a premiere.\n\n Now, these, yet again, are only a few of the problems. There's the geography of Middle Earth, some ropey special effects moments and the clumsy ending to deal with. But you can read the books and see the film for yourself; I've already typed enough about all that here.\n\n BUT, now that I've just spent the main chunk of this review telling you about the shortcomings of The Fellowship of the Rings as both a movie and an adaptation let me tell you, it is good, exceptionally good.\n\n There is no denying that the storyline itself, acting, effects, props, sets and so on and so forth are all spot on. Visually the film is a triumph and WETA has now, without question placed itself ahead of Industrial Light and Magic in terms of industry leading special effects. There are bags of style to proceedings, with some sequences displaying the sheer amount of vision of the whole team to bring somewhat vague sections of the novel to life.\n\nAll parts are played to perfection by the cast, and the casting is literally some of the best and most appropriate seen in years, none of this who-hot-and-who's-not Jerry Bruckheimer trash, it's a case of the best possible person for the part at every stage of the film. We'll give particular credit to Sir Ian Mckellan, Christopher Lee, Ian Holm and Elijah Wood again here. No doubt they've had scores of favourable and loving reviews already but these performances truly are worth mentioning just once again.\n\n The film is a masterpiece from start to finish. Yes, it does take perseverance, no it's not entirely faithful to Tolkien's work and there are some serious flaws, but in a year that has been so barren of even five decent mainstream movies I think it's safe to say that no matter when this film had been released it would have outshone its competitors.\n\n\n", u'-0.0870558', u'\nThe reason why this first part of Jackson\'s \'Lord of the Rings\' is superior to his latter two parts is because of restraint. Jackson was restrained from over doing it with the CGI and "epic" battle sequences, which in my opinion does not make a story epic. Part of the reason was simply because Tolkien did not have very many battles in the first part of his book, which thankfully forced Jackson to focus on creating a believable world rather than a believable hack-n-slash action movie.\n\nI don\'t find much entertainment in watching people mutilate each other, but I love it when a movie engages me in a world, and \'The Fellowship of the Ring\' does just that. Certainly the most breathtaking scenes in the movie are the moments of patient observation, when the camera pans around and captures the beautiful settings of Middle Earth. I must give Jackson credit. He did hire some very extraordinary artists that have envisioned one of the grandest interpretations of Tolkien\'s world.\n\nThere are about five particular moments that stick out in my mind and gave me that tingle of goosebumps down my spine when I saw them for the first time. The first is the introduction to Hobbiton. After the somewhat awkward prologue, I was beginning to have my doubts to whether the movie would live up to the book. But the movie surprised me. Hobbiton is perfect. The houses have flower patches and old fences, the roads look worn and made through decades of travel, and the Old Mill spins with the laziness of a quiet town. Every color is vibrant and every moment looks as through it was taken out of a picture book. Although I still don\'t agree with the particular look of the Hobbits, I believe everything else in Hobbiton is worthy of Tolkien\'s words.\n\nThe second moment comes after Frodo\'s awakening in Rivendell, and the third, during the exploration of the Halls of Moria. In both moments, the camera pans away from the characters and outward into a static shot of their surroundings. The moments make us feel like we\'re turning our heads and gazing at the world around us just as the characters do. The golden waterfalls of the elven city mark an interesting contrast with the dark halls of the dwarfish mines, but each are inspiring in their own ways and add to feeling of being engaged in a living world.\n\nMy other favorite moments come during the exploration of Lothlorien and the passage down the Anduin. And while I won\'t go into detail about the scenes, since they really should be experienced without any prior expectations, they are monuments in imaginative cinema. \'The Fellowship of the Ring\' is one of those rare movies that I always wish I could reexperience for the first time. Unfortunately, Jackson turned away from exploring Middle Earth in his next two movies, and instead, turned to fighting and warfare. He seems to take a lot of pride in the love story and battle sequences he created in \'The Two Towers\' and \'The Return of the King,\' but it is was in his first movie when he really got it right. In \'The Fellowship of the Ring,\' it\'s okay if the characters are uninteresting and have silly dialogue. Middle Earth is the star, and the characters are the ones seeing it for the first time.', u'0.364816', u"I absolutely love this movie, partly because the acting is really good, but also for the CGI effects and the good storyline. I watched the extended version and realized that it isn't boring like some people think because some people I know think that FOTR is quite a lengthy movie because of all the talking, but in my opinion, if there's not talking, there's no story! If they just jumped to the fighting scenes without any of the introduction, then you won't know where the movie started from. I love the scenes where they get to fight, whether Orcs or Nazgul, the fighting scenes are still the climax of the movie.\n\nAnother good movie to see after FOTR is TTT, of course. It is the second part of this great trilogy and there are more climatic scenes. Most probably, you'll enjoy that more than FOTR but don't shun this movie just because it's a bit lengthy.\n\nOverall, it's a great movie to see and it is really worth spending the money to buy/rent the extended/special DVD to watch too. Definitely a 10 out of 10 on my scale! Actually, in my opinion, 10/10 doesn't even come close!", u'0.0674858', u'\n\'The Lord of the Rings\' is one of my favorite books, I have read it several times, and remember thinking the last time, about 3 years ago that if I made a film I\'d want to make it of this, but wouldn\'t it be almost impossible. You can then imagine how strong my expectations were when I went to see the eagerly awaited first installment.\n\n This film impressed me hugely, more than anything else because of how true it was to my imagination, both in the characters as well as in the effects and setting- a sentiment I have heard consistently from other fans of the books. Elijah Wood brought across the character of Frodo with the kind of haunted, frail courage that Tolkien captures so well in the books. Nor could I find any fault at all with Ian McKellan\'s Gandalf, Viggo Mortensen\'s Aragorn, and Sean Bean\'s Boromir, all of whom I thought were portrayed excellently. I could pick out instances where I did think, \'no, that\'s not right\', however their seldomness in number would only serve to illustrate the excellence of the overall portrayal. One thing that did stand out for me was Cate Blanchett\'s performance as Galadriel, the part itself became so perfunctory in the film that to me her alternation between benevolent seer, and figure of potential terror seemed little more than a slightly confusing detour with no real connection into the plot other than as a vehicle for a glimpse into the future. But that was it.\n\nI thought that the points where Jackson did deviate from the text were completely the correct ones to do so. Shortening the opening Shire scenes and cutting out the whole Tom Bombadil bit was great since frankly they bored me slightly in the book anyway. Also, expanding the role of Arwen was a sensible decision.\n\n However this film is by no means above criticism. The dialogue was in my opinion terrible and purely there to drive on the plot. Normally this would ruin a film for me (as in "The Matrix"), making it almost intolerable to view, however fortunately here it proves little more than a minor irritation. Also, the film seemed overall to be excessively plot-driven and at times a mad dash from one action scene to another, the characters, for all their truth to the book did seem flat and sometimes little more than stereotypical fantasy characters. This is perhaps my major quarrel with the film- I would have liked these characters to have come alive as people in a way that was made impossible by the sparseness of the script and the rollercoaster nature of the plot. In general the whole film lacked the depth of context that I think distinguishes Tolkien from other fantasy writers. However to have achieved this would have required a very different movie, and you can\'t fault an action film for being an action film.\n\n This movie is undoubtedly not for everyone. A lot of people just don\'t get fantasy- other than Lord of the Rings, I don\'t particularly either. However in my opinion Jackson really has made an incredible achievement- his and Tolkien\'s vision carried through suberbly by a breathtaking setting and stunning special effects, as well as by a cast clearly as enthralled as he was. He has taken on a huge task, and is dealing with it with breathtaking success.', u'0.00333026', u'Here is one film that lived up to its hype, and by the time I saw it after it had arrived at the video stores, I had heard and read a ton of things about it, and seen all the awards it had received, and expected a lot. To my surprise, it did not disappoint.\n\nNow, several years later after having watched all three of these "Rings" films twice each, I still think this first movie of the trilogy is the best. It is a truly spectacular adventure story all the way through, probably the best ever put to film...and the first three hours of it is extra special. The following two films were very good, to be sure, but this first had a better mixture of the story. The second and third movies were almost entirely Frodo and his allies\' long journey, but the first half of this movie also gives a good bit of interesting introductory material including a number of scenes at the Shire, before the long adventure starts. If you watch all three of these films consecutively the action wears you down by midway through the final episode and it almost becomes just too much That never gets a chance to happen with the "Fellowship" film.\n\nAnyway, "Fellowship," stunned me for the visuals alone. I can\'t recall any film that has so many jaw-dropping scenes, one after the other, for three straight hours. Some are beyond description, and I don\'t care if they are computer- generated. So what? The fact is they are awesome to view, both in beauty and in staggering action scenes that feature incredible-looking monsters and other mythical characters.\n\nThe story covers all kinds of terrain, too, from the lush Shire of the Hobbits, to the harsh neighboring landscapes. Each couple of minutes, as in the two movies that followed, scenes radically change from calmness to action, adventure to romance, sweet lovable characters to hideous monsters, on and on and on. It\'s an incredible movie experience.', u'0.414345', u'I\'ve never been a fan of the sword and sorcery genre . I\'m surprised film companies decide to make rubbish like THE BEASTMASTER, HAWK THE SLAYER and RED SONJA but I am aware of the popularity of JRR Tolkien\'s massive novel LORD OF THE RINGS and of it\'s popularity , I remember in a survey carried out by a very well known British fantasy/SF magazine in 1987 Tolkien\'s book was voted the greatest fantasy novel of all time ( THE STAND by Stephen King was a long way second ) , but it\'s a novel that has always struck me as being read by anoraks who - like fans of STAR TREK and STAR WARS - insist on reading subtexts that are just not there . When the THE FELLOWSHIP OF THE RINGS shot to number one in the IMDb top 250 films I put the popularity down to obsessed anorakish fans who were going to vote the film a classic no matter what . Stranger still I found groups as diverse as neo Nazis to gays to enviromentalists proclaiming " This is our film " so when I finally sat down to watch TFOTR I was expecting only some average entertainment for a non sad person with no political axe to grind . After seeing the film I had to admit THE FELLOWSHIP OF THE RING is a masterpiece .\n\nMuch of the credit must go to the producers . I \'ve no idea of the politics about bringing the story to the silver screen but I can imagine the Hollywood bigwigs sitting around the commitee table saying " Give us Tom , give us Nicole , get Harrison , get Leonardo . No limeys . Limeys are slimy . No limey accents . We\'re Americans , this is our baby " to which the producers gave a firm and resounding " No " . Good for them because the Hollywood treatment would have ruined this film. The cast comprised of well known - but not megastar - actors and unknowns are uniformally excellent even the normally hammy Lee and Rhys Davis and the bland Tyler are good . Also great to see so many Brits playing good guys and having the American actors adopting non specific British accents .The cast do a good job\n\nThe other production values are outstanding . Pride of place goes to Andrew Lesnie\'s cinematography where the camera sweeps down from the sky into the Orcs underground lair and the camera also shows off the stunning New Zealand landscapes . I\'d always believed Scotland had the greatest scenery on Earth but I\'m willing to change my mind . The FX are good throughout though perhaps the matte backgrounds and CGI are less impressive in places but they\'re still a lot better than we\'ve been used to recently . The Orc make up is wonderful and helps them become classic cinema monsters . The only bad point about the Orcs is - Like the stormtroopers in STAR WARS - they\'re too easy to kill .\n\nThere are some minor flaws to THE FELLOWSHIP OF THE RINGS but this is probably down to Tolkien\'s source novel rather than the film makers . A couple of times the heroes seem set to suffer a resounding defeat when something not obvious at first like flammable villains or a giant eagle saves the day . I guess this is cancelled out by the dangers and adversaries also appearing from nowhere and there\'s little female perspective in the story for the women in the audience to relate to but come on girls you\'ve got Viggo Mortensen and Sean Bean acting all hunky and macho so you can\'t complain.\n\nI see the IMDb reviewers have started a backlash against FOTR like they did with TITANIC and GLADIATOR . They\'re right about the gawd awful rubbish that is TITANIC but they\'re wrong about GLADIATOR which is a very good film and even further wrong about THE FELLOWSHIP OF THE RING which is a cinematic masterpiece. Ignore their criticisms . Any film that is praised by people as diverse as fans of the book , people who have never read the book , enviromentalists and cynics like myself is worth your time watching . I\'m really looking forward to THE TWO TOWERS', u'0.00867474', u'The first part of the Lord of the Rings trilogy, the Fellowship of the Rings opened the door to a whole new world for me. I\'d never read any of Tolkien\'s books when I saw the film for the first time at the theatre and, now that I\'ve read them, in retrospect I think being a neophyte to the mythology made my LOTR movie experience all the more miraculous.\n\nI loved The Two Towers and Return of the King almost as much as FOTR, but not quite, because seeing Fellowship for the first time was like taking a journey to a fabulous new place and meeting incredible new friends that you don\'t want to leave. I\'ve never felt anything quite like what this epic evoked in me. It was akin to being a child again, with that tireless sense of wonder and enjoyment of each and every moment, maybe because as a child you are discovering your surroundings, and whatever age you are, when you watch the Fellowship of the Ring you are rendered in awe upon being introduced to the purity and beauty of Middle Earth and darkly enthralled by the majesty of Eisengard, Saruman, Sauron and all of their mighty malice. One of the things that makes this movie so special (and there are so many!) is that you fall in love not only with the "good" characters, but also with the "evil" ones. For example, Christopher Lee was amazing as Saruman, and I can\'t imagine the movie without him.\n\nSome films that might be comparable to the Lord of the Rings trilogy are: The Fifth Element, the Star Wars Trilogy parts IV, V and VI (forget the newer prequels), the Matrix trilogy (especially the first part), Interview with a Vampire, the Legend of Sleepy Hollow (with Johnny Depp), Logan\'s Run and The Island. They are all excellent movies and works of art that weave that movie magic that keeps you spellbound and entranced for the duration of their runtime.\n\nBut after seeing The Fellowship of the Ring, I knew I had found the movie by which I would judge all other movies. Based on J.R.R. Tolkien\'s beloved books, Peter Jackson has set a new standard in the industry of cinema, one that I honestly think has not and won\'t be surpassed, at least not in my lifetime, not even by PJ himself.\n\nIt is truly an instant classic that will stand the test of time and be loved by generations to come. God Bless Tolkien and Jackson and everyone involved in the conception and making of this film, for creating a world that is at my fingertips, only takes the touch of a button to go to whenever I want, and makes me forget everything else.\n\nThe LOTR Trilogy is undoubtedly MY precious, the non plus ultra of all movies!', u'0.295465', u'Peter Jackson set out to make movies which the author of the Lord of the Rings trilogy, J.R.R. Tolkien would have endorsed. All three were resounding successes, though because of the film medium they necessarily varied from Tolkien\'s story-line. Purists may have issues with Jackson\'s theatrical license, but as someone who has read Tolkien\'s books several times and seen the films 4-5 times each, I never felt that Jackson went too far or compromised Tolkien\'s story, the mythology he developed or the wonderful characters he brought to life. Many have said what Jackson did could not be done. He has not only proved the nay-sayers wrong, but lovingly crafted a set of films which will, for many decades to come, stand out as a great achievement. \n\nThis is the first of three reviews I am publishing on IMDb for these films. I am labeling them Parts 1, 2, and 3 just in case anybody wants to read them in order. The reviews will be self-contained, but will also be enhanced by a chronological reading. My reviews will focus on the extended edition DVDs, though my comments are also relevant to the theatrical releases.\n\nThe Fellowship of the Ring introduces the key characters and the broad story arc of the Lord of the Rings trilogy. Wizard Gandalf the Grey travels to a small town for small people (Hobbits)to help celebrate Bilbo Baggins\' birthday. The very elderly Baggins doesn\'t look a day over 45, and soon it becomes apparent why. Since the great adventure of his life, a quest he was sent on by Gandalf himself, he has possessed the most powerful object in all of Middle Earth \x96 The One Ring. \n\nThis ring is evil incarnate, with an insatiable lust for power, it taints every creature who possesses it and tries to work its way back to its creator \x96 Dark Lord Sauron. Bilbo uses the ring to disappear, as he intends to spend his senescence with his friends the Elves in Rivendell. But activating the ring, he draws the attention of Lord Sauron from thousands of miles away in the land of Mordor. Realizing what has occurred, Gandalf scrambles to determine a course of action and recruits Bilbo\'s nephew Frodo and his loyal gardener Samwise to bear the ring to the Council of Elrond in Rivendell. Thusly, the seeds of the fellowship are planted in the soil of the Shire.\n\nAt this point, we are about 1/6th of the way through The Fellowship. Fairly soon thereafter, it becomes clear who will compose the fellowship, and who and what these people are. Though the succeeding films are not entitled "Fellowship", they follow the adventures of the surviving central characters. Characterization is done just as Tolkien did it in the original novel \x96 by example not discourse. \n\nFor example, we are given hints to the identity of Strider (Mortenson) earlier on in the movie than in the novel, but the actual significance of this remains ambiguous until about midway through. Strong characterization is key to the success of the entire trilogy. To summarize, Peter Jackson, his team and cast \x96 NAIL the characterization. \n\nThe casting and acting is perfect. It is very difficult to resist the temptation to single out Mortenson and McKellen for carrying their difficult roles so well (Strider/Aragorn and Gandalf), but why risk diminishing the contributions of the rest of the cast? Nobody mis-steps, and it is clear from the beginning that the entire cast was thoroughly and completed engaged with the task before them.\n\nTolkien believed that no film would ever do his work justice, and until this trilogy, he was correct.Peter Jackson and his team have managed to do exactly what they set out to. As Jackson himself has said in reference to the film trilogy, they set out to \'make Tolkien\'s film.\' Jackson successfully drew out elements of all three books, expanding and contracting, rearranging, and sometimes adding whole subplots which are hinted at in the books, but not well explained, in order to adopt the grand story to the film medium. Arwen (Liv Tyler), daughter of Elrond and Elven lover of Aragorn, for example, is introduced early in the films and plays a role in the films which is much more equal to her significance than it was in the books.\n\nThe Howard Shore score is lovely, and its simple themes are used to great effect throughout all three movies. The musical collaborations improvising on Shore\'s basic themes are great, and, though they feature some prominent performers \x96 are never weighed down by star-power.\n\nJackson made all three movies simultaneously. This technique allowed for perfect continuity, and permitted much greater flexibility in editing and post-production work than would normally be allowed. Knowing that he would need to establish and support his own fellowship to make this production work, he also knew that success would make the production legendary. So, he documented the creation of the films beautifully. Two complete DVDs full of documentary pieces are included in all three Special Edition Packages in the trilogy. Many are likely to be bored by the details in these documentaries, but those interested in the creative process behind the films will be provided with a more comprehensive view than I can remember ever seeing in any similar DVD package. \n\nThe Fellowship of the Rings is as true a representation of Tolkien\'s novel as can be imagined. Although some aspects of the stories in the novel were adapted to the screen, the essentials, the characters, and the overall story are not just recognizable, but ENHANCED by the film. What results is a film that is not just entertaining, but an enormous fulfillment of an undying wish of millions of fans around the world.\n\nVery highly recommended.', u'0.389059', u"Barely ever hearing of The Lord of the Rings, I went in to see this film in theaters the consecutive Friday it was released, to not only be flabbergasted at its greatness, but wanting more! Since then, I devoted myself to seeing the following two films on the first day of release -- a promise I kept.\n\nPeter Jackson's take on Tolkien's fantasy masterpiece not only carries a great deal of the text to full film fruition, but shows the power of film, and proving that nothing is impossible. Jackson's vision is continuous, and never seems to loose grasp of the story that is being told. Using the artistry of John Howe and Alan Lee, The Fellowship of the Ring gleams with a beautiful and dark atmosphere, a length of detail that makes it seem like everyone and everything has its own history, and full of wondrous images one could never imagine.\n\nThe acting is superb. With a complex script, each actor has transformed these characters into 3-D people with deep back-story, and people that we feel compassion for. This is one extraordinary ensemble cast. Each actor IS that character, making it seem impossible to imagine anyone else fill that person's shoe in their stead. Viggo Mortensen IS Aragorn. Sir Ian McKellen IS Gandalf the Grey. Elijah Wood IS Frodo Baggins. One could weep with our heroes should one fall, or feel inspired when they achieve victory. A fantasy with this much emotion just seems surreal, but it's completely believable.\n\nNever losing pace, the writing and direction is flawless, making for one enthralling introduction into Middle-earth. The voice over prologue fills even the most uneducated audience member with all the necessary knowledge they need to know in order to understand our heroes' and villains' motives. Some things of course have been omitted for pacing reasons. While not present in the theatrical cut, we do see the passing of the Grey Elves, and get a brief tale of Beren and Luthien. The barrow-wights and their story is no where to be seen (as interesting as it is in the book, there really is no place for it in this film) and Tom Bombadil is absent as well, but thankfully to the ingeniousness of the writers, in the Extended Edition of The Two Towers a little homage is paid to the character. Omissions and changes are always part of adapting a book to film, and the ones made by Peter Jackson, Phillipa Boyens and Fran Walsh are justifiable in every way.\n\nThe action scenes are spaced out thoroughly enough for breathing room, plot advancement, and ever-continuing character development. Each action scene is its own, be it the flight to the Fjords of Bruinen, the Mines of Moria, or the showdown at Amon Hen near the end of the film. All are greatly choreographed, each stunt member and actor is full of energy and ambition as they wield deadly weapons at each others' heads and limbs. It really is a sight to behold.\n\nThe special effects are mesmerizing. The use of CGI, miniatures/bigatures, and even clever camera angles blend to make one ideal image after the other. The soaring images of Barad-dur or Orthanc seem real when in fact, they only stand so many feet high. The Argonath, two figures of enormous height standing before the Anduin River seem like 300 foot creations, when in fact they are about only several feet off the ground. Simply jaw-dropping imagery.\n\nHoward Shore's score for The Fellowship of the Ring is a beautiful, epic, and complex piece of work that makes one feel like they have been entranced. Even when some of the text seems omitted from the screen, it can be heard through the powerful instrumentation conducted and created by this composer. The use of leitmotifs to symbolize a country, race, or character is stunning.\n\nOverall, The Lord of the Rings - The Fellowship of the Ring is a visionary masterpiece, allowing the world to see what seems like actual history with fantastic elements, equaling the greatness of Hollywood's earlier classics. As the first of three, one who has not seen these films can await the next several hours of their lives to be changed for ever.", u'0.397663'], u'tt0050083': [u'\nAn excellent courtroom drama with a unique twist. Instead of following the trial itself, the viewer has a unique chance to observe the events behind the closed doors of a jury room. The film begins with the end of the trial. The jurors retire to deliberate the case. A preliminary vote is taken and the result is 11:1 in favour of the guilty verdict. Eleven jurors have raised their hands to convict a young man of killing his father. Only Juror #8 has doubts. At first even he does not truly believe the young man to be innocent but notes (rightfully) that the case for the defence might have been presented in a more convincing manner and that the boy might be given the benefit of a doubt. Since the boy is to be executed if found guilty his life is now in the hands of the jury and juror #8 reasons that the least they could do is talk about the case a bit. As time goes on some of the jurors change their minds and find that there is perhaps enough reasonable doubt not to convict the young man after all. But not everyone is easy to convince.\n\nAlthough the plot of the film is excellent and it is fascinating to see what little things can influence which way a verdict goes, where this film really succeeds is in presenting the characters of the 12 jurors. The character of each of the jurors emerges through a wonderful mix of perfect casting, excellent dialogue and near-flawless acting.\n\nJuror #1 - a simple man who clearly does not understand the full complexity of the task that lies before him but is trying to do everything not to let anyone else find this out. He appears at ease only once during the film - when he talks about football. He has the misfortune to be selected foreman of the jury - a task he clearly does not relish.\n\nJuror #2 - a small, quite man, clearly unaccustomed to giving his own opinion much less to expecting his views to be of any importance. Apparently he finds solace in his job - he is an accountant.\n\nJuror #3 - probably the most complex personality in the film. Starts off like a pleasant self-made successful businessman, he analyses the case impartially, explains his arguments well and is reasonably self assured. As time goes on he becomes more and more passionate and seems to be somehow personally involved with the case.  He also starts to show some signs of slight mental instability. Wonderfully played by Lee J. Cobb - this is the character you remember after the film is over.\n\nJuror #4 - self assured, slightly arrogant stockbroker. Obviously considers himself more intelligent than anyone else in the room, he approaches the case with cool heartless logic but (as one of the jurors says - "this is not an exact science") he does not take into account the feelings, the passions, the characters of the people involved in the case. He is conspicuous by the fact that he is the only juror that does not take his jacket off (it is a very hot day).\n\nJuror #5 - here is a man under great emotional stress. He comes from the same social background as the accused boy - with who he almost unwillingly seems to identify with. Paradoxically this appears one of the main reasons for him voting guilty - he does not want compassion to influence him - so ironically it does.\n\nJuror #6 - a simple man, quite readily admitting that everyone in the room is better qualified than he is to make decisions and offer explanations. But he really wants to see justice done and it worries him that he might make a mistake.\n\nJuror #7 - the only one that really has no opinion on this case. Literally throughout the film his thoughts are never on the case - he talks of baseball, of the heat, of fixing the fan but the only reason he has for voting this way or that is to speed things up a bit so he might be out of the jury room as soon as possible. Not an evil man he just has no sense of morality whatsoever - he can tell right from wrong but does not seem to think it\'s worth the bother.\n\nJuror #8- a caring man, has put more thought into the case than any of the other jurors. He tries to do his best even in the face of seemingly impossible odds.\n\nJuror #9 - a wise old man with his great life experience has quite a unique way of looking at the case.\n\nJuror #10 - the most horrifying character in the film. Votes guilty and does not even try to hide the fact that he does so only because of the boy\'s social background. The tragedy comes from the fact that his own social position is only a cut above the boy\'s - which makes him all the more eager to accentuate the difference.\n\nJuror #11 - an immigrant watchmaker, careful methodical man, well mannered and soft spoken. respects the right of people to have different opinion to his - and is willing to look at both sides of the problem. Loses his temper only once - horrified by the complete indifference of juror #7.\n\nJuror #12 - a young business type - perhaps he has his own opinions - but is careful to hide them. What he has learnt out of life seems to be that intelligence is equal with agreeing with what the majority of people think.\n\nThe film succeeds in doing something very rare today - developing an intelligent plot while also developing 12 believable, memorable and distinct characters.\n', u'0.0429496', u'\nThis film is superb, in fact as Shakespeare once said "Its the bees\' knees".  The film captivates the audience from the beginning.  Each of the twelve jurors are introduced to us as they are introduced to themselves. The characters are well draw out and individual, each with his own personality.\n\nThe tension of the characters draws the audience in from the start.  We imagine that the case is open and shut, 11 me saying guilty and 1 not.  We feel the discomfort of Henry Fonda as the other characters belittle and mock how he can see any reasonable doubt in the case.  But we also share his victories and the enthusiasm as he proceeds to refute or add doubt to the arguments for guilty and are captivated and draw in as other jurors begin to see doubt in the proceedings.\n\nThe audience can also see the arguments for guilty and wonder if Fonda\'s character is correct in saying that he doubts. Yet they also feel the shame of the characters as he disproves that a previously sound theory is iron tight, joining his side as members of the jury do.\n\nOn top of this they are wonderfully woven in human elements such as the misconceptions that influence people and the growing tension between different characters.  This is brought to life even more by the amazing performances, Fonda, Lee J Cobb and Joseph Sweeney are of particular note.\n\nI started watching this film on a bored relaxed laying about day but by the end i was on the edge of the seat with my hands on my knees feeling more tense than a politician on results day.\n\nHow a film should be made.  Modern directors take note(thats ur telling off for the day) 10/10', u'0.45634', u"'12 Angry Men' is an outstanding film. It is proof that, for a film to be great, it does not need extensive scenery, elaborate costumes or expensive special effects - just superlative acting.\n\nThe twelve angry men are the twelve jurors of a murder case. An eighteen-year-old boy from a slum background is accused of stabbing his father to death and faces the electric chair if convicted. Eleven of the men believe the boy to be guilty; only one (Henry Fonda) has doubts. Can he manage to convince the others?\n\nThe court case provides only a framework, however. The film's greatness lies in its bringing-together of twelve different men who have never met each other before and the interaction of their characters as each man brings his own background and life experiences into the case. Thus, we have the hesitant football coach (Martin Balsam), the shy, uncertain bank clerk (John Fiedler), the aggressive call company director (Lee J. Cobb), the authoritative broker (E.G. Marshall), the self-conscious slum dweller (Jack Klugman), the solid, dependable painter (Edward Binns), the selfish salesman (Jack Warden), the calm, collected architect (Fonda), the thoughtful, observant older man (Joseph Sweeney), the racially bigoted garage owner (Ed Begley), the East European watchmaker (George Voskovec) and the beefcake advertising agent (Robert Webber) who has plenty of chat and little else.\n\nAlmost the entire film takes place in just one room, the jury room, where the men have retired to consider their verdict. The viewer finds him or herself sweating it out with the jury as the heat rises, literally and metaphorically, among the men as they make their way towards their final verdict. Interestingly, the jurors (apart from two at the end) are never named. They do not need to be. Their characters speak for them.\n\nHenry Fonda is eminently suitable and excellently believable as the dissenter who brings home the importance of a jury's duty to examine evidence thoroughly and without prejudice. Joseph Sweeney is delightful as Juror No. 9, the quiet but shrewd old man who misses nothing, whilst E.G. Marshall brings his usual firmness and authority to the role of Juror No. 4. All the actors shine but perhaps the best performance is that of Lee J. Cobb as Juror No. 3, the hard, stubborn, aggressive, vindictive avenger who is reduced to breaking down when forced to confront the failure of his relationship with his own son.\n\nSeveral of the stars of '12 Angry Men' became household names. Henry Fonda continued his distinguished career until his death in 1982, as well as fathering Jane and Peter. Lee J. Cobb landed the major role of Judge Henry Garth in 'The Virginian'. E.G. Marshall enjoyed a long, reputable career on film and t.v., including playing Joseph P. Kennedy in the 'Kennedy' mini-series. Jack Klugman was 'Quincy' whilst John Fiedler voiced Piglet in the 'Winnie The Pooh' films and cartoons.\n\nOf the twelve, only John Fiedler, Jack Klugman and Jack Warden* are still alive. Although around the eighty mark, they are all still acting. The film was still available on video last year and it is shown on t.v. fairly frequently. I cannot recommend it too highly!\n\n(*John Fiedler died June 2005. Jack Warden died July 2006.)", u'0.019352', u'........Films rarely get this uplifting and brilliant. I cannot think of the last time I was so intrigued by the flawless plot, dialogue and acting since 12 Angry Men. For such a simplistic story set in one jury room, it is surprising that Sidney Lumet can drain you of all your emotions and leave you on the edge of your seat with suspense, mystery, and some of the best acting your bound to ever see grace the silver screen!\n\nWhen a boy is on last day of trial for killing his father in the heat of domestic arguments, 12 jury men are forced to present a verdict in which if guilty, is the one way ticket to the electric chair for the boy. When the jury men decide to quickly end the discussion and raise their hands to find out who thinks the boy is guilty, only one jury man (Henry Fonda) doesn\'t put his hand up. Trial and Character revelations, doubts, and possibilities follow.\n\nSo masterfully crafted is this film, that every time I watch it, only gets better. It includes some of the best character development I\'ve ever seen. Sidney Lumet is an expert in this field and this is by far his greatest contribution to Hollywood history - one of the most important contributions to world cinema. However it was Henry Fonda and Lee J. Cobb who really made this film legendary, with their incredibly realistic performances. Casting was genius. And the dialogue was astoundingly riveting up until the brilliant finale. What really impressed me personally also was the camera angles and movements that made the film so suspenseful. Black and White made the film all the more powerful. And the music was minimal, which gave the film a more atmospheric experience, like you were their in the jury room with them - and you just feel that tension really built up as the movie proceeds.\n\nThis inexpensive film, with such a simple setting had the world talking, the academy awards nominations rolling and Henry Fonda at his complete best form. I have rarely been so hypnotized by a film - \'Lawrence Of Arabia\' and \'It\'s A Wonderful Life\' are other ones that come to mind. This is a definitive viewing for anyone who loves film. It sums up everything I love about film. Everything from a technical point of view to superb acting and a simple yet complex character driven story, it\'s platinum and is most definitely one of the greatest cinematic achievements of all time - bar none! A statue should be erected in Sydney Lumet\'s honor......\n\n"Is it possible?" - Juror #8/Henry Fonda', u'0.57449', u"This film deserves to be on anyone's list of top films. My problem is that it is so perfect, so seamlessly polished, it is hard to appreciate the individual excellences.\n\nThe acting is top notch. I believe that monologue acting is quite a bit simpler than real reactive ensemble acting. Most of what we see today is monologues pretending to be conversations. But in this film, we have utter mastery of throwing emotions. Once the air becomes filled with human essence, it is hard to not get soaked ourselves as the camera moves through the thick atmosphere. Yes, there are slight differences in how each actor projects (Fonda internally, Balsam completely on his skin...) but the ensemble presents one vision to the audience.\n\nThe writing is snappy too. You can tell it was worked and worked and worried, going through several generations. It is easy to be mesmerized by this writing and acting, and miss the rare accomplishment of the camera-work. This camera is so fluid, you forget you are in one room. It moves from being a human observer, to being omniscient, to being a target. It is smart enough to seldom center on the element of most importance, so expands the field to all men.\n\nThis is very hard. Very hard, to make the camera human. So much easier to do what we see today -- acknowledge the machinery and jigger with it. Do we have a filmmaker today who could do this?\n\nTed's Evaluation -- 4 of 3: Every cineliterate person should experience this.", u'0.229269', u'I watched this film for the first time, when it was shown at about 1 o\'clock in the morning. I made an effort to see it as it is rated as one of the best movies ever made, however I must admit that I watched it with a sense of reluctance as I\'m not a great one for old "classics". This film blew me away however; how ignorant can I be about old films? How many other pre-1960s gems are there out there that I haven\'t seen? What strikes me most about this film is how progressive it is for its day. Indeed the issues this film makes about American society of the 1950s, still ring true for western society today. This film concerns twelve jurors debating the sentence of an 18 year old Puerto Rican boy who on the face of it, has no real alibi. However one man, played brilliantly by Henry Fonda, is ill-at ease putting a young boy to death without even debating his case, much to the despair of the other jurors. What follows is a brilliant piece of film making, slowly revealing many of the juror\'s complex characters to the audience as they react to Fonda\'s concerns with their own mix of metal scars, prejudices and insecurities. What especially struck me about this film is how ordinary most of the characters are, none of the jurors are shown to be especially bad men, indeed most are portrayed as honest everyman type people. The use of ordinary characters is the films master-stroke because as one by one they begin to question their initial instincts, the flaws of society that have let this Puerto Rican boy down are presented to the audience. Tragically it appears that many of the issues that were beginning to be discussed in the 1950s have only got worse. For me there is one immortal comment in this film: one of the jurors, a man in his 50s says that the youths of today have no respect and have changed so much for the worse since his day. How ironic is it that some grumpy old men of today who may not even of have been born when this films was made, still say exactly the same thing? Finally a quick look at the cast shows that Fonda aside many of the cast were only moderately successful after this film. I think that\'s a shame as everyone of these actors is excellent and plays their part in making it one of the best films of all time. However within the cast there are a couple of treats; look out for Jack Klugman (Quincy) and John Fieldler who is the voice of many of Disney\'s characters such as Piglet. I urge you all, if you have not yet seen this film, please do so now.', u'-0.09122', u'\nThis once-in-a-generation masterpiece simply has no equal. The late 90\'s TV remake was quite adequate though totally unnecessary and in the upshot proved simply that updating a film for updating\'s sake is really an exercise in futility. Even had it BEEN as good - so what?\n\nThere could be few, if ANY film-goers reading this who are unaware of the plotline and in any event many others have re-hashed this for you. The brilliance of the film is evident in so many aspects. To begin with, the ability to not only sustain interest but to command the viewer\'s attention for basically its entire running time within a setting of principally just one room, borders on the inspired. Whether or not that would actually work with TODAY\'S audiences is another discussion! What we have here are twelve everyday Mr Joe Blows, summoned together on a jury panel to decide a defendant\'s guilt or innocence with regards to a murder charge. If you were to gather unto yourselves ANY twelve jurors at random, you would most likely be able to pinpoint the Henry Fonda, Lee Cobb, E. G. Marshall, Jack Warden etc etc amongst them! Their very "ordinariness" is where the film succeeded. Everyone can identify with at least ONE of those characters. Whether or not he may WANT to is a different matter. The thinker, the sensitive man, the arrogant bully, the opportunist, the mentally challenged loudmouth, the slimeball, the emotionally withdrawn, the sheep etc - they\'re all here! Welcome to society folks! I dislike society in the main - doubtless a reason I found this film to be such a revelation..even when I was barely into my teens!\n\n12 ANGRY MEN also pinpoints the shortcomings of the law, how "truth" can be so intrinsically left-field and unintentionally flawed. Lumet, working within a minimal budget here, delivers unstinting brilliance in both direction, character portrayal and script interpretation. He had of course superb acting talent at his disposal although some of the most memorable performances are from the lesser players. Some have denounced Fonda\'s role as being acceptable rather than awesome. I think however he was to a great degree playing himself here, not to an audience. His, is a study in deliberation and logic not show-pony stuff, but hell that never WAS Fonda was it?\n\nThis is a great great movie, as is evidenced by the extremely high user-vote worldwide. IF you haven\'t seen it - you really should do something about that!', u'0.114235', u'\nThis is one of those movies where everything could go wrong. The story is as simple as it can be: 12 men are jurors on a open and shut murder trial, but one man thinks that another persons life deserves at least some thought on the matter and votes not guilty. From this point on we have 12 actors and a\nclosed room. This could be the most boring film ever made. Lumet however is a master of mise-en-scene and provides a tense movie that keeps you locked on from the word "go". The dialogs are great and supported by incredibly talented actors. Joel Schumacher in Phone Booth needed to see this movie and draw a few ideas on how to make a character built, dialog driven movie. A must see for everyone.', u'0.105965', u"\nThe plot of12 Angry Men revolves around the murder trail of a Latino boy who is accused of killing his father. The conviction of the boy would mean a death sentence and the destiny of the boy's life is in the hands of twelve male jurors of ranging personalities. The case seems open and shut with a murder weapon and several witnesses to place the boy at the scene of the crime. For eleven of the jurors the decision is apparent that the boy is guilty but for one juror, Mr. Davis (Henry Fonda), the boy's life should entail some discussion to eliminate any reasonable doubt the jurors may have. As the film progresses the personalities of the jurors become apparent and many underlying issues influence the guilty decision chosen by the majority of the jurors.\n\nThe underlying issues are the complexity of the personalities of the jurors and the reasons why they have the motivation to feel and act the way they do. As the case unfolds further, more is learned about each juror individually. The personalities range from being a short-tempered loud mouth to a straight- laced accountant who never breaks a sweat. As the movie progresses much more is learned of the characters that exposes the intricacy of human nature and people's different personality traits.\n\n This film is an excellent example of movie making that does not require elaborate sets to entertain the viewer. The majority of the film takes place in a jury room with the men never leaving the room from their deliberation responsibilities. The cast and dialogue make this film memorable and the film has some clear moral issues that are addressed. The main issue is that not everything is as it seems. With further analysis the understanding of a situation becomes more concrete enabling the men to make a solid decision that affects a young man's life. 12 Angry Men is a classic film that should not be missed.\n", u'0.0432144', u'\nIntense courtroom drama which has 12 very different people, all males, struggling with a murder case involving a young Puerto Rican boy that seems cut-and-dried. However, juror Henry Fonda does not believe it to be as sure-fire as it appears. He votes not guilty and what follows is a chain of events that will test the views, beliefs and thoughts of the other 11 members. Fonda is great, but Lee J. Cobb steals every scene (and that is not easy to do in a film like this). Ed Begley, Martin Balsam, Jack Warden, Jack Klugman, Joseph Sweeney, E.G. Marshall and John Fiedler are among the other individuals caught in a situation that is much more difficult than it appears on the surface. An excellent character-study that should be studied and embraced by all present and future film-makers. 5 stars out of 5.', u'0.188795', u"\nOne of the finest ensemble pieces of film ever made.  12 jurors debate, argue and sweat it out to decide the guilt or innocence of a teenager accused of murdering his father.  This was Sidney Lumet's directorial debut. This film is almost entirely set in one room for 90 or so minutes, as the valiant dozen play cat and mouse with the accused's life.  To 11 jurors it's an open and shut case - guilty. The defendant's life lays in the hands of one liberal juror (Henry Fonda). The film meticulously examines the facts of the case, as each juror provides reasons for their decisions. Fonda struggles to convince his fellow jurors that there is room for reasonable doubt, but he's working against dubious priorities and deeply-ingrained prejudices. Within the confines of a hot and angry room Fonda fights his corner, whilst highlighting both his open-minded and fair beliefs with the frailties and failures of his fellow defendants. Although unconvincing in detail, the film is absorbing, and made the more remarkable as it is almost entirely set in one room and yet holds the viewers attention.  The acting is magnificent; the 12 actors are essentially the movie. A classic film, not using fancy plots or effects, but the talents of actors. A great piece of film making and one of the best films coming out of the US. Worth watching, if not just for analysing human weaknesses.", u'0.233532', u'Gosh, I don\'t know how many times I studied this play and performed it in high school, not to mention how many television shows had an episode that was inspired by 12 Angry Men. It was always a great drama because of the raw human emotions that were so true and remain timeless, this play will never be dated. I couldn\'t wait to see this movie when I saw it at the video store and it was the first movie I slipped into the DVD player. First off, I was incredibly impressed with the credits, we not only had Henry Fonda, we had Lee J. Cobb in the cast! This movie was so well performed and such a treasure, god, I couldn\'t ever say any words to justify it. I\'ve done this a million times, but here is another summary of what 12 Angry Men is all about.\n\n12 jurors are about to make a decision about a murder case, over all it seems like an open and shut case with tons of evidence that would make any good man look guilty, an 18 year old boy is about to be put to death if convicted. 11 of the men vote guilty, only one vote holds them back and they have to discuss the trial once again due to one vote being not guilty. Jurour #8 refuses to just jump to conclusions and brings up incredible possibilities that can always make a man think of "reasonable doubts", one by one the jurors begin to see the points he is making, except for one stubborn #3 who would rather just pull the switch to the chair himself.\n\n12 Angry Men is a timeless tale that could either be told very badly, i.e. 7th Heaven, or incredibly well and bring out terrific performances like Henry and Lee did. Actually, the whole cast was terrific, there wasn\'t a performance that was off key, movies like this are so needed in Hollywood today, it was so simple, but added so much for a 30 minute play. Please, if you have any taste, you will truly enjoy 12 Angry Men and have a great appreciation for it! \n\n10/10', u'0.196094', u'NOTE: Apparently, some fan of "Lord of the Rings" reported my review to the IMDb Admin because I said "12 Angry Men" is (and I quote) "...better than LotR." And for some reason, IMDb actually deleted my review - even though it had over 20 helpful reviews (out of about 26).\n\nSo, to please that angry little insecure fan, I\'ve decided to remove all LotR references in this review from here onwards. Enjoy, scumball.\n\n--\n\n"My Review of 12 Angry Men" \n\nor \n\n"WHY THIS MOVIE IS 10x BETTER THAN THE LORD OF THE RINGS."\n\n"12 Angry Men" is pure, unadulterated American courtroom classic that has been shown in schools across America for decades. I\'m not Sidney Lumet\'s biggest fan ("Serpico" is overrated), but he is masterful behind the camera here.\n\nIt\'s classic, to say the least. But it\'s also a wonderful motion picture.\n\nIt saddens me that this is number twenty-one on the Internet Movie Database\'s top 250, yet the three "Lord of the Rings" movies are somewhere in the top ten. Disgraceful, how far culture has sloped downwards over the year. A UK list of the best musicals of all time was recently completed. Guess what was ahead of "Singin\' in the Rain" and "My Fair Lady"? "Buffy the Vampire Slayer: The Musical." Mmm-hmm...I\'m sure.\n\nI recommend this to anyone who thinks classic cinema is boring.\n\nHere\'s a classic, and here\'s one of many films that is put to disgrace by these newer-age lists of "best movies." I believe many of the people voting otherwise should take into account the fact that they might enjoy "X2" very much (as I did!) but that doesn\'t necessarily mean it is the 120th best film of all time!', u'0.0379055', u'12 Angry Men is a terrific film that reflects a lot of the past problems and the proposed solutions of immigration, youth violence, and of course, overcoming one\'s own background and discrimination. The film surprised me in how progressive it was, and the ending social conclusions that it reached.\n\nIn the film you can see clearly form a rift between the upper class, conservatives who are unwilling to change and the progressives who are proposing change for the better of all of us; this film, deep down, is a very class conscious and socially conscious film about discrimination and the deep lines it had in American society in 1957.\n\nAlthough the film\'s portrayal is sometimes overly simplistic, drawing a "stubborn, pig-headed" conservative versus "righteous, just" progressive, one can find that this was very much so a necessary film for its\' time. In many ways, it is a work that was socially far advanced.\n\nAlso what is interesting is the fact that it is a film that is done with great simplicity; some actors, and a room... It relies greatly upon the pure talent of the actors, and the great direction of Sidney Lumet -- this film is truly unique due to the true minimalism it embraces in its\' production tactics, yet this is something that could easily go unnoticed due to the incredible quality of the film.', u'0.439426', u'I defy anyone to watch this movie and not be completely absorbed in the group dynamics on display. I could take points off for the overly tidy and convenient script with its TV-movie ending or some of the less subtle methods through which director Sidney Lumet drives home his points. But with a cast as uniformly excellent as this, why quibble? Henry Fonda is just the person to play the liberal everyman, an extension of his Tom Joad character from "The Grapes of Wrath." E.G. Marshall is excellent as Fonda\'s most formidable opponent; cool-headed and logical, he\'s the only holdout who bases his verdict on facts instead of emotions. Lee J. Cobb\'s performance wears thin, and his character is the most poorly written. Ed Begley is almost too good in his role, so revolting is his character. Jack Klugman and Jack Warden register in smaller roles as well.\n\nThis movie conveys the sweaty, tension-filled atmosphere of a stifling jury room but never feels oppressive, thanks to Lumet\'s fluid direction. My favorite moment comes when Fonda begins counting off paces around the jury table (a key piece of evidence hinges on this), and the camera drops to floor level and follows his feet as he does so. Choices like this prevent Lumet\'s film from ever being static or stagy.\n\nAn important film and a great one. If you haven\'t already seen it, put it at the top of your list.\n\nGrade: A+', u'-0.062969'], u'tt0120586': [u"\nA good friend of mine suggested this film, and I really didnt know what to expect going in, but after this film was over, I sat in stunned silence. I knew that racism was horrible, but I found through this film that it does not come without a terrible price..the loss of love, friends, family...and the realization that everything that you believed to be true isnt always the way things are. Edward Norton's performance takes the viewer through this journey, and its not a pretty one. He goes from an bright young man, to a vengeful bigot, to a remorseful excon with a brothers life in jeopardy, and you feel as though you are looking in on someones life in the course of 2 hrs. All of the acting in this film is first rate, and the ending wasnt quite as predictable as others might have you believe...it is quite shocking, as is much of the film. It causes quite a debate on the way people view others whos skin color is not the same. As Dr. King said, judge me not on the color of my skin, but on the content of my character. I live with racism, because I am a black man living in America...it exists, but if we educate ourselves like the main character in AHX, it wont stay around for much longer. Hopefully it wont be too late, as it was for him. Peace and Love, JB33  Rating 5 stars", u'-0.202942', u"\nI honestly don't think I have ever seen a better movie than American History X in my entire life! I may only be 14, but I have seen a lot of movies. I am an avid fan of them, and this one just takes the cake. Edward Norton is just unbelievable. He is the most talented actor I've ever laid eyes on. His performance in the movie is phenomenal. He delves so deep into his character that he can convince the whole audience easily of his neo-nazi role. The look on his face as he walks back from killing one man in the first seen is purely horrifying. The entire move was dramatic, intriguing, and powerful. It really is moving and emotional as well as scary. It is so true to life, and provides the viewer with such insight into the life and events that create a monster such as Derek Vinyard. It answers many questions I have long awaited an answer to such as what could possibly make someone act as Derek did in this movie, yet left open-ended many others that people such as myself may have. Almost every single scene in the movie was extremely captivating. I can't even go on to say more about the acting, other than if Edward Norton does not win best actor this year, I will go absolutely nuts. It's bad enough he lost it to Cuba Gooding Jr. when he was in Primal Fear, which was yet another incredible performance by him. Edward Furlong, the little kid from T2 is astounding as the confused brother of Derek. I was stunned walking out of the theater after seeing American History X, and I don't think I will ever have the benefit of seeing another movie as good as this one as long as I live. I recommend anyone with a good tolerance for violent and graphic depictions go see this movie. I am bewildered as to why director Tony Kaye would ever want out of this success. If I were to rate this movie, as I often do for others in reviewing them for school, I would give it an A+ with all of my heart.", u'0.27628', u'I was expecting a kind of a moralistic movie with an overly present, almost preaching like message. The movie however turned out to be extremely powerful mainly due to the professionalism it was made with.\n\nThe movie its story is told \'beautifuly\' in black & white and color. The quite original directing from Tony Kaye gives the movie a nice visual style and certain atmosphere. The story itself isn\'t that complicated or extremely original on its own and perhaps at most points even predictable but the way the story is told is phenomenal. This is not a movie with an happy ending or a movie that provides a solution to the racial discrimination problems. It shows what is NOT the solution to the problems and that everything that is occurring is like a vicious circle. The movie does not give a hopeful message but instead shows the dangers and pain you\'re causing to yourself and your close environment when you\'re thinking as a white supremacist.\n\nAs an anti Neo-Nazi movie this movie works really powerful. I think that its a really good and important thing that this movie is often shown in classrooms.\n\nEdward Norton is truly fantastic in his role. He is very well believable as a Neo-Nazi as well as the reformed person he later turns into in the movie. It\'s almost like he\'s playing 2 different characters and he does that so extremely well. Also really good was Edward Furlong who we all long had not seen in a big production. Furlong and Norton are both acting well together in their scene\'s are highly believable as two brothers.\n\nAlso surprising good was the musical score by Anne Dudley who had already won an Oscar for "The Full Monty", the year before.\n\nThis was a movie that surprisingly impressed me. As a movie its extremely powerful and important.\n\n10/10\n\nhttp://bobafett1138.blogspot.com/', u'0.412252', u"\nAmerican History X is one of the most powerful movies released in years. Not since Schindler's List has the subject of racism been so potently presented. The use of black and white cinematography to portray painful flashbacks is amazing, and the settings, while not necessarily pretty, fit the story flawlessly. \n\nDerek Vineyard's (Edward Norton) transition from a white supremacy leader's protege to a gang leader himself to a changed man is shown mainly through a series of flashbacks to the time before he was sent to prison. The character development and story are amazingly well done, and this is largely a factor of the high quality of the acting. Edward Norton especially, but also Edward Furlong, Beverly D'Angelo, and all of the rest of the cast down to Avery Brooks as Bob Sweeney, the African American high school teacher who comes up with the term American History X, and Stacy Keach as the wonderfully hateable Cameron Alexander. Keach, by the way, would have been the perfect choice to play Francis Dolarhyde in Manhunter, the film the precedes The Silence of the Lambs, but oh well. \n\nUnfortunately, despite the fact that American History X is one of the best films in years, it is horribly underrated. Much like Norton's last film, Primal Fear, which was also a great movie, this movie did not get nearly the recognition that it deserves. ", u'0.358937', u'\nPowerful portrayal of Neo-Nazi movement in America. Told in series of flashbacks. Flawless acting by Edward Norton. Does its best to make the point that no one is ever right aand no one is ever wrong. I have a friend who was a Nazi and a racist. But upon walking out of the theater after this movie he hung his head in shame. This is why the film industry began.\n', u'-0.095416', u"I have been wanting to see this movie for a long time, since my English teacher mentioned it in our class in grade ten. Gosh I wished I wouldn't have waited all this time to finally watch it, although maybe it's a good thing cause I would have probably been a little bit more traumatized at 14... This movie is exceptional!!! Makes u think, makes you frustrated, makes you wanna scream and even makes you cry! Edward Norton is just phenomenal playing the role of a freak skin head and even more so playing this skin head who finally realizes how stupid he was and tries to protect his younger brother. Edward Furlong also does an amazing job!!! This film is moving in so many ways...I can't even describe how real and heartfelt it felt. I definitely think Edward Norton should have won the Oscar for his performance, cause he was absolutely terrific! I can't get why they didn't gave it to him... This movie will surely stay on my mind for a while now... just thinking that some place in the world things like that still happen...it crushes my heart. This is a wonderful movie that every single person should see at least once in his life... Watch American History X, it totally worth it!", u'0.0750817', u'This is a fantastic movie because no matter what side you\'re on in life, this movie shows them all, good and bad, right or wrong. I also agree with the point in the movie that proves that people can change for the better and straighten things out in their head to do the right things in life. Yes, things in our world have changed, some for the good, some for the bad, but just because you might not agree with some of it, doesn\'t mean you can play God and try to make things "your way" and this shows exactly what happens when you try. This movie talks about all walks of life and the struggles we all have in what beliefs are right and wrong. Yes this movie is brutal and violent, but also truthful to the past and unfortunately still sometimes the present. This movie is about race, but not only 1 race is singled out and fed to the dogs, they all are. So, go into this movie with an open mind and your mind will come out full.', u'0.102377', u'\nWhen I first heard of "American History X," I thought it was going to be "just another movie." Man, was I wrong! The first time I watched it, I sat there as it ended, and I was just completely in a state of shock. This movie, more than any other movie I had seen on the subject of racism, really made me think twice about how I treated people of a different race. The way that Derek Vinyard\'s family was almost completely split apart and destroyed due to his racist beliefs should be a wake-up call to those people who have any racist beliefs whatsoever. I believe that this movie was a whole lot more than just a ground-breaking, controversial drama; it was a portrayal of exactly how much damage can be done to a family and a nation simply because of the hate for a person or people of a different color, for almost no reason at all. The Bible says that "God created man in his own image." It also says to, "Love your neighbor as yourself," which, right there, implies that racism is not something people should even consider. I wouldn\'t recommend that anyone under the age of 16 see this movie due to its graphic content and language; however, I believe that everyone who is over the age of 16, should see this movie at least once. This way, more people will get a chance to see the true consequences of racism, and how it can easily tear apart a family.', u'-0.291969', u'Edward Norton plays Derek Vinyard, a violent but also intelligent neo-nazi. After brutally killing two black people who tried to break into his car, Derek is sent down for a couple of years. Meanwhile, his younger brother Danny (Edward Furlong) is busy following in his brother\'s footsteps. After certain incidents in prison gives him time to thing, Derek decides to reform on his way out. Once out, he realises how quickly in number his old gang of nazi thugs has grown and wonders if he can save his brother.\n\nThis is a brilliant film. Perhaps what disturbs me the most is the way that Edward Norton looks so brutal, yet sounds so intellectual throughout the film.\n\nAlthough the film contains a constant strong theme of violence, it is always justified in portraying a picture of racial tension. Neither black nor white people are "judged" in the film, it\'s primary focus being to outline that it\'s people\'s brutality that causes a racial divide, not race itself.', u'0.100737', u"American History X is a movie of its own. It has a little bit of everything in the way it touches you. This of course making it a very though provoking film. There isn't a genre you can place this film in because it is a not a crime story, action or even a simple drama instead it is a humanistic thriller. What it is about, is the battle over ourselves.\n\nWho better than to display these wild but common complexities within people than Edward Norton. The range he shows here is astounding in only his fifth movie. Norton plays Derek Vinyard, a skin head that realizes through cruel yet necessary events in his life that he has gone down the wrong path. When he comes out of jail he attempts to stop his brother played Edward Furlong from going down the same road he had done. Through all his efforts though some things just prove to be inevitable. Avery Brooks also gives a great performance as Derek Vinyard's former teacher and now principal of his former school. His words may not be of the most inspiring but his actions and messages sent across are subtle yet strong and to the point.\n\nNorton's performance though wasn't just about range but exploring different dimensions of life. Whether it proved to be psychological, social or even political on a certain level. It is a transforming performance revealing something mind blowing and eye opening. That we, and this includes anyone, can take a devastating turn in life no matter how intelligent we are or thoughtful. That the person that determines the outcome of your life is yourself whether it is good or bad. Norton's realizations aren't through teachings such as the ones that got him in jail but they are through the events in the time he spent in jail. He saw the truth for himself realizing then what is false and what is real.\n\nThe screenplay written by David McKenna is about as versatile as the performance Norton gives. Not only because of the Derek Vinyard character but because of the characters involved in his life. For example the root of his evil did not come from the murder of his father but rather his father himself. Through just a conversation at breakfast did his negative thoughts get really embedded eventually then leading to them dramatically taking over his mind and way of life. Only when his father got killed did these negative thoughts seem justified. The way this screenplay and direction was able to display this message in just a plethora of other underlying tones was spectacular.\n\nWhat makes this movie great though is that you can truly find yourself in the messages delivered. As much as the main character might not seem relevant or connected to many people it his emotions and functioning of his mind that all of us are able to connect with. Yet what makes a movie great is not simply the message or messages sent across but how powerfully they are delivered. American History X delivers its multiple and intertwining messages about as powerfully as I've seen from a film.", u'0.174474', u"Strong performances by Edward Norton & Edward Furlong really make this \r film for me. The direction by Tony Kaye with his mixture of black & \r white history contrasting with colourful reality is magic to absorb and \r shows this film up to be what it is \x96 a true American Classic, \r ironically by a British director.\r \r\nThe film itself is about two brothers, Derek the elder and Danny the \r younger adoring sibling. Derek has been in jail for three years after \r killing a black youth who tried to rob the family; the nature & \r brutality of the crime still shocks me to this day. \r \r\nAHX tracks Derek's history through the first formation of racist \r sentiment laid down by the father. These feeling of hate are \r embedded when later his father is killed in the line of duty. Derek \r becomes involved in the local Nazi movement, his intellect turned by \r youthful rage into hate crimes and the rational that comes with Neo \r Nazi propaganda. \r \r\nThe Nazi-tattoo sporting, egotistical, philosophical younger Derek is a \r steam train waiting to crash, his propulsion to stardom is eventually \r embodied when he takes the life of the young thief, the scene is very \r apt as he calmly lies down and knows he will be a hero to his friends.\r \r\nWithout wanting to spoil the film Derek encounters change in the \r prison, he meets a black man whom he works with and faces his own \r demons inside, I will leave it there for those who want to be moved by \r his transformation. Anyway, he comes out a new man and only wants to be \r that new person, which means leaving the old crowd, leaving the \r Anti-Jewish sepal he's been living with so long. The problem lies with \r his brother who has become a little Derek, getting drunk and being \r influenced like he was. Derek's cross to bear is that he can't change \r his life without his brother coming with him and being on the right \r side of humanity.\r \r\nI think that this film is less about race and more about our ability to \r change as individuals, the fact that we can become what and who we want \r is a gift. Derek becomes the man he always wanted to be, he only wants \r the same for his brother. \r \r\nKaye's use of black & white creates an atmospheric drama that builds \r tension and has you feeling like a stung out piece of drum leather by \r mid movie. I love the way that Kaye subtly uses quotes and \r intellectualises the Nazi Stance, only to watch it being broken down by \r the same man (Derek / Norton).\r \r\nNorton is a joy to watch as is Gould and Furlong. \r \r\nTo sum up American History X is a powerful intelligent drama, which \r provides plenty of discussion after the movie. This film should be on \r every high school curriculum\x85", u'0.17696', u'This movie, got to me! I mean got under my skin got to me. It is so effective, the performances were just perfect. We have Edward Norton and Edward Furlong, two fine actors, they play two skin head Nazi racist brothers who are very violent. We start off at a very disturbing scene where we see how Edward Norton\'s character is put in jail for killing an African American very violently. When he comes back, he has just learned so much that no school, no white man could ever teach him: self respect, respect for others, respect for life, for his family, and knowing that "We can\'t live our lives p*ssed off". He is touched when he learns that his brother\'s teacher is asking him to write a paper about racism and how it effects today\'s society called "American History X". But when Eddie just gives a wrong look to the black kid in school, some things go terribly wrong.\n\nFirst off, Ed Norton\'s old "friends" turn on him because he wishes not to be part of their very racist gang. Even his own brother who followed his footsteps hates him for turning on the gang. But Ed Norton takes Eddie and tells him his passionate and harrowing experience in prison. Eddie seems to start to see the light, but there is an extremely powerful ending that will make even the toughest guy shed a tear. I highly, very much highly, recommend this movie for everyone. Even for the kids, though you might want to turn them away for a few scenes, but that\'s how powerful this movie is. Trust me, this movie should not be missed and it sends a message.\n\n10/10', u'0.1996', u'\nIn just a short career, Edward Norton has emerged as the best actor of his generation. 5 films, 2 oscar nominations, and the best performance I have ever seen turned in by a modern actor. In this film, Norton plays a skin head who goes to Prison for brutally murdering two black men who are attempting to steal his car and comes out reformed only to find that his brother (Edward Furlong, turning in a fine performance) is headed right down that same route.\n\nYes, the "hate is bad" message is overplayed and by the end of the film you\'ve been hit over the head with it. The scenes, as well as the story, are minimal and the "shocking ending" is predictable, but it all doesn\'t matter. It\'s all more of an actor\'s piece than any one else\'s and Edward Norton turns in the  most amazing performance I have ever seen captured on film. No longer, the sweet innocent psychopath he was in Primal Fear, Norton bulked up considerably for this role and it pays off.\n\nIt is, hands down, the most powerful American film in decades. I\'d give it a 12 out of 10 if I could. ', u'0.430607', u"\nConsider this: an ultra-low-budget movie on the subject of racism, with no CGI and few special effects of any kind, with all of the action taking place on two or three sets, the plotline basically consisting of two or three people talking at a time punctuated by occasional outbursts of no-holds-barred violence, a massive downer of an ending, and not starring the usual assortment of Hollywood stars. Sounds like an indie for sure, right? But it's not. It was a Hollywood film, although for the life of me I can't imagine how any major studio got behind it. AHX is one of the best films of the decade if not of all time. Norton, who was just kicking off his career, is absolutely mesmerizing as a repentant skinhead and Furlong, known primarily for his role in T2 (and whose career has sort of sputtered out), is right up there with him as the confused younger brother. A must-see for everyone, although not the kiddies. An amazing film, right up and through the incredibly sad ending. ", u'0.0396738', u'\nA Finnish commentator compared this film to American prison drama OZ . I love OZ , it`s my all time favourite American show , it`s compelling and brilliantly acted , adjectives you could use to describe AMERICAN HISTORY X. However while the HBO show suffers from lapses in logic there`s enough going on in different sub plots for you not to notice these flaws but seeing similar flaws in this film you can`t help but notice them\n\n\nFirst let me point out the good aspects . As said this movie contains great performances . In real life Ed Norton reminds me of the Kevin character from HARRY ENFIELD AND CHUMS with his floppy hairstyle and his back to front baseball cap but he always gives a good performance . In this movie he gives a GREAT performance as Derek the skin head from hell . Edward Furlong also gives a GREAT performance as Derek`s younger brother Danny . Norton earned an Oscar nod but strangely Furlong seemed to miss out , a pity . Tony Kaye also shows us he had great potential as a director , and it`s one helluva shame it`s unlikely we`ll be seeing either Furlong or Kaye as big Hollywood names\n\n***** SPOILERS *****\n\nBut it`s the script that brings the film down , and in some places it`s quite woeful . Derek kills a couple of armed home boys who turn up at his house and he`s convicted of manslaughter . I know this is a plot device but couldn`t it have been better done ? Is it possible any jury would have convicted Derek for protecting his property from armed burglers . I guess all the jurors were called Goldberg and Rubinstein ? And I`ve got to agree with everyone who don`t buy the idea of Derek making friends with a black guy inside prison even after Derek gets raped by the skin head gang  , oh and how many prisons in America have a mix of one third black , one third hispanic and one third Nazi/peckerwood ?  It`s unrealistic the reasons why Derek stopped being a Nazi but it`s even more unrealistic why he became one in the first place - His Father used the " N " word a few times ! Of course the real reason might have been that his Father was murdered by a black gang but if that`s the case then why include the dinner scene ? It`s just confusing . There`s also another confused dinner scene where Derek`s mother invites a Jewish teacher around the family table . Would a Jew want to share a table with a couple of Nazi teenagers ?\n\nBut the major flaw is with the ending . AMERICAN HISTORY X is a very obvious redemption plot but Danny being murdered at the end doesn`t tie in with Derek`s redemption . If Derek remained a Nazi Danny would have died , if Derek had become a flower arranger with Greenpeace Danny would have died . No matter what Derek would have done Danny would still have been murdered .\nWhen writing a redemption plot it`s essential the ending of the movie ties in with the protagonist`s road to Damascus .\n\nAMERICAN HISTORY X possibly does deserve to be in the IMDB top 250 movies but not at number 58 . It contains great performances but also some very poor scripting especially poor character motivation . If you want to see a better , more thought provoking film concerning race hate watch ROMPER STOMPER   ', u'-0.167852'], u'tt0114814': [u'\nAh, the Usual Suspects. My personal favorite movie of all time. Don\'t let my bias be a fool. Perhaps it\'s not THE best movie ever, but it\'s one that I never get tired of.\n\nIf you like flash and bikinis and breath-taking camera angles, you won\'t find them here. Usual Suspects is not an "epic," and it doesn\'t pretend to be. It\'s a modestly-budgeted piece by a fresh director (who later went on to do the X-Men movies, a FAR departure).\n\nA great, gritty script, beautifully-acted characters, and what many have called the greatest movie ending of all time, are some of the shining qualities that make the Usual Suspects an object worthy of praise above its humble-looking shell.\n\nThe casting is very unusual but somehow fits perfectly. Gabriel Byrne is convincing as the ex-con trying to build a new life when he gets drawn back into his old life. Stephen Baldwin has the role of his career as the smart-mouthed and cocky professional. Kevin Pollak takes a big departure from his usual good comedy self to take a more dramatic role. Benicio del Toro literally takes a one-dimensional character with absolutely nothing in the script to give him character, and he fleshes it out with brilliant mannerisms and memorable mumbling to show incredible acting creativity. Kevin Spacey as we know him was born from this movie. His manners and fast-talking yet shy gimp nature are a treat to listen to throughout the flick.\n\nWithout giving away the plot, the best and most genius parts of the movie are the subtleties. After you see the ending, and the truth hits you like a ton of bricks, you have to watch it again. On the second time through, you\'ll jump up and point at the screen whenever you spot a clue you missed the first time. It\'s even possible to watch the movie multiple times and see something new with every viewing. It\'s that attention to detail that make the deceptively innocent-looking Usual Suspects one of the greatest movies of all time.\n', u'0.146648', u"\n'The Usual Suspects' has received a lot of comment for its killer twist ending, which while by no means the first in movie history, has proved to be enormously influential (stand up Messrs. Fincher and Shyamalan...). But this movie is so much more than a surprise ending! It is a meticulously scripted, faultlessly acted masterpiece that stands up to repeated viewings. Every single time I watch it I notice some new detail, or get more enjoyment out of a performance or scene.\n\n This movie really put  Kevin Spacey on the map, but everyone in the ensemble cast is outstanding, even Stephen Baldwin(!), who has never appeared in a movie this good before, or since.  I also got a kick out of the Paul Bartel ( 'Death Race 2000', 'Eating Raoul') cameo, and the ultra-cool Peter Greene's ('Laws Of Gravity', 'Pulp Fiction') all too brief appearance. Bartel is sorely missed, and Greene one day (mark my words!) will become the star he deserves to be.\n\nDirector Bryan Singer has yet to live up to the promise shown here with his subsequent movies, the average 'Apt Pupil' and the disappointing 'X-Men'. For all the acclaim he and the (admittedly superb) cast have received, the real star of 'The Usual Suspects' is Christopher McQuarrie's sensational script, one of the finest of the modern era, and one that genuinely deserved it's Oscar.\n\nIt really doesn't get any better than this!! One of the greatest movies ever made, any time, any where. A truly unforgettable experience.", u'0.217119', u'One day in a bookshop, I flipped through a book entitled: "the movies of the nineties" and this movie wasn\'t included! How can a book specialized in cinema skip such a milestone of the last decade? Any movie buff, any cinema critic must have considered the nineties a fruitful era for the American thriller. According to one\'s tastes, some will say that the best thriller of the nineties is "Silence of the Lambs" (1991). For others it will be "Pulp Fiction" (1994) while others will praise to the skies "Se7en" (1995). For me, the pinnacle is this present movie, "the Usual Suspects" (1995) with its staggering story (to put it mildly). It\'s a sensational debut for Bryan Singer which enabled to put him on the map. With a little help from his accomplice Christopher McQuarrie, he signed an unparalleled gem in the landscape of the American thriller, even the whole cinema.\n\nThe average viewer who watches "the Usual Suspects" for the first time might think that the whole crew concocted him a meandering story with as a leading thread, Spacey\'s convoluted story. At the end of the projection, he may feel puzzled and will probably wish to watch the movie a second time. He won\'t regret it and Singer and McQuarrie will rejoice at it. Their masterwork gains by several repeated viewings to appreciate the subtleties of a rich movie with a convoluted construction which will take its seemingly definitive form in the five last minutes. To watch "the Usual Suspects" is like gathering the pieces of an intriguing puzzle, a little like any other suspenseful movie but in the case of Singer\'s flick, one will never really be able to completely end it. So many things happen in less than two hours that we are never really sure of what we watch and this is reinforced by a breathtaking unexpected twist at the end which makes our assumptions falter. Singer and McQuarrie take a mischievous delight in taking the viewer in their nebulous scenario and to follow it according to Spacey\'s declarations and it\'s obvious that they raise more questions than answers. It\'s up to the viewer to make his imagination work and to bring his thoughts on the film. This is what inspires its pernicious charm.\n\nFrom Spacey\'s story, the authors developed a top quality script, set with clockwork precision. Singer\'s directorial style virtually evolutes on the razor\'s edge and conveys an increasing tension. It is filled with ingenious visual ideas and served by fluid camera movements. Singer was in his early thirties when he shot his film but it presents the signs of a seasoned author. There\'s also a tight editing and a unsettling score which cement the movie in its place of winner. More remarkable, the authors pull off with gusto to increase the audience\'s curiosity throughout the film in spite of a somewhat deliberate confusion and the interest won\'t weaken until the end which constitute the apex: an unexpected twist which will leave the audience speechless once they understood it. In Singer\'s flick, it doesn\'t disappoint because there are little but noticeable visual and verbal clues which justify it. However, it has something unsettling. We believe that we are at the end of the maze but there\'s more to the picture than meets the eye. Maybe this "coup de theatre" veils one more truth. Maybe also the shrewdest ones will have guessed it but the result is the same for any viewer: Singer puts a baffled spectator in his pocket.\n\nSinger and Quarrie show a perfect master in the domain of the film noir: an ominous atmosphere, nocturnal scenes which stay rooted in the mind and a deep psychology of certain characters which give more substance to the film. Considering the last point, the character of Gabriel Byrne is the most interesting one: a former crooked cop who seemingly redeemed himself in catering but caught up by his past and forced to come back to work. I personally think that Byrne is the stand-out of the topflight cast the movie boasts. But don\'t neglect the other members. Kevin Spacey pocketed a deservedly Oscar in 1996 and the rest of the cast doesn\'t stay on the bench. Maybe Singer grants a little shallow attention to the three others baddies in the gang but in a way it\'s necessary to underscore the fact that they\'re lousy gangsters embroiled in a infernal spiral and unable to perceive what lies beneath all this. Pete Postlewhaite and Chazz Palminteri make their scenes count too.\n\nA riveting storytelling, a painstaking flash-back, a tight and first-class directing, a thoughtful twist, a topnotch cast, "the Usual Suspects" includes almost everything a director would sell his soul for. Everything contributes to make it a stalwart model in the suspenseful movie and the whole cinema. After the first vision, be prepared for mental gymnastics and for a second screening...', u'0.268647', u"\nSuch films like this should be enshrined  in museums, simply due to the fact it  destroyed the entire genre of mystery films.  While this film was unique and captivating,  no other mystery will ever accomplish this  sort of cult status, single handedly shaping  a genre. While most mysteries try to shock  you too often with twists and even more  twists, it turns out to be overkill. This film  encompassed such ideas with flair and  originality, which is probably the reason  Brian Singer is sticking to sci-fi action films.  Only Memento and The Game are the  only recent mystery movies worthy  enough to stand beside this film. Sadly,  Singer has somewhat sold out by doing  the X-Men movies, but I guess trying to  make films like this would be too taxing.  This film will always bring a smile to  my face when I watch it with someone  who hasn't seen this movie. A good  viewing every time I watch it, the new  special edition DVD is awesome.", u'0.328426', u"\nDISCLAIMER: Not seen 'The Usual Suspects' yet? Then don't waste any time reading this! Rent it, buy it, borrow it, I don't mind, but watch it before you bother reading any further.\n\nOne of the main reasons that 'The Usual Suspects' leaves such a long-lasting impression on the viewer is that it takes advantage of the gullibility of the audience. For the first 100 minutes we are delivered an intriguing and complex story to which there seems no easy answer. When the final piece of the puzzle seems to be in place the entire film is turned on its head. This final revelation initially leaves you speechless and then shortly after the audience realises that they have fallen for a brilliantly inspired trick. The second great trick that this film plays on its audience is making us think that by watching it again we'll be able to understand slightly better what was really going on. The truth is that the more you try to make sense of it, the more confusing it becomes. It's probably best not to try to look for any concrete answers and just accept that we fell for the filmmaker's tricks. The success of the film is mainly thanks to the sense of satisfaction the audience is left with at the end of the film. I think that people love the idea of a story when you're not sure who you can really trust, along with the realisation that the film's most shady characters are the filmmakers themselves.\n\nAside from the twist the film is also unique in the way the narrative is presented. The majority of the story is told as a series of flashbacks by crippled con artist Verbal Kint (a performance which deservedly won Kevin Spacey his first Oscar). The film's other Oscar went to screenwriter Christopher McQuarrie (who also directed 'The Way of the Gun' (2000)) for his brilliantly constructed screenplay. It's a testament to the director, Bryan Singer that he was able to combine all these elements and turn them into something which is nothing short of a modern masterpiece. His moody and stylish direction help to bring the film together and perfectly complement the film's dark tone. A mention should also go to John Ottman for his skilful editing and amazing score.\n\nThe Usual Suspects is more than just a film with a clever ending. It revealed an awful lot about film audiences and showed us that their expectations can be used against them. It is also a film about story telling and the importance of myth. I think that one of the most valuable lessons that filmmakers can learn from \x91The Usual Suspects' is that the more interesting and intriguing your story is the more your audience will believe.\n\nThe Usual Suspects was certainly not the first film to contain twist ending (the twist ending became one of Alfred Hitchcock's trademarks) and was certainly not the last ('The Sixth Sense' (1999) also used this technique effectively but left more subtle clues for the audience to pick up on their repeated viewings). Despite this 'The Usual Suspects' remains one of the most innovative and memorable crime thrillers of the nineties.\n", u'0.333038', u"\nAlthough the film is perhaps a little slow in fully developing, the consequent results are astounding. Spacey's performance is captivating and will only be fully appreciated once the viewing is complete. The supporting cast, including Gabriel Byrne, provide the basis for a convincing drama which will change the way you perceive crime thrillers in the future.\n\nOne is required to discover the identity of the elusive Keyser Soze throughout the film and if it were not for the well thought-out script and professional dramatic acting then the viewer would feel a sense of anti-climax. However, this is not the case; you shall be left speechless and wondering how the film achieved its goal.", u'0.476362', u'\n"The Usual Suspects" is a complicated puzzle of a movie that I bet you can\'t watch just once.  The film deals with five career crooks who have big plans after they are all brought together in a police lineup.  However, their mayhem is interrupted by a mysterious character named Kaiser Sose who plans to eliminate all five of the crooks after they all crossed him in various ways during their checkered pasts.  An amazing original screenplay and tight direction keep up a substantial amount of tension throughout.  Gabriel Byrne, Stephen Baldwin, Benicio Del Toro, Kevin Pollak, Pete Postlethwaite, and Chazz Palminteri all give top-notch performances.  But it is Kevin Spacey (in an Oscar-winning part) that makes "The Usual Suspects" work on all levels.  This part put him in a higher class of actors and can be compared to Robert DeNiro\'s star-making job in "The Godfather, Part II".  5 stars out of 5.   ', u'0.085361', u"\nIf plagiarism were a crime in film techniques, director Bryan Singer would  be imprisoned for life. Screenwriter Christopher McQuarrie would be serving  a similar sentence. However, since it is not, Singer and MacQuarrie (who  have joined forces again after the not-so-successful PUBLIC ACCESS) took  advantage and duplicated nothing but the best. From CASABLANCA to PULP  FICTION, and even a version of a line (intentionally or otherwise) from  BUTCH CASSIDY AND THE SUNDANCE KID.\n\nMany people oppose watching a film with a twist a second time. I disagree.  By watching it again you can observe how the director and the screenwriter  have hidden and revealed clues, how they have tried to steer the audience  away from the ending. First time is for entertainment. Second time is for  art. This film is certainly worthwhile to see again. To date, I have  watched it five times. (Two of those five times I thought, 'well, I'll just  watch about half-an-hour,' but ended up watching the entire film because it  is so entertaining.) I'm not exactly a noir fan, so it is assured that this  particular crime film appeals to a wider audience.\n\nTHE USUAL SUSPECTS has a skilled director, an engrossing screenplay, and ten  praiseworthy performances. The film runs a fast 105 minutes. Don't miss a  minute of it.", u'0.303177', u"\nThe Usual Suspects is two movies in one.  Enjoyable the first time you watch it, even more enjoyable the second time round.  The first viewing asks questions that are answered in an `I could kick myself' moment in the final few minutes, and the second viewing is interesting because when you know the answers, the film becomes that much clearer.  It requires a certain amount of commitment, though.  Be warned, if you stop concentrating for a moment then the remaining running time of the movie will be spent trying to figure out how what you missed has lead to what you are now watching.\n\nIt concerns the story of five felons brought in by the police for a line-up and how those same felons reluctantly end up working for the mysterious and ghost-like Keyser Soze: a legend among the criminal fraternity, a man who no-one has seen and lived, a man so dangerous that he is thought to be the devil himself.you get the idea.  The plot is rather intricate so I shan't bother to explain it here but it does rather make me think that Christopher McQuarrie, the writer, kept going to the office in the morning with yet another complexity to add that he thought up the night before.  That's not to say it doesn't work, far from it, but it does leave you reeling from the sheer amount of information and names thrown at you from the offset.\n\nGabriel Byrne is good, but not flawless, as the tortured Dean Keaton who is torn between his career as a criminal and his forlorn attempt at trying to go straight, but his relationship with uptown lawyer Edie Finneran (Suzy Amis) is badly explored and I never felt it gave motive enough for his actions throughout the movie.  Kevin Spacey is wonderful as the crippled Roger 'Verbal' Kint and is effective with the results both cunning and tragic.  The real star of the movie, however, is a strangely accented Pete Postlethwaite as Kobayashi, supposedly Keyser Soze's right-hand man.  He effortlessly plays a character of terrible coolness and poker-faced efficiency leading the dance that the rest of the characters must follow.\n\nDirector Bryan Singer has done well to bring such a momentous and involved screenplay to life and any gripes I may have cannot detract from the fact that the film, as a whole, is much better than the sum of its parts.\n", u'0.075878', u"\nI have seen this movie many times and yet it still astonishes me every time I watch it.  Even though I know the ending I still feel myself being caught up in the plot.  It is possibly one of the greatest scripts of all time.  I can't remember another movie in which I was completely astonished at the finale.  The cast gives a tremendous performance.  Kevin Spacey gives one of his two best performances (the other being as John Doe in Se7en) in my opinion.  That is probably why he was awarded Best Actor for this role.  It was truly deserved.  Gabriel Byrne also gives a great performance.  It may be the best character Stephen Baldwin has ever played.  In all, this is a must for any movie collector or enthusiast.", u'0.228402', u'Usual Suspects is one of the Best Mystery Thrillers in the world. It contains one of the greatest endings ever seen in any film. When i first saw this film, i understood 85% of the film. I had to watch it again, to recap on what happened earlier. After the second time i watched it, i realised this is a Superb movie with a fabulous twist. I have now seen this film about 20 times and seems to get better every time i watch it. Kevin Spacey delivers the greatest performance in his career. Gabriel is great, Benecio delivers a great performance with humour. Stephen is quite good in his best film. Pollak was impressive, Chazz Palminteri is a Superb underrated actor. Chazz looks ultimately smart and supposingly is a intelligent investigator. But Spacey turns out to be 10 steps ahead. Superb, brilliant and any other great ways to describe this film.', u'0.612208', u"\nThe Usual Suspects, is, in my mind, one of the most fantastic pieces of film-making ever to grace our screens. That a group of people can come up with a piece of fiction that is so excellent in every way, from start to finish, is frightening. Who knows, maybe this film has no superior.\n\nA lot is made of the film's ending. Not for a moment am I going to let slip what exactly that is. I would never deny another film lover the sheer sense of amazement that ran through my body when the film reached its climax. While not the film's only strong point; this is a masterpiece ALL the way through, the ending will blow you away.\n\nThe cast is, in a word, flawless. Kevin Spacey has, as far as I am concerned, never been better. He turns in a performance that is so moving and outstanding that he should have got three Oscars. But he is not alone. Byrne is fantastic, Del Toro adds continental flair, and Postlethwaite is disturbingly dark, yet calculated.\n\nBy all means watch this film, and observe its strong points, from Bryan Singer's masterful direction to the equally pleasing musical score. Prepare yourself for a rollercoaster ride and the best ending EVER in a film made anywhere in the world. I mean that.\n\nOh, and when you have finished; by all means, watch it again!\n\n9.7/10\n\nNothing in life is 100% perfect now is it?", u'0.273797', u'Out of the mind of Christorpher McQurrie comes this incredible story of a man in search of the devil. The film is called " The Usual Suspects" and what could be more appropriate than an unusual movie about five suspects who are anything but usual. The story originates with the only survivor of what the police conclude was a murderous and explosive drug deal gone bad. His name is Roger Kint (Kevin Spacey is perfect) also known as \'Verbal.\' From the mouth of this innocent storytelling, con-artist comes the fantastic tale of how he and his fellow criminals, Stephen Baldwin, is Michael McManus, Benicio Del Toro is Fred Fenster and Kevin Pollak as Todd Hockney were originally assembled and then set-up. Beginning with a mix-up by law enforcement to put several guilty men together in the same line up, the tale proceeds cross country and culminates with a powerful, but mysterious kingpin by the name of Keyser Soze. It\'s through his attorney, Kobayashi (Pete Postlethwaite), the men learn they are marked for death unless they undertake a dangerous assignment. The center piece of the Unusual group is their leader, a remarkable individual named Dean Keaton (Gabriel Byrne, incredible performance). What transpires in this movie from moment to moment is a lesson in sleigh of hand. What we and the police Dave Kujan, (Chazz Palminteri) are told is not what we see. Conversely, what we see is not what we have been told. In the end, this film with it\'s haunting theme by John Ottman, is nothing short of incredible. A superb classic in both mystery and action entertainment, by Bryan Singer. A great film indeed. ****', u'0.152791', u'Kaiser Soze is a super-criminal of almost comic-book stature. Legendary among an underground of testosterone and nicotine-driven low-life \'usual suspects\' of this film - Soze - remains unseen, fantastic, just outside of the camera\'s view, and detached from any reality we might call familiar or real. Nevertheless, he is the central character in the film, and the single force of will driving the entire film. The viewer, like the characters portrayed, must constantly ask \'Who is Kaiser Soze, does he even exist?", and - as silly as it might seem - "is he the devil himself?". \n\nSoze\'s irresistible will is represented and enforced by an emissary (the stone-faced Pete Postlethwaite) who is just as cold-hearted as any of the hardened criminals who comprise \'The Usual Suspects\'.\n\nThe narrative begins and almost ends as a retrospective with just a bit of very necessary voice-over narrative by Spacey. His character - Verbal Kint - is interrogated by Palmintieri concerning the murder of several hardened criminals in a single night aboard Russian ship. Most of the major plot points are highlighted wonderfully by the changes of pace and camera work afforded by the shift between one plot - the events leading to Kint\'s interrogation - and another - the interrogation itself.\n\nKint, physically disabled and emotionally disturbed, is himself a desperate, down-on-his luck, petty criminal whose chief talent seems to be getting mixed up with and attaching himself to more talented criminals. His latest \'friend\' - Keating (Byrne) is a brilliant but depressive thief who is trying to straighten his life out for a woman lawyer he has fallen for. But along with the other \'usual suspects\' - expert safe crackers, con men and sociopaths (possibly the best performance of Stephen Baldwin\'s career thus far) all - Keating is swept up into agreeing to do \'one final job\'. In a fine piece of character interpetation, Byrne plays denial to the hilt telling himself that this job, if successful, could end his life in crime permanently. \n\nThese expert thieves, con men and killers meet in a bogus police line-up one night and from that point on, they are bound together under the control of Soze until they either succeed or fail in the crime he has laid before them.\n\nSoze has been betrayed, whether directly or indirectly, by each of these men, and he leaves them all no choice. Accept the crime plan or die. They accept, knowing that their odds of success are, to say the least, very limited.\n\nThe entire feeling of this film shifts radically from the action of the main plot (described in Kint\'s narrative) and the narrative itself (Kint\'s interrogation). While this may look simply like a clever piece of film work, it is actually a very brilliant plot device, as both story lines are finally united in the stunning and brilliant finish.\n\nWhile I am not usually a ready fan of mysteries, and even less interested in thrillers, this film was pure entertainment from start to finish.\n\nDirector Singer has established himself as a pioneer in ensemble cast direction, and this film alone (his third) should have awarded him that title.\n\nThe performances are, without exception, flawless. While flawlessness or some approximation of it is something I generally expect from people like Spacey, Byrne, and Del Toro, many of the folks in this film very much surprised me. I now watch out for folks like Kevin Pollak, for example. Without detracting from the performers whatsoever, some credit for the stunning quality of the performances must go to the director, editor, script and cinematography team. This film makes them all look positively great.\n\nI was bitterly disappointed by the fact that this film did not take many Academy Awards in its release year. While I realize that the academy\'s choices do not always reflect quality or achievement, I prefer to maintain at least a superficial guise of hopefulness. The fact that Usual Suspects did not win for editing was the biggest shock. I can not think of a better piece of editing.', u'0.00311083', u'I don\'t know what the problem is. I had heard that this is an incomprehensible film. That when it ends we don\'t know what exactly happened. I thought that throughout the film we were in the loop, and even if we have an unreliable narrator, I suspected that from the start. Anyway, it\'s been a long time since I\'ve been taken for such a joyride with such interesting characters, even if they are murderers and felons. The plot is woven so delicately and the threat is so interesting, that I was involved from the first minute. I always wondered how Kevin Spacey, a rather ordinary looking guy with a receding hairline, got to be so well known. Obviously, this is the reason. His performance is right on and he dominates the screen, even though he is a "gimp." There are so many layers in this film, but I don\'t think the screenwriter ever plays unfairly with it and it is quite satisfying.', u'-0.0379798'], u'tt0110413': [u'\nLuc Besson\'s movie L\xe9on (The Professional) gives us an intense story which is maximized in potential by the casting of the movie done by Todd Thaler.  Every aspect of the movie delivers to the audience and makes an impressive overall package.  Jean Reno plays a character named  L\xe9on who has learned to repress his emotions in order to perform his job as a "cleaner", or hit-man.  His secluded world is shattered by the young girl named Mathilda who lives on the same floor as he does in an apartment building. When she turns to him for help, he learns about living a normal life, even if the circumstances which unite them are far from normal.\n\nThe performance delivered by then twelve-year old Natalie Portman as Mathilda is nothing short of brilliant.  Her ability to relate to others with body movement and facial gestures is matched by few, she really brings raw emotion and believability to a difficult role.  Mathilda and L\xe9on are unexpectedly thrown together, but learn to value life from their chance encounter, and how valuable a friendship can be.\n\nJean Reno as L\xe9on gives us a solemn and calculated character who sets all of his energy on his assignments until her is given something else to care about.  Mathilda gives him the daughter that he never had, while L\xe9on serves as a father and friend to her.  Gary Oldman, as the corrupt DEA Agent Norman Stansfield, offers the viewers an amazingly wired and electrical performance which pushes the envelope.  He moves the story along by his actions.  Oldman offers us a memorable portrait of a sadistically obsessed man who stops short of nothing to get what he wants.\n\nThe Professional is what movie-making is all about.  Without the overuse of special effects, a large shooting location, or a commercially star studded cast, we are given all that could possibly be asked for in a movie.  Portman, Oldman, and Reno, along with Danny Aiello as the hit-contractor Tony remind us that there is no substitute for great acting. There are elements of comedy, drama, and action, and great original music by Eric Serra adds to the energy the film already encapsulates.  The most impressive thing about the movie is its story which is basic but is maximized by all the other elements which go into the making of the movie. Simply put, an intense and impressive movie.   ', u'0.300213', u"\nWith enough blood and gore to please any fan of action movies, and a unique love story to please the ladies, this is a great movie for couples to watch together. However, to truly comprehend the beauty of this film, you must see the European Cut.\n\nThe U.S. version is still a great movie, but it cuts out 24 minutes which contain much of the heart of the movie and most of what makes the film a work of art instead of the usual action fodder. Elements of the story which are only hinted at in the U.S. cut become the centerpiece of the story when the un-cut version is seen.\n\nThe two main characters are a recently-orphaned girl who is wise beyond her years and a hitman who is still an innocent. Their relationship unfolds against a backdrop of murder and revenge as director Luc Besson explores issues of age and maturity, good and evil, and the interplay of life, death and love.\n\nThe acting in this film is superb. Reno has an expressive face which conveys a myriad of emotions with great sensitivity and few words. He is cold as ice as the almost super-human 'professional', but his performance is most moving when he reveals his sensitive side. Watching as his wounded soul slowly begins to heal is enough to touch the heart of any woman, but it is handled so subtly that it never becomes too 'sappy'.\n\nIn her film debut, Natalie Portman turns in a performance that is beautiful beyond belief. She manages the transition from a  frightened child to a woman capable of killing so convincingly that it makes the relationship between she and Leon not only believable, but understandable.\n\nGary Oldman is just the best psycho there is, and it is kind of nice to see him without all the strange makeup for a change. As a dirty cop in this film he personifies evil, and it is a joy to watch him do his thing.\n\nThe special effects are all you could hope for. Besson does great actions scenes - especially the explosions. There is also a lot of humor and when you throw in the tender love story -  this picture has it all!", u'0.644111', u"\nThis movie is rated 63 on the imdb top 250 movie list, showing that people obviously like this movie, and with good reason. But why the hell didn;t this movie garner at least one single oscar or golden globe nomination??\n\nnatalie portman's performance was terrific as the emotionally ravaged matildha - best actress nomination for sure.\n\n jean reno should have been nominated for a best actor nomination. the fact that the audience is led to feel sympathy and sorrow for a hitman speaks words enough about his performance.\n\n gary oldman is fantastic as the corrupt and psychotic cop. his character is so repulsive and chilling, but at the same time so quirky and interesting to watch. best supporting actor nomination.\n\n luc besson. when this man will get some kudos for his work i never know. the professional, in my opinion, is his greatest achievement as a director and, considering the fact he has helmed classic cult films such as nikita and the fifth element, the professional must rate highly as one of the best films of the 90's atleast! best film and best director nominations should have been given.\n\n but no, it was all too easy to heap praise on the feel good movie forrest gump, and shun the movie that, through its intensity and tragedy, better highlights the value of life and love. ", u'0.919055', u"\nThis film was absolutely amazing.  I have spent hours re-watching various scenes and noticing all the perfection with which they are acted and directed.  It's not the violence or action sequences that make this movie so great (although they are well done...), but rather moments like where Mathilda knocks on Leon's door.  It would be so easy to just film the door opening, but instead we see light illuminating Natalie Portman's face, symbolizing something angelic.  And the moment has so much more meaning.\n\nI know a lot of people who have seen this film because they are action fans. I'm not.  But I'm glad I finally found it, because it's a wonderful film in so many other ways.", u'0.293207', u'Luc Besson\'s "The Professional" is sort of a companion piece to his international breakthrough hit "La Femme Nikiti", and in many ways it\'s an even better film. It raises the stakes of Besson\'s playful women-with-guns theme by making the heroine a 12-year-old, played by a then unknown Natalie Portman. Jean Reno is excellent as her assassin trainer and surrogate father. Oldman is completely over the top in one of his best bad-guy roles, obsessed with both Beethoven and butchery. As a gritty, suspenseful thriller, this film won\'t leave action fans feeling cheated, but the film is so much more than that. At the center of "The Professional" is a wonderful father and daughter-like relationship between two damaged strangers who find solace in each other.', u'0.465347', u"\nLeon (Jean Reno) is a tortured soul. He lives in squalor and misery, never truly happy or at peace with himself. After all, he is a hitman. He lives quietly from kill to kill, harming no-one whom he has not been paid to assassinate. He is a simplistic, childlike man who lives by his own set of morals but is troubled by them. The one thing he seems to fear above all else is change.\n\nMathilda (Natalie Portman) is Leon's neighbour. A young girl, she lives with her father, step-mother, half-sister and half-brother. As unhappy as Leon, she lives in awe of the dark stranger, unaware of his true profession. Beaten by her parents and sister, she has abandoned school and instead spends the day watching cartoons and trying to escape from the real world.\n\nWhen Mathilda's family is brutally murdered by a drug crazed Norman Stansfield (Gary Oldman), her only chance for survival is to hide with her neighbour. When she learns of Leon's true identity, she becomes infatuated with both him, and the grim world he inhabits.\n\nThis stark portrayal of humanity and inhumanity is produced with the style and finesse that one expects from Luc Besson. In addition, the combined talents of Jean Reno, Natalie Portman and Gary Oldman provide not only an unmatched on-screen chemistry, but also three perfectly created characterisations, the like of which are rarely seen in today's cinema. This film has my personal recommendation of being the best piece of cinema that I\nknow of. I have not seen anything that matches it in terms of intensity or emotion - and believe me, I've looked. I found myself caring for the characters involved, an unique experience in itself.  This is not the type of film for a night in with your mates, but nevertheless, it is an unforgettable piece of cinematic history.\n\n", u'-0.114173', u'\nLeon is one of the most emotionally intense movies ever made. French director Luc Besson uses everything: actors, music, camera angles, lighting to create an unique experience - "It\'s not realism, it\'s not naturalism - it\'s heightened reality" as Gary Oldman very well put it.\n\n\nIn "The making of The Professional" Besson says "If I imagine somebody in the street try to knock on my daughter, I kill the guy, in five seconds. I kill him, and I think "It\'s in me, I\'m a beast!" On this part we can\'t forget that a part of us, the genetic things inside are much, much older than The Ten Commandments". He certainly uses visceral scenes to create very strong emotion  in the movie - the blood running from Mathilda\'s nose or Stansfield\'s unforgettable "EVERYONE!" are just a couple of examples. The music and the sound are excellent and are used in a masterly fashion - you can hear Fatman\'s heart beating desperately or a low claustrophobic sound when Stansfield turns to look at Mathilda\'s father.\n\nHowever Leon does not work only on this primary level, it also has an intelligent story. It may seem to be almost a fairy-tale, but don\'t be fooled -  just like his character Besson is serious. This movie has a message: without love we are dead, even if we don\'t see it. Only true love give meaning to our lives: "everything else reminds me a big yogurt: warm and rancid" as Mathilda says in the original script, which is available on the net under the name Leon Version 1. Is this true in "real life"? I don\'t know but this movie can make you wonder.\n\nThen of course there\'s the sensuality. It\'s hypocritical to deny it, the camera interacts with Mathilda in a mesmerising fashion. It\'s not sick and it\'s not degrading: it\'s art, subtle and beautiful.\n\nLeon is not perfect but it has so many great moments that all its flaws can be forgiven. It\'s a movie that really should not be missed, unless you are concerned with its amorality. And don\'t be - Leon is less violent than many action movies and the unusual relationship between the main characters is handled mostly with genuine feeling and tact.', u'0.304082', u"\nluc besson will never top this movie. This is his benchmark, his classical composition. Look at the precise, intricate scenes. It's a symphony in cinema. Straight off, it's action. Intelligently shot, and scripted. It makes everything that follows hard to live upto. But it does so easily. It's stylish without being showy, it's deep without being sentimental. And it's just hugely enjoyable. Seeing the friendship between newly orphaned mathilda and skilled assasin leon bloom, is tenderly done. At risk of slipping into a sappy bond, besson keeps it easy on the emotions, without coming off as shallow.\n\nThe actors are all spot on, most notably the debut from a young natalie portman as mathilda. Showing an angry, sad, pent up, in love girl is no simple task but she breezes through it, touching all the right notes. And jean reno as the title character, is minimal but very effecting. Hard to understand, but easy to relate too. But gary oldman steals it, with his glorious overacting. He's as scary as he is determind. His line delivery is almost perfect. And his fate is very fitting. If only they made more intelligent action movies, then they could contend with this film. But as it stands right now, leon is one of the best action dramas ever made.", u'0.488083', u"\nI have long thought that owning films on DVD or video is a waste of money - you watch them once and after that they are left to fester at the back of a\ncupboard. Occasionally I make an exception - some films simply cannot be fully appreciated on just one viewing. Every time I watch Leon is as gripping and enjoyable as the first. Sad, funny, violent, incredibly touching - few films manage to tick all the boxes and even fewer are about hitmen.\n\nIt obviously helps when your leading man has as much screen presence as Jean Reno. Thin and wiry with toilet brush hair and a face like a bag of spanners, he is hardly your typical gun-toting action hero, but he has an innocence and compassion that makes you fall for him instantly. Leon's life is as simple as a small child's: TV, lashings of milk and the odd gangland assassination. He cannot read, he doesn't sleep, he hasn't the trappings of family or wealth (the fees for his hits are habitually trousered by his `benefactor': sleazy small-time Italian gangster Tony (Danny Aiello)) - In short, he lives like a robot. And then he meets Mathilda.\n\nNormally I can't stand Hollywood kids. They are all doey-eyed, bouffant-haired brats who can cry on cue and are always ready with a cutesy, smart-alec comment that will cause their adult co-stars to tinkle with laughter or tousle their hair playfully. Often they are kidnapped and huge ransoms demanded while their parents go demented with worry. I for one am usually rooting for the kidnappers.\n\nNatalie Portman's Mathilda is the antithesis of these namby-pamby Dawson's Creek actors-in-waiting. For starters, she has something justifiable to gripe about, in that her entire family has just been slaughtered by Gary Oldman and his gang of crooked DEA officers. This is a bit of a blow, to say the least, but Mathilda takes it all in her stride and teams up with Leon in a bid for revenge. So begins one of the stranger relationships in silver screen history, but one of the most memorable.\n\nOn the face of it, a love story between a twelve year old girl and a hairy French hitman would raise a few eyebrows among more conservative movie-goers, but director Luc Besson handles it so beautifully, it seems like the most natural thing on earth. They are united in being totally alone in the world - indeed, the scene where Mathilda walks quietly down the corridor past the carnage in her apartment and knocks on Leon's door, imploring him in a tearful whisper to let her in is as breathtaking as it is heartbreaking. Leon is wary at first, but she soon wins him round and starts to gently bring him out of the shell.\n\nPortman is truly astonishing - one can almost forgive her for being a part of the appalling Star Wars prequels on the strength of this one performance. The iconic image of this tiny, grubby little girl clutching Leon's beloved plant and trotting to keep up with her lanky hero's giant strides is one that will live long in the memory.\n\nAiello and Oldman (at his sadistic, malevolent best) provide predictably excellent support, there is a wonderfully suspenseful yet satisfying ending - heck, there's even a decent Sting song playing over the credits - for this (if nothing else) it would be remiss of me to give Leon anything other than top marks.\n\n10/10\n", u'0.150221', u'\nAn interview with Anne Parillaud, in the Evening Standard, 24.8.90, it was said that the message of Nikita is not one of violence but the idea is that people who are full of despair and missing love are not alone.\n\nThis idea continues in L\xe9on. L\xe9on was Besson\'s first foray into international film production. The similarities, or parallels, between Nikita and L\xe9on are undoubted. Both the central protagonists attempt to come to terms with their dysfunctionality, to society, against a background of violence, which they both continue to act upon as the agent of someone else. There is no clean difference (we may also include Le Dernier Combat for comparison.) The only difference is gender.\n\nI always found that until obtaining the "Version Integral" there was a character hole in the plot. The original cut released for US audiences was felt, by Besson, had an "offending" scene cut which ruined later scenes. The American test audiences hated it, seeing it as perverse and paedophiliac. The film was still panned by US critics as quasi-child pornography on general release. What it to be understood about this film, and this is what infuriated Besson, is that the film is about pure love. Not sex, which is all the Americans, could see.\n\nAnd so we have ascertained that the characters in Besson\'s films are, simply, great. Then there is the action which is all the grace and style of Nikita. Typical of Besson\'s style with fast action-shooting and violent characterisation. This has to be one of Jean Reno\'s and by far Natalie Portman\'s best screen performance. To me, Gary Oldman plays his part to the tee, said by some magazines to be the best screen bad guy - it is one of his best performances.\n\nStylisation and excess are hallmarks of Besson\'s work. Characters are larger than life. D\xe9cors are in excess of realism. Besson\'s characters lack psychological depth. "The sumptuous and the ornate cohabit with the violent or the vulgar." Besson\'s use of excess is also extremely playful mixing violence with humour. Besson\'s work appeals to the tastes of popular culture and may not please that of the elite - arguably a reason for the rejection of his work by many intellectual film journals.\n\nI have yet to hear of a person putting a bad word against this film. There is nothing I can personally fault so I give this film 10/10, a score only two other somewhat different films hold in my IMDb list of 345 films - "The Wizard of Oz" and "La Cit\xe9 des Enfants perdu". If you like French Cinema or consider yourself a cinephile you must see the latter.\n\n', u'-0.0330253', u'\n   This film, better known in the U.S. as "The Professional", is a wonderful  and intense film. Jean Reno plays his role as a "cleaner" with incredible  subtlety. Leon tries to keep his emotions completely suppressed, yet  Matilda (in an extraordinary performance by a young Natalie Portman, who is  destined to become a very powerful actress into her adult life) bring out  in him a new-found joy for life that accompanies his growing paternal  instincts. But, the most dynamic element of this film is undeniably Gary  Oldman\'s performance as a wildly sadistic and crooked DEA agent with his  own narcotic-induced demons. His obsessions eventually lead him to the  brink of absolute madness in his hunt for the cleaner. Truly, this is  Oldman\'s finest performance to date, worthy of Oscar glory, though sadly  forgotten. And so, Luc Besson did indeed top his triumph of "La Femme  Nikita" by far with this masterpiece. Though, I cannot exactly praise his  most recent effort with the sci-fi misfire, "The Fifth Element."\n', u'0.457534', u'"...if it\'s from a person who doesn\'t care about it." \n\nWhat really stands out for me (aside from the really excellent direction of the action sequences) is the too-brilliant for its own good script. Oldman,Reno, and Portman deliver lines that would seem goofy if spoken by lesser performers. Oldman especially chews the scenery in a way that\'s both amusing and utterly menacing. I wonder if his Beethoven obsession is a nod to the ultra-violent Alex from A Clockwork Orange?\n\nThe American version ("The Professional") was the first version I saw. I\'d originally had no real intention of seeing it because I\'d read a pretty savage review of it likening it to child pornography. Clearly this particular reviewer had his head firmly planted in his rear. I\'m surprised he could find room what with that tremendous stick in the way. Anyway, once I finally saw "Leon" for myself - thanks to my cinemaphile grandfather - I observed no such thing. This wasn\'t smut, it was love. Leon has no interest in Matilda sexually, but loves her as a father would love a daughter.\n\nIf you have a choice then go for the longer director\'s cut. You get about 15 minutes more film - and not just filler. These are scenes that truly expand upon the story.\n\nMy only complaints are about the almost complete under use of the completely underrated Danny Aiello, and Oldman\'s single dimensional evilness.', u'0.114228', u"In New York, Le\xf3n (Jean Reno) is an Italian professional hit-man, who loves drinking milk and has a plant as his best friend. His godfather and mentor is the mobster Tony (Danny Aiello), who loves Le\xf3n as if he were his own son, and his cold blood makes him a perfect killer. When Stansfield (Gary Oldman) and his gang executes the family of his twelve years old neighbor Mathilda (Natalie Portman), Le\xf3n lodges the girl in his place, beginning a weird friendship between a killer and a confused girl wishing revenge. When Mathilda finds who Stansfield is, she presses Le\xf3n to kill him. \n\n'Le\xf3n' is a wonderful movie, having one of the most perfect chemistry in the cinema between Jean Reno and Natalie Portman. The storyline recalls some parts of John Cassavetes' 'Gloria', but the performances of the debutant Natalie Portman and the always-excellent Jean Reno upgrade this film. There are at least three scenes that I really love: the light on the corridor, when Le\xf3n opens the door for Mathilda; when they are walking together in a New York street, coming towards the camera; and when Stansfield hits Le\xf3n. My vote is ten.\n\nTitle (Brazil): 'O Profissional' ('The Professional')", u'0.351688', u"I sensed that Luc Besson (director of The Fifth Element and La Femme Nikita) was, like Tarantino and many, many others before him, borrowed elements from various films and genres to create their own voice in the film. With Leon, I sensed him alluding to the crime films of France (i.e. Melville), Hong-Kong (i.e. Woo), and America (i.e. Scorsese), and making it into his own special brand for the story and characters. That his style visually is as compelling helps a great deal. The international version (which is the one I saw) is a little grittier, and more suggestive, than the version most American audiences saw in 1994 and on cable. But it is also a must-see if you are planning to see the film. It's not a long movie, though it gives a good many details in its story.\n\nJean Reno has his star-making turn (at least for what he's worth) in Leon- he's ruthless contract killer who will kill just about anyone for the right price. He lives out of an apartment by himself, trying his best to ignore his noisy neighbors. One of the daughters is Mathilda (Natalie Portman, also a major breakthrough performance), abused by her whole family to no end. When a corrupt cop (Gary Oldman, one of the key villain performances of his career along with Dracula and Drexl in True Romance) goes and kills off her family while she's away, she has no one else to turn to besides the reclusive killer. She knows what he does, and she wants in. The rest of the film is about their relationship, as it unfolds professionally and emotionally, leading to a tremendous, bloody climax.\n\nOne thing that struck me most about Leon is the fact that the film was more disturbing than I expected. The idea of a killer getting a pupil in a young teenage girl is unusual enough, but the way it unfolds I felt so much for her plight got to me at times. this doesn't make Leon a tear-jerker (maybe for some, I'm not sure), but because of Portman's dead-on portrayal, it makes the story work somehow, and is in a way as fantastical as it is naturalistic. There are also a few scenes that stuck out as being little masterpieces of all the elements coming together. The first is a brief scene, and crucial to showing the character of Leon early on- he takes a break after his contract, and sees a movie, a musical with Gene Kelly. He's the only one in the theater, and he is completely in the grasp of what he sees on the screen. It's the perfect touch of humanity and shows his only escape is into complete fantasy.\n\nThe second is when Leon and Mathilda are in a restaurant, after she has just gone through a day of training (there's a hilarious montage that follows this scene). Mathilda is getting drunk off of champagne, rambling with words she may or may not mean. Suddenly, she starts laughing, and she laughs more, and harder. People in the restaurant look at her like she's nuts. Leon is, of course, embarrassed. However, I thought this was just the right touch to this scene, where the kind of father-daughter relationship going on between Leon and Mathilda is revealed. It's not exactly funny, not even really cringe worthy. It just is. The third scene is when Mathilda decides to pay a visit to the man who murdered her family. She follows the man into the bathroom, and waits. Suddenly, he (Oldman) appears out from behind a door. The language used, the tenseness of the two off of one another, it's simply the most terrifying scene in the picture (aside from the first violent turning point).\n\nSo, basically, when Leon finished, I think I realized that my reaction was this: if I had seen this film when I was younger, be it in high school or even middle school, I would've responded to it even more strongly than I do now. There's something very visceral about the nature of violence and killing, as well as the mentor/pupil relationship, that Besson really gets down pat. While some of the situations have the chance of slipping into clich\xe9s, it doesn't happen very often. Leon: The Professional, is hard-hitting when it has to be, soft and funny when it can, and does stay with the viewer a few days after it's over.", u'0.0521829', u"On IMDb's list of top 250 movies Leon is currently number 47, and my number one. There may be movies produced with a bigger budget, more special effects, and 'big named' actors (read overpriced scientologists) but Luc Besson created his muse and my passion with this movie. This is by far my most favorite movie of all time. In the past I would simply rattle off movies 'in my top 10' because I couldn't pick favorites. Leon has finally broken my cowardice and made me choose. It just works for me. Natalie Portman is amazing. I have honestly fallen for her over and over again since I first saw this movie. Jean Reno and her fulfilled their roles so well. I loved the way their connection was so unconventional but pure. Love is love. It doesn't apologize, it doesn't follow a mold and it doesn't have to. Damn, I think I'm going to go watch it again right now.", u'0.16955'], u'tt0068646': [u"Rather than concentrating on everything that is great about The Godfather, a much easier way for me to judge its quality is on what is bad about it. Almost every film has something that I don't like about it, but I can honestly say that I wouldn't change anything about The Godfather. There is nothing weak about it and nothing that stands out as bad. That's why it gets ten out of ten.\n\nThis is one of those films that made me wonder why I hadn't seen it earlier. The acting from everyone involved is great, Marlon Brando comes across perfectly as the head of the family, and James Caan and Al Pacino are excellent as his sons. The soundtrack by Nino Rota is also very memorable, bringing back memories of the film every time I hear it. The plot has to be excellent for it to get ten out of ten, and it is, it's far from predictable and the film is the definition of a great epic.\n\nThe film is pretty shocking in the way every death occurs almost instantaneously, and as it spans ten years so many different things happen and every minute of it is great entertainment. It's a well-made and entertaining film that is only the first part of a trilogy, but it stands on its own as a wonderful film in its own right. If you haven't seen it, what are you waiting for? This was one acclaimed film that didn't disappoint.", u'0.168334', u'\nThis is by far the best movie ever to give a portrait organized crime, this movie goes deep inside and shows it all inside out..\n\nWith superb acting by especially Al Pacino as Mike Corleone and Marlon Brando as Don Vito corleone this movie shows how one of the head mafia families in New York works, it gives a detailed picture of how their business runs and what kinda chances they got to take on their business, for example their denial to step inside the narcotic business brings on alot of troubles, but also it shows what kinda sacrifices they make, every day could be their last day..\n\nAl Pacino shines above all in this movie, as the smart boy of the family he returns after fighting a war for his country, at that time not involved in the family business, but it doesn\'t take long before the war breaks lose and he see no other ways than to step in and fight for his family.\n\nThis is definetely a "must see" masterpiece.', u'0.461634', u'\nThe Godfather is one of the few films in which I personally did not find any significant weakness even after many viewings. From the direction, to the acting, to the storyline, to the score, The Godfather has the word classic written all over, and it really is not much of a surprise that it is now considered by many one of the top five movies of all time. Perhaps when it comes to cinematic techniques The Godfather has not been as revolutionary as Citizen Kane, but its influence on motion pictures is comparable. Rarely a movie has defined or re-defined a genre as much as this one did for "gangster movies", but its influence goes well beyond that.\n\nThe Godfather\'s influence has been so big through the years that elements of it can be found in virtually every "organized crime film" nowadays; almost every comedy featuring a gangster in the last few years has spoofed something in The Godfather. The Italian-American old mobster a-la Don Vito Corleone has become one of the most established figures in the public\'s imagination.\n\nBut to say that The Godfather is simply "influential" is to diminish its true qualities, and so is to describe it simply as "a movie about gangsters". The Mafia is certainly the main focus the story revolves around (despite the fact that the word is never mentioned), but although the movie never tries to forcedly insert separate subjects it contains an amount of psychological and social subtexts that cannot be overlooked. Considerations on how the social environments changes us, on how moral values appear different from different point of views, on how violence can destroy a human soul, and on how power can corrupt an individual are deeply blended into a story that stays practically always true to complete realism, and the result is a picture of astonishing efficacy and believability.\n\nAs good as the direction and the story are, it would be unfair not to consider the major role that the actors\' performances had in the cinematic triumph that was The Godfather. Praised by many as the best cast to ever appear in an American movie, all the cast in The Godfather succeeds in portraying complex, three-dimensional characters without ever making a slip. The exceptional portrayals of Don Vito and Michael Corleone respectively by Marlon Brando and Al Pacino, the performances by Robert Duvall, James Caan and Diane Keaton as Tom Hagen, Santino Corleone and Kay Adams, the ruthless Virgil Sollozzo played by Al Lettieri -- as well as more than a few other roles -- are all perfect for the movie, and they all succeed in making us believe these are real people, not just actors. We are not watching a central character and a bunch of incomplete figures that revolve around him: although Michael Corleone is the character that gets the most screen time, everybody is the center of this world his own way. The movie makes it possible for the viewers to identify with different characters and to observe how their personality and story fits in, and it does it much more effectively than many bloated multiple-storyline movies that came out in the last few years.\n\nThe movie opens on the wedding of Don Vito Corleone\'s daughter, Connie (Talia Shire). Don Corleone is a powerful man, and it was not without the use of violence that he achieved this position during the course of his life. The wedding scene gives a perfect setting of where and how the Don\'s power extends; from the regular worker in a neighborhood, to the immensely popular singer, to the friends in politics and right to the ruthless killer, Don Corleone has links to people ready to ask him favors and to pay him back. Some are trustworthy, some are not, but thanks to his intelligence and intuit the Don can almost always distinguish the two.\n\nHowever, this is 1946, times are changing, and to many of the younger people working in the crime business, Don Corleone\'s ideas are becoming obsolete. The Don believes that the new trend in the business, narcotics, is too dangerous and the families dealing with it would eventually end up self-destroying; while his family had deals in alcohol and gambling for a long time, part of the Government and law enforcement was ready to close one eye. Drugs are another thing.\n\nTo this day, Don Corleone was able to keep things together while maintaining his economic and political power, but things will brutally change when a powerful drug dealer name Sollozzo enters the picture. The refusal of Don Corleone to cooperate with Sollozzo, and a weakness immediately spotted by the latter, will ignite a war that will cost many lives, and that will see Michael Corleone, Vito\'s younger son and the one who never wanted to take part in the family business, lose his "innocence" and transform into a gangster as ruthless as the people he initially stood up against.\n\nI purposely decided not to spoil much about the plot because I believe that the film is perfectly enjoyed without knowing anything in advance, and -- believe it or not -- there are still quite a lot of people who have never seen this movie. There are multiple scenes that manage to create an incredible tension, various twists, and although like any other masterpiece The Godfather can be watched knowing the whole story beforehand and still be a phenomenal experience, I believe it is always a pleasure to see it for the first time and enjoy its multiple climaxes. Besides, to outline such complicated characters and such an emotionally intense story in a short review like this one would be inadmissible.\n\nThere has been much speculation on how the events in The Godfather novel written by Mario Puzo, the book the film is based on, could be an expos\xe9 of true facts. Many believe that the character of Johnny Fontane , for instance, was based on Frank Sinatra\'s real life, and many of the other characters were modeled after real people. I won\'t go into that: frankly, I\nhave no idea whether these voices are reliable, although the Frank Sinatra reference seems obviously quite believable.\n\nThe cinematography of The Godfather is dark and tasteful, and colors are used perfectly to give a true feel of the era it is set in. There is a fair amount of violence, though rarely gratuitous.\n\nThe Godfather certainly doesn\'t need my recommendation. The film is universally considered one of the best of all time, and the performances by Pacino and Brando alone is the stuff of legends.\n', u'0.197708', u'\n     This movie is strong, good script, great casting, excellent acting, and over the top directing.  It is hard to fine a movie done this well, it is 29 years old and has aged well.  Even if the viewer does not like mafia type of movies, he or she will watch the entire film, the audiences is glued to what will happen next as the film progresses.  Its about, family, loyalty, greed, relationships, and real life.  This is a great mix, and the artistic style make the film memorable.  ', u'0.544112', u"\nThe Godfather is one of the very few films that doesn't have a single flaw.   Seeing The Godfather for the first time was the most amazing movie  experiences of my life.  There's scenes that stay with you when the movies  over, and you don't forget them.   Everyone makes the mistake of calling  this film a movie about crime.  Its really a movie about family.  The  dialogue is just unbelievable.  I've seen the movie at least 30, 40 times,  and I'm still amazed at how perfect it is.  The music, the acting,  everything.  People think that Citizen Kane is the greatest movie ever  made...well, there's no way  that ANYONE can think that Citizen Kane is  more moving, and has a better storyline than The Godfather.  The thing I  find so amazing about The Godfather is how Michael (Al Pacino) changes  throughout the movie.   Its my opinion that this is the greatest movie ever made,  and I doubt that anyone can watch this movie, and think I'm crazy.", u'0.402375', u"This is a masterpiece. A timeless masterpiece. Initially, I didn't like this film all that much - I found it rather over-hyped and boring. This was until the advent of DVD, which gave me the feature I needed for this sort of film: subtitles. Once I switched them on and heard (read) every last word of Brando's ramblings and other characters ramblings, I grew a true appreciation for this epic.\n\nTo make a true epic, you need all of three following ingredients working in near perfect harmony. For screenwriters who come across this, take the following pointers on board: 1) Contrasting Characters: Good films have some character distinction, but most fall rather flat because the core of each character is the same.\n\nOf course, there are exceptions to rule (ie... where you want mono-tonal characters... aka matrix; or where you want outlandish contrasts... aka The Fifth Element), but ultimately, this is what makes films deep, meaningful and grand. Consider the contrasts between the Don's children. Michael is rather cool, rational and collected, whereas Sonny is more hot-headed, spontaneous and simple minded. But simply having these contrasts is not nearly enough. What you really need to do is to develop these characters - place them in situations - and then dwell on how their character impacts on the situation they're put in. The Godfather is a terrific example of how to pull this off. While many try to do this in screenplays, most lose the plot and create character obscurities that stretch credibility.\n\n2) Transformation: The central character(s) must undergo a transformation, resulting in them being almost unrecognizable by the end of the film. By putting them into situations, the character's character must not only influence the outcome of the situation; it must also have a lasting impact on the character. Consider Michael at the wedding and compare that to the Michael we see at the end of the film. Again, many films try, but most fail because they come up with unreal (literally, not praisingly) or simply moronic transformations (eg, Wall Street).\n\n3) Patience: Men in Black 2 was an astounding film for one simple reason - it was an entire film squashed into about 70 minutes. It was not much longer than an episode of ER or Buffy. I certainly hope the new goal of Hollywood isn't to make films as short as possible.\n\nAll the great ones spend time - time developing characters, family life, growth, patience with the story telling in general. This is the key (provided that the story isn't mind-numbingly boring). Dances with Wolves, Heat.. and so on are very patient but top-class films. While studios may be lukewarm on the idea of longer films, they are worth it if you have a ripper story to base it on.\n\nI feel that this film has not dated all that much and has tremendous re-watch-ability.", u'0.183835', u"This must rank as the best film (along with part 2)of all time.An ensemble performance that has no weak spot.\n\nParticularly, John Cazale ( Fredo) and Richard Castellano ( Clemenza) give wonderfully understated performances. You just have to believe that Castellano WAS Clemenza, he brings a real touch to his role.\n\nJohn Cazale brings the troubled Fredo to life, and you can see the weak Fredo desperately trying to live up to the family reputation but knowing that he can never be what his father wants. \n\nThe story of one man's reluctance to be drawn into the murky family business,and his gradual change through circumstance, paints a vivid picture of this violent period of US history.\n\nDo not miss this film!", u'0.835443', u'\'The Godfather\' is the pinnacle of flawless films! The first time I viewed \'The Godfather\' I was in my early teens and it was the most astounding film I had ever seen, and has since then stood as my all-time favourite film. It is due to this that I have been looking forward to writing a review of this unforgettable classic. So let\'s start from the beginning. The film opens to four words, \'I believe in America\', it\'s crazy to think that this simple line has become a resonant quote solely due to the impact it made on the entrance to the film\'s "threshold". This is just one of the many renowned quotes that litter the film, and believe me, there are a lot. After the first take we are then absorbed into the life of Vito Corleone, brilliantly portrayed by the Oscar- winning performance of Marlon Brando. Vito is a feared man, he is a criminal, he is a mafioso, but above all he is a respected family man, his three sons are depicted by three excellent actors, James Caan, John Cazale and Al Pacino as well as his adopted child Tom Hagen, played by Robert Duvall. The film follows Vito as he attempts to transfer his crime empire to his reluctant son, Michael. With some of the most graphic and gruesome death scenes to have ever been seen in the 1970\'s film industry (including a certain horse\'s head), \'The Godfather\' epitomises how violence can be used effectively within a film. The Corleone\'s are some of the greatest antiheroes to have ever been seen on screen, whilst they are villains, the audience will refuse to accept that fact, Coppola does something simple and audacious, he takes the guilt out of organised crime. A film rife with beautiful cinematography, memorable musical scores and well-paced action and drama. Overall, The Godfather is one of Hollywood\'s greatest critical and commercial successes that gets everything right; a gangster flick that is overflowing with life, rich with emotion and subtle acting, and further blessed with amazing direction from Francis Ford Coppola. Arguably the most unforgettable masterpiece to have ever been made.', u'0.731528', u'I love this movie and all of the GF movies. I see something new every time I have seen it (countless, truly). The story of tragedy and (little) comedy that exists in this film is easily understood by people all over the world. This film has been called an American story however I have met others who have seen this movie in other languages and they seem to have the same love and appreciation for it that I do. I love the characters and all of the different personalities that they represent not just in families but in society itself. It seems like the entire cast is part of every other movie that I love as well. The sounds, music, color and light in the film are just as much a part of the film as the people. This could be attributed to the method in which it was filmed. At many parts of the film I can still find myself feeling the emotions conveyed in the film. I never tire of appreciating this film. I thank God that FFC is an American treasure. We are fortunate to have him.', u'0.465012', u'The godfather trilogy is an exclusive set of movies that will continue to live with humanity, every generation will see them to say, "Oh that was 10 out of 10." If you watch them you will know that the world that lives inside the underworld is same as the one we live in except that people in underworld are so smart, in fact smartness is the only thing that can keep them there. Don Vito Caroleone\'s early life shown in part-II is very well done to show the Don in making, how a kid who couldn\'t even tell his name went on becoming a underworld don who keep most senators, judges and lawyers in his pocket. Meeting of don with the so call five families are among most impressive scenes.\n\nA saga that goes on for 9 continuous hours takes you around various walks in life of Mike (Don\'s younger son who become Don later), his school days, love life, personal life, family life, business life, political life and religious life. How all of these different roles Mike plays in his life and how intertwined these are.\n\nI enjoyed watching these movies so much, I wish I had seen them much before then I did. Its amazing to see how the Part-III was made 18 years later the part-I was made and everything looks so continuous if watch them together.\n\nI need not say much! The Godfather father trilogy been around for a while and everyone knows that they are great set of movies, its just the matter of when you actually get to see them.\n\nWatch them! Kudos to Francis Ford Coppola! -Vishy', u'0.285332', u'Marlon Brando is Don Vito Corleone, head of perhaps the most powerful New York-area mafia family in the 1940s, in this well-respected film by director/writer Francis Ford Coppola. As the film begins, Vito is receiving "business" guests in his office at his home while his daughter Connie\'s (Talia Shire) wedding and reception are taking place. The epic plot takes place over many years, telling the story of Vito, his family--including Michael (Al Pacino), Santino (James Caan) and Tom Hagen (Robert Duvall), his associates, and their interactions with other mob syndicates.\n\nThe Godfather is commonly considered to be one of the "greatest films of all time". Even though I\'ve given it a 10, I wouldn\'t put that same kind of exalted emphasis on it. I\'ve given literally thousands of films 10s over the years, and for me, Godfather just barely made a 10. I think it has a number of flaws, but Coppola also has a knack for transcending the problems with some brilliant move or another. At any rate, it is definitely must-see viewing--even if it\'s only because it\'s so highly regarded--if you\'ve not experienced the film yet. I think it\'s a good idea to attain cultural literacy, and films as popularly loved as The Godfather become necessary elements in achieving that literacy.\n\nShorn of its gangster trappings, The Godfather is sprawling and soap-operatic in tone. The sprawl is appropriate to its origins as a novel by Mario Puzo, who also co-wrote the screenplay with Coppola. There is a large cast of characters--maybe too large, as it can be difficult to keep track of just who everyone is. Even after you\'ve watched the film a couple times you may find scenes where mobsters seem to spontaneously appear and you catch yourself saying, "Wait, who is that guy supposed to be again?" The soap opera angle can be a positive or negative depending on your tastes. I tend to not like soap-operatic stories, but of course Coppola put yummy gangster topping on this one to make it palatable for guys like me. At root, though, The Godfather is concerned with realistic depictions of a very dysfunctional family as they try to make it through life--including marriages, births, adultery, spats between family members, tiffs with others in their community, and so on. My theory is that the soap opera angle accounts for much of the film\'s appeal. For me, it (and the slight lack of focus from the sprawl) accounts for much of the reason that I barely gave the film a 10.\n\nBut two things help the film transcend a lower score for me. Even though the gangster stuff has been far surpassed in graphic brutality in the intervening years, the dramatic context of the violence usually gives it tremendous impact. Films like Ichi the Killer (2001), which I just watched for the first time the night before watching The Godfather again, make the Godfather\'s brutality fit for Sesame Street in comparison. However, although Ichi\'s violence is effective, setting that knob to "11" doesn\'t make it better. Besides, Ichi is so over the top that it would make many Godfather fans want to hurl.\n\nTo the extent that Coppola and Puzo just focus on the extended Corleone family, they create tremendous depth in their relationships. The whole film can be looked at as a fascinating depiction of "oscillating" dynamics in the family, with the pole pairs being interacting/distancing, control/lack of control, benevolence/malevolence. Most character stances and actions are some combination of those ranges of characteristics, and everyone dances around the poles, so to speak, throughout the film. From this angle, even the attractive surface violence (well, attractive to us fans of that stuff in artworks) is mainly there for the purpose of pushing characters more to one pole or the other. There is an implication that underlying these mechanisms is some natural tendency towards achieving (a dynamic) equilibrium.\n\nBut there are more superficial stylistic factors that help push my score up to a 10, also. The most obvious, which everyone and their grandparents have mentioned, are the performances. It\'s tough to go wrong when you have a cast including Al Pacino, Marlon Brando, Robert Duvall, James Caan, Diane Keaton, and so on. Another commonly mentioned element that I agree is fantastic and superbly integrated to create atmosphere is Nino Rota\'s score.\n\nLess often mentioned is the consistently intriguing cinematography by Gordon Willis. Most of Willis\' unusual shots in the film are so subtle as to be barely noticeable unless you\'re looking for them. The opening, for example, consists of a long (it lasts a few minutes) "zoom out" from Amerigo Bonasera (Salvatore Corsitto). The shot is beautifully lit--most of the frame is extremely dark, giving Bonasera a chiaroscuro effect (the opening is also unusual in that it\'s a long monologue from a minor character).\n\nWillis and Coppola have a knack for placing their actors in the frame to create depth and interesting visual patterns. This is done so slyly that at first blush you wouldn\'t believe it\'s something they thought about, but if you keep this in mind while watching, you can see delightful visual paths that zigzag, wind to a focal point, and so on, all created by the confluence of actors and scenery in the frame.\n\nIf you haven\'t seen The Godfather before, the most important thing you can do before watching is to forget about all of the "greatest film of all time" hype. That\'s only likely to set up expectations that could never be met; more than likely you\'ll be disappointed. Just think of it as one of the better films from one of Hollywood\'s more admirable but relatively odder directors, featuring earlier performances from a very well known cast, and keep in mind that it\'s as much a "historical family saga" as a crime or gangster film.', u'0.287082', u"\nEngrossing motion picture that features some of the finest editing, cinematography and performances ever. There is a wonderful theme of family that runs through this film and its later sequels. No  one is truly judged. Love is unconditional. God is the one who truly judges. Easily, the word masterpiece describes this film, but that's  been said by so many...Who am I to argue? Masterpiece is right on the money.  ", u'0.670091', u'"The Godfather" is a huge piece of film entertaining, involving sentiment, nostalgia, filial affection, pride, integrity, loyalty, corruption, honor, betrayal and crime... Within weeks of its release, it was clearly a blockbuster, a cinematic phenomenon, an exquisite Mafia epic with outstanding performances... Coppola got everything right, creating a landmark in American cinema...\n\nHis film acutely details the inner workings of the criminal "families," and the ruthlessness of those in organized crime, but also examines their steadfast loyalty, love for blood relations, and code of ethics... Coppola and Puzo subtly weave a complex narrative with themes of hypocrisy, power, and corruption which stands as a pulsating reflection of our uncertain times... \n\nWith his raspy voice, deliberate movements, and penetrating stare, Brando creates a personage that will be remembered for ever... The line "I\'m gonna make him an offer he can\'t refuse" has reached legendary statues... Brando\'s Don Corleone is the moral center of the film: a tough, wise, feared old Sicilian who has risen to become an all powerful leader in an empire of Italian-American organized crime...\n\nWhile crime may be the first image that comes into one\'s mind in the film, violence plays a vital part in this complicated tale... Brando is the head of one of the five families who are said to control the Mafia in the area of New York... He is opposed to any involvement in drugs, and refuses to risk his political contacts and prestige for such putrefied money... He is behind the time but he understands that society is not alarmed by "liquor, gambling, and even women..." He is also a loving family man... His sons, relatives and friends are part of his operations... He despises displays of weakness... He understands the strength of power and his wordless sympathy for Michael when he is forced to assume the "sovereignty." In the outdoor garden, father and son are affectionate to each other, but cannot express their emotions openly...\n\nThe Corleones are a warm, close family and the motion picture (with l0 Oscar Nominations) shows the flavor of Italian-American home life... Don Corleone is an undisputed patriarch, and as played by Brando, he has almost the manner of a religious leader... His voice is quite and rasping, his chin stands as a symbol of his authority, and men kisses his hand as they ask for his favors... He is a charismatic leader and his eyes reflect his kind heart as his implacability...\n\nPacino\'s gradual and subtle transformation is the heart of the film... From a gentle man to one of the most cunning, ruthless, and cold-blooded man ever to come on the screen, he has learned from his father never to talk in front of outsiders and always keep his own counsel... His commandment "Never to take sides against the Family." \n\nThe opening shot of "The Godfather" sets the tone of the film as Don Corleone and some of his family listen to an undertaker, Amerigo Bonasera (Salvatore Cirsitto), pleading for justice for the near-rape and brutal beating suffered by his daughter...\n\nAttending the wedding of his sister Connie to young bookmaker Carlo Rizzi, Michael, a highly decorated Marine captain from World War II, points out the other guests to Kate (Diane Keaton), his non-Italian girlfriend... In the same time Coppola introduces us to his large cast of characters:\n\nSonny (James Caan), the rough, hot-headed impulsive kid who never really grew up; Fredo (John Cazale), the troubled, shy, weak young man who can\'t seem to do anything right; Tom (Robert Duvall), the right-hand man, the legal adviser and adopted son to the Godfather\x97 steady, reliable, always thinking, always controlled; Connie (Talia Shire), the battered wife and rebellious sister, who achieves and promotes the movie\'s most horrific scene; Johnny Fontane (Al Martine), the idol star whose tears set up the shocking moment when a movie "big shot" named Jack Woltz (John Marley) finds himself in an horrifying pool of blood; Luca Brasi (Lenny Montana), the giant criminal thug, one of Corleone\'s most trusted enforcers; Tessio (Abbe Vigoda), the fearsome tall enforcer who implies the possibility of violent revenge guaranteeing Michael\'s safety; and Clemenza (Richard Castellano), the other faithful enforcer...\n\nWith a beautiful score by Nino Rota immensely memorable, Coppola\'s motion picture remains a triumph, nearly perfect in its execution, composition, and impact...', u'0.426117', u'"The Godfather" simply put, is one of the greatest films of all time. The script is thee best I\'ve ever read. The direction is flawless. The acting may very well have the best ensemble cast in any movie I\'ve ever seen or will ever see. It\'s also one of the most precise and intricate films I\'ve ever come across as writer, Mario Puzo brings out some of the most hidden and guarded secrets of the underground world ever captured on film. Watching "The Godfather," is like watching cinematic art. Francis Ford Coppola\'s direction is what brings this film, that\'s so ambitious and so grand, down to earth with precision direction as he handles each and every scene with such care. The film starts with a black screen and an opening monologue from an undertaker. As the man starts talking about honor, family, respect, and justice we are pulled right in on his luminous eyes as he stands in near darkness. He begs for justice since the American system has failed him. He goes to Don Corleone (Marlon Brando) for justice. Don Vito is the man of power. He\'s the one who pulls all the strings and watches his puppets dance from behind the stage and out of sight; untouchable, or so we think. Some of the greatest moments in the film- and very intentional to show the distinguishable difference between Michael and Vito- are of Vito crying over his son, Sonny\'s (James Caan), death. When Michael learns of the news, he has little reaction. Two of the most emotionally powerful scenes in the film are from the cause of a loved one that has died long before he should have, and they come from Brando. As Vito stands over the body of his son he nearly breaks down. There is clash of feelings between the two men that are never conflicting, but compared. \n\nThe film opens during the wedding of Don Vito\' daughter, Connie (Talia Shire), and we see just how strong the bond of family really is. You have the family dancing with each other, drinking, laughing, and sitting next to each other to show how close they are, then we see some of the outsiders such as the Barzini family, and surprisingly Michael (Al Pacino) along with his girlfriend Kay (Diane Keaton) on the outskirts without much interaction. Michael seems almost out of place as if he is the adopted son and Tom Hagen (Robert Duvall) is more apart of the family than he is. His opening words are to Kay, and they include, "That\'s my family, Kay. That\'s not me." \n\nWe get the feeling that Michael\'s nearly ashamed of the stigma that goes along with his last name: This is what makes Al Pacino\' role- significantly- the hardest performance in the entire film to portray. He\'s the one doing all the heavy lifting as he has to go from outsider and completely against the family\'s actions and businesses to, by films end, head of the family. Brando has the teary eyed moments that actors live for, but Michael is too cold for that. Never for a second as he gradually comes to power do we think this turn is ridiculous or laughable, and in lesser hands it very easily could have been. \n\nThe final act of the film is loaded with plot points as decisions are made left and right as the film becomes visually and emotionally captivating. As the film draws to an end, Michael has gained half of the power of the family and makes most of the decisions. He\'s treated, not with respect, but as an outsider, too high ranking for his experience. The Corleone family is on the brink of disaster and losing everything, yet we never get that feeling. We see the two leader\'s confidence and we keep our confidence in them, even if the other family members doubt their decisions. Michael goes to Las Vegas and makes Moe Greene an offer he can\'t refuse. Then he refuses. This is Pacino\' shinning moment in the film. There\'s no screaming or the hoopla that goes along with his name. After he treats Moe Greene like utter garbage, Fredo (John Cazale) get\'s upset and starts barking at him. Coppola is perfectly on his game here, too, as we watch from Fredo\'s height, looking down on Michael who sits in a chair as he coldly looks up with his radiating eyes, that have so much going on behind them, and simply says, "Fredo, don\'t ever take sides with anyone against family again. Ever."\n\nThat\'s some serious foreshadowing for the second film, and only after watching the second film can you go back and appreciate what Pacino and Coppola pulled off in this scene; Cazale too. We have no idea how serious Michael is. These are some of the stepping stones that make Michael\'s change believable. He\'s not quite his father- Vito has a soft spot for his children (admittedly so)- as he\'s capable of turning on anyone and using the line, "It\'s strictly business" when it comes to family issues. Michael\'s sister, Connie, calls him a "cold hearted bastard" at the end of the film. It\'s hard to find better superlatives than that, yet we still love him. The interesting thing about Pacino\' performance is that he doesn\'t sugarcoat it. He doesn\'t try to make the audience love him. He plays the character as the character should be played. That\'s the sign of great writing; great acting; and great directing since we could have very easily seen someone try to make him likable. This crew just presents the character with all his flaws and let\'s us decide if we love him or hate him. Its films like "The Godfather," that made me wish I had amnesia, so I could feel the same heart pounding moments over and over again.', u'0.185284', u"\nBefore 'The Godfather' came out in 1972, the gangster genre, chiefly associated with Jimmy Cagney and the film noir style of the forties and fifties, had been in something of a decline. It was, therefore, a brave move for Francis Ford Coppola to attempt a three-hour epic based upon the family life of a Mafia don. \n\nThe film opens in the immediate post-war period with the wedding of the daughter of Don Vito Corleone. Scenes of the wedding are intercut with scenes showing Don Vito himself in his study, granting favours and dispensing a crude form of justice as though he were an absolute monarch. We soon learn, however, that times are changing, even in the world of organised crime. Don Vito's empire has been based upon gambling, illicit liquor sales and prostitution. Other Mafia families, however, are eager for the profits to be made from drugs, and Corleone receives a proposal from a drug dealer named Sollozzo that the Corleone clan should join him in exploiting the narcotics market. Corleone refuses, ostensibly for business reasons, but it is made clear that his real objections to narcotics derive from his personal code of honour. Sollozzo, offended, orders an attempt to be made on Corleone's life. This fails, but Corleone is left seriously injured.\n\nThe focus now shifts to the younger generation. Don Vito has three sons, Santino ('Sonny'), Fredo and Michael, and an adopted son, Tom Hagen. These four have contrasting characters. Sonny is hot-headed and impetuous, Fredo weak, Tom cautious and moderate. Michael, the youngest, loves his family, but initially wants to play no part in their criminal enterprises. Recently returned from the war, his ambitions are to qualify as a lawyer and to settle down in a respectable life with his Anglo-Saxon wife-to-be, Kay. The attempt on his father's life, however, persuades Michael that his first loyalty is to the family, and he agrees to be part of a revenge attack on Sollozzo and Captain McCluskey the corrupt policeman who is on his payroll. There follows a brutal cycle of revenge, as each killing is avenged by another murder. \n\nThe film's emphasis on family ties, honour and vengeance recall the revengers' tragedies of the Shakespearean and Jacobean theatre. Coppola does seem to be aiming for a Shakespearean grandeur. Don Vito, the ageing monarch whose powers slip away is reminiscent of King Lear, Michael, a good man corrupted by power, of Macbeth (a comparison which will become even more apt in the later episodes of the trilogy). There is also something of Hamlet in Michael and Sonny's resolve to avenge their father. Such an ambitious film requires acting of a very high order if it is to seem credible, but Coppola was able to draw upon some of the best performances of the seventies. To my mind, this was Marlon Brando's last great role (I have never cared much for 'Apocalypse Now' and loathed 'Last Tango in Paris'), but it was one that he made the most of. His Don Vito is both terrifying and pitiable, part dictator and part lonely old man. His rasping voice (the result of an earlier bullet wound in the throat) conveys both menace and physical weakness. Don Vito may be a bad man, but he is also in a way a magnificent one, and his passing marks the end of an era. \n\nIf the film was notable for the last of the great Brando, it also saw the birth of a new star. Except perhaps for 'The Godfather Part II', I have never seen Al Pacino give a better performance than he did here, as he portrayed Michael's passage from a 'civilian' (as his brother calls him) to a warlord, from an innocent young idealist to a ruthless killer. Given the length of time that Pacino is on screen, I am surprised that he was only nominated for Best Supporting Actor rather than Best Actor. It would be interesting to speculate who might have won if he and Brando had been in competition for the award. I am even more surprised that Pacino did not win as Best Supporting Actor; Joel Grey's role in 'Cabaret' (which did win) is more showy and a technical tour de force, but it lacks the emotional depth of Pacino's performance. I also greatly admired James Caan's role as the hot-headed Sonny. \n\nThis is not a perfect film; it has flaws, both artistic and ethical. Artistically, there are places where it tends to drag, particularly after the killings of Sollozzo and McCluskey, and even more so after the killing of Sonny, although it recovers at the ending, which is a highly effective piece of cinema. \n\nEthically, I felt that the film tended to take the characters' world view too much at face value. Don Vito may be a dictator, but he is in his own eyes a benevolent dictator, a man of honour who lives by his own moral code. As others such as Roger Ebert have pointed out, this is a film which views a closed society from the inside; the only outsider is Kay, and her role is a relatively minor one. As a result, we do not get to see the damage that organised crime does to the fabric of society, and the Mafia's own view of itself is never openly challenged. That is not to say, however, that the film is totally amoral. We do see that an ethos of taking revenge can spiral out of control and lead to unforeseen consequences, to the innocent as well as the guilty. This is particularly true of the scenes where Michael takes refuge in Sicily after killing Sollozzo. The dead man's associates track him down, and a bomb meant for him instead kills his innocent young Italian wife Apollonia. \n\nAlthough there may be no overt condemnation of the moral position of the Mafia, there is implied criticism of its bloodier deeds. All the characters, whatever the crimes of which they may be guilty, are careful to pay lip-service to the Catholic Church and its rituals. Throughout the film (indeed, throughout the trilogy as a whole) the traditional ceremonies of the Church form a backdrop to various criminal activities. ('The Godfather' begins with a wedding and ends with a baptism). It seemed to me that Coppola was using these scenes to make an ironic contrast between the values of organised crime and those of Christianity, especially at the end of the film. Michael, already a 'godfather' in the metaphorical sense of a Mafia boss, becomes one in the literal sense of a baptismal sponsor. Shots of him taking vows on behalf of his godchild to reject the works of the devil are intercut with shots of his enemies being gunned down on his orders.\n\nDespite my reservations about this film, and although I personally would not have ranked it as my all-time favourite, there can be no denying that it is a film of great power and a milestone in the history of the cinema. 8/10\n", u'-0.0540809'], u'tt0120689': [u"\nThe Green Mile is a masterwork. This is film as art, at it's very best. The depth of the cast is extraordinary, with all of the players delivering excellent performances. There is a clear sense here that all involved in the production knew that this was something special, and gave it their all. See this film if you truly enjoy actors giving everything to their craft. Watch for the countless subtleties of expression, and the great power that the cast creates with silence. This is evident in the opening sequence and remains throughout. Above all, Michael Duncan as John Coffey is exceptional. He brings gripping emotion to a unique, fascinating character.\n\nThe Green Mile should bring you joy, laughter, and if you are like most in the theater this night, tears.\n\nBRAVO!\n\n", u'0.7947', u'\n"The Green Mile" is one of my favorite Stephen King books and I have read it several times.  I was anxiously anticipating the film version, but was concerned that the emotional impact of the book could not be replicated on screen.  Fortunately this wonderful story was adapted by Frank Darabont, who did such a magnificent job bringing King\'s "Shawshank Redemption" to the screen.  He does the same high quality work with "The Green Mile".  The story is faithful to the book, only losing details that were not important to the story anyway.  The casting is superb - every actor is perfectly suited for his role and does an excellent job, although I would like to single out Doug Hutchison.  His portrayal of the detestable Percy is right on the mark and suggests complexities in this character I had not discovered in the book.  The length is about three hours and it seems that critics are complaining about that.  I can\'t understand the complaints.  The film never drags and is never dull, and it certainly didn\'t feel three hours long.  The length is needed to tell this story the way it should be told, and the story is so very engrossing.  Best of all, Darabont and the actors bring so much emotion ot the screen, that I cried like a baby through several scenes. "The Green Mile" will haunt you.  ', u'0.111981', u'\nFrank Darabont returns to the directors chair with another adaptation of Stephen Kings novel. The events take place at a death row, the guards call the green mile. The story is a layered, rather character-driven fantasy tale of the events that transpire at "the mile" after the arrival of a giant man, John Coffey (Michael Duncan), convicted of the murder of two small girls. Actually this is not one single story, but several tied together seamlessly.\n\nA character-driven movie requires a lot from the cast, and fortunately when it comes to cast, The Green Mile delivers. As the poster of the movie tells, this movie stars Tom Hanks as Paul Edgecomb, senior prison guard of the mile, and as always he performs very well indeed. Yet the cast around him is even more spectacular, perhaps partially due to them being relatively unknown. With a face you know, one inevitably remembers previous performances, and the new role is coloured by this.  Doug Hutchison as Percy Wetmore, a mean spirited prison guard was particularly impressive, yet his character could have been given more depth. The most captivating was the performance of Michael Duncan.\n\nIt is hard to find a flaw in this movie. The camerawork is superb, cast wonderful and direction flawless. The movie\'s considerable length, a bit over three hours, is something that had me worried. Yet the marvellous cast and the peaceful yet firm pace of the movie held my attention progressively through the three hours right to the touching culmination. Many will find this movie to be too long, but I for one was delighted of the style, combination of simplicity of events and depth of characters and conversation.\n\nAll in all the The Green Mile is a very touching drama, with the joys and sorrows of the life pictured with great skill, if not the best movie of the year. Five out of five.', u'0.46496', u"Having seen the movie, The Green Mile, and read the novel of the same \r name by Stephen King, I am glad to say that the movie stays true to the \r book, which in itself is a great read.\r \r\nI read the book in one setting about a year ago, and after seeing the \r movie, I didn't see one scene from the book, or one plot point, left \r out. There were a few minor changes from the book but which in no way \r detract from either work.\r \r\nAs far as performances, I can imagine many people pointing to Michael \r Duncan as John Coffey or Tom Hanks as Paul Edgecomb as the best \r performances of the movie, and they are good, but I would hope that \r Michael Jeter would receive recognition for portraying Eduard \r Delacroix. He plays Delacroix exactly as I pictured him when I read the \r book.\r \r\nI can very well see why King himself said this is his favorite of the \r movies adapted from his novels. It is the only one played out as he had \r written it.\r \r\nI wouldn't compare this movie or the book to (Rita Hayworth and) The \r Shawshank Redemption because that would be unfair to both. They are \r both great, but are both different. The Green Mile isn't a movie about \r hope and friendship, as The Shawshank Redemption was, it is a movie \r about a miracle of a man, and the people he affects.\r \r\nBut like The Shawshank Redemption, I give The Green Mile 4 out of 4 \r stars. Great story, great cast, great look.", u'0.276241', u'\nTHE GREEN MILE (1999) ****\n\nStarring: Tom Hanks, David Morse, Michael Clarke Duncan, Bonnie Hunt, James Cromwell, Michael Jeter, Doug Hutchison, and Gary Sinise Written and directed by Frank Darabont. Running Time: 180 minutes. Rated R (for scenes of strong disturbing violence, language, and some sexuality)\n\n\nBy Blake French:\n\n\tIt\'s not everyday that a movie is able to change an audiences opinion on something. "The Green Mile" is a movie that made me think long and hard about supporting the death penalty. The film, based on a novel by  Stephen King, contains such a variety of emotional events that it repels its audience away from its subject rather than glamorizing it. Only a handful of recent productions have been capable of such power. "The Green Mile" is truly one of the best films this year and is Oscar Worthy in many categories. It is a unique, three hour experience that must be seen to believe.  \n\nThe story is more of a personal narrative than an actual plot. The film offers an interesting perspective of the events that take place. It is seen through the eyes of a man who is over one hundred years of age, Paul Edgecomb, who is currently living in an old folks home with his friend, Elaine. During a very emotional day for Paul, he tells Elaine of a historical year in his experiences. She listens closely to his story.\n\nHe tells of a particular year in the 1930\'s. The setting is a beautifully crafted prison hall. Paul explains he used to be a kind prison guard on death row in charge of overseeing the executions. In this year, several significant activities occurred in his life: he had a terribly painful urinary infection, and met a prisoner named John Coffey. This man has been sentenced to the electric chair for the rape and murder of two innocent little girls. This man isn\'t like anyone else Paul has seen, however. Aside from being massive in size, he is humble, mild mannered, and caring. After several miraculous events take place that may point to the thought that John Coffey might have magical powers from God, Paul begins to doubt the crimes this so called criminal has been convicted of. \n\n\tThroughout the story we witness three executions that in an electric chair. These capital punishment sequences have much power and significance. The electrocutions, one in particular, contain some of the most unsettling, disturbing material in film history. The movie is anti death penalty; we see the sometimes sadistic world from the prisoner guards point of view. It will put you in their shoes--and perhaps, change your opinion on the death penalty. I certainly had to think about my stand on this issue.\n\n\nI did have questions that were not really answered by the filmmakers. I wanted more on John Coffey\'s magical powers; the miracles aren\'t investigated enough to suit our pleas. I think the movie could have also stood on a firmer platform of religion. We assume that Coffey\'s abilities are a gift from God from the character\'s dialogue, but religion itself is more of a theme in the film than a message or plot point. I can perfectly see why the writers decided to leave these elements to the audiences imagination, to provoke participation. So I suppose my objections are not really flaws, just personal aspirations.\n\n"The Green Mile" contains so many vivid performances, I will not be able to honor everyone who deserves credit in my review. Michael Jeter, Gary Sinise, Doug Hutchison, James Cromwell, Bonnie Hunt, and David Morse are all superior in strength of their characters. Each contributes Oscar worthy performances, and if the Academy leaves these individuals out at Award time, they need to recheck their databases. Michael Clarke Duncan recently received a Golden Globe nomination for his supporting role, and he deserves it. Tom Hanks is just unspeakably brilliant in the leading role. He is right behind Kevin Spacey from "American Beauty" in the best performance of 1999. \n\n\nThe message to "The Green Mile" is clear and understandable: justice isn\'t always just and the miracles can happen in the most unexpected of places. This film is one of the most penetrating dramas of the past several years. It will induce your mind to think about its subjects, and gradually build on you. "The Green Mile" is a movie that will stick with you long after the ending credits role by. \n\nBrought to you by Warner Bros. \n', u'0.195958', u'\nThis movie is a real gem.  It is hard to find fault with it.  Hanks is excellent in a role that clearly calls for him to suppress his natural slant toward humor.  He is Paul Edgecomb; Tom Hanks is nowhere to be found.  Yet he gives Edgecomb just the right flavor.  One cannot find a single weak cast member!  Michael Jeter should have got an Oscar.  Michael Clark Duncan put just the right shading on his huge character to make him vulnerable and sympathetic.\n\nFlawlessly shot on perfect period sets, the whole production binds together to bring the extraordinary story into the realm of a believable and compelling study of human injustice and charity.', u'0.312927', u'\n\n\nTHE GOOD:\n\n--The story to the film on the outside appears astoundingly simple, though once inside the film and into the plot, there is a lot more to the eye than what appears. Death Row in the olden days might sound like a boring setting for a film, but there are many intricate webs of storyline and a number of surprises and twists along the way, many which had me gasping aloud.\n\n--"The Green Mile" is easily one of the most dramatic films I\'ve ever seen. It\'s because we care so much for these characters (even a mouse!) that the events of the film are so affecting. I cared about everyone (who\'s not a bastard) so much and I was enthralled to see how the film would be resolved. Mix this with a number of absolutely tear-inducing scenes (the final 15 minutes especially) and you have what is nothing less than a masterfully constructed drama.\n\n--Death Row is the setting for this film, and death row is not a place where bunnies dance around singing happy-happy joy-joy. Darabont knows the audience is aware of this, and makes the old death row set gritty and atmospheric, dripping with dread just as it should. The execution sequences are not taken lightly either, in fact many will find them extremely hard to watch, as they are very graphic.\n\n--Characterisations and performances are a definite good point of this film, a lot of the time the performances are what drives the story. Tom Hanks is terrific as usual, injecting a lot of emotion into the character. I especially liked the way he played his character\'s silent suffering with God\'s judgement of his life. David Morse was very underrated for his performance here, personally I thought he was extremely effective and added a little something to many scenes. Patricia Clarkson was moving, Bonnie Hunt was lovely, James Cromwell was good as always.but there\'s no secret that the real revelation here is within Michael Clarke Duncan\'s absolutely fascinating performance as John Coffey (like the drink, only not spelt the same). His child-like manners are so touching to watch, the character is so sweet, but Duncan makes him so much more memorable. He does more than just cry in the film, he transfixes you with every glance as the gentle giant John. Damn, if it weren\'t for Haley Joel, Duncan would easily be my favourite supporting actor performance of 1999.\n\n--This movie just proves how much director Frank Darabont can do with such little setting. For example, how many neat camera angles and cinematography techniques can you think of for the setting of death row? Not many.but Darabont utilises his setting and pulls off some truly wonderful cinematography that catches the sometimes magical and at others truly horrific feeling of the green mile. The performances by the cast also show how much effect a great director can project on a performance, or several.\n\n\nTHE BAD:\n\n--At just over 3 hours, "The Green Mile" is a little over-long, and you get the feeling a few scenes could\'ve been cut down to make the film run a little smoother pace-wise.\n\nRATING:\n\n9/10 - Frank Darabont\'s second outing is a profoundly moving film experience.\n\nIF YOU LIKED THIS MOVIE I RECOMMEND:\n\nForrest Gump (10/10) Frailty (9/10) The Hurricane (9/10) Monster\'s Ball (9/10) The Shawshank Redemption (10/10)', u'0.551542', u'\nWithout using all the old cliches, I would recommend this movie to anyone interested in a creative, intriguing, and life enhancing experience. Everything about this movie was delightful. I recommend seeing this movie with someone especially close to you. After the movie my Fianc\xe9e and I spent two hours talking and expanding on the films ideas and concepts. This was truly a electrifying experience. I would venture to call this movie one of the best movies of all time.  Sure, there are things that I would have liked to see done differently, but that is what makes a movie more enjoyable. The discussions following this film were wonderful.', u'0.753119', u"\nHaving doubts about seeing this movie because of the length (3 hours can be death to a film).I was so surprised that I didn't look at my watch once throughout the whole movie. Tom Hanks, in my opinion, gave the performance of his career by bringing emotion and depth to his part. The only actor that bettered him was Michael Clarke Duncan. How he made this giant like character into a vulnerable pussycat was a marvel. On whole, the cast came together and gave the best performance I have seen in a movie for a long time. Not one of them let the side down by being weak. David Morse who is more known for his supporting roles was also excellent and hopefully not long till he's carrying his own movie. If you haven't seen this get it out now,forget about the running time and connections to 'The Shawshank Redemption' and enjoy it for what it is, a little miracle. 4 out of 5\n", u'0.0867268', u"\nThe length of the movie was perfect. It kept to the story to an amazing degree. The few changes didn't hurt the feeling nor the telling. The story itself is stirring and captivating. The casting of the parts and their portrayal were right on. This is one of the best movie versions of a Steven King novel I've ever seen, and I think I've seen them all. If you're prone to tears at a film, take extra tissues, you'll need them. The theater I was in was a mass of sniffles through the end credits. If you like fantasy/drama the film cannot be missed. There are some graphic scenes that may upset some, but this is Steven King. This is a movie I plan to add to my video collection as soon as the Letter Box version hits the shelves.", u'0.249836', u'\nI went looking for an experience. Something that would take me to the limits of my own existence and remind me that even in the darkest corner of my own life, there was hope. I was reminded, instead that along with the triumph there must also be sacrifice. A part of me died in that theater, but I walked out feeling renewed, refreshed...and a little cursed.\n\nI think Paul Edgecomb feels the same way.\n\nTom Hanks has to be the epitome of a Hollywood living legend...and the guy\'s only in his 40s. He went from scraping his way through sophomoric slap like The \'Burbs, Turner & Hooch, and Bachelor Party to rise up in the 90s as our towering "everyman."  Anyone who marvels in his "simple guy in complicated circumstances" roles such as Forrest Gump and Saving Private Ryan knows that he can deliver the goods...and an Oscar nomination (or win...or two...in a\n\nROW!!!)  But Tom does something very interesting in The Green Mile.  He lays back.\n\nThe breakout performance in this film goes to Michael Clark Duncan (right now tied with Sixth Sense\'s Haley Joel Osment for my Best Supporting Actor vote).  Crippled by his size, Mr. Duncan has a limit of the roles he can play. However, given the role of a child-like behemoth with Christ-like powers of healing, Duncan brings to the screen a performance that will transcend the Denzels and the Poitiers of the world.\n\nThe Green Mile is Cell Block E in a Louisiana State Prison, death row. Paul Edgecomb run this wing with compassion, a startlingly different approach considering the legendary cruelty of southern prisons.  He is surrounded by men in him employ who all share his philosophy that these men ultimately await the most devastating punishment.  Why make their stay any more troubling.\n\nAll save one: Percy Wetmore (Doug Hutchinson), relative of the Governor and always ready to remind anyone who disagrees his HIS methods just who got him his job. Percy hates everything about The Green Mile; the prisoners, other guards, even a tiny, brave mouse who befriends one of the inmates (Michael Jeter).  It isn\'t until another new inmate is processed, a man they call "Wild Bill", that Percy will meet his equal.\n\nSo where is the common thread? What is a messianic character doing on death row? What role will Tom Hanks play in his redemption? And what\'s this "curse" thing I brought up in the beginning of this review?\n\nIf I could tell you, you wouldn\'t slap the money down on the box office and find it for yourself.  Let me just tell you that the final blessings bestowed by John Coffey (Duncan) could make optimists and pessimists alike find a common ground. How you perceive the final moments will be up to how you impart on yourself...and the world.\n\nIf John Coffey guilty of his crime?  Are the fates of the characters in this film deserved?  Half and half.  Evil is punished, bu t\ngoodness must bare witness...and that has a price as well.  Will Tom Hanks win another Academy Award?  He shouldn\'t.  Is this a good film?  No.  It\'s an incredible film.\n\nI still weep for Paul Edgecomb.', u'-0.0875101', u"\nWhat an excellent movie this picture was. When I first saw the trailers in October, I thought it might be pretty good.\n\nThe Green Mile exceeded my expectations. Tom Hanks leads a wonderful cast in this movie which stands out by far from most others. If you liked Shawshank Redemption, you'll love this one.  I've realized just how good Stephen King can write, now that I've seen this and Shawshank.  It's three hours long, and worth every minute of it.  It touched me in many ways.  I was fortunate enough to see it twice. And I will buy it on dvd as soon as it is available. The Green Mile will certainly become a classic. Go see it, you won't be disappointed.   ", u'0.58201', u"i expected this movie to be a normal and i just want to see it for Tom Hanks but as movie goes through i cry,i laugh and there comes a feeling which can't be described in words. i rate this movie as the best i have ever seen. some moments in the movie makes me hold my bed pillow in the tightest ever grip. i can guarantee that this movie will leave an impression in your mind for a long time. i even say that this movie is better than shawshank redemption.fantastic story, brilliant acting,mind boggling feelings and overall an unforgettable drama. if you have watched 1000 movies and not this then your movie watching journey is incomplete.i will also make sure that even my next generation should watch this one.", u'0.931321', u"I'm glad that a number of reviewers have informed me that this highly unusual tale was a faithful adaption from the novel by Stephen King. I'm not much of a fiction reader so it is gratifying to hear that his vision got to the screen intact. \n\nI would not have guessed this film would have come from a horror story writer. No monsters from the id or any place else are present in this story set in the American South of the Thirties. But demons do exist in The Green Mile and there is a man named John Coffey who takes them unto himself.\n\nThe Green Mile refers to the cell block housing the inmates scheduled for Death Row. In that cell block comes Michael Clarke Duncan who is close to seven feet tall and maybe weighing 400 pounds. He's also as docile as a baby lamb and whose only request is that they leave a night light burning because he gets a little afraid of a strange place in the dark.\n\nOf course the guards who have the typical white Alabama attitudes of the day don't quite know what to make of them, but Tom Hanks who captains the cell block and most of the rest find out just how special he is. And Hanks cannot believe that someone like Duncan could possibly be guilty of a double rape/murder of a child.\n\nThis modern day parable of the Jesus story has King telling us that it is very possible that many of his kind have walked the earth with talents for healing. One of them got a religion worked around him, but they can come in all walks of life and certainly no one would expect one to come in the guise of an illiterate black Alabama sharecropper. But one of my favorite Bible verses has Jesus himself saying that what you do unto the least of my brethren you do unto me.\n\nSomebody of Michael Clarke Duncan's size and build is not going to get too many really good roles and he certainly hasn't played anything remotely like John Coffey again. Parts like that don't come along and the film seems almost to have been built around him. It's one of the most moving performance that has ever been put on film in history. And it's an incredibly difficult role, he's meek for his size and Uncle Tom like, but as we learn far from it. In fact Coffey is beyond what the ordinary human mind can comprehend. Duncan received one of four Academy Award nominations that The Green Mile got, in his case for Best Supporting Actor. Since the film is built around him, my only question is why was it the Supporting Actor category?\n\nThe Green Mile was also nominated for Best Picture, Best Sound and Best Adapted Screenplay, but did not come home a winner in any of these. A pity that one of the best films of the Nineties could not get at least one Oscar.\n\nWhere there's a Christ-like figure you also have some devil spawn villains and we have a pair of them in Sam Rockwell as another death row prisoner and David Hutchison as a rat of a prison guard with both connections and issues. What happens to them is both poetic and diabolical in true Stephen King tradition. Others in the cast of note are Bonnie Hunt as Mrs. Hanks, James Cromwell and Patricia Clarkson as the warden and his wife, David Morse and Barry Pepper as two other guards on the block and Michael Jeter as another prisoner with a remarkably trained 'circus' mouse.\n\nThe Green Mile is a remarkable allegorical picture and might be considered for Easter time viewing if it has a season. It certainly will make folks think.", u'0.024679', u"There's a reason why this Oscar winning tour de force is #67 ranked of all films on IMDb, despite the fact that it's 3 hours long and has some truly grisly scenes (not for the squeamish, children, or a first date.)\n\nIt's chock full of outstanding performances, not only from Hanks, but also from the many supporting characters, all who are rich and full. It will seem slow to the impatient, but will be richly rewarding for those with the stamina to make it to the end. \n\nIt will certainly get you thinking about capital punishment and perhaps different shades/degrees of evil. It is either a deeply moving spiritual tale or a wonderfully creepy journey down the rabbit hole of Stephen King's mind; take your pick. Either way, I put it right up there on my desert island list with the likes of Shawshank Redemption. It is definitely required watching.", u'0.624251'], u'tt0167261': [u'Peter Jackson truly outdid himself when creating the Lord of the Rings: The Fellowship of the Ring and he fails to disappoint us in the 2nd part of the Trilogy. The Two Towers shows us that he is not a one-hit wonder, like so many directors are. I actually think that The Two Towers reaches the same level as the Fellowship of the Ring, and sometimes even surpasses it.\n\nThis film is the biggest film in the trilogy. What do I mean by that? Well this film has so many things going like the amazing Battle of Helms Deep. Frodo and Sam journey to Mount Doom, to destroy the Ring. But the one who\'s leading them through the way is Gollum, he looks so creepy and realistic, that he doesn\'t feel disconnected from us. A powerful performance by Andy Serkis as Gollum, he should of been nominated for an Oscar for Best Supporting Actor.\n\nThe Best part of the film, is quite easily and everyone knows it the ending. The ending of the battle of Helm\'s Deep is quite breathtaking, and as Gandalf the White comes in the distance with another army to defeat the Orcs. When Treebeard and his army of Entz tear down Isengard, the destruction and the battle is so immense in size, that you truly have to see to believe.\n\nIn size and scale, Peter Jackson has truly redefined the word "epic" and he also pays attention to the small things that truly elevate this movie from great to amazing. I definitely recommend this film to everyone, but you really should watch the first movie to truly understand what\'s going on.\n\n10/10', u'0.406668', u'\nIt seems ridiculous to want to add my own comments to a slew of others that are already in IMDB\'s records, but I feel like I cannot sleep nor cease the throbbing in my chest until I release some of what I have so recently seen.\n\nPeter Jackson\'s The Lord of the Rings is one of the bravest projects ever attempted by a filmmaker. Mr Jackson deserves every ovation he will receive, every award, every bit of the praise and adoration that will be spoken and written.\n\nThis second installment of the story is a masterpiece in every sense, forget your prejudices about the books, they are another way of looking at this beautiful story (I know this is slightly against the rules, but a I cannot resist saying that a previous writers comment - a comment that compared the Lord of the Rings Films and Books to the difference between Romeo and Juliet in screenplay and ballet formats - was entirely accurate).\n\nGollum was an excellent amalgam, so easily could he have been an annoying Jar-Jar-Binks-Alike. Instead the way that Jackson and Serkis (and doubtless many many others) chose to portray the CGI incarnation of "Smeagol" was incredibly emotive and powerful. Gollum is profoundly disturbing, amusing, almost lovable... Not even John Ronald Reuel himself could induce that range of emotions for Smeagol in me...\n\nA truly skin-crawling performance by a superb Brad Douris as the evil Grima Wormtongue was just beyond words. Douris _Became_ Wormtongue in a skillful fulfillment of what was already inspired casting.\n\nProbably the most definitive casting of this film though was Manchester born Bernard Hill as Theoden, King of Rohan. The casting for "The Two Towers" makes one shake ones head and wonder, in retrospect, whether anyone else could have filled these roles. Mr Hill\'s performance was truly first rate, a performance which contributed greatly to "The Battle of Helms Deep", scenes which were a spinning tornado of emotions for the viewer.\n\nViggo Mortensen goes from strength to strength. His performance is visceral and yet sensitive. The overriding emotion that Tolkiens vision of Aragorn induced (at least for me) was awe at his heroics. Mortensen\'s portrayal in Jackson\'s frame brings new aspects to the Aragorn character. Mortensen\'s Aragorn is emotionally dextrous to go with his physical dexterity, he is sensitive, seemingly empathic, warmer and more fundamentally human, and yet super-human in presence and charisma. "Definitive" is not strong enough of a word.\n\nIf you still view Jackson\'s epic with scepticism I implore you to put down your preconceptions and your prejudices, but most of all put down the books... This is beautiful way to see middle earth, don\'t pass it up - The books are the ultimate fantasy epic - the pictures you draw in your head are better than anything you can imagine, but The Lord of the Rings "The Two Towers" is one wonderful interpretation of that epic story.\n\nGo, Laugh, Cry, and Sit in Awe of this cinematic treat.\n', u'0.585116', u"\nThe opening scene of The Two Towers provides an outstanding, yet very brief, taste of action, cinematography, and special effects, only to be matched (and far surpassed) in the final hour of the film. The stunning events of the third hour of The Two Towers are undoubtedly the centerpiece of the film, and while the first two hours serve finely as story development, they primarily build anticipation for the final hour, which mostly depicts the battle of Helm's Deep. More than anything else, the first two hours merely tease and torment the patient audience. It's a shame that such a gap has to exist between the first minute and the final hour, but I take no reservations in saying that despite how you feel about the first two hours of the film, the final hour will make the wait entirely worth its while.\n\nAs stated, the road to the battle of Helm's Deep can be enormously long and painful for any viewer aware of what breathtaking scenes await towards the end of the film. Perhaps The Two Towers' biggest fault is in its own accomplishments; the first two thirds of the film are well shot, well paced, and they necessarily and adequately progress the storyline, but when compared to the spectacular final hour, the first two hours seem uneventful and insignificant. However, to be fair, I feel that it's simply impossible to create two hours of film that could appropriately lead into the battle of Helm's Deep. It's difficult to comprehend how such scenes came to exist in the rather short amount of time Peter Jackson has had to create six hours (so far) of finished film. The battle of Helm's Deep is simply unreal; it's unlike any event that has come to pass since fantasy films gained, and regained, popularity.\n\nAs assumed, The Two Towers begins where The Fellowship of the Ring ended. The majority of the film follows four separate groups and their story lines: Frodo and Sam; Aragorn and Legolas, Merry and Pippin, and Saruman and his army. The performances live well up to the standards of the first film, with a particularly notable performance from Viggo Mortensen as Aragorn, whose role is significantly larger in The Two Towers. Aragorn satisfies a thirst for someone to root for, a thirst that was left partly unquenched in Fellowship. It's much easier to root for Aragorn than it is for Frodo; Aragorn has many more qualities of a leading man, a soldier, and a hero. More than once did the audience, filled mostly with academy voters, applaud the heroics of Aragorn. Gollum also shines in a much-welcomed large role, due to extremely realistic computer animation, and a fine performance from Andy Serkis, upon which the animation was modeled. In Fellowship, it was appropriate to consider Gollum one of the many great 'features' of the film. However, here he is more of a leading character and a 'star,' and his convincing dual-personality, stabbing voice, and well-choreographed body movements make him consistently eye-grabbing and the center of focus of nearly every scene in which he appears.\n\nAs was The Fellowship of the Ring, The Two Towers is a visual delight. Those who have seen Fellowship are no doubt familiar with the beauty of the landscapes of New Zealand. The cinematography is, again, one of the best aspects of the film. The swooshing camera movements that follow the armies and horsemen throughout the fields are extremely satisfying in this post-Matrix era. The shots of the ascending enemy-laden ladders in the battle of Helm's Deep are terrifying and chillingly gorgeous all at once. The visual effects take an appropriate leap forward from those of the first film. While the visual effects in Fellowship were outstanding, the battle of Helm's Deep provides for the best application of CGI since the rippling waves of The Matrix's 'Bullet Time.' The battle of Helm's Deep features absolutely awe-inspiring and seamless integration of acting, stunts, and computer animation. Each orc seems to have its own personality, demonstrated in its movements and visual features. The masses of armies fight with strategy and true character, which I imagine is much harder to accomplish than animating thousands of identical clone troopers. The only problem I have with the visual department is the look of Gimli, the Treebeard. Gimli's visual features seem a bit childish and uninspired, inconsistent with the standards set by the rest of the film. But again, there is simply nothing that compares to the battle of Helm's Deep. George Lucas and the Wachowski brothers certainly have not created anything that approaches the grandness and magnificence of The Two Towers' final hour, and I doubt they will do so anytime soon.\n\nIn The Fellowship of the Ring, I had a few minor problems with Howard Shore's score. While I thought it was gorgeous and it established several very memorable themes, I don't think it handled the sentimental scenes (opening in the Shire, Gandalf's passing) properly. I thought it caved in to the melodrama a bit too much, resembling the emotions from James Horner's Titanic. However, I believe that The Two Towers requires the type of score which Howard Shore accomplishes best: dark, continuous, and unrelenting, as demonstrated in Se7en and Silence of the Lambs. The theme used in many of the action scenes in Fellowship (low brass, six notes repeated with a rest in between) is much more present in The Two Towers, appropriately. A brand new theme is also unveiled, the theme for Rohan, a prominent kingdom in Middle Earth. Rohan's theme is played more often than any other melody in the film, underscoring most of the memorable and heroic scenes with great effect. Howard Shore undeniably exhibits his skills as an 'A-list' composer, and with a possible double Oscar nomination this year for The Two Towers and Gangs of New York, he could get propelled to the very top of the 'A-list,' right beside John Williams and Hans Zimmer in terms of demand.\n\nIf not the picture itself, there should be a way to recognize and award the battle of Helm's Deep. The battle sequence alone represents successful filmmaking in its highest form. The choreography of the battle, the visual effects, the pacing, acting, cinematography, and music, all work together in perfection to achieve grand filmmaking which is as entertaining and enjoyable as film can be. For this very reason, no one, whether a fan of Fellowship or not, should miss The Two Towers. ", u'0.341632', u"\nSeriously, I never thought a movie could get better than the Fellowship of the Ring, but it did. This movie should be #1 on the IMDb top 250. This movie, as long as it was, captivated me from start to finish, and those who are not entertained by this movie can not be entertained period.\n\n\nYes, I have read the book. Any chapters cut out at the end of books III and IV will probably themselves in the next installment. If you haven't noticed, the beginning of the Two Towers was actually closed the Fellowship of the Ring on the big screen.\n\nGollum was a CG masterpiece. He added some light to this incredibly dark movie. At the same time, there are areas where you feel sorry for the poor guy, or just want to kill him. Smeagol was probably the most diverse character I've ever seen.\n\nElijah Wood put on a better performance than he did in the first movie, as did Sean Astin. Ian McKellen, who captivated us in the last movie, captivated us even more in this one. Viggo Mortensen, John Rhys-Davies, and Orlando Bloom made a great trio. They laughed together, cried together, prospered together, and suffered together. This trio gave life to Aragorn, Gimli, and Legolas. Eowyn expressed her emotions clearly through Miranda Otto. \n\nThe music need not be discussed. Its greatness speaks for itself.\n\nFavorite Scene: The Battle of Helms Deep. Possibly the greatest scene in the book, 50% of the trailer, and action packed climax to this beautiful movie.\n\n\nThe movie, like its predecessor, fails to bring us closure, but that's ok. Closure will come next year. I look forward to the Return of the King.\n\nThe Two Towers is now my favorite movie of all time.\n\nThe scale is broken. 10 is not a capacity sufficient enough to hold this movie... my movie... my... precious...\n", u'0.0887312', u'\nReally, I should probably let this film soak in a bit; I am, after all, on something of a "post-viewing" high right now. However, at this moment, my feeling remains the same from the first installment - this is the movie experience I\'ve been waiting my whole life for. In case you haven\'t gathered, this movie is visually stunning, literally breathtaking. I mean that, some of the scenes in this film simply stopped my lungs in their tracks, shocked at the pure, enveloping beauty of the shot. Peter Jackson has a profound grasp of visual manipulation like few directors have ever had.\n\nThe acting is, as always, superb. Kudos for hiring "actors" not "stars"; "Oscar-worthy" over-acting could have threatened the realistic touch the film\'s remarkable cast supply. Specific mention goes to both John Rhys-Davies in his well enjoyed comic turn, and very largely to Andy Serkis, who was a major role in creating the most realistic and brilliantly well-performed CGI character I\'ve ever seen (Gollum).\n\nFor the most part, and as a fan of the books, I take no offense to the slight plot modifications. My understanding is that Tolkien himself realized that visual adaptation of LotR would require a somewhat different take on his work, and was apparently open to such minute changes. There are also a\nfew tiny bits and pieces I was disappointed to see not make the final cut, however, I\'m sure a future inevitable extended DVD will take care of those.\n\nIn short, if you found the continual enjoyment I did with the first movie of LotR, this movie will in no way let you down. Not even for a minute.\n\nHighly recommended, 10/10.\n', u'0.249898', u'\nYes, it\'s true. Return of the King may have won more of the Oscars as the culmination of Peter Jackson\'s magnificent cinematic achievement, but history will in fact adjudge "The Two Towers" as the greatest of the three Rings. If Fellowship was a road movie and ROTK was a friendship film, then Two Towers is an unadulterated war movie of heroic proportions. Peter Jackson said he based it on "Zulu"- and we can see why. It has a dramatic intensity and flow which none of the other films quite share. Good against evil are so sharply contrasted that you could cut your fingers on them. TTT also has the best score Howard Shore has produced. And it has the best dialogue.\n\nThe screenplay explains (with barely disguised contemporary resonance) what we are protecting in Western civilisation when we defend ourselves against those who would wish to destroy it. When Sam tells Frodo that there are "some things worth fighting for", when Merry tells Pippin that there "won\'t be a Shire" unless they do something about it, when King Theoden laments that "the sun has gone down in the West" this film could be entitled not the "Two Towers" but "the Twin Towers". It is Miltonic in its scope. It is cinema as art.\n\nYes, one may quibble about certain Entish details, and I know that the Elves weren\'t supposed to be at Helm\'s Deem, and that Faramir is a little undeveloped, but does this matter? Not at all. The Extended version is better than the original, but does not need to make such a quantum leap as Fellowship managed with its EE. However it will be a film that is seen as a landmark in cinema. A trilogy which may never be bettered. And a reminder of what we are all here for\n', u'0.40133', u'\nThe Two Towers can only be explained in one word, beautiful.  This film left me breathless.  I was hoping for a film that could stand in the same depths of the Fellowship of the Ring, and I must say that it has surpassed the film completely.  I will have a hard time watching the Fellowship and seeing the ending, knowing there is so much more waiting.\n\nLet\'s start with Gollum.  Gollum gave an astonishing performance.  The poor misunderstood beast, or the darkened soul creature whose cares are only based on the One Ring.  The performance given in CGI is at times very human. The facial expressions given could strangely give this character a personality as you would see in any great actor.  Gollum\'s voice is still haunting, even when the beast appears to be the loving guide to the dark gates of Mordor.  For these reasons and more, Gollum has become my favorite character in the film, replacing Legolas in the Fellowship.\n\n\nOn the other side of Middle Earth we see Aragorn, Legolas, and Gimli.  I have to say that the dark times of this movie are at times overbearing, and saddening.  There is a perfect mix of humor in the film given by the characters Gimli, and Legolas, while still keeping the viewer in understanding that these are very darkened times.  Aragorn\'s performance is outstanding.  He has proven that he can be put on an A-List of actors, and deserves appraise for his performance.\n\nGandalf "the White" in this film was a twist.  We remember the friendly Gandalf The Grey in the Fellowship being a kind elderly wizard.  Shouting off fireworks for the children of the shire, and smoking "leaf" as explained in the novel.  There are no cute scenes with the new White Wizard.  No fireworks, or pipes.  Just a Wizard that knows the daunting task ahead, and the quest seems to have taken hold of the great wizard.\n\n\nVery dark are the times for Frodo, and Samwise.  Gollum seams to give Frodo hope, as the two ring bearers can associate the pains of the One Ring. Frodo gives an amazing performance this time around as well.  It seams that the Ring of power has taken hold of Frodo, and our hero is slipping.  But the surprise was aimed at Samwise.  Proving that Sam is the definition of a\ntrue best friend.  Even at times when it seems there is no hope for the troubled trio, it seams that Sam brings hope to the moment.  This is what keeps the Frodo\'s story this time around even more extraordinary, is the hope that is there, even when all odds point to despair.\n\n\nMerry and Pippin\'s story is very odd initially.  The Ents in the story are very wise and newly troubled creatures from the amazing mind of Tolkien. This story goes back to cut scenes during the worries of the rest of Middle Earth, and gives us a feeling of hope, in the troubled times of Aragorn and the others.  The Ents were very well done CGI wise, but it was there personality that moved the audience.  They are curiously wise, and well spoken and give the impression of an elderly college Professor.  Their story is eventually given a wonderful opportunity, and for those of us who know the story, know that greatness is upon them.\n\nThis movie honestly moved me further than I thought any film could.  I could see my face and the emotion I felt as I was watching this mammoth film. Peter Jackson has truly given us all a gift of a magnificent.  This story has captivated my heart, and the film has taken my breath away.  There is no words that can express the greatness of this film. 10/10\n', u'0.327496', u'\nEvery great adventure story worth telling has a solid hero - someone who puts others before themselves and uses their talents to do their best at keeping the forces of evil at bay even if it means the loss of life and limb. At its core, this movie has eight such heroes and each one lives up to the call. From Pippin and Merry, the lost hobbits who aid the Ents in battle, to Gandalf, Aragorn, Gimli and Legolas who held back the hordes at Helms Deep to Frodo and Samwise who continue to make their dangerous and arduous trek to Mount Doom. All of these characters are heroes and they\'re played with love, respect and meaning.\n\nThough the acting in this film was top notch throughout, I found myself amazed by Gollum\'s (motion captured body and voice by Andy Serkis) overall performance. Though obviously CGI, there was so much emotion in this character that I couldn\'t help believe he was real! Though "Final Fantasy" was the only movie that created the most realistic CGI characters that dominated an entire film, Gollum is lightyears ahead with the simple fact that this deformed li\'l hobbit seemed human. He had the spark of life behind those eyes that the FF "cast" lacked.\n\nAs a film, this movie has it all - action, drama, comedy - but none of it would\'ve worked without characters we cared about, villains we despised and heroes we cheered for. With the obvious success of the first two installments, the release of the final film next December may prove this to be THE BEST trilogy ever made!\n', u'0.250484', u"From the beginning to the very end, the Lord of the Rings trilogy is interesting and enjoyable. The books and the movies alike grasp one's attention as if they were real. You, the reader or viewer, can sense the pain of the characters, their emotions. The trilogy is truly powerful on screen. The second movie, however, I believe has something the first and third are missing; it feels like a bridge connecting two great islands. There is something unique about it that cannot easily be described. Metaphorically, the first movie is, say, a soldier. The third movie is the path home from war. And the second movie is the act of coming home because it contains the obstacles that must be passed through before achieving the goal. Although not 100% loyal to the written trilogy, the movies are done in such a way that the mainstream audience and LOTR fans from before the movies came out can say they were enjoyable and well made.", u'0.306759', u"\nI considered The Fellowship of the Ring to be one of the greatest movies ever. This one is better!\n\nThe scenery is marvelous, the animations great, and the story superb. This episode strays further from the books when it comes to the unfolding of events, but I feel that it stays closer in atmosphere and realism; the nazg\xfbls are now the fear-inspiring creatures they should be. Gollum, excellently implemented, even becomes more realistic then I remember him from the books, not to mention other attempts to portray him. His schizophrenic monologues are among the highlights of the movie.\n\nThe major drawback is once again the apparent incapability of the dark-side creatures. Aragorn with fellows can ride back and forth among them unhurt, while the Uruk-Hai fall in large numbers just for being nearby. Though I enjoy many of the jokes made at Gimli's expense, this still is another thing I partly dislike. Gimli sure is no clown in the books.\n\nI rate the movie 9/10 (my highest so far).\n", u'0.200561', u"\nWe have been waiting an entire year for this one!!! The Two Towers picks up right where last years Lord of the Rings: The Fellowship of the Ring leaves off. The director, Peter Jackson, did not include a recap of the last movie, so if you don't remember what happened in the first movie you better rent it and refresh your memory before you head off to the theater.   \n\n\nWhen we last left our fellowship, it had splintered apart. Frodo Baggins (Elijah Wood) and Sam Gamgee (Sean Astin) continue there quest to return the all powerful and evil ring to Mordor where it can be destroyed. They take on the creature Gollum (Andy Serkis) as their guide to Mordor despite Gollum's obsession with getting `his precious' back. Aragorn (Viggo Mortensen), Legolas (Orlando Bloom), and Gimli (John Rhys-Davies) begin by trying to find the kidnapped Merry (Dominic Monaghan) and Pippin (Billy Boyd), but end up getting caught up in a battle to save a race of humans. The evil wizard Saruman (Christopher Lee), controlled by Dark Lord Sauron created a grand Uruk-hai army that is sent to destroy the race of Humans at the fortress Isengard. The presumed dead Gandolf (Ian McKellen) also returns to lend his assistance in battling Lord Sauron's troops.     \n\nThis film was better paced than the first in the trilogy. There were still some breaks in the action that were a little dull, but the dialog was necessary to further the story. With three separate stories going on simultaneously between the three groups of the splintered fellowship, the film kept the action moving quickly. Clocking in at 179 minutes, it is just one minute longer than the first film. This time, I didn't mind the length. The battle for Isengard comprised about a third of the film, and it was very intense.      \n\nThe rest of the film had a lot of the same excellent cinematic shots as the first movie. The shots tracking the actors from above (done by helicopter) with the beautiful New Zealand mountains and countryside in the background were just amazing.  The landscapes helped to keep me involved with the story when the action slowed for dialog intensive scenes.      \n\n\nThe creature Gollum played a very key roll in this movie, and the computer-generated character was very lifelike and amusing. He reminded me of Dobby the `house elf' in Harry Potter and the Chamber of Secrets. Gollum and the Dwarf were the two main comic relief characters in this very serious film.      \n\nTo conclude, we had to wait a year for this film, and it lived up to expectations! A final reminder\x85this is the middle film in the trilogy so you can expect another ending that leaves you wanting more! Not to worry though, the third and final film is due out next Christmas.\n", u'0.125176', u'\nI\'ve read ---with care and delight--- the books four times in the last 34 years, including the recent reversion to Tolkein\'s "original" manuscript, edited by his son. I\'m a fan. There, I said it, and I\'m glad, I tell you!\n\nThis second installment of the trilogy is probably as good as a movie could get. It captures the Tolkein vibe probably as well as it could be captured in a theatrical release. Watching the flick tonight I realized that much of the vaunted charm of the very readable and very "literary" Tolkein books is in part the time it takes to read the long pages--- 1,000 to 1,400 pages, depending on the edition your are holding. And that time--- weeks and weeks of pouring over pages, re-reading certain passages, pondering and mulling over the fake languages and songs, and histories Tolkein concocted--- allows one to create and invent the Tolkein world inside oneself. That\'s GREAT! I loved each time I read the original. But no one could possibly expect a movie to give you, in 2-1/2 hours, that kind of luxurious lingering in the fantasy world. Duh!\n\nTherefore, the movie\'s focus on action--- and FYI, it is dead-on accurate and faithful to the books--- is OK. The Ents\' meeting in the forest took 3 or 4 DAYS in the book, and Merry and Pippin spent many more days hanging with Treebeard. The movie telescoped that down into a few hours. But hey!!! Think about it--- how could a movie, ANY movie, capture all of the sylvan reverie (including the Hobbits growing a couple of feet taller with the Entwash, etc.) in a trilogy movie series? All of that dreamy book-world stuff would be great to see on the screen--- but it would take dozens and dozens of hours of screen-time. Who could sit in a theater for that many weeks? There aren\'t that many "festive" people on the planet to make such a theatrical release profitable.\n\nMaybe if we were wishing, we could have wished for a 30 or 40 hour TV mini-series. Then we COULD afford to meander and linger and all of that. Seriously--- I\'d have enjoyed it. But then, the battles and evil empire and such would have to be portrayed with a vigor equal to Jackson\'s efforts, else the drama and peril (etc.) would be lost. For MY ridiculous wishing, then, I\'m wishing for them to have made two projects--- the 3 theater-release movies, AND a 30-hour TV mini-series for all the "literary" vibe. But then, instead of a $300 million triology, we\'d have had a $1 BILLION dollar (but memorable!) TV mini-series.  Oh well--- if wishing were having...\n\nOverall, "LOTR Two Towers" is an excellent movie! A "10" out of "10"!!!\n', u'0.319645', u'\nDon`t you just hate cinemas ? No matter where you sit you always end up surrounded by people who spend their time chatting amongst themselves as to the events on screen 30 seconds before they happen . If we`re after a running commentary we`ll buy the DVD thank you very much . Add to this unattended mad mental kids running around wild . In fact many years ago our local newspaper saw a no holds barred letter of complaint about a screening of 3 MEN AND A LITTLE LADY which referred to foul mouthed juvenile delinquents in the audience . And on top of all this I`m a chainsmoker and cinema chains don`t allow patrons to poison themselves or others with nicotine so as a rule I don`t visit cinemas . But it`s a rule I broke in order to see THE TWO TOWERS because I was literally dying to see it . So I\nbooked my ticket well in advance for the premier screening in Rothesay on the 26th of January , popped into the cinema that night and demanded to be entertained\n\n****** SPOILERS ******\n\nI was entertained and more , but I later had some reservations . On a technical level TTT not only does not disappoint but it outdoes FELLOWSHIP in terms of both scope and scale but this doesn`t automatically make it as some people have claimed a better film . The battles of Helms Deep and Isengard are truly breath taking and out do anything Hollywood has done , but ironically by concentrating on spectacle TTT feels more like a Hollywood film than FELLOWSHIP . And all this spectacle causes a problem for Peter Jackson - How does he finish all these impossibly epic set pieces ? The simple answer is he can`t ! As several reviewers have mentioned the fractured storyline comes to the rescue of the director in much the same way as Gandalf rides to the rescue of Helms Deep : Cut to the most breath taking calvary charge in the history of cinema , cut to the Ents attacking Isengard and then cut back to Helms Deep where our heroes have snatched victory from the jaws of defeat  , except they did so mainly off screen . It`s as if the director has used the fractured storyline in order to get himself out of a\ncorner . Likewise reviewers on this site have noticed the story telling technique hides several plot holes involving characters appearing and disappearing to and from the story .\n\nOf course you don`t notice these flaws at the time due to the awesome onscreen visuals but there is one major criticism you can level at TTT as soon as the credits roll and that`s a lack of an emotional impact . Yes you`ll gasp and cheer and feel your heart race but you won`t burst into tears . Remember the scenes in the first film where the fellowship escape into the mountains after Gandalf has confronted the Balrog or the departure of Boromir ? Remember how your throat tightened and you nearly had a tear run down your face ? Of course you do because these two scenes are amongst the most moving and heart wrenching in cinema history . Unfortunately there is no similar equivalent in TTT . And the film also cries out for a flawed but noble ambigous anti hero like Boromir in a story where everyone is either good or evil and no in between , though this is almost certainly the fault of Tolkien rather than Jackson who does manage to get the best out of his cast in film lacking in character development . Special mention goes to Andy Serkis who alas seems to have missed out on nominations for best supporting actor , Brad Dourif who plays a very slimy villain , and Bernard Hill who made me forget that this is the same actor who played Yosser Hughes in BOYS FROM THE BLACKSTUFF 20 years ago . But I couldn`t help but miss Sean Bean and I suppose casting him as Faramir twin brother of Boromir would have been just too obvious\n\nBut despite my criticisms I enjoyed TTT immensely and for three magical hours I forgot all about my nicotine addiction and the world outside . No doubt the audience at the Rothesay cinema felt the same way as me as we watched this film in a hushed silence . We laughed at the right bits , gasped at the technical achievements , but no one cried which means I can only award THE TWO TOWERS 9 out of 10       ', u'-0.396899', u'Watching this movie is like watching a 179 or 223 minutes long action sequence. The pace is incredibly high. Alright I have to admit that the Extended Edition of the "The Lord of the Rings: The Two Towers" takes an awful lot of this pace away and make some of the scene\'s unnecessary long and the scene\'s with Treebeard are also a bit dull and long but still...Especially compared to the first that was just too slow at times this is an huge improvement!\n\nLuckily there also are some welcome additions in the Extended Edition. Best addition are the scene\'s with Boromir, Faramir and Denethor in Osgiliath.\n\nThere also are some newly great characters and actors. David Wenham is a surprisingly talented young actor and I think it\'s great that they actually have cast someone that really looks like Sean Bean. Bernard Hill also impressed me, he probably is best know for his role as the captain in "Titanic" in which he also already impressed me. Viggo Mortensen probably still is the best actor of "The Lord of the Rings" movies. Yes sure Ian McKellen and Christopher Lee are also more than great but Mortensen really puts some passion and effort in his character. I know Sean Astin is always being praised a lot but I seriously don\'t think that he is such a good actor in any of "The Lord of the Rings" movies. Andy Serkis also was really good as Gollum/Sm\xe9agol and I wouldn\'t had mind seeing him get an Oscar nod.\n\nStrange thing is that the Gimli and Legolas suddenly changed into some comical sidekick characters. It was odd to see but it works! They provide some good comical relief at times.\n\nMost fantastic thing about the movie is that it\'s really action filled. The Battle of Helm\'s Deep truly is fantastic to see. Still favorite and most powerful moment of the movie is when the Ent\'s march to war. Also the scene\'s with the riders of Rohan are a true spectacle.\n\nI\'ve never been really a big fan of the editing of "The Lord of the Rings" movies and this one is no exception. Problem is that Peter Jackson shot way too many hours of footage with as a result that the editors have difficulties picking the right scene\'s and the length of them.\n\nBut "The Lord of the Rings: The Two Towers" is one of those movies were the pluses make more than up for the minuses.\n\nA spectacular adventure action experience.\n\n10/10\n\nhttp://bobafett1138.blogspot.com/', u'0.399825', u'I didn\'t really appreciate this second installment of the LOTR trilogy until I watched this for the second time. The key was how I looked at the key character of this film: "Gollum" (Andy Serkis.). Once I began to appreciate and marvel at this weasel-like character, my opinion of the film went from bad to good. That doesn\'t mean I like that slimy creature: I don\'t, but I am more fascinated by him rather than totally annoyed as I was with the first viewing. A big reason was that I put on the English subtitles, so I was able to understand everything he said. I recommend doing that you has a similar problem deciphering his dialog. Now I more fully understood what a tortured soul that pathetic creature was.\n\nAnyway, this second installment, as in the first, offers a lot of fascinating sights and sounds and a nice varied platter of action scenes and wild characters. For younger kids, I am to happy to say there is absolutely nothing, language-wise, that would offend anyone but the violence is heavy and brutal at times.\n\nThis is a solid, highly-recommended second installment in the trilogy. It\'s epic film-making. No, it may not be equal to the first - The Fellowship Of The Ring - but what adventure story is?', u'-0.097417'], u'tt0167260': [u'\nPeter Jackson has done it.  He has created an all-encompassing epic saga of Tolkien\'s Lord of the Rings books, and after coming away from the final chapter, how does this rate not only as a film on its own, but as a part of the whole?\n\nPerfect.\n\nI\'ve never seen a series like this.  A trilogy of movies created with such love and care and utter perfection of craft that you can\'t help but walk away and wonder how did Peter Jackson make this possible?  I have always loved the original "Star Wars" and "Indiana Jones" series for their epic storytelling, and just for just fitting in as a great moment in cinema. This should be, will be, remembered with as much revered fondness for generations to come.  They do not make films like these anymore.\n\nAs a stand alone film, it picks up immediately where "Two Towers" ends, so brush up before seeing it.  I\'ve read the books, and the anticipation of seeing some of the more profound moments in this film made me kind of view it with a rushed sense of perspective.  I wanted to make sure everything in this film was done "right".  And when it happened, it was.  I will need to see this again to enjoy everything on a more casual level.\n\nThe cast comes through once more.  The musical score retains its beauty, elegance and power.  The special effects, notably Gollum again, are nothing less than breathtaking, and simply move the story along.  The battles are monumentally huge and exciting.  There are some liberties taken with the story, especially during the end with the homecoming, and yet, everything that needed to be covered regarding the main characters was handled. After the greatest moment of the series resolves itself, the story provided a breather.  And gives a good-bye to friends seen on screen for the last three years.  It was truly a bittersweet feeling in realizing that there will be no "Rings" movie in 2004.  I will miss this talented group of actors.\n\nAs with the first two, the film is very long, but goes by without you ever truly realizing it.  This film is so much more than a simple "fantasy" epic. It\'s a story about strength of character, friendship, loyalty and love. And while every member of the Fellowship has their part to play, I finally understood why some critics have said this series is a story about Sam. It\'s his unwavering resolve that led the quest to its victory.  Sean Astin is a true credit for adding the inspirational heart to this epic.  As as far as the ending goes, they ended it the way that it had to be ended. Jackson ended this film the way it should have been.\n\nI will miss looking forward to a new "Rings" movie, but these movies provide hope that high-quality films can still be made without special effects taking over a story, bathroom humor, or a "Top 40" soundtrack.  George Lucas could learn a lot from these films about how not to alienate the fanbase.\n\nEach film has earned a "10" from me for the last two years, which for me to give is a rarity.  This one, however, is as equally deserving as its two predecessors.  The Academy had better not look over this film for "Best Picture" of 2003.  To do so would be greatly disrespectful of the craft and care that anyone involved with these films put into them.', u'0.208617', u"\nSaying that this film starts where `Two Towers' left off is somewhat misleading, for the film starts a great distance from the walls of Helm's Deep. `Return of the King' opens with a flashback of Smeagol (Andy Serkis) obtaining the one ring of power and an origin of his deterioration into the creature Gollum. This opening recaptures an emphasis that was somewhat lost within the epic battles of `Two Towers,' at that's the ring. The first installment, `The Fellowship of the Ring,' provided heaps of exposition on the ring's importance and influence, and in `Return of the King,' we see it pay off, big time.\n\nAfter the armies of Isengard have been defeated due to an allegiance between Theoden (Bernard Hill), the king of Rohan, and the elves, the main threat to middle earth is now concentrated in the kingdom of Mordor, controlled by the dark lord Sauron. Sauron has turned his eye towards the realm of Gondor, the last free kingdom of men, and the wizard Gandalf (Ian McKellan) must warn Denethor (John Noble), Steward of Gondor of the impending attack, while Aragorn (Viggo Mortenson), heir to the throne of Gondor, and Theoden gather men to aid against the armies of Mordor. The dark lord Sauron needs only to regain the one ring of power to conquer all of middle earth, and two hobbits, Frodo (Elijah Wood) the ring-bearer and Sam (Sean Astin), must continue their journey, directed by Gollum, to Mount Doom, the only place where the ring can be destroyed. Got all that? If not, you need to bone up on your `Lord of the Rings' before expecting to follow this film.\n\nSince all three epics were filmed simultaneously, each individually has the feel of being part of a larger picture - except for this one. `The Return of the King' is just too big, the most epic of a set of epic films. Now that director Peter Jackson has brilliantly constructed the characters and plotlines throughout the first two films, he puts them to use.\n\nAll of the characters have their best moments within this film. The pair of mischievous hobbits, Merry (Dominic Monaghan) and Pippin (Billy Boyd), are no longer the tree ornaments they were from `Two Towers,' but are split-up, and take their characters in completely new directions. Aragorn, played with an unmatched sense of honor by Viggo Mortenson, is about to meet his destiny as the future king of all men, while Andy Serkis continues his expert portrayal of Gollum (Serkis' provided not only the voice of Gollum, but also assisted during production by acting out the scenes of the computer-generated character with his fellow actors).\n\nHowever, the real acting triumph of the film is Elijah Wood as Frodo Baggins. He continues his descent into corruption with an incredible talent that many could not pull off. Wood's performance is so critical to the film because it determines the ring's power to corrupt, which, needless to say, is absolute.\n\nThe first two films established Jackson as an incredible visionary, shooting vast landscapes from his native New Zealand. With `Return of the King,' Jackson really gets a chance to show off. With, hands down, the most beautiful visuals of the trilogy, Jackson makes `Return of the King' a gorgeous feast for the eyes, while never resorting to McG level over-the-topness. Jackson stays very grounded in his characters, not letting the effects tell the story, but only assist the wonderful dialogue and characters. Think of `Return' as a mix of `Fellowship' and `Two Towers,' with enough action and character development worthy of ending a film event of this magnitude.\n\nThe bottom line, fans of the films will not be disappointed. Hardcore Tolkien lovers might be upset by plot changes and interpretations made by Jackson and the other writers, however, it is unrealistic to expect a completely true adaptation of the novels, being that film is an entirely different medium. Despite the alterations, Jackson consistently stays true to the major themes and ideas from the original text, while adding some of the finest filmmaking ever put to screen. `The Lord of the Rings: The Return of the King' is one of the most finely tuned and cinematically perfect films ever made. Not only the best of the trilogy, but a crowning achievement in epic filmmaking.    ", u'0.481205', u"I am, I admit, an unlikely convert to the religion of Tolkienism. I \r have never read the books, having, I thought, been put off them for \r life by the sort of obsessive freaks who read them when I was at \r school. (One classmate, then aged about sixteen, told me with great \r pride that he had read the whole of 'The Lord of the Rings' at least \r fifty times). I also have never been a great admirer of the 'sword and \r sorcery' school of fantasy writing or film-making; indeed, some of this \r genre (mostly those starring the current governor of California) struck \r me as being among the worst films ever made.\r \r\nI was, however, persuaded to see the first in the trilogy, 'The \r Fellowship of the Ring', by its overwhelmingly positive reception from \r the critics, and was quickly won over by the scope of Peter Jackson's \r vision. I had been expecting some twee tale of elves, gnomes and \r fairies; what I experienced was a genuine epic (in the true sense of \r that overused word). Ever since December 2001, I have been waiting for \r parts two and three of the trilogy to be released. Neither has \r disappointed me.\r \r\nThe story of 'The Lord of the Rings' is too complex to be told in a \r review such as this. Suffice it to say that it revolves around a magic \r ring which will give its possessor immense power. The power-hungry Dark \r Lord Sauron (a figure who is never actually seen on screen) desires to \r obtain the ring in order to dominate Middle Earth. His enemies, led by \r the wizard Gandalf, are seeking to destroy the ring, which can only be \r used for evil purposes, not for good. At the beginning of the final \r part of the trilogy, Sauron's forces are massing for an attack on the \r kingdom of Gondor.\r \r\nThe film relates the story of the conflict which follows, and this \r leads to some of the most spectacular battle sequences I have seen, \r even more impressive than those in 'The Two Towers'. Inevitably, the \r film makes much use of computer-generated effects, but unlike many \r films dominated by special effects, plot and character are not \r neglected. The acting is uniformly good, and in some cases outstanding. \r Special mentions must also go to the camera-work, which made the best \r possible use of the magnificent New Zealand scenery, and to Howard \r Shore's memorable musical score.\r \r\nSo, looking forward to the Oscar ceremony, I have no doubt that this \r should be the best film and that Peter Jackson, who has amply fulfilled \r the promise shown in the excellent 'Heavenly Creatures', should be best \r director. Best Actor? I would find it difficult to decide between the \r competing claims of Sir Ian McKellen, who brings wisdom, kindliness and \r the required touch of steel to his portrait of Gandalf, and of Elijah \r Wood, who plays the brave and resourceful hobbit Frodo to whom falls \r the dangerous task of ensuring the ring's destruction. Best Supporting \r Actor? My own nomination would be for Sean Astin, as Frodo's loyal \r companion Sam, but several others might have claims, notably Viggo \r Mortensen or Bernard Hill.\r \r\nIs this the best movie ever made, as some of its admirers have claimed? \r Possibly not- that is, after all, a very large claim to make. I have no \r doubt, however, that the trilogy as a whole is the first great \r cinematic masterpiece of the twenty-first century. It has certainly \r inspired me to start reading Tolkien's original novels. 10/10.", u'0.308663', u"\nAs a movie watcher, I tend to become bored with the constant, overdone, overdrawn, underplayed, overdramatized performance and production quality of most Hollywood films. It's a trait that in recent years has sadly driven me away from most big budget American films. A decent idea will become mangled by the money making machine that is Hollywood, hoping to pump the most raw cash they can out of it before it drops dead in the street.\n\nWe all saw the catastophre of a failure that arose from the Matrix Franchise. Such immense hype and professed genius only made the failure all the more poignant for those of us that really wanted and expected more from the franchise.\n\nThat all being said, I must say that The Lord of the Rings is an amazingly powerful visual experience. Not even just a visual experience. Peter Jackson has crafted one of the finest written pieces of our era into THE quintessential epic. He supplements the brilliant storytelling of JRR Tolkien with one of the most awe-inspiring collection of films ever created.\n\nThe 7 hours of film that leads up to the Return of the King is only precursor though, when you sit and watch this film. It's just plain brilliance. Everything about the film is wonderful. The manner in which Jackson has arranged the scenes, detracting slightly from the original flow of the novel really helps to keep the suspense strong in all three story branches. The Tolkien humor is intact perfectly and the gallantry and just plain coolness of these heroes is plain amazing. (Check out Legolas in the BIG battle) It's all just too much for words.\n\nIf one were to gripe, and I suppose there will never be a film made that one cannot find a point at which to grip, it is painfully long running time here. I personally believe that this is the only way such a film could be made, true to the source material and completely engrossing, but I found myself more worried about the pain in my posterior than the emotional final minutes after 4 hours (including ads and previews) that I had spent in a cramped seat. As such, this will be all the better (at least for me) when it's release on DVD (can't wait for the extended...get to see the Sauroman scenes that they cut out).\n\nAs a film though, this is amazing. A true lasting legacy in story telling and now cinema. Bravo Mr. Jackson.", u'0.162695', u"Obviously, I'm aware of the fact that the Lord of the Rings trilogy is actually one giant movie, but since it was released in parts, that's how I'm judging them. The Return Of The King is the final chapter, and since it is the climax and resolution of the epic journey, it has a little more intensity and urgency than the previous installments.\n\nAt this point everyone has come to know and love all of the characters, and the stakes have become tremendously high. Kingdoms are at their knees, and the only two characters who can save the day are getting weaker and weaker. The tension was very high in this episode and I can honestly say that out of all 3 this was the only one that had me on the edge of my seat. There were many memorable scenes (one of my favourites including the part with the giant spider)that made this the classic that it is sure to stay for decades to come.\n\nThis is the longest of the series, mostly because of the ending that seems to last a while. This was a good ending, and I can see why Frodo did what he did. He, and us the audience, have gone through an incredible ordeal and I think we needed that 20 minute linger. When the battle is over, and the celebrations have ended, there is a sad emptiness felt. The films spanned over 3 years, there have been the extended cuts of course, but after that, it's all over. Peter Jackson gave us an ending that was both appropriate and admirable.\n\nThese were some amazing movies and this one in particular is the best, in my opinion. As whole, the Lord Of The Rings is a phenomenon. An absolute phenomenon. Much more than just movies. They have a universal appeal and have touched the hearts and imaginations of millions. I'm one of them.\n\nSorry if I'm being all fanboyish and kissing this movie's ass, but I really admire it. It may not be among my personal favourites but generally this seems to be the movie event of the century. There will never be another Lord of the Rings film, and that's a bit depressing.\n\nMy rating: 10/10", u'0.0794392', u"\nFrodo and Sam continue their quest to destroy the ring, led by the untrustworthy Gollum.  Meanwhile the rest of the Fellowship prepare for another battle to hold a human city against an onslaught of orcs.\n\nIf you check my other reviews you will note that I wasn't a massive fan of the first two films - I loved them, but was not blind to their faults. However, let me just lay my cards out here, I was totally blown away by this film.  For the vast majority (and more of that later) the narrative flowed really well where the other two films had struggled to really keep consistent.  Here the various strands work well together and, while characters have only brief times to tell stories, on the whole it manages it well.  I got the feeling that the film really let rip - it knew this was the ending and it did feel that everything came together in a collection of noise and energy which really made it feel like the final part of a trilogy rather than just a stand alone film.\n\nThe one area where the film really stutters (and actually caused people to leave the cinema in annoying numbers) is ironically the place where Jackson is true to the book, and that's the final 20 minutes.  There is a clear scene where the film ends, however it then runs for another 20 minutes - which is a mix of scenes that all fade out like they were the end.  To Joe Public (ie me!) I would have been happy not to have all the loose ends tied up in the way the book does it - the film should have ended on a high (with the King being crowned etc) but instead it seems to crawl to an end in a way that is not in line with the momentum of the film (if not the whole trilogy!)  This problem is minor on the grand scheme of things, but I would rather have left the cinema on my high than be made to wonder `when's this ending? Is this the end now? Oh, maybe this is it now?' - but I do understand why it was done this way.\n\nThe cast, as they have been all the way, are excellent.  Wood's Frodo changes well during this film while Astin is touching in his portrayal of unerring friendship.  Bloom and Rhys-Davis had less to do but came into their own during the battle scenes - adding both action and the odd comic touch (`that still counts as one' being accepted by the audience as a chance to break the tension).  Mortensen is the title character and serves it well, with McKellen also continuing his strong role.  I could list through the whole cast but I will stick with noting two things.  Firstly, both Monaghan and Boyd had bigger and more meaningful roles and rose to them well. Secondly I continue with my belief from the second film that Serkis is the stand out actor of the trilogy.  His Gollum is so much more than an effect - he is tragic, fearsome, hateful and funny.  Praise of course goes to the special effects for making this character tell so much with an expression but to pretend that the work of the actor is secondary to the character (as opposed the look) is foolish.  He deserved one for Two Towers so I hope an Oscar goes his way.  It was a shame to not have screen time for Lee but the film works well without him and it was a brave move by the editors.\n\nThe special effects do not stand out - and that's a compliment.  Even in state of the art movies of late I have been aware that I could be watching a video game.  Here I only occasionally noticed that things were clear computer effects, even though the majority of the film was!  This is how they SHOULD be used - not as a draw in their own right but as part of the film.  Whether it be the massive battle scenes that are spectacular or the animated spider or just the fact that I forget that Gollum is only an effect, I cannot fault it's use of effects or the sheer visual feast that is this film.\n\nI have tried not to gush because there will be plenty of others to do that without me joining them, but it is hard to really fault this film.  It is the strongest of the trilogy and brings it all together really well, it is an emotional event more than a film and, if Jackson needs 20 minutes of slow closure to finish it to his satisfaction then I can give him that in return for all the hours of wonderful cinema that he has given me.", u'-0.114203', u"\nThis is the final movie in the Lord of the Rings trilogy, and certainly doesn't disappoint like some other trilogies *coughMatrixcough*. The three films had their principal shooting all done at the same time, which lowers their overall costs and keeps a good sense of continuity for the films.\n\nThe special effects, first of all, are excellent. While there's a few little things (a reversed shot with smoke flowing back into chimneys and occasional lighting that's a bit off), by and large they're excellent. The most impressive thing about them is the sheer scale. This isn't a small or simple scene; it often includes thousands of digital characters combined with filmed actors and action, sweeping landscapes, and dozens of things happening at once. This is a good reason to see it in theatres; even on DVD, there's little details that you can only catch when it's on a massive screen.\n\nThe filming is good, although there are a few evidences of digital smoothing and cutting that can nag at the mind and eyes of a picky movie-goer. There are a few interesting shots, but most are fairly plain and straight on, getting the point across without being dazzling. New Zealand's landscapes provide a great backdrop for everything going on, and there really are some beautiful places, especially up in the mountains. I hear land prices are quite good, what with the orcs warring and everything, so you may want to look into real estate purchases now.\n\nSound has been said to make 75% of the emotional impact of any production. This is a loud 75%. All the sound effects are very well pulled off, sound appropriate, and are generally loud. The Nazgul screeching was bordering on painful, but in a good way. Most everything has a distinct sound, and it's rare that anything feels out of place. In some of the battles, the roof of the theatre was shaking. The soundtrack fits the movie well, and Howard Shore has done an excellent job, as with the last two films in the series.\n\nPerformances all around were good, but Sean Astin as Sam and Viggo Mortensen as Aragorn really dominated the film. They performed their roles perfectly, and came away giving a good picture of the characters. Elijah Wood seemed to be stuck with the same terrified expression on his face through most of the movie, almost Max Payne-style, and it grew old quickly. Ian McKellen, the ever-wise white wizard, had a fair bit of dialogue which he delivered well; my only complaint is he had too much in the way of wistful sayings leading to scene changes. Orlando Bloom, favorite of young teenage girls everywhere, had a few more action sequences (which got cheers from the aforementioned girls) which were quite well pulled off, but his acting wasn't much tested by this film. John Rhys-Davies continued with Gimli's joking performance; he's really too amusing to take seriously, but does a good job at it.\n\nFor the old Tolkien fans, this movie stays quite close to the book, although they did have to omit some portions, most notably the taking and retaking of the Shire and the time spent in the Halls of Healing in Minas Tirith. Hopefully some of this will show up in the Extended Edition on DVD. Shelob's attack was left until this film, and much of the time spent in Mordor was shortened for the sake of pacing, and it was a good decision.\n\nMy favorite scene would have to be the battle at Minas Tirith. The incredible scope of the battle, with the special effects, sounds, and many close-ups of pieces of the action, make for an exciting scene. The visual effects especially are stunning; the 'oliphaunts' play a big part in the action, and they're entirely created by computer. There's also some wide shots with tens of thousands of digital characters marching on the field of battle, and even the individual actions have the masses warring as a backdrop. It's worth your movie-going dollar simply to watch this on a large screen. It was also intermingled with some smaller events inside Minas Tirith, so it's not pure battle for the whole of the scene, and it keeps it from being dreary or heavy-handed.\n\nOverall, this is a movie well worth watching, and even paying to see in a theatre. I'd recommend against bringing small children, as there are some scary images, and they'd also be a distraction during the final movie in what will probably remain the series of the decade. Not a particularly great date movie, either...this is a real, bring-your-friends big movie. Five out of five decapitated orcs (and trust me, there were a lot more than that).", u'0.416582', u"\nFeeling weary and battle-worn, I have just staggered out of the cinema after three and a half hours of special effects creatures fighting other special effects creatures. I had taken refreshments but barely touched them - probably because the film I had watched is one of the most mesmerising, evocative, inspiring, and awesome I have witnessed of any big adventure epic. Not to mention superb ensemble acting, moods that shift effortlessly between mediaeval battles of colossal proportions and convincing bloodshed, beauty and wonderment, fantastic natural and artificial landscapes and cityscapes, touches of humour, well-paced dramatic tension, and human bonding that is moving enough to just let you dry your eyes as the unassuming credits flash by.\n\nReturn of the King is the greatest of the Tolkien trilogy by New Zealand director Peter Jackson. Although I've seen the other two and read the book, I felt it would also stand alone well enough for people who hadn't done either.\n\nThe storytelling is much more professional that the first one - which maybe laboured to introduce so much information - or the second one - which has little let up from the tension of long battle scenes. In Return of the King, there is an emotional sting at the start, as we watch the transformation of Gollum from warm, fun-loving guy to murderous, mutated wretch. The movie then moves deftly between different segments of the story - the sadness of the lovely soft-focus Liv Tyler as fated Arwen whose travails and woman's love succeeds in having the Sword that was Broken mended, the comradeship of Sam and Frodo (Sean Astin & Elijah Wood) that is tested to the limits, the strong commanding presence of Gandalf (Ian McKellen) who keeps an eye on things whilst turning in an Oscar-worthy performance, the ingenious and very varied battle scenes, and the mythical cities of that rise out of the screen and provide key plot elements.\n\nThis is a fairy story of human endeavour, the defeating of power cliques and the triumph of the human spirit that could almost be compared to Wagner's Gotterdammerung. It is a fairy story without any sugary sweetness, a fairy story the likes of which hasn't been told so well before, and is even unlikely to be done so well in the future. The haunting scream of the Nasgul stays with you, the physical attractions are not airbrushed, and the battles are about as far from pantomime characters waving wooden swords as you can get. The ingenious monsters keep you on the edge of your seat. The whole narrative maintains the spirit (if not archival, detailed accuracy) of the original and makes you want to read the book (or read the book again!)\n\nThe worst I can say about it is that it is maybe a tad long - but not that you'd notice . . .\n", u'0.44201', u'***SPOILERS*** ***SPOILERS***\n\nOver the years, I\'ve read Lord of the Rings four times. During the holiday season of 2003/4, I watched Return of the King four times. While I embraced ROTK as the third part of a dream come true, I was not totally happy, left wondering why so many things vital were missing. The 4-hour extended DVD version explains a lot.\n\nMy biggest beef was on so much missing about Aragon, and I found most of them in the DVD. One of the vital elements in the Fellowship\'s strategy is to draw Sauron\'s eye away from Frodo, and here Aragon\'s role is crucial. The "last debate" in the movie is totally inadequate in explaining the suicidal march to the Black gate but the DVD makes it very clear, with the additional scene of Aragon revealing himself to Sauron though the Palantir. He is the bait that Sauron cannot resist.\n\nAnother important aspect is that Aragon comes into the city of Minas Tirith first and foremost as a HEALER, not as a king. The kingship comes afterwards. This is again brought out in the additional scenes in the DVD, although still missing a lot of details from the book.\n\nStill disappointing, even for the DVD, is that so little is given to the story of Eowyn and Faramir. The dialogue through which they come to accept each other could very well be the most beautiful in the entire book. The few shots in the DVD that trace the development of their relationship are far from adequate, although that\'s a least a slight improvement from the film version.\n\nAnother disappointment is Aragon\'s arrival at the Pelennor Fields, which is hopelessly lame compared with the original treatment in the book: amidst the despair of the Rohan and Gondor soldiers in witnessing the approaching black ships, Aragon\'s standard suddenly unfurls at the main mast: "There flowered a White Tree, and that was for Gondor; but seven stars were about it, and a high crown above it, the signs of Elendil that no lord had borne for years beyond count. And the stars flamed in the sunlight, for they were wrought of gems by Arwen daughter of Elrond; and the crown was bright in the morning, for it was wrought of mithril gold." \n\nThe treatment of Gandalf\'s confrontation of the Witch King in the DVD departs from the book, in which the two are locked in a face off, then Rohan\'s horns are heard and the Witch King swings around and leaves. What in heaven\'s name is in Peter Jackson\'s mind when he had Gandalf\'s staff broken by the Witch King. But this did explain a mystery that has been bugging me for a year \x96 why Gandalf had to snatch a spear from the guard when he saved Faramir from the pyre of Denethor.\n\nEnough on the DVD.I shall be remiss if I do not pay tribute to Peter Jackson for the wonderful film he and his dedicated crew have created.\n\nMost inspired is the lighting of the beacons to summon help from Rohan. In the book, this is observed by Pippin in the ride to Minas Tirith. To satisfy Pippin\'s curiosity, Gandalf explains the background to him in a somewhat factual manner. Jackson turns this into one of the most exciting moments in the film, with aesthetically superb shots of the 13 beacons (yes, I counted them) being lit up in succession, accompanied by beautifully rousing music score, culminating in Theoden\'s heroic utterance of "Rohan will answer". Watching this has to be among the most uplifting moments one can experience in a cinema.\n\nMost poignant is the Faramir\'s suicidal attempt to retake Osgilaith, under the orders of an unloving father. Starting from the soldiers of Gondor filing out of Minas Tirith in what looks almost like a funeral march to the letting loose of the swarm of arrows by the orcs in Osgilaith, every image of this scene is so hauntingly heartrending. It reminds me of John Woo\'s favourite scenes, although here, the music is Pipppin\'s actual singing rather than adapted background music, rendering the tragic mood even more devastating.\n\nDirectly opposite in mood is Rohan\'s charge in the Battle of Pelennor Fields. Even if this mission is, in a way, equally suicidal, the spirit is sky high, radiating dauntless heroism and lust for battle. This scene also reminds me of the legendary battle scene in Spartacus (1960) which is universally recognised as the model in depiction of battle strategies. Rohan\'s charge in Pelennor Field, no the other hand, exemplifies heroism unsurpassed.\n\nAlthough ROTK is first and foremost the King\'s story, we should not forget, in the overall scheme of things, the ring bearers (no typo here because Frodo did acknowledge Sam as a fellow ring bearer in the end of the book). Elijah Wood and Sean Astin (particularly Astin) have played their roles to perfection. Towards the end of the quest, when Frodo\'s strength was almost fully spent, to hear Sam say "I cannot carry it (the ring) for you, Mr. Frodo, but I can carry you" and not be moved, one will have to be a hopelessly and irreversibly hardened cynic. The background music, incidentally, is "Into the west".\n\nIt is certainly a good sign that the general audience worldwide has reacted favourably to the long aftermath following the destruction of the ring, indicated that their capacity to appreciate has not been impaired by the proliferation of Hollywood style slam-bang endings. Viggo Mortensen\'s line to the Hobbits "My friends, you bow to no one" is delivered with sincerity and conviction. The final scene at the Grey Havens is graceful, touching, stylish. However, there is one shot that I must mention: Galadriel\'s final enigmatic, alluring, half-smiling glance at Frodo before she disappears into the ship. Cate Blanchett is among the most versatile actresses around today and in LOTR, she is Galadriel incarnate.', u'0.18462', u"\nThousands of comments have been made on this outstanding production and there is little left to write that has not already been written or said. Again, not surprisingly at last night's 'Oscars', the third film in the trilogy took most of the awards. Like others I could give glowing comments about content, acting, production, direction, visual effects etc. but will instead, convey what I consider to be equally important;  that is the realistic and accurate portrayal of a classic masterpiece of literature from one of the world's most imaginative authors. I have tried and failed three times to completely read the book and I enjoy reading, but feel that I could now do so and have a better understanding of the story - only because I know that Peter Jackson set out to retain accuracy of the story. Sometimes our own imagination lacks the ability to see exactly what the author intended and if a film can help that, then it only adds to the experience. By timely coincidence as I write this my computer screen saver has put up a picture of a mountain valley in New Zealand - it must know what is in my mind. That beautiful country was perhaps the ideal setting for the film with its mystical landscape punctuated with mountain valleys, rivers, forests and open spaces. It cannot be far from what may have been in Tolkien's own  mind.\n\nI would perhaps add one comment about content. Although there was much reliance on computer visualisation it was well-balanced by emotional acting like the characters Gollum and Gandalf. Although Gollum was a villain, I actually was made to feel sorry for him at the end. Too many potentially good films are spoilt by substituting acting for over indulgence in special effects. This is an art that the producers and directors of this film had exactly right.\n\nI hope that the success of this trilogy will herald a new era in film-making of classical stories. Our literature has a wealth of candidates, and even ones that have been tried could be re-visited now that such experiences as Lord of the Rings have proved financially viable and immensely popular.\n\n", u'0.313182', u'Just as Peter Jackson felt that LOTR had to be made as one large, three-part, cinematic piece, I decided to write my IMDb review of all three movies as a single, multi-part essay. Click on my screen-name and hit "Chronological" to view my reviews of the Fellowship and Two Towers. I make no guarantees about the quality and consistence of my review, but I do guarantee that these three films offer very high and very consistent quality from beginning to end. The acting, cinematography, art, and direction simply can not be beat.\n\nWhich of the three movies is my favorite varies with my mood \x96 and the same holds true for Tolkien\'s books. When I am immersed in the story, ROTK is my favorite. When I simply want to have fun with the whole experience, I love Fellowship. And when I want something intense, evocative and thoughtful, I go for the Two Towers.\n\nFrodo, Sam and Golem are on their way to Mount Doom and their bodies, nerves, and relationships have borne the greatest burden on middle earth. The rest of the fellowship is rallying to the defense of Minas Tirith, and preparing for even more deadly battles to come.\n\nThe heroism and romance are incredibly moving - when was the last time you saw an entire audience leaving a theater after a fantasy movie rubbing their eyes? The sets are breathtaking - even moreso than in the previous two films.\n\nThe casting and acting are superb.\n\nThe film delivers at every level and is the jewel in the trilogy\'s well-earned crown.\n\nReturn of the King offers a resolution of all of the major story arcs in LOTR. As with the classic Tolkien trilogy, however, you may be able to predict some of what will occur, but never all of it and you\'ll never guess how you will get there. The same fatalistic and paradoxically unpredictable feeling of Tolkien\'s grand plots is present throughout ROTK especially. The major theme in ROTK, however, is the varied ways and means of heroism \x96 both intentional and unintended, and Tolkien\'s examination of sacrifice and heroism is as inspiring as it is subtle. Amazingly, it all comes through in the films.\n\nEven more than the previous two films, Jackson and his writers took liberties with the story-line. Like the others, however, this serves the film better than simple adaptation from one medium to another. By reordering some of the chronology and adding scenes and plot devices which are consistent with Tolkien\'s world and characterizations, the film-makers actually do a better job of preserving the concepts and themes of the story than they could have with a pure adaptation. The lengthy epilogue in Tolkien\'s book is greatly reduced, reordered, and somewhat changed in order to work in the film. Some parts actually appear very early in ROTK. And some aspects of Tolkien\'s epilogue are disclosed in the Two Towers, though not directly depicted. But all of the really important components of the epilogue are, at least strongly implied if not well illustrated in ROTK.', u'0.477959', u"The Lord of the Rings: The Return of the King is, hands down, among the most spectacular and magnificent films of all time.\n\nA short run-down of the plot: After the battle of Helm's Deep and Saruman's imprisonment in his tower Orthanc, Aragorn, Legolas, Gimli and Gandalf re-group with Merry and Pippin in Isengard. There they learn that the army of Sauron is planning a full-scale attack on the largest city of men - Minas Tirith in Gondor. Gandalf and Pippin ride to Minas Tirith to warn Denethor, the steward of Gondor, of the threat from Mordor. Defenses are built up as the army of Sauron marches across the Pelennor Fields towards Minas Tirith. A distress call is sent to Rohan, still recovering from Helm's Deep. Rohan manage to muster a large army, and set out for Minas Tirith, but the battle has already begun. In the meantime, we continue with Sam and Frodo on their quest to destroy the One Ring.\n\nA major achievement of this epic film is the character development. Gollum becomes more cunning and sneaky than ever, and manages to turn Frodo against Sam, who is desperately trying his best to get his old Frodo back. Merry and Pippin are no longer just a source of comic relief, both of them prove themselves worthy as they are split up for the final battle. We learn about the true bravery and potential of hobbits as Merry helps cut down the Witch King. Eowyn also proves herself in the film, as she defies her uncle and sets out to Pelennor fields with the other Rohirrim, and eventually destroys the Witch King, and makes a very feminist remark while doing so. We learn to loathe Denethor because of his hatred of his last remaining son, Faramir, who really hasn't done anything wrong. The peak of our hatred for Denethor is reached in the scene where he tells Faramir that he would have preferred it if he had died instead of Boromir, his brother. And then, right after that, Denethor sends Faramir into certain suicide, and Faramir immediately accepts the mission he is appointed to, in a final attempt to please his father. And of course, Aragorn learns to accept his fate as the true king of men.\n\nIn fact, the character development is so powerful that we actually participate in the character's feelings. We FEEL Frodo's exhaustion and agony as he literally drags himself across Mordor. We feel Sam's pain as Frodo is turned against him. And, just briefly, we participate in Gollum's triumph as he finally gets the One Ring. We are actually happy for Gollum and just for a brief moment, Frodo becomes the bad guy as he tries to take the ring back. All in all, Return of the King contains the most moving, emotional and touching scenes in the entire trilogy, and some of the best acting, especially from Sean Astin (Sam), Elijah Wood (Frodo), Ian McKellen (Gandalf), John Noble (Denethor, he is very successful in adding depth to his character), Miranda Otto (Eowyn), and of course, Andy Serkis (Smeagol, and top-notch at it, just like in The Two Towers).\n\nThe battle of Pelennor fields may be THE most spectacular and epic sequence in film history. Unlike Helm's Deep, Pelennor Fields shows the true cleverness of Sauron's army. Orcs are not the only participants; trolls are heavily used in the battle, as warriors and as beasts of burden. The nazgul are very significant in the battle, and while the Witch King didn't actually lead the battle as he did in the book, the nine ringwraiths and their fell beasts still play a key part and do lots of damage in the battle. We see just how powerful the nazgul really are. And of course, the men from the south and their massive oliphaunts play a significant part. While in Helm's Deep we felt triumphant, in Pelennor fields we only feel the triumph briefly, as the Rohirrim make their charge into the horde of orcs and trolls. The triumph in Pelennor Fields almost immediately dissolves, as the Rohirrim are trampled down by the oliphaunts. The battle is won, but we're not happy, we're grieved for all the destruction, all the losses. It's a totally different feeling than Helm's Deep, and makes this battle all the more superior.\n\nReturn of the King features the most magnificent visuals in the entire trilogy. Whether they are of Minas Tirith, Pelennor Fields and Osgiliath, Mordor and the slopes of Mt. Doom or the climb to Shelob's cave near Minas Morgul, Peter Jackson really shows us the true impact of these landscapes and images.\n\nMany people may complain about the changes in the movie, especially the significant cut of Saruman from the end, but you must realize that if they would have featured the whole part with Saruman the movie would have continued another hour and a half. Don't fret; Peter Jackson said the scenes will all appear in the extended version of the film. The ending is long enough as it is, and the film continues at least another half an hour after the Ring is no more. The hobbits return to the shire, and Sam marries Rosie. Aragorn meets his fate and is crowned king, and is finally reunited with Arwen. And of course, one of the most moving scenes in the movie, in which Frodo gets on the last ship to the Undying lands with Bilbo, Gandalf, and the last of the elves (Galadriel and Elrond to name a few), and must part with his three hobbit friends for good.\n\nAll in all, The Lord of the Rings: The Return of the King is one the most fine-tuned, cinematically perfect films ever made, it's absolutely flawless in every aspect. The Lord of the Rings trilogy as a whole is a spectacular achievement in film making history, and all three movies are together, without a doubt, the greatest epic ever made.", u'0.134267', u'\nIt takes a miracle for me to go the cinema since smoking is banned in cinema chains but Peter Jackson is a miracle worker . How else would he be able to make me forget my filthy and disgusting nicotine addiction ? He made me forget all about cigarettes for three hours with THE TWO TOWERS and I knew that with RETURN OF THE KING he could make me forget all about ciggies for a\nrecord breaking three and a half hours . I booked my ticket for Rothesay winter gardens cinema and sat down to be enthralled\n\n!!!!! SPOILERS !!!!!\n\nI do conclude there are some people in the world who can`t see what the fuss is about with the LORD OF THE RINGS trilogy . My parents seem slightly puzzled that their cynical critical son loves LOTR . It`s simply explained ,\nthese epic movies aren`t a childish fantasy , they`re like David Lean filming a Shakespeare play , but I do take onboard the criticism that the story structure of the movies can be irritating . FELLOWSHIP is very stop-start while the action intercutting in TTT can be annoying but ROTK has probably the best pace and structure of the three . ROTK starts with a sequence showing Smeagol murdering his friend in order to get the ring . This gives some needed backstory to Gollum . It also sets up its stall that it`s not a family film never mind a " childish fantasy " . In fact I predict that many of the children in Rothesay cinema will be having nightmares tonight due to the scenes with that horrible big spider , it made my skin crawl and the woman sitting next to me was gasping out loud as it prepared to cocoon poor Frodo , you should have seen the Q for the toilet after that scene which tells you how convincing the FX are in this movie , nothing appears CGI : Gollum isn`t computer generated he`s a living being and Peter Jackson doesn`t use camera trickery for fight scenes he uses million upon millions of extras . He is David Lean reincarnated . No he is David Lean AND Will Shakespeare reincarnated , look at the way the cast act their parts , it`s like they`re appearing in the greatest play of the bard . Their performances are superlative\n\nThere are some flaws . I did mention the script gives background to Smeagol but the script - Like the other films in the trilogy - is somewhat uneven .\nJohn Noble`s character Denethor seems somewhat underwritten and I wasn`t sure what his motivation was . Also as everyone else has mentioned the false endings are very irritating . When Aragorn is crowned king and the screen faded to black the audience reached for their Jackets and bags then we`re shown another scene lasting several minutes which faded to a blaze of music. Everyone reached for their bags and jackets , then another scene which... It would have been better to have seen Aragorn crowned King and then seen Frodo sailing into the distance but I guess after the screenwriters have irritated us with the abrupt endings of the first two movies it`s somewhat traditional to irritate with the end of the trilogy . These faults I can forgive but there is an unforgivable cop out of having an army of the undead charging to save the race of men from the Orc army at the end . It didn`t ruin the movie for me but it just seems so lazy and contrived which stopped me from thinking it was the best movie in the trilogy , it`s not , FELLOWSHIP is . But still this is a masterpiece of cinema which like cigarettes left me breathless and satisfied and hopefully we`ll see it sweep the Oscar ceremony at last\n\nAs for the Oscars themselves I`m puzzled about a couple of things . Howard Shore`s score is beautiful and haunting but it`s far from original with much of the music in ROTK re-used from FELLOWSHIP ( The Gondor theme ) and TTT (\nThe Celtic music ) while the omissions are even more surprising . No nominations for any of the actors ! I know that all the great performances would cancel each other out but it`s shameful Andy Serkis wasn`t nominated as best supporting actor . Can anyone name a more unlikable baddie than Gollum in recent cinema ? Me neither and no nomination for cinematography !\nI`ve no idea how John Lesnie`s camera was able to keep up with the action and he deserved at least a nomination so maybe we`ll see the third instalment robbed on Oscar night like FELLOWSHIP was . Even if it is that doesn`t stop me and millions of other film fans from recognising the genuis of Peter Jackson . I bow to you Sir   ', u'-0.331793', u"The Lord of the Rings - The Return of the King is by far the most moving, inspirational and epic of the three parts in Peter Jackson's take on Tolkien's fantasy masterpiece. After proving that this trilogy can carry the weight of a truly enormous body of text with The Fellowship of the Ring and The Two Towers, Jackson has shown that nothing is impossible anymore when being brought to film, and that fantasy can be surreal, but grounded to reality.\n\nI saw this film at 8:00 PM, and missed school the following day -- exactly similar to The Two Towers when it was released. After seeing The Return of the King I was speechless. Never before had a film made such an impact on me as this conclusion did, and now with it completed, The Lord of the Rings is truly the best of the best.\n\nJackson has treated this trilogy as one film, following to Tolkien's linear time-line, and not the way the books were written, which makes this a film that flows and never loses track of pacing. The dialogue is emotional, be it the speech between Gandalf and Pippin before the gates of Minas Tirith, or inspirational, such as the rousing deliveries by Theoden and Aragorn. The vast emotion makes this a film for the ages. Following our heroes adventure since film one, we have grown compassion for each and everyone of them. Sam's devotion to Frodo is something that can inspire, and the eu-catastrophe is fully used here once again, because just as it seems that all hope has been lost, it shines through the void and victory is achieved. If one were to fear that the ending would feel like there was no closure, then have none, because The Return of the King has a 20-minute denouement that goes as far as four-years into the future, and the ending on the shores of the Grey Havens brought me to tears.\n\nThe special effects are nothing short of amazing. The blend of miniatures/bigatures and CGI is believable beyond comprehension, and the addition of New Zealand locales adds something beyond some peoples' wildest dreams. The level of detail on Minas Tirith is something no one has ever seen before, the massive armies sunder speakers as war erupts, and we see the Mumakil and the Fell Beasts in full fruition, as hinted in The Two Towers. What could've seem fatal, as cinematic history has shown before, is the introduction of Shelob the spider. The special effects team has created the most memorable spider in film history. She terrifies and drops jaws at the realism of such a beast.\n\nThe tension for the siege on Minas Tirith is so highly anticipated, that the filmmakers have completely satisfied every expectation to how epic it could've been. The scope is just extraordinary. The battle of the Pelennor Fields is so huge in the book, yet it has been fully realized in Jackson's film. The final stand at the Black Gate is so emotional involving, it's hard to think that any action could top what was previously seen, but it is done so with vision beyond imagination.\n\nHoward Shore's music is also some of the most impressive and beautiful orchestration ever done for film. Besting its predecessors, The Return of the King's score is pure genius. From the new theme for Gondor, to the moving Into the West, Shore's composition sweeps and soars. Now that each of the three films' complete recordings have been released, I strongly urge a fan of the music to buy them, because they really are the best of the best.\n\nThe acting even surpasses the first two, having the evolution of each character add to the dramatic effect, be it the loss of a life, or the triumph over evil. Viggo Mortensen as Aragorn is like a Godsend. Sean Astin steals nearly every scene he is in as Sam, making us hope he helps Frodo get rid of the Ring of Power. Once again, Andy Serkis provides a stirring and great performance as Smeagol/Gollum. The full weight of the Ring is realized in this film, and Elijah Wood makes us see his struggle like the Fellowship of the Ring and The Two Towers only hinted upon.\n\nOverall, The Lord of the Rings - The Return of the King is remarkable. The battles are amazing, never making the film drag, and always heightening the tension. From the acting to the sound editing, this film delivers in what it promises, and that is the supreme motion picture of our lifetime, and many more years to come.", u'0.455892', u'\nThe journey comes to an end. For me the final installment ensures that the Lord of the Rings replaces Star Wars as my favourite fantasy movie franchise. In time the film will look dated, but the story and characterisation far surpass that of Star Wars. The Empire Strikes Back is the only one of the Star Wars films that is in the same league as LOR.\n\nAs with Two Towers, the Return of the King doesn\'t recap the story so far, so don\'t even think of seeing this film if you\'re unfamiliar with the story. It starts with a flashback to Smeagol and means Andy Serkis gets to appear on the finished print. Frodo, Sam and Smeagol then continue on their quest, whilst the remaining members of the fellowship are briefly reunited at Isengard before taking different paths to Minas Tirith.\n\nThe action is unrelenting and most people will not notice the running time is over 3 hours. As with the previous films the combination of sets, models and cgi brings middle earth to life.\n\nI suspect quite a few of the performers will be in with a chance of Oscar recognition. Miranda Otto is the stand out performer and is outstanding as Eowyn and surely deserves the Best Supporting Actress honour. I\'m sure that Viggo Mortensen, Ian McKellen, Elijah Wood, Sean Astin, and Orlando Bloom will all have their supporters for acting honours and rightly so, as they all put in fine performances. I\'m not sure whether Andy Serkis is elligable, but I suspect the success of Smeagol/Gollum owes as much to him as the animators. Bernhard Hill should also be in with a shout for recognition for his performance as King Theoden. My guess is that it\'ll miss out on the acting awards with the exception of Miranda Otto. It\'s absolutely certain to take Best Director, Best Picture and a string of technical awards though. My guess is that it will be nominated for about 12 categories and take 8 gongs.\n\nReturn of the King isn\'t flawless however. Saruman was cut entirely from the theatrical release of the film. We therefore missed out on the final face off between Gandalf and Saruman at Isengard. This was certainly filmed and will no doubt be on the extended edition. When the Hobbits return to the Shire it looks remarkably like when they left. No sign that Saruman has arrived back before them and taken over. In the book Merry, Pippin, Sam and Frodo help rally the rest of the Hobbits to retake the Shire, but at some cost to both the hobbits and the environment. Merry, Pippin and Sam become heros to the rest of the hobbits who are largely unaware of Frodo\'s adventure and exploits. I\'m not sure if any of this was shot, but it would be a welcome addition to the extended addition. Personally I would have followed Tolkien and got rid of 7 minutes of Arwen footage and kept Saruman in. Bearing in mind Christopher Lee\'s passion for the trilogy it is also sad to see him removed from the final episode. I\'m quite sure Peter Jackson must have had a few sleepless nights over that decision.\n\nIf Saruman\'s exclusion was the biggest blunder of the film, Gimli\'s consignment to comic interlude was also a bit disappointing. I\'m not against a bit of light hearted relief every so often, especially in such a long film, but it seemed that every time Gimli appeared on screen it was for light entertainment. The "That still only counts as one" line to Legolas was very funny though.\n\nDespite these gripes Peter Jackson can certainly be very proud of the Lord of the Rings. Very few people thought it possible to do justice to the book. He has crafted a film that many people will enjoy for many years.\n', u'0.172521'], u'tt0099685': [u'"As far back as I can remember, I\'ve always wanted to be a gangster." -- Henry Hill, Brooklyn, N.Y. 1955.\n\nGangsters are all around us. Everyone knows it, not everyone wants to accept it. "Goodfellas"--based on true events--explores the lives of gangsters, chronicling the events through the eyes of Henry Hill (Ray Liotta), who gets involved with the Mafia at a young age and continues his "career" throughout the film.\n\nAs he gets older, he marries and has children, but still works for the organized crime family, under mob boss Paulie (Paul Sorvino); and he is friends with Jimmy (Robert De Niro), a calm, steady gangster; and Tommy (Joe Pesci), a wild man with serious mental problems. \n\nEventually Henry\'s life goes down the gutter, leading to drug abuse and paranoia, that leads to other unfortunate incidents that will be ruined if I type any more about them.\n\n"Goodfellas" is one of the best films I have ever seen. It\'s a tour de force of breathtaking images, witty scriptwriting, superb acting and realistic violence.\n\nRobert De Niro gives one of his best performances -- ever -- as Jimmy, even if he\'s not in the film as much as you might be lead to believe from the front cover.\n\nJoe Pesci is in this movie about as much as De Niro, maybe a bit more or less. But when he\'s on screen there\'s no doubting he\'s on screen--he\'s very hard to miss. A short, deranged, loud-mouthed man with something wrong in his head. Someone makes an insult toward him and he shoots them, and then laughs. It\'s quite disturbing. I am a huge fan of Pesci, and I tend to love his characters, but he really makes you feel sick towards his character in "Goodfellas," while at the same time taking a strange liking to him. That just goes to show how good of an actor Pesci is.\n\nRay Liotta is perfect as Henry Hill. I can\'t think of a better actor to play him. He captures a sense of innocence yet at the same time a feeling of violence. I love the scene where he walks over to a man\'s house with a regular expression on his face. "What do you want, f&*^&?" the man asks. Liotta continues walking, takes out a gun, and starts to continually beat the man in the skull with the butt of his gun. As Henry walks back to his car, his face is disturbing and his expression stays with you for a long, long time.\n\nMartin Scorsese is a brilliant director and his work here is fabulous; it\'s been recreated by other directors (namely Paul Thomas Anderson in "Boogie Nights") and there\'s a reason: it\'s great stuff. He totally deserved to receive Best Director in 1990, but of course he didn\'t. (Rumor has it the Academy frowns on Scorsese\'s use of racial slurs in his work. Oh boo hoo, get over it.)\n\nThe movie is based on the true-crime memoirs of the real-life Henry Hill, whose novel with Nicholas Pileggi -- "Wiseguys" -- was adapted into a screenplay by Pileggi and Scorsese. The book itself was fantastic and insightful; the screenplay is even better. The dialogue is incredible.\n\nAnyway, "Goodfellas" has to be one of the best films I\'ve ever seen--a true modern classic that will be remembered for what it is: One of the greatest tales told on screen. It\'s an offer you can\'t refuse!', u'0.156872', u'If there was one word that I could use to describe Martin Scorsese\'s "Goodfellas": it\'d be priceless.\n\nA surreal and deeply fascinating take on life of Henry Hill who was involved in the Mob for three decades and his rise throughout the time span (and Nicholas Pileggi\'s book "Wiseguy").\n\nThere isn\'t a single moment in the movie where it doesn\'t miss a beat, you could only tell by the atmosphere of the time period and it seems so real.\n\nThe performances in this film simply make it even more memorable and how the characters are portrayed here especially by Ray Liotta, Robert De Niro, Joe Pesci (who won an Oscar for Best Supporting Actor), and Paul Sorvino are believable and easy to understand that they were a family, very close and tightly knit to the core. Also, how director Martin Scorsese lets the movie pace itself and keeps the viewer off guard in what happens deserves a lot of credit.', u'0.801235', u"Needs to be seen to be believed; in one word: perfection. Every frame, every voice-over, every song - it all comes together at the exact right moment to create the perfect film experience. This film makes you really understand and feel what makes the American mafia so compelling; in the eyes of a kid, who was unfortunate enough to grow up in a tough neighborhood, those gangsters are rock stars. Live fast, die young - but when you die, it ain't gonna be of a glamorous suicide or drug overdose - the ending will be brutal, ugly and sad. And it may very well be one of your best friends that will blow your brains out.\n\nI'll never get tired of watching Goodfellas; the entertainment value of this film is just amazing. It doesn't happen very often that every person involved in the process of making a film is at the peak of his/her game. And rarely do art and entertainment come together the way they did here. Storytelling with impeccable pacing, this is what it's like when a master composer conducts his masterpiece. All hail the king; the most versatile and talented filmmaker of his generation: Martin Scorsese.\n\nMy vote: 10 out of 10\n\nFavorite films: http://www.IMDb.com/list/mkjOKvqlSBs/\n\nLesser-known Masterpieces: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls070242495/\n\nFavorite Low-Budget and B-Movies: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls054808375/\n\nFavorite TV-Shows reviewed: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls075552387/\n\nIn an ideal world, movies would be made without the aim for a certain rating. This article sums up why this is so important:\n\nwww.the-fanboy-perspective.com/the-importance-of-the-r-rating.html", u'0.547567', u'Amazing is the one and only word to say for this film. I have always thought that Goodfellas was one of the greatest films ever made and set a landmark in the 90\'s or even in movie history. I bought Goodfellas last week and I got to watch the film a couple days ago. I really just couldn\'t lay my eyes off the film and everything about it was just simply worth watching. The acting was excellent, Ray Liotta, Robert DeNiro, Joe Pesci, Lorraine Bracco, and other actors did great and almost all of the characters they portrayed were 100% accurate. The camera-work also was brilliant and Martin Scorsese does a beautiful job by putting excellent camera shots in his films and I give him high credit for that. The soundtrack too is one of the best soundtracks ever made and the song "Layla," put chills down my spine of how great this song fitted the film. Overall, Martin Scorsese made his best film in my opinion and him and Nicholas Pileggi made an excellent and sharp script that made this, the greatest mob film still today.\n\nHedeen\'s Outlook: 10/10!! **** A+', u'0.675537', u'\n"GoodFellas" may be the most important film of the 1990s in the fact that its incredible success led to some of the other great movies of the decade.  Films like "The Silence of the Lambs", "The Crying Game", "Pulp Fiction", "The Usual Suspects", "Fargo", and "L.A. Confidential" would have likely never been made as well as they were without the influence of Scorsese\'s "GoodFellas".  The film is an intense study of a Mafia family over a 30-year stretch.  Ray Liotta plays the half-Irish, half-Sicilian kid from Brooklyn whose only dream is to be a gangster.  Although Liotta\'s story is at the heart of "GoodFellas", it is the supporting cast that is the film\'s calling card.  Robert DeNiro gives one of his greatest performances, Paul Sorvino is quietly effective, and Lorraine Bracco (in an Oscar-nominated role) does the best work of her career.  However, it is Joe Pesci (in his well-deserved Oscar-winning turn) who steals every scene as the one who does the "dirty work".  This is probably the definitive film in a decade that produced many film-noir styled classics.  5 stars out of 5.    ', u'0.644207', u'Scorcese & Pileggi\'s masterpiece on the life of Henry Hill as a Brooklyn NY mob wise-guy. \n\nAs much as the true events of Henry\'s life have more than likely been dramatised and glamourised to a certain extent, the essence of this film IMO is that it is still a brilliantly damning portrayal of the characters and lifestyle of mobsters.\n\nThe sham of the mafiosi is exposed - preaching loyalty, respect & principles - but when it comes down to it they are just two-bit criminals that\'ll stab each other in the back for money or power over others. Each of them has an inflated sense of self-worth and stature that comes with being a "wiseguy", breeding with it paranoia that others are not giving them the respect they deserve.\n\nAn example is De Niro\'s portrayal of Jimmy Conway. His outward persona is that of a calm and reasonable nature. But really he is a paranoid killer who at the drop of a hat would kill even his closest associates for money. I use associates rather than friends, as their relationships are of tolerance rather than kinship. Distrust, hate and jealousy through the forced smiles. \n\nInteresting that given this, certain people envy their life-style and would have loved to have been a wiseguy. I personally couldn\'t think of anything worse that being tied for life with having to keep the likes of Tommy company, but whatever rocks your boat. Some people have actually paid to see The Dukes of Hazzard film, so I shouldn\'t be surprised.', u'0.118414', u"\nThis is the gangster film at its finest. Scorsese is on top form as are Pesci and De Niro. Liotta has never bettered the performance he gives here. The film starts as it means to go on - violent, full of profanity, fast paced and very stylish. The story follows Liotta's character from boy to man as he climbs his way up through the ranks of organised crime. We see all the highs and lows of his life and meet a host of very believable and very undesirable characters along the way. It's a film full of memorable scenes whilst remaining much more than the sum of its individual parts at the same time. This is what all movies should be like. It draws you in and won't let you out of its grasp at any point. When it finishes you feel exhausted and exhilarated at the same time. If ever the word 'masterpiece' was meant to be used, it was for this film.", u'0.128891', u'\n\'Goodfellas\' is a masterpiece, pure and simple. While not my favourite Martin Scorsese movie it is a stunning achievement, and one of his very best movies. The film is stunning technically. The consistently fine acting by the large ensemble cast (both known and unknown), the cinematography, editing, dialogue, brilliant use of music, it\'s all breathtaking. But Scorsese and co-writer Mitch Pileggi never lose lose sight of their main goal - to tell a story. And in that it\'s really hard to beat this movie. As to the actors De Niro is on top form, Ray Liotta is the best he\'s ever been, and this is Joe Pesci\'s definitive performance. Plus you have Lorraine Bracco, Paul Sorvino, Michael Imperioli, and lots of well known faces in small but important roles (Debi Mazar, Samuel L. Jackson, Illeana Douglas, Kevin Corrigan), plus dozens of unfamiliar actors (and non-actors) who are all so good it seems unfair just to single out the "stars". (Also keep an eye out for Vincent Gallo in a few scenes. He has no lines, but looks cool!). \'Goodfellas\' is (to date) Scorsese\'s last Great Movie, and one of the very best films of the 1990s. Absolutely essential viewing for any movie fan, this tremendous film is not to be missed! Highly recommended!', u'0.525013', u'This is one hell of a film about the mobsters, based on a true story and coming from one of the great directors of all time. This is about Henry Hill, the narrator of the story, an Irish simple person who gets involved with the Mafia at a very young age and continues his life through it. There is no major plot in this film, just isolated incidents one of which was the turning point of Hill\'s life. Scorsese, as brilliant as he ever was, shows violence, sex and drugs etc in his own trademark style. And his actors helps him to make this film one of the classics.\n\nRobert DeNiro is not present in much of the film, nor his acting leaves too much impression. The three actors who really did their best job here are Ray Liotta, Joe Pesci and Lorraine Bracco. I hate to say that most youngsters today don\'t know too much about Liotta or how talented he was. I asked my younger brother about him and he said, "The man who did the voice on GTA: Vice City?". This is partly because Liotta did not get too many big roles after that, especially in recent years. But here he is just brilliant as Hill. It\'s Pesci\'s one of the best too. Playing a mad mobster with dark sense of humor wasn\'t his usual type. And Lorraine Bracco becomes the perfect lead female in such type of films.\n\nThe film\'s got smart screenplay and excellent cinematography. And I don\'t know how many times Scorsese will be denied his Academy recognition. I hate to see a lifetime achievement award as his first Oscar. But things are going like that.', u'0.0855029', u'\nGoodfellas makes you feel like you are watching guys that you know or knew.  To this day, I have a friend that still talks like Jimmy Two Times.  He always says things like "Nice Nice" and that was just a background piece in Goodfellas.  But that is the point, all that is background is just as important as the main players and locales.  It all paints us a perfect picture of what mob life must be like.  And with all due kudos to The Godfather, but there is no other film that has ever made mob life look so real and feel so tangible the way Goodfellas does.\n\nTo say that Joe Pesci is the best part of this film would be to discredit the rest of the cast, but at the same time, you have to mention him in some way.  His portrayal of Tommy is haunting.  Here is a man that is so insecure and wants to be the top dog, the made man so bad that he can\'t decipher between what is a joke and what is disrespect towards him.  Of course the scene in question is when he shoots a common boy for telling Paulie to screw himself after Paulie shot him in the leg.  You would think the guy has a right to let off a little steam and vent, but Paulie is always looking for the diss.  He is always looking to find some hidden gesture from someone that is putting him down.  Even at the beginning when he is getting on Henri in the now famous " You\'re a funny guy " scene.  He is kidding with Henri but deep down inside he is angry with him, you can see it and feel it.  Joe Pesci gave the performance of his career and he richly deserved to win best supporting actor that year.\n\nThe story and script by Pileggi is sheer inside brilliance.  You can feel the inside observations that no one can have except for a guy that spent his whole life on the inside.  They ring so true and they get into your blood.  From scenes like the fat guy running around delivering messages to the other mob guys because he doesn\'t like to use the phone to the scene when Henri, Paulie and Tommy have Billy Bats in the trunk but they stop off at Tommy\'s moms house for a late night dinner of pasta and such.  They also have to borrow a sharp knife to finish off the guy in the trunk, but to his mom they have to cut off the hoof of a dear that hit the car.  And the scene where Tommy does kill the young kid for joking with him and then Paulie gets mad at him, not for killing the guy but because he doesn\'t want to dig a hole tonight.  There are so many tiny observations in Goodfellas that give it the authenticity it has.  And it is a film that stays with you for years to come.  I think this is Scorcese\'s best film and although I understand and accept why the academy awarded Dances With Wolves the accolades it did, if this film would have swept the Oscars that year, no one would have been surprised.  It is a landmark film and I think it is one of the best films ever made.  And again, taking no credit away from Coppolla\'s Godfather epics, but this gets inside the mafia on a deeper level.  It goes one step beyond what Coppolla gave us, and for that Goodfellas should be remembered as the best film about gangsters ever made.', u'0.37655', u"One of the best Mafia movies I've ever seen. This and The Godfather are movies I must recommend if you like gangsters, wise guys, etc. This movie is actually based on a true story. The real Henry Hill, who is the main star of this movie, actually said it was at least 90% true. He than said it was probably 98% accurate. This movie expresses a lot of the gangster ways and how they really did things.\n\nSummary: This is pretty much a biography on Henry Hill, who as a kid always wanted to be a gangster, and he actually worked for them. It shows how a young kid grew up helping the mafia and becoming a mobster himself. This is a true story and really shows what being a wise guy is all about.\n\nOverall: Definitely a 10/10 movie. Really makes me want to be a wiseguy.", u'0.813229', u"\nI bought this film on DVD on the strength of two things - one, de Niro's excellent track record, and two, the very high rating on IMDB (in the Top 50). Having watched it, I have to ask what all the fuss is about? This is a very ordinary film which explores at extreme length the intimate details of the lives of the most childish individuals ever committed to celluloid. Whether or not people like these really exist, I found it completely uninteresting. I have no idea why so many people are fascinated by the mafia - maybe it's envy of the power - but they should not hold a fascination for civilised human beings. People who deal out death as a punishment for the slightest reverse in their lives deserve to be ignored or reprimanded, not lauded and celebrated as in this film. For every Henry Hill, there are a thousand or more kept in poverty because of the crime which supports his odious lifestyle. It would be nice to think there was some kind of a moral ending, but even then, we see Henry selling out his colleagues just to keep himself somewhere nearer the feeding trough.\n\nHow anyone can rate this film so highly is beyond me; how so many of you IMDB browsers can and do, just beggars belief!", u'-0.304909', u'\nWatching this good movie, you feel like watching the Sopranos,moving from one casual killing to another, with an italian family meal or two. Scorsese is so clever you\'re not bored any minute : situations are funny, suspense is there, both characters and actors are good. But you cannot go as far as liking the "hero" or feeling anything for him except a mild sympathy. so, all in all I give this movie a 7 mark but do not really understand its ranking, except if some have mistaken it for the godfather...', u'0.2098', u'Typical Scorsese effort: average crime movie script dressed up with great acting and pretentious, way overly stylish camera-work.\n\nI\'m amazed this movie holds anyone\'s attention, let alone earns the "best movie ever!" praise you hear about this one. As I said, I didn\'t think it was bad, it was just wasn\'t that good. I had to force myself to keep watching, trying once again to see what other people see in Scorsese. I get the feeling all the praise and accolades heaped on him are just a big prank being played on me.\n\nAt least the Godfather was an actual good movie, although certainly no masterpiece.\n\nA far, far better movie than this that came out around the same time would be Miller\'s Crossing. It\'s actually entertaining--you don\'t feel like killing yourself after watching it for just a few minutes, which is another thing about Scorsese I don\'t like. His slickness, bleak subject matter, unredeeming violence all combine to create an effect like a low-frequency earthquake hum or day-old shellfish--it\'s nauseating and depressing. I honestly spend the rest of the day depressed and joyless after watching a Scorsese film. You may say that\'s the power of the film maker, but I say that\'s simply the power of the subject matter. Manos: the Hands of Fate is pretty depressing for much the same reason.\n\nArt shouldn\'t always be uplifting (I love Bicycle Thief and the Year of Living Dangerously) but if it\'s going to put such misery on the screen then it should have a good reason for doing it and it should teach me something.\n\nA good example of how hollow the praise for Scorsese and his works rings is the famous Copacabana scene, a two or three minute steadicam shot following two characters from the outside of a nightclub as they wind through the kitchens and so forth and end up at their table. Scorsese\'s fans call this "the best shot ever." As I said, it\'s a long shot of a fellow getting a table. Kubrick did great tracking shots too, but the key to a great tracking shot, like any shot, is that it communicates something significant to us, puts us in the state of mind of the characters, etc. But this was just some people walking to their table. The difference is contextual and often subtle, but it\'s there.', u'0.0323533', u'Goodfellas is the type of movie that has it all. Action, thriller, suspense and even some comedy thrown in makes this epic film the best of it\'s kind. The pace of this film is brilliant. There is no dull scene, no fillers and it leaves you completely entertained from start to finish. Joe Pesci is absolutely amazing and deserved the Oscar no question. You don\'t even have to be a person that likes gangster films to appreciate Goodfellas. If you were one of the people that found The Godfather to be a little slow or boring at times, I highly recommend this film as a substitute "mafia" film. You will definitely get your money\'s worth if you rent this one. Best film of the 90\'s without a doubt.', u'0.464366'], u'tt0172495': [u'"Gladiator" definitely is a classic film as it combines a simple, but moving, story with beautiful scenery, filming, direction and score \x96 it is truly a "complete" movie.\n\nI am mostly compelled with the beautiful script which in a way reminds me of poetry, though it is still everyday language. I love the acting portrayed by the late Oliver Reed and also Richard Harris. Russell Crowe, Djimon Housou and Joaquin Phoenix are also superb and the parts suit them perfectly. There are also a number of less "popular" artists who also deserve a big "bravo". Amongst them I have to mention ex-Mr Universe Ralph Moeller who is mostly used as the comic relief of the movie. In Gladiator we can also the beautiful and popular Maltese TV Star and actress Ruth Frendo, who although has a small part, she is totally brilliant and outstanding.\n\nActually I got to IMDb while I was looking for her name on the internet, in fact on IMDb she has some very stunning photos. I was lucky to meet Ruth Frendo whilst she was filming in another Maltese production. Ruth Frendo is not only a gorgeous and talented actress but she is also amazingly intelligent and very down-to-earth. We will definitely be seeing more of her work in the future... \n\nThe scenery used for "Gladiator" is brilliant \x96 and the opening battle scene is definitely one of my top favorite scenes. The modern camera technique contrasts sharply to the brutality of the gladiators actions and blood shed during the movie; and I love the light contrasts thanks to the lenses which most definitely have been used to create a surreal feel to the entire movie.\n\n"Gladiator" deserves all the awards and great reviews it has received, and for those of you who still haven\'t gone and watched it \x96 I can assure you that it will be well worth your time and money. So go on and rent it now!', u'0.760813', u"\nMost films require that the viewer identifies with the character to truly be engrossed with the film. If you can't feel something for the character, than the audience is lost.\n\nLuckily, in Ridley Scott's case, Russel Crowe is so captivating and convincing as a general loved by his troops and as a slave loved by the people that the movie really works. Possibly one of the greatest actors today, Crowe carries this epic film on his very capable shoulders.\n\nNot to say that he is the only reason this works. The supporting cast, most notably Connie Neilsen, buoy the film to new perspectives.\n\nJacquin Phoenix definitely captures the egotisitcal persona he should display, stealing every scene he's in. Phoenix will surely be put on the map with Gladiator.\n\nBut the real shining star in this film are the incredible action sequences which jolt the viewer right in with the opening sequences, as Maximus' true worth to the Roman Empire is displayed. Scott's camera work within these completed sequences takes a modern twist that really works for the gruesome scenes.\n\nCrowe will now get the respect he deserves for this collosal performance. Gladiator makes the most of its 2 and a half hours, marking a triumphant comeback for the long forgotten epics of the classic days of film. ALL HAIL MAXIMUS!", u'0.526091', u"\nOnce again, Director Ridley Scott proves to be as professional as one can be. The recreation of ancient Rome is splendid, with all its magnificent buildings and atmosphere and he is able to show with all brightness the greatness of the Roman Empire, with its political problems and military discipline, and love and treason, of hate and jealousy, that still have a place in our world today. But the story has a glow of its own, to which all the beautiful scenery (believe me, it's awesome!!!) and great cinematography are just balancing factors. The plot is a rich one, that is as dynamic as it is present. He once again, after Blade Runner, 1492, and others helps us visit the depths of the human soul, which remains the same over all our historical and social experience. Even the fights, are displayed in such a way that all the blood is quite discrete, but still, making us feel like screaming and jumping out of our seats. I would also like to point out the performances of the cast, that is surprisingly good. We have some actors and actresses, who are not Hollywood icons, but are are greatly able to move the audience among screams and tears. All in all, we have guys like Russel Crowe, who are coming out to be part of a new and extremely promising harvest of people who are making each time more fans around the world. Well, you should see for yourself!", u'0.573882', u'\nThis is wonderful storytelling.  The opening Battle Scene simply mesmerizes, showing the brutal nature of combat for Roman conquests.  I went back to see the film again.  The first time I didn\'t hear anything Crowe said before the battle.  I was just too visually caught-up.  The second time I listened very closely and caught the wise yet succinct line from Maximus "what we do in life... echoes in eternity."  Awesome.\n\nA simple man v. an emperor.  I just loved the resilience Maximus showed throughout the movie.  I find in most movies, there is an irritatingly slow process where the character has to "find himself," not so with Gladiator. Maximus does what is needed.\n\nI liked how there were only two or three issues within this film.  One was the afterlife.  Aspects of the afterlife are opened, but not overdone.  Love of family is given sizable focus. I liked the theme of love of country that we see as well, although it may not be justly deserved, it is never questioned.\n\nThe visual effects were amazing.  It actually had me wanting to believe that\'s the way Rome actually looked in all it\'s glory.  The battle of Carthage reenactment was really great.\n\nThe ending is just hypnotic. Intentionally or unintentionally it was simply emotional.  The music is wonderfully beautiful as if Maximus\' family are telling him...you have arrived.\n\nBottom line: magnificent.  Visually and emotionally satisfying.\n', u'0.296585', u'\nGreat Story!  Great Writing!  Great Acting!  Great Directing!  Great Score! This movie has it all.  I especially enjoyed the mood of the film.  Even though it has a lot of action, there is a subtle elegance throughout the picture that gives it great style.  The movie flows effortlessly from scene to scene, while at the same time creating wonderful intensity and nail-biting excitement.\n\nThe acting in the movie more than lives up to expectations.  Russell Crowe is brilliant in his role as Maximus, the "general who became a slave, who became a gladiator, who defied an emperor."  Crowe\'s intense style is perfect for the relentless determination and confidence of Maximus.  Joaquin Phoenix is equally wonderful in his role as Commodus, the corrupt emperor. He plays a great villain because he is able to give Commodus depth by showing certain vulnerable or fragile sides, while at the same time instantly transforming to let the ruthless nature of his volatile character shine.  It also helps that Joaquin has the classic Caesar look that works perfectly with his role.\n\nConnie Nielsen is also very good as Lucilla.  However, perhaps the two finest performances in the movie were given by a couple of acting veterans in supporting roles.  Richard Harris and Oliver Reed were exceptional in what will be remembered as crowning achievements at the end of their careers.  Harris was perfect as Marcus Aurelius, the aging Caesar who reflects upon his life and contemplates how the world will remember him. And Reed, especially, gave my personal favorite performance in the movie as Proximo, the trainer for the gladiators.  The way he spoke about the life of a gladiator, the splendor of Rome, and the "thrill of the Coliseum" really added excitement and anticipation during the viewing of the movie.\n\nGladiator is filled with many memorable moments that one would need to see more than once to fully appreciate.  The excitement felt for me when Rome is first shown in all its wonder and marvel is my favorite scene.  But the whole movie is a rush!  Hans Zimmer provides the absolute perfect score to capture the different moods in the movie.  Ridley Scott sets the perfect tone with his artistic and creative directing.  I would recommend it to anyone who can stomach intensity and enjoy an epic story for the ages.  Next to Braveheart, this movie is the greatest of all-time!\n', u'0.624243', u'\nThe movie is the story of Maximus (Crowe), a general who leads the Roman army to victory over Germania in the beginning of the movie. The dying emperor of Rome, Marcus Aurelius, is watching this battle.\n\nThe emperor\'s son, Commodus, then arrives with his sister Lucilla, and it is discovered that Commodus fully expects to be announced the new emperor of Rome in a few days. Aurelius, however, has other plans--he wants to make Maximus emperor, and requests that of the general, who wants nothing more than to go home to his family.\n\nI went into this movie having just watched Ben-Hur in my film studies class and having watched an episode of Xena only a couple of weeks earlier that featured the story of Marc Anthony and Cleopatra. So you could say I was in the perfect mindset to watch a "sword-and-sandal" movie. I wasn\'t sure what to expect, having somehow avoided all the hype that accompanied this movie. But I was not disappointed.\n\nGladiator features some wonderful cinematography by John Mathieson. The battle scenes are very graphic. (This movie is not for the squeamish, that\'s for sure.) There were some scenes in particular that really struck me, such as when Crowe appears to be floating over the ground very fast.  The use of color and color tones added a great deal to the mood of the movie. Excellent.\n\nThe script was being written and re-written as the filming was going on, yet it doesn\'t show that the actors had no idea how the movie was going to end when they began filming.  The acting is terrific. Russell Crowe is wonderfully cast as Maximus. Many reviewers agree that he is now officially a star. Joaquin Phoenix also proves his mettle as the emotionally troubled Commodus, whose behavior and emotion toward his sister could give anyone the creeps. Connie Nielsen makes you believe that, as Lucilla, she really is torn between natural loyalty to her brother and doing what she knows is right. Oliver Reed, in his last performance, is memorable in his role of Proximo, the former gladiator who is the owner of Maximus and brings him to Rome.  In short, the actors were brilliant in their roles, not over-acting, but giving subtle, strong performances.\n\nThe script itself is very good.  Although some elements are a little hard to believe--the fact that no one recognizes Maximus when he\'s a slave?--this film calls for a willing suspension of disbelief, which one would happily comply with.  (It\'s really no fun to nitpick such a movie.)\n\nIt\'s true that this movie does pretty much follow the Braveheart formula. However, this movie includes some elements, such as the cinematography and the incredibly graphic battle scenes (one reviewer likened it to Saving Private Ryan, "only better"), that are spectacular in itself. Overall, a great movie that I highly recommend.\n', u'0.182992', u"\nI love history, and to me, Gladiator is a masterpiece. It is the most accurate picture of the Roman Empire Hollywood has ever put out.  People declare Spartacus a masterpiece, but Gladiator far outdoes Spartacus in quality.  The costuming, the acting, the screenplay, the scenery, and the fighting styles made me think that I had traveled back to 180 A.D. Russell Crowe is a true Hollywood tough guy, and he is superb in this movie. Joaquin Phoenix is outstanding as a villain, one of the best in movie history.  He played his character as if it were a psychologist's dream case. Connie Nielsen plays one of the strongest female characters that I have ever seen.  The choreographer of the action sequences was brilliant. Ridley Scott did an outstanding job in recreating the Empire, including the multitude of ethnic groups within the Empire and accurately depicting everyday life.  If you're looking for insight into what the Roman Empire was like, this is a perfect depiction.  ", u'0.829415', u'\nThe epic blockbuster returns with the 21st Century\'s answer to Cecil B DeMille, Ridley Scott and his dramatic tale of courage and revenge, GLADIATOR - "the general who became a slave, the slave who became a gladiator, the gladiator who defied an emperor".\n\nOnce a great roman General, and as good as adopted son of Marcus Aurelius Caesar (Harris), Maximus (Crowe) is forced into exile by Commodus (Phoenix), heir to the throne, after the death of Marcus. Saved from death by slavers, he is purchased for use as a gladiator by Proximo (Reed) and ends up in the arena of all arena\'s, the Colloseum, where he proves unbeatable under his guise as "The Spaniard".\n\nAnd with a budget of over $100m, Scott certainly delivers the goods. GLADIATOR transcends the notion of \'blockbuster\' that we have become accustomed to in the age of electronic and special effects wizardry and instead offers a good old fashioned action film along the lines of Spartacus and and Ben Hur. Not only are we drawn into an archetypal story that contains all the classic elements a filmgoer could dream of (love, loss, courage, despair, good triumphing over evil etc etc) - also on offer is a visual feast of cinematic painting after painting - a rich tapestry of images that are breathtaking and ultimately visually satisfying. From the plains of Germania, to the desert stronghold of Zuchobar, and finally to great Rome herself, John Mathiesion, the cinematographer is to be commended highly for his general inventiveness and ability to capture so much on film. The opening  battle scene is superb as a cast of thousands erupt across the screen and provide an indication that we are about to see a film that pays incredible attention to detail throughout its entirety. In every way, Scott has created a world for us that scuttles films of similar epic undertakings (and budgets!) and sends them to their dooms at the bottom of the murky depths of film history where they belong.\n\nThe cast is generally very strong. Crowe proves himself very suitable to the task with a great emotional range and depth of character. His accent ocassionally bugged me (as did the mish mash of accents on offer - but that is I guess a legacy of \'internationally casted films\'), but this aside, he was well and truly up to the task. Phoenix is also excellent as the disturbed Commodus, as is Nielson as Lucilla, the daughter of Marcus who "should have been a son" and finds herself torn between loyalty to her brother and doing what is \'right\'. The old guard thesps of Harris, Reed and Jacobi (Grachus) are uniformly strong as supporting characters, and Spencer Treat Clark (Lucius) does a fine job as the young heir to the throne.\n\nAdd to this great cast excellent editing and post production work, and an intricate soundscape (including a magnificent Hans Zimmer score), and you have a film that, despite its length, was highly palatable and had me in there from beginning to end. A must see.\n\n ', u'0.60597', u"\nI borrowed this movie on DVD, but I wish I had seen it in the theater for it would have been a lot more fun and powerful there. Despite this, Gladiator is one of the most powerful and moving films I've ever seen. The plot goes so smooth together, as well as the acting and the terrific musical score. Director Ridley Scott puts all effort into making this film an epic, and he does just that. I'd have to say that anyone who likes Ridley Scott (I sure do) should see this. It is a lot like Ridley's other movies (Black Hawk Down was also amazing). If you can stand a little bit--well, ok a LOT of blood and gore, then you should see this. Russell Crowe shows an excellent performance like no other. I don't think there's one bad movie that Ridley Scott has made or that Russell Crowe has acted in. The fact that the brutal battles involving innocent slaves in this film actually happened in real life centuries ago makes it even more interesting and powerful. Emperor Commodus is a truely evil and life-like villian who shows a lot of his wits in attempts to get his revenge against Maximus.\n\nRidley Scott went to many different locations to shoot this film to make it real, and he does. The film is set in Rome, and it looks just like it. You feel as if you are there in the crowd, hearing them cheer and cheer to see the death. To some of you, this may sound a little barbaric, and believe me the film is VERY barbaric and brutual, however it teaches a very strong lesson of what happens when an economy turns as violent as Rome was. Ridley Scott goes to many lengths to make this movie real, because even though the characters are fictitious, all of this really did happen. Innocent people had to go through brutual fighting while thousands of people cheered for either their death or the enemy's death. If you were an inexperienced fighter, chances are you would get killed. But the strange thing is that Rome LOVED this. People came from all over to see these fights and to see the blood that was shed, that is why you can't blame the characters in this film for being so forlorn and saddened the whole time. The film itself is very dark. The theme is dark and the ending is dark. From beginning to end there is excessive violence (for those action movie-goers, this is a movie for you). But if the violence is concerning you, don't let it. The special effects make the movie great, but it's the acting and storyline that make it spectacular. HIGHLY RECCOMMENDED for anyone who wants a good time. Definitely makes you think. ***** out of *****.\n\n\n", u'0.149729', u'When you go to the ruins of Rome now, you get really no sense of the scale and the grandeur of what that forum would have been\x85 It\'s hard to get it anywhere except from some of the great epic films of the past like "Quo Vadis," "Ben-Hur," "Demetrius and the Gladiators," "Barabbas," and "The Fall of the Roman Empire." \n\nScott\'s "Gladiator" is build around a mythic character, a man trying to find his way home... It is around someone finding inner strength in a tough time\x85 Maximus is somebody who doesn\'t want to be a soldier\x85 We realize this is a man who is pursuing the ultimate which is transcending death and finding love after death which completely transforms your reaction to the man, a man who is very, very strong but very, very loving\x85 \n\nThe plot, familiar from Anthony Mann\'s " Fall of the Roman Empire," had Crowe as Maximus, the proud well-loved Roman general in the army of Emperor Marcus Aurelius (Richard Harris). Maximus whose motto is \'Strength and Honor\' is like a son to Aurelius, a statement that left Aurelius\' own son, Commodus perturbed...\n\nDisappointed by the news that his father privately decides to name Maximus his successor, and being a young ambitious son lusting for power, he murders his father, and orders a strike against the general... One of the best scenes of the motion picture is where Commodus is told by his father that he is not going to be the emperor\x85 Joaquin Phoenix is easy to hate in a frightening and vile character...\n\nRidley Scott creates a lot of beautiful scenes between the characters\x85 He did some fantastic work in all of those wonderful scenes in the film\x85 But there\'s another moment between the emperor and his daughter Lucilla (the Danish beauty Connie Nielsen) that I loved very much\x85 Harris says, "Let\'s not speak of politics. Let us pretend that you are a loving daughter and I\'m a good father. " They walk for a few seconds and Lucilla says, "This is a pleasant fiction." I felt this short scene so sophisticated\x85 It seemed to me wonderfully insightful, simple in terms of amount of words, but complex in terms of understanding this strange relationship\x85 \n\nOne of the most successful bits of casting was Oliver Reed\x85 He\'s a harsh and rough businessman who makes his living off the death machine and yet, inside, there was some kind of ethical person that would come out at the right moment\x85\n\nRidley Scott\'s epic film does not romanticize a democratic Golden Age of Rome but a decaying, blood thirsty empire on the edge of its fall... Through its beautiful music, through Russell\'s performance and through Ridley\'s soulfulness, "Gladiator" brought a poetic vision in a new and very cinematically richly way that really gave the audience something different, so emotional and so intimate\x85', u'0.263038', u"\nGermania, 150 AD, the setting of Gladiator's opening scene. Far from the blazing sun and dazzlingly beauty of ancient Rome, Ridley Scott shoots the opening sequence in a subdued light. The Roman legions are nonetheless impeccably turned out as they face the comparatively disorganised rabble that inhabits this miserable environment. Caesar's soldiers seem somewhat misplaced here. However, Russell Crowe is at home in this environment of knee-deep mud and merciless snow. He commands the screen with all the virtues of his motto: \x91Strength and Honour.'\n\nThe plot, with its hero-to-zero-to-hero nature, runs through Gladiator's every vein. As General Maximus, Russell Crowe is welcomed by Marcus Aurelius Caesar (Richard Harris) to take the Roman throne as Emperor of a new Republic. All does not run smoothly however as mislead heir to the throne Commodus (Phoenix) takes over Rome with ill-gotten domination, having dispatched his own Father. Maximus is cast out to find his family murdered and his Spanish farm burnt to the ground. Taken in as a slave by Proximo (Reed), Maximus becomes a Gladiator and starts his journey to the Coliseum and revenge against Commodus.\n\nScott's cast is powerful and he is not left wanting as powerful performances are delivered by all. Due to his untimely mid-production death, Oliver Reed is created in some scenes by the grace of computer graphics, which are as convincing as they come; sometimes making it difficult to differentiate between Reed himself and his computerised counterpart.\n\n\nIt is, however, the supporting actors who create many of Gladiator's best dialogue-based scenes. In an accomplished demonstration of her acting ability as Lucilla, Connie Nielsen saves the occasional scene as Joaquim Phoenix shows us that he can \x91do evil', but is less convincing when it comes to the more emotional qualities of his role.\n\nAs a vehicle for the plot, Scott's beautifully created and highly symbolic (there is an image of fire in nearly every shot of the film) dialogue scenes are of a certain merit with digitally created backgrounds that encompass the meticulous nature of the Roman Empire. However, dialogue alone does not an epic movie make, and it is in the film's spectacular action sequences that Gladiator come into its own. Shot on location in Malta, Scott's first arena was built by an army of locals and commanded some 5000 extras (a large majority of whom were of a cardboard variety). All of this pales in comparison as we arrive in a digitally created Rome which makes some scenes in Ben Hur some somewhat small scale. The Coliseum is immense, both inside and out, and the computerised provides the electric atmosphere in which Crowe and his feline companions (four sizeable, and real, Bengal tigers) perform.\n\nThe battle sequences are perfectly choreographed and shot as iconic masks and typically Roman chariots are abundant in their power and imagery. As swords clash and heads roll, Ridley Scott is triumphant in the application of special effects technology and his directorial prowess.\n\nAlways one to embrace technology, Scott's views over Rome's landscape are reminiscent of the beautifully created cityscape of Blade Runner. This is a film that fears so little and boasts so much, even a lady archer being sliced clean in half by a spiked chariot wheel!\n\nAll those involved with Gladiator should be delighted and confident with their creation, for indeed this is a convincing and enthralling display with epic proportions to take the wind from James Cameron's titanic sails.\n", u'0.166457', u'Gladiator! A thrilling tale of a Roman general who must battle against all thinkable odds to avenge the death of his family and restore justice to the empire. The plot is simple, legendary general Maximus Decimus Meridius, after many victorious campaigns and battles wants to return to his peaceful home in Spain, However the kind, fair and dying Emperor Marcus Aurelius wishes to bestow his title on him over his cruel son, Commodus. Commodus is understandably annoyed and kills his father calming the title of Emperor. Maximus is sentenced to death along with the rest of his family back at his home in Spain. Maximus escapes but is unable to save his wife and son. His loss of will to live makes him an east target for slavers and he is soon sold as a gladiator. He fights his way into the coliseum in Rome were he wins over the crowd and uses his celebrity status to defy the Emperor, to whom he swears his vengeance for the death of his family, after many battles and political backstabbing he gets his chance to fight the Emperor in the Arena.\n\nThis is just such an amazing film, it captures every emotion possible in only the way an expert director can achieve, we can go on for whole scenes without the need for speaking, everything is told through the genuine body language and expressions. And when there is conversing we get such emotion and wonderfully powerful quotes \x96 "What we do in life, echoes in eternity" Wow.\n\nThe opening scene is spellbinding, showing the true gore of battle, the fight scenes are marvellously realistic, discarding the popular "pretty" sword fighting for brutal aggressive force. The audience in the arena express every emotion, surprise, anger, and enjoyment. The cast is brilliantly chosen; we can really see Russell Crowe as a gladiator, in Commodus, Joaquin Phoenix gives us a man we can really hate, Connie Nielson shows real emotion and passion in the role of Lucilla. So apart from the spellbinding acting, scarily realistic fight scenes and the amazing script, what else can we look for? The music is just stunning, its exactly what we need brought in at exactly the right time, truly wonderful directing. And then we have the stunning special effects, we can really visualise the greatness that is Rome, the fight scenes really make you believe. Some critics have condemned the lack of historical fact, for instance an emperor would never fight a gladiator, and these comments cannot be denied, its true.\n\nBut I think we can forgive them that one fault for such an amazing movie. Without hesitation I give this movie a truly deserved 10/10!', u'0.276143', u'An intense Roman epic, a la "Ben-Hur" or "Spartacus," it was nice to see something like this made again. It had been since the 1960s that we had seen a 3-hour extravaganza like this.\n\nLike Ben-Hur, this is a story of a successful man who loses everything thanks to an evil man, and then has to fight his way back up to seek revenge on that man and to obtain his freedom back. It\'s a tried-and-true formula. This movie doesn\'t go to excess on the violence as some of the other more recent epic films did, such as "Braveheart" or "The Patriot."\n\nThe acting is excellent, beginning with Russell Crowe, who has established himself as one of the best actors of today. Joaquin Phoenix also put himself "on the map" as an actor with his portrayal of the evil "Commodus." He\'s so annoying you want to slap that sucker, which means he\'s doing a good job acting. Kudos to the rest of the cast, too.\n\nToo bad they don\'t make more of these type of films, as they did in the 1950s and 1960s.', u'0.132205', u'Ridley Scott\'s Gladiator is not a perfect film, I would think that the hardiest of fans, of which I\'m firmly one, know this deep down. Yet just like Commodus in the film is keen to point out that he himself has other virtues that are worthy, so does Gladiator the film. Enough in fact to make it an everlasting favourite of genre fans and worthy of the Academy Award acknowledgements it received.\n\nIn narrative terms the plot and story arc is simplicity supreme, something Scott and Russell Crowe have never shied away from. There has to my knowledge as well, never been a denial of the debt Gladiator owes to Anthony Mann\'s 1964 Epic, The Fall of the Roman Empire. Some folk seem very irritated by this, which is strange because the makers of Gladiator were not standing up bold as brass to proclaim they were unique with their movie, what they did do was reinvigorate a stagnant genre of film for a new generational audience. And it bloody worked, the influence and interest in all things Roman or historically swashbuckling of film that followed post Gladiator\'s success is there for all to see.\n\nWhat we do in life echoes in eternity.\n\nSo no originality in story, then. While some of the CGI is hardly "Grade A" stuff, and there\'s a little over - mugging acting in support ranks as some of the cast struggle to grasp the period setting required, yet the way Gladiator can make the emotionally committed feel - overrides film making irks. Crowe\'s Maximus is the man men want to be and the man women want to be with. As he runs through the gamut of life\'s pains and emotionally fortified trials and tribulations, we are with him every step of the way, urging him towards his day of revenge splattered destiny; with Crowe superb in every pained frame, winning the Academy Award for Best Actor that he should have won for The Insider the previous year.\n\nBacking Crowe up is Joaquin Phoenix giving Commodus preening villainy and Connie Nielsen graceful as Lucilla (pitch Nielsen\'s turn here against that of Diane Kruger\'s in Troy to see the class difference for historical period playing). Oliver Reed, leaving the mortal coil but leaving behind a spicy two fold performance as Proximo the Gladiator task master. Olly superb in both body and CGI soul. Richard Harris tugging the heart strings, Derek Jacobi classy, David Hemmings also, while Djimon Hounso gives Juba - Maximus right hand man and confidante - a level of character gravitas that\'s inspiring.\n\nI didn\'t know man could build such things.\n\nDialogue is literate and poetic, resplendent with iconic speeches. Action is never far away, but never at the expense of wrought human characterisations. The flaming arrows and blood letting of the Germania conflict kicks things off with pulse raising clarity, and Scott and his team never sag from this standard. The gladiator arena fights are edge of the seat inducing, the recreation for the Battle of Carthage a stunning piece of action sequence construction. And then the finale, the culmination of two men\'s destinies, no soft soaping from Scott and Crowe, it lands in the heart with a resounding thunderclap. A great swords and sandals movie that tipped its helmet to past masters whilst simultaneously bringing the genre alive again. Bravo Maximus Decimus Meridius. 10/10', u'0.220521', u'There is so little to find wanting in this film and not wanting to merely repeat its many deserved praises, all I can do is question a couple of historical points.\n\nIt is unlikely that a Roman general would be sold into slavery and forced to fight in the arena. Exiled, yes. Killed maybe. Asked to commit suicide to retain his property, most likely. \n\nIt is unlikely that he would return to find his family crucified, of all things. Romans were very specific about who got crucified and why. Romans usually avoided it, no matter how cruel the tyrant(?) was.\n\nRoman legionnaires would NEVER have a tattoo unless they were barbarians who got one BEFORE joining a legion. Marking or mutilating the human body was expressedly anti- Roman. No statue or depiction exists of a main-period Roman showing a body-marking. The bonding feature the writer was attempting was an inappropriate borrowing from the 20th century German SS.\n\nGreat entertaining movie nonetheless.', u'-0.421431'], u'tt0253474': [u'I can remember when this film came out I was adamantly against seeing it. I had my preconceived notions that it would be some other heroic Jewish Holocaust film where good triumphs over evil and in between we would see some brutal atrocities committed by the Germans to add some flavour.\n\nHow wrong I was.\n\nThis is one of the best films I have ever seen and what it did to me I cannot describe in words. But in a nutshell, it moved me, made me cry, made me feel like I was in the Polish ghetto in 1940, and ultimately made me kiss the sidewalks as I walked out of the theater and thanked God that I live in the free society that I do. \n\nRoman Polanski has proved that he is a great director with films like Chinatown and Rosemary\'s Baby but this is his crowning achievement. I think the fact that this won the awards that it did at this years Oscars goes a long way to validate the brilliance of this film. I believe that the Oscar\'s are rigged for the most part and films and actresses and such win based more on their pedigree or business associations than anything else, so when it won best actor and director and adapted screenplay this year, it tells you that it should have won best picture but the Weinsteins seem to have a spell over everyone, hence a charlatan like Chicago takes top prize. Sorry for the digression here but when you compare a "film" like Chicago to a masterpiece like The Pianist, there really is one clear cut winner. They handed out the statue to the wrong movie.\n\nThe Pianist follows up and coming piano player Wlad Spielzman from his days as a local hero to a prisoner of war to his time in the ghettos, surviving only by the kindness of strangers. I think many people have touched on this before but what makes this film so amazing and well crafted is because Spielzman is a man that we can all relate to. He is not a hero, he is not a rebel and he is not a kamikaze type that wants and lusts after revenge. He is a simple man that is doing everything in his power to stay alive. He is a desperate man and fears for his life and wants to stay as low as he can. Only from the succor he receives from others does he manage to live and breathe and eat and hide. And this is how I related to him. If put in his position, how would I react? Exactly the way he did. This is a man that had everything taken from him. His livelihood, his family, his freedom and almost his life. There is no time for heroics here. Adrien Brody embodies the spirit of Spielzman and his win at this years Oscars was one of the happiest moments I have had watching the festivities. His speech was even better but that is a topic for another time.\n\nUltimately it is his gift of music that perhaps saves his life and the final scene that he has with the German soldier is one of the most emotionally galvanizing scenes I\'ve witnessed. With very little dialogue, it is in the eyes, the face, the mouth and the sounds that chime throughout their tiny space that tell you all you need to know. I think it is this scene that won Brody his Oscar. This is one of the all time great performances.\n\nI think Polanski spoke from the heart here. He has taken a palette of memories and amalgamated them with what he has read and given us one of the best films of our generation and any other. I think The Pianist will go down as one of the best films of this century and when all is said and done, Chicago will be forgotten the way Ordinary People was forgotten and when people talk about the film The Pianist, they will do so with reverence and respect. This is a cinematic masterpiece.\n\n10 out of 10', u'0.323171', u'\nThe Pianist is an account of the true life experience of a Polish pianist during WW2, in the context of the deportation of the Jewish community to the Ghetto of Warsaw, a setting virtually absent from all films inspired on WW2.\n\n\nPolanski (himself a child survivor of the Krakow and Warsaw ghettos) could have described in more detail the legendary, desperate fighting of the Jewish resistance in the ghetto of Warsaw, or the horrific mass extermination in concentration camps. Instead, the film gains in intensity by displaying the war from the pianist\'s own point of view (through windows, half-opened doors, holes in the walls - with big emphasis on the use of "point of view shooting" by the cameraman). One cannot help feeling disturbed by the most enthralling scenes of the film, as the isolated pianist tries to ensure his survival in the ghetto and ruins of Warsaw, hiding and fleeing, moving from one bombed house to the next, gradually becoming a shadow of his former self, hungry and afraid (merit largely attributed to the extraordinary performance by Adrien Brody, who visibly loses half of his weight throughout the film).\n\nDoes the pianist raise any sympathy from the audience? Not immediately, in my view. The pianist is more than often a drifting character, almost a witness of other people\'s and his own horrors. He seems to float and drift along the film like a lost feather, with people quickly appearing and disappearing from his life, some helping generously, others taking advantage of his quiet despair, always maintaining an almost blank, dispassionate demeanour. One may even wonder why we should care in the least about this character. But we do care. That is, I believe, the secret to this film\'s poetry.\n\nIn one of the strongest scenes, towards the end, a German officer forces the pianist to play for his life, in an episode that suddenly brings a much lighter, beautifully poetic shade to the film (this German officer will be probably compared to Schindler, although his philanthropy does not quite share the same basis).\n\nThis is also a wonderful tribute to Polish artists, through Chopin\'s music, with the concert at the very end of the film and the opening performance by the pianist at the local radio station (with the sound of bomb explosions in the background) forming an harmonious link between the beginning and end of the film (following Polanski\'s usual story-frame).\n\nOverall, The Pianist is one of the most detailed and shocking accounts of the treatment of the Jews by the Nazis, with the atmosphere in Warsaw well captured and believable. Quite possibly, The Pianist will remain in the history of film-making as the most touching and realistic portraits of the holocaust ever made.\n\nPolanski\'s film deserves a strong presence in the 2003 Oscar nominations, including a nomination for Adrien Brody\'s amazing performance, Polanski\'s sublime direction, best adapted screenplay and, obviously, best picture. This could be, at last, Polanski\'s long awaited, triumphal comeback to the high and mighty Hollywood.\n', u'0.264434', u'Man, I can not get this film out of my head. It is so rare that a movie can affect me the way "The Pianst" did. The last movie that did that was "Casino". I was really tired when I was watching the movie. It was almost midnight, so I was thinking that I\'ll start watching and I\'ll finish it in the morning. Did I? No, indeed I did not stop watching. I couldn\'t stop it. I just wanted to see what would happen next. I cried during "Schindler\'s List", I sobbed in this film. Everything that happens in this film is so sad. Adrien Brody does a remarkable job of acting in this film. I would very highly recommend this film. Especially if you are a history buff. Please, I think this film should be in the top 10 best films of all time.\n\nI looked on the message boards you know and some other user comments that didn\'t enjoy this film much, they criticized Adrien Brody\'s performance and say that he was boring and only showed emotions that are easy to act. Please, you have got to be kidding me. This man portrayed the total feeling of hopelessness, being alone, being hated. I one time had an audition in high school like this to see if I could improvise, and the way I imagined this feeling is like in dodgeball where you have no one else on your team and you\'re the only one left standing, yet on the other team there is 20 big men that are just waiting to wack that ball at you. Adrien couldn\'t have done a better job, I was so frightened for him and cried for him during the whole film while he was one the run.\n\nRoman Polanski as the director, he himself escaped the terrors of being a prisoner in The Holocaust, yet he lost his mother and other family members. Yes, I\'m sure this film must have been hard to re create for him, but he was probably the only director that could have done this movie as brilliantly as he did. He created this story and made it so effective, I called up my mom and told her that I loved her so much because we take so many things for granted. True, this isn\'t the 1930\'s or 40\'s, and we are in America. But it\'s still frightening to think that human beings are capable of that much hate and being so brutal to another human. \n\nWorld War II is one of the most frightening wars in history, if you read more about The Holocaust, you get more into it and you should. If you are not interested, then watch this film. It\'s a must see, otherwise how else will we learn from our mistakes? The Pianist is a beautiful and extremely dark tale about a man and the struggle to survive. The ending is so powerful and moving to know that sometimes one man can make a difference in a crowd of so many and I\'m not talking about Adrien Brody\'s character. You\'ll see what I mean.\n\n10/10', u'-0.101533', u'\nThe Pianist is the true story of Wladyslaw Szpilman, at the time Poland\'s most acclaimed pianist whose life is transformed during the Nazi occupation of Warsaw beginning in 1939.  The film spans several years and maps his many personal trials in addition to providing the perspectives of his family, rebel factions and sympathizers.\n\nBrilliantly directed by Roman Polanski and starring an amazing Adrien Brody, The Pianist is bound to garner comparisons to Schindler\'s List, for obvious reasons.  However similar the subject matter, the approach is different. While Schindler\'s List was filmed in a beautiful, crisp black and white that offered many incredible images, The Pianist was filmed with almost muted color.  Schindler\'s List featured what has been argued as a complicated hero.  Oskar Schindler did save many Jews, but not without battling his own materialistic demons first.  The Pianist\'s Szpilman is a sympathetic character throughout.  His plight was desperate, and the demons he fought were over his own guilt in surviving a fight that eventually turns into a primal will to live.\n\nPolanski does not spare the viewer any grief with his film.  The horrific scenes between the Nazis and the Warsaw Jews were more terrifying and horrible than any horror/suspense movie I have seen in some time, possibly ever.  The humiliation and complete loss is wrenching.  In several scenes, Jews are lined up in the middle of the night and subjected to either torture or death.  In one case, a woman asks of a Nazi officer, "What will happen to us?" and is promptly shot point blank in the head.  The camera does not flinch or subdue any of these atrocities.\n\nA mention must be made of Brody\'s performance.  Having only previously seen Brody in two other films, Spike Lee\'s "Summer of Sam" and Terrence Malick\'s "The Thin Red Line" (a part that was supposed to be his launch into stardom before his part was unfortunately cut drastically) I knew his potential was great.  After his Oscar win, I viewed this movie with more criticism than I\nnormally would have and he certainly did not disappoint.  He transcended my expectations.  His physical transformation was amazing, but more importantly, he conveyed the sorrow of this man shockingly well - in both verbal and non-verbal contexts.  It will be very interesting to see what kind of opportunities this role will afford him, and the kinds of roles he will accept.\n\nSomething worth mentioning is the affect this movie had on the audience with whom I viewed this film.  Normally, when a film ends, the regular hardcore filmsters like myself will stay and watch the credits in their entirety. The rest of the audience stands up and leaves, usually to the chagrin of the remaining enthusiasts.  This was one of the few times I have seen a film at a theater where not one person stood to leave during the final credits. It wasn\'t until the house lights came up at the end did people begin to disperse.  Personally, I hightailed it out of the theater the second the lights came on because not only was my face a mess from crying during the film (Tammy Faye comes to mind) but I had this overwhelming need for an emotional release, so when I reached my car I sat and wept for about five minutes.  It has been years since I have watched a film that upset me to that extent. Conversely, while discussing this film with my brother, (someone who loves movies as much and has similar tastes as I do) he mentioned that while he thought the movie was excellent, he wasn\'t as profoundly emotionally effected as I was.  After thinking about this for a couple of days, I realized the difference: The music.  As a classical music enthusiast and erstwhile musician, the thought of not being able to enjoy, much less play the music you love is a tragic one.  Then the emotional outpouring that comes when you return to it - there aren\'t words to describe how intense that is.  Not having the same appreciation for this musical genre, one will be able to sympathize with the physical and emotional tribulations, but perhaps not in the musical sense.\n\nThe Pianist was truly an astonishing film.  I was riveted from start to finish and so emotionally affected that I couldn\'t even consider writing a review until a week later.  Having said that, I am filing this away with my list of movies which include Schindlers List and Philadelphia, as films that I love but cannot rewatch for a long time after due to their intensely emotional content.\n\n--Shelly', u'0.0309481', u"\nlast weekend, I saw Roman Polanski's The Pianist and what a movie. The grizzly reality feeling of the movie shell-shocked me in the first place but later on I recognized the pure feeling of the film: The horror what war does with innocent people truly is. the main story isn't about a war hero, but about people who don't want to die in this madness. Every aspect of the film is really done for an reason and in his place and you don't feel this as entertainment.\n\nthe music is what hit me the most. the classical tunes had such an enormous impact on me and portrayed the feelings of the main role of the pianist. The fact that there are no hero's in a war movie is for me more than a welcome benefit. No war in the world should have hero's who can't die. Everybody in this movie can die, every second of it. The scary moments are real scary.\n\n\nbottom line: ten times as realistic as the also brilliant Schindler's list. and twenty times better than Saving private Ryan for the lack of hero's and there is no patriotism at all.\n\nten out of ten, best movie of 2002 ", u'0.157624', u'I remember seeing "Schindler\'s list" about ten years ago, and I remember how weird I felt for being almost completely unmoved by it. Although it showed the horrors of holocaust quite realistically, somehow it all seemed just a bit too fake and exaggerated. Characters were a bit off (I still can\'t decide who was more over the top, Schindler or Goeth), fake sentimentalism was all over the place, . While it was a work of art and an important reminder of true events that shouldn\'t be forgotten, on emotional level it just somehow failed to deliver.\n\nEnter "The Pianist". With no Spielberg around to put his trademark sappy material, we finally have a movie that shows the true horror and tragedy of Jewish people in World War II. The story is told through the eyes of one man - Wladislaw Szpielman, Jewish pianist who works in a radio station in Warsaw during the German occupation of Poland. Together with him we watch his world getting torn apart, witness his family being taken away, his existence being reduced to bare essentials. Brody gives a subtle yet spectacular performance, his best work yet. And never once are we reminded that we are watching a movie. Everything is shown from Szpielman\'s point of view, and it is all very gritty and realistic. While Spielberg\'s rendition of German atrocities always had a slightly staged feel to augment their dramatic purpose, here they are so true to life there impact is much greater - you watch and are being reminded in horror that this things actually happened.\n\nWhile being very hard to watch sometimes, this is a movie that "Schindler\'s List" was supposed to be. This movie doesn\'t judge anybody, or tries to explain anything - it shows historical events as a reflection of one man\'s fate, making a powerful testimony that stays with you long after the beautiful last shot and the end credits are over.', u'-0.0178147', u"\nThe Pianist is an incredible film in many aspects. Roman Polanski's account of the survival of the pianist, Wladyslaw Szpilman, is a document about how one man can overcome the worst possible situations in a world gone completely mad around him.\n\nThe only fault one can find with the adaptation of Mr. Szpilman's story by playwright Ronald Harwood, is the fact that we never get to know the real Wladyslaw Szpilman, the man, as some of the comments made to this forum also have indicated.\n\nThere is a very interesting point raised by the the pianist's father who upon reading something in the paper, comments about how the Americans have forgotten them. Well, not only the Americans, but the rest of the world would not raise a finger to do anything for the people that were being imprisoned and made to live in the confined area of Warsaw. The exterminating camps will come later. \n\nWhat is amazing in the film, is the frankness in which director Polanski portrays the duplicity of some Jews in the ghetto. The fact that Jews were used to control other Jews is mind boggling, but it was a fact, and it's treated here matter of factly. Had this been made by an American director, this aspect would have never surfaced at all. Yet, Mr. Polanski and Mr. Harewood show us that all was not as noble and dignified as some other films have treated this ugly side of war.  \n\nWladyslaw Szpilman, as played by Adrien Brody, is puzzling sometimes, in that we never get to know what's in his mind. He's a man intent in not dying, but he's not a fighter. He accepts the kindness extended to him. He never offers to do anything other than keep on hiding, which is a human instinct. He will never fight side by side with the real heroes of the ghetto uprising. His role is simply to witness the battle from his vantage point in one of the safe houses across the street from where the action takes place.\n\nAdrien Brody is an interesting actor to watch. As the pianist of the story he exudes intelligence. There is a scene where Szpilman, in one of the safe houses he is taken, discovers an upright piano. One can see the music in his head and he can't contain himself in moving his fingers outside the closed instrument playing the glorious music from which he can only imagine what it will sound in his mind.\n\nThe supporting cast is excellent. Frank Findlay, a magnificent English actor is the father of the pianist and Maureen Lipman, another veteran of the stage, plays the mother with refined dignity.\n\nIn watching this film one can only shudder at the thought of another conflict that is currently brewing in front of our eyes. We wonder if the leaders of the different factions could be made to sit through a showing of The Pianist to make them realize that war is hell. \n\n\n  ", u'0.0854295', u"\nPolanski has depicted the gory details of the holocaust without much restraint. But, the most wonderful aspect of the film is that the director has not lost focus of his story and instead of focusing too much on the holocaust horror he has weaved the true-life narrative of survival around devillish happenings.\n\nEvery single act of escapade Szpilman goes through is depicted like a drop of water on a barren desert. However, the Oasis in the driest desert comes in the end and it is here that Polanski captures the essence of human emotion. I had this very strong urge of jumping into the theater screen and magically adopting a character in the movie and doing something about the helplesness portrayed so convincingly.\n\nOverall, Polanski has given a stunning visual narrative of the cold war. Survival indeed is a privilege though it is taken for granted today. Performances by Brody, Kretschmann deserve applause.\n\nPawel Edelman's camera work is moving and he has brilliantly captured the dark sadness in the visual canvas in an effective way. The lighting is amazing. Pre-dawn shooting schedule could have helped a great deal.\n\nHerv\xe9 de Luze's editing work has ensured that the narrative does not slip away from focus. Most notable is the scene where the human bodies are lit on fire and the camera raises to show the smoke. The darkness of the smoke is enhanced and is used effectively to fade the scene out.\n\nThe scene where Brody's fingers move as he rests his hands on the bars of the tram handle only goes to show the brilliance of Polanski as a film-maker.\n\nGreat film that will be in the running for this year's Oscars. I will give it a 9 Out of 10.", u'0.617357', u"\nThis wrenching yet ultimately uplifting fact-based drama won Adrien Brody his Academy Award and finally made him a star (along with his gracious yet heartfelt Oscar speech and That Kiss :-) -- rightly so, since title character Wladyslaw Szpilman is a challenging role in so many ways!  It's not easy to command the screen when your character often has to be passive, deliberately trying not to draw attention to himself to keep from falling into Nazi hands in war-torn Poland, but Brody pulls it off.  It helps that Brody is absolutely stellar at acting with his eyes, plus his body language speaks volumes; these fill in the emotional cracks, especially in scenes where Szpilman, alone and in hiding, can't speak or even move around much for fear of giving himself away.  (Brody is the youngest actor to date to win the Best Actor Oscar, BTW, having gotten his little gold man only a month before his 30th birthday.) While there's no lack of haunting scenes, thanks to the deservedly Oscar-winning work of director Roman Polanski and screenwriter Ronald Harwood, the one that always gets me is the one where Szpilman discovers the apartment serving as his latest `safe house' has a piano. We see Szpilman sit at the piano; we see him in a head-and-shoulders shot, shoulders moving; we hear piano music and gasp as we fear his love and longing for music is about to give him away -- and then we see his hands moving in the air just above the keyboard and realize, with both relief and a pang of regret, that the music is only in Szpilman's head.  Terrific as the other 2002 Best Actor nominees were, now that I've seen THE PIANIST (as well as the fascinating making-of documentary on the DVD's flip side, showing what a physically and emotionally grueling experience Brody's job often was), I'd be really p***ed off if anybody but Adrien Brody had won! (Besides, the rest of the 2002 Best Actor nominees already won Oscars -- this time it was dark horse Brody's turn! :-)\n\n", u'0.183121', u"\nThe Pianist tells the story of such a man in war time Poland, played by Adrien Brody, who from start to finish sees his life literally getting worse and worse and worse- starts off with new rules from the Nazis, then the stars on the arms, followed by the Warsaw ghetto, and while there he could play in the restaurant, that too soon ended, as the trains arrived and took his family and anyone else he knew away.  During this he narrowly escapes, and from then on the film in a sense almost becomes not exactly a holocaust film, but more like a cross of that as the element and the basic structure of something a-la in Cast Away: this includes stretches of scenes showing Brody simply trying to keep out of view of the Germans, either in a small apartment provided by helpful Polish Christians/Jewish resistance, or as a scavenger in the abandoned sections of the ghetto, all while feeling the old rhythm of the piano in his head and fingertips.  \n\nThis is the kind of magnificent filmmaking that shows a director not only being as true to the story given to him (that of Painist Szpilman, based on his autobiography) but to his past as well- Roman Polanksi faced similar conditions as a boy in the early 40's, and has found the best line to show, never crossed or mis-stepped, in representing the characters and the period.  There aren't any hints of tightened suspense, no clues as to where the film could veer to, it just is.  The big difference to be seen between a film like this and Schindler's List is not just in the people and situations (Schindler's List was a film about two people, Schindler and Goeth, in the foreground while the Pianist is a total first person tale), yet also in the filmmaking qualities being here surely European.  And while the accents on the Polish-Jewish actors sounds a bit too British, that is quite forgivable considering the scope of the project (thank heavens he didn't put in English speaking Germans).\n\nIn conclusion, Brody turns in a superb performance, and this indeed is in with Polanski's best, a deserved of 2002's Palme D'Or.  Great music too.  A+", u'0.215733', u'\'The Pianist\' is definitively an inspiring epic that celebrates the tenacity and fortitude of the human spirit... It is a remarkable tale of human survival sensitively brought to life by Polanski... The film carries us to the horrible reign of terror, where condemned people wearing the emblem of humiliation and oppression, are deprived of their rights, their human values and dignity, before being shipped to \'labor camps.\' \n\nIn Polanski\'s movie all the conventional elements of the drama are at peaks of excellence: \n\nFamily union: When a father has to bargain to buy a single piece of caramel and divide it in six pieces to share it with each member of his family...\n\nStarvation: When a ghetto inhabitant assaults a helpless woman for a bowl of soup... \n\nConfusion: When a distraught woman wails on a platform because she smothered the cries of her baby with her hand...\n\nLove: When a young musician turns to his younger sister and utters with sad regret, "I wish I knew you better." \n\nSurvival: When one man observes the war through his hide-outs around the city...\n\nCruelty: When an old man in a wheelchair is thrown off the balcony by the Nazis because he failed to stand upon their entrance...\n\nFear: When a talented musician sits down at the old piano, and pretends to play his music, keeping his fingers flowing with control above the vertical ivories...\n\nDiscrimination: When bored Nazi guards entertain themselves by forcing grotesquely mismatched old and sick couples to dance to a Jewish street band by the ghetto gate...\n\nHorror: When condemned Jewish workers lie face-down in the street, while one SS guard walks down the line, shooting without remorse each one in the back of the head... \n\nIsolation: When a fugitive emerges from his harrowing hiding place and walks through a field of deserted ruins exactly like the last man alive on Polish soil..\n\nAdrien Brody gives an absolutely moving performance (based on descriptive facial expressions) as the Polish composer and pianist who stays alive as a Jew, and remains true to his ideals... Brody captures the character\'s desperation, his anger and grief, his willpower and perseverance, his passion and love of music... Polanski gives us the chance to better know his shock and disbelief, his ordeal and tragedy, his hope for fairness and humanity...\n\nNominated for seven Academy Awards, this captivating drama went on to win three Oscars, including Best Director, Best Actor, and Best Adapted Screenplay... Once Brody took the stage to accept his Oscar, he was so overwhelmed with happiness, that he swept the gorgeous Academy Award-winning Halle Berry off her feet with a long, steamy kiss...', u'0.0660641', u'Spoilers Ahead:\n\nThis film equals or surpasses Schindler\'s List. It is on the micro or individual level versus the macro or group level of Schindler\'s. Brody gives such a powerful, quiet, understated performance and Polanski shows why if he applied his considerable gift towards less supernatural films we would all be quite richer. Polanski\'s signature in this movie is showing little snippets of individual cruelty; he let\'s us project outwards the large sum of all these acts of evil. Slapping the father for walking on the sidewalk, making the Jews dance with each other, and my favorite taking the grandfather, in the wheelchair, lifting him over the balcony and dropping him several stories. I prefer this movie to Schindler\'s because the cruelty in taken down to the everyday, human level. Schindler\'s was so large, the liquidation of the Warsaw Ghetto, you get lost in the sheer numbers of the horror you are witnessing. Here, you get to look out it close up. Polanski does not paint all of his countrymen as saints, notice how one slob abandons Brody, using his name to collect money for his care, pocketing it and not caring what happens to Szpilman. \n\nBrody really draws us in with his quiet, slight unimposing manner; we run with him as he is forced to flee from one piece of safety to another. Who will forget him making the racket and the big Nazi cow bellowing Jew! Jew! as he runs away. The horrors of working for these insects how any trip or mistake is punished with severe beatings. Book burning, corpulent, stupid, Bratwurst eating fatheads yelling and beating. I love the scene where they have to line up, the tall pig picks people out at random, makes them lay down and shoots them. Watch for the poor last guy when the swine runs out of bullets and calmly reloads while the man waits to die. What Polanski did is blend inextricably the beautiful classical music Brody plays with the images of human cruelty. Spielberg did the same with a scene in Schindler\'s where while they are machine gunning hiding stragglers at night, in the buildings, the machine gun reports blend with some Nazi playing Bach; the idiot listening calls it Mozart demonstrating his ethics equal his musical knowledge. \n\nThe point of the synthesis is a lesson in misanthropy. When you hear that beautiful music, remember what the humans who generated it are also capable of doing to their fellow man. We see this replicated at the end where the Nazi who catches Brody, demands the starving, shaking, emaciated man play the piano for him like a performing monkey. Some people felt sorry when his mercenary kindness to Brody doesn\'t bear fruit later when the Russians capture him; I was not one of those people. He got just what he deserved. The movie is so gently done, except for a few scenes of the Warshaw Uprising, there really are not big macro moments. Yet, that is its beauty; we experience is all through Brody\'s eyes. This harmless, tiny man who plays the piano with great beauty; this juxtaposition, the beauty with the ugliness is why Roman Polanski is such a great director. It is not a movie, it is an experience you will take with you the rest of your days. They still haven\'t released it on Blu Ray for some stupid reason; how they could have missed this great film for conversion to HD escapes me. A Great Film From A Brilliant Man.\n\n"A man selling stolen goods and the other paying with counterfeit money; that is your picture of human nature." Mark Twain', u'-0.147486', u'Film makers have to step carefully when dealing with issues like the Nazi extermination program. There have been equally brutal programs of ethnic cleansing in places like Southeast Asia and Rwanda, in which hundreds of millions died, but nothing like this in Europe since the Middle Ages. The victims here were not only Jews but Gypsies, the mentally ill, homosexuals, socialists, communists, and political undesirables. The Nazis eliminated not six million but some uncountable number between 12 and 15 million. An event like that can\'t be treated lightly and milked for easy tears, or the event itself is cheapened.\n\nFortunately, the films that have explored the subject have been uniformly well done, as Roman Polanski\'s "The Pianist" is well done. Polanski himself suffered in much the same way as the protagonist, Vlad Szpilman (Adrien Brody). Polanski has a habit of embellishing his tales but there\'s no question that in this instance he knows what he\'s talking about.\n\nSzpilman is a well-known young pianist on Warsaw radio but the German occupation puts the station out of business. He and his family are herded into the Warsaw ghetto where they are subject to constant abuse and occasional murder. Szpilman barely escapes being sent to Treblinka with the rest of his family. And for the last half of the film, with the help of some friends who endanger themselves by lending him aid, he scuttles rat-like from one hiding place to another, each more dismal and perilous than the last. He suffers jaundice, his hair and beard grow long, his clothes turn to tatters, his food disappears, he\'s half frozen, and he seems to shrink.\n\nHe\'s reduced to living in the attic of a nearly demolished apartment building and is ecstatic to discover a gallon can of pickles overlooked on the top shelf of a kitchen cabinet. The can falls out of his hands while he tries to open it and rolls across the floor to come to rest at the boots of a German officer, Captain Hosenfeld (Thomas Kretschmann). The only Germans we\'ve seen so far have been brutes -- ridiculing the insane, executing Jews who ask simple questions, or simply shooting people chosen at random.\n\nWe expect nothing from Hosenfeld except a quick shooting. But Hosenfeld is a human being and, having discovered that Szpilman "is" -- or rather "was" -- a pianist, he asks him to play a piano left in one of the flats. Szpliman has been unable to play for years and when he seats himself we worry that he might not bring it off and, indeed, his first chords are tentative, uncertain. Then his playing becomes automated, the old habits return, and he dashes off a dramatic and exquisitely executed piece of Chopin. Hosenfeld has been leaning back, enjoying the music, then leaves Szpilman quietly to his attic. He returns a few times later, before the Germans withdraw before the Russians, and unceremoniously hands him a few packages of food and, finally, his overcoat. The matter-of-fact compassion shown by Hosenfeld, and Szpilman\'s desperate need for contact with another human, are very moving.\n\nWhen the Russian troops finally arrive, Szpilman stumbles out of his hovel to greet them, but seeing his overcoat the Russians open fire on him. Szpilman finally convinces them that he is a Pole, not a German, and one of the befuddled soldiers asks, "Then why the ****ing coat?" Szpilman is trembling with fear but manages to gulp, "I was cold." An epilogue tells us that Szpilman went on with his career and Hosenfeld wound up in a Soviet prison camp where he died in 1952, despite Szpilman\'s attempt to find him. Under the end credits, a smiling Szpilman plays a lively, sparkling composition by Chopin.\n\nIt\'s a remarkable film. Polanski is no longer the Wunderkind but a mature film maker. Nothing is excessive. We need only as much as we need to know to understand Szpilman\'s travails -- one tragedy following another. There are no sentimental speeches at the final parting of Szpilman and his family. Szpilman himself never breaks down. He simply does what needs to be done to survive. And Adrien Brody captures what Szpilman must have been like. (From some angles he resembles the young Arthur Rubenstein.) Kretschmann gets Hosenfeld down pat as well. In their scenes together we sense their respective positions -- one man with nothing left to lose, the other with nothing left to gain. The story, and the historical facts it\'s based on, raise many questions about human nature, of course. I\'m not at all sure that if we could find the answers to those questions we would like what we found.\n\nOne of the better films of the year.', u'-0.108055', u'The Pianist is not a movie made for entertainment. It\'s either more or less than that and only the viewer can decide. You have to ask yourself sometimes if the main reason films about the holocaust are so popular is because of shock appeal. If a movie depicts these terrifying events well, does that make it a good movie? The Pianist has many scenes showing the Nazi\'s brutality that feel almost voyeuristic. Some scenes show Adrien Brody\'s character looking out the window at these terrible things and you feel as if you\'re looking out a window, too.\n\nI hope shock appeal isn\'t the reason this film is liked so much, though. Because this is an amazing story about the will to survive. Music is the character\'s passion,and throughout his struggles he can only fantasize about playing piano. There is one scene near the end in which he finally gets the opportunity. What follows is a touching moment that transitions from rusty skills warming up to an intense and passionate display of artistic talent. In this moment there is no longer a war going on, no longer the agony of hunger or memories of lost loved ones, just beautiful music. His reputation as a musician and his desire to go on to play again is essentially what keeps him alive. And who says art isn\'t important?\n\nAdrien Brody is very good in this. Well obviously he is, he just won the Best Actor Oscar. I think he can be compared to Tom Hanks in Cast Away- even in scenes of silence there\'s just something about the actor\'s movements and expressions that keeps you engaged.\n\nThere\'s another scene near the end that defines the entire performance, the entire movie for me: After all the trouble Brody went through trying to survive, he is almost killed by the people who would save him. He is wearing a coat that a German officer had given him earlier, and when Russian troops spotted Brody they thought he was German. They shot at him and almost killed him, but they finally found out he was Polish. An officer asks him, "Why the f-cking coat?" Brody, with his hands still in the air, a terrified look on his face, almost crying, replies: "I\'m cold." That did it for me.\n\nThe Pianist is certainly a shocking and even depressing film, but like most movies that aspire to provoke thoughts and emotions, the audience takes out of it what they bring in to it. Surely Szpiellman wasn\'t just a lucky bastard who survived in times of inhumane brutality. It was through the kindness and compassion of others who helped him, if only because they found themselves inexplicably moved by his music.\n\nMy rating: 10/10', u'0.124059', u'The problem with making a holocaust film is that it\'s a subject that\'s been done before . Everyone from Steven Spielberg to ( Amazingly and somewhat hypocritically I say ) Vanessa Redgrave has made a film centering around the Nazi attempt to exterminate European Jewry . I have a problem with this because it denigrates history to an extent . If people have to make a film featuring man\'s inhumanity to man as a reminder what does this say for the rest of humanity ? Can\'t the rest of humanity watch a documentary like SHOA or the Genocide episode of THE WORLD AT WAR ( My first introduction to The Holocaust ) or read a book of the accounts of Nazi mass murder ? Would it be too cynical to point out how well rewarded Holocaust movies are ? It\'s also noticeable how formulaic these type of movies are . We start at the beginning of the war and follow the protagonist\'s survival until they\'re liberated by the allies in 1945 \n\nThat said THE PIANIST does have merits of its own even though it doesn\'t really bring much to the table originality wise . Actually the food allegory is appropriate though slightly confusing . Early in the film we see the terrible conditions in the Warsaw ghetto as its Jewish population are effectively walled up from the rest of the city and left to die . Cut to a restaurant interior as Wladyslaw Szpilman entertains the guests by playing the piano as the patrons grow fat by gorging themselves on food , fine wine and cigarettes as their fellow Jews fall dead in the streets . With a little editing you might find yourself thinking this part was directed by David Irving instead of Roman Polanski ! One thing THE PIANIST does do well is include the apocryphal tale of the Jews discussing their fate at the hands of the Nazis with no one wanting to believe for a second that the lone voice stating the Nazis are deporting them to be murdered may in fact be talking the truth no matter how unbelievable and horrific the truth may be \n\nLike I AM LEGEND the story suffers from the fact that the protagonist has no one to speak to for large portions of the narrative but there\'s so much incident on screen such as the Warsaw uprising it\'s not a major problem . You could make the point that Szpliman then becomes a spectator to Polish history rather than a character in his own right and you\'d possibly be correct but these scenes are very well choreographed and filmed that it shouldn\'t be made as a criticism . There\'s also the introduction of " A good German " that we\'ve seen before in films such as MUTTER\'S COURAGE but Hosenfeld is so well drawn and acted by Thomas Kretschmann it\'s very difficult not to feel sorry for his fate \n\nIn truth THE PIANIST follows the usual structure of holocaust movies but unlike some movies of this particular genre certainly deserved much of the critical acclaim hoisted upon it . As can be expected it\'s not a feel good movie but is definitely a well made and acted story of human suffering and endurance', u'-0.250067'], u'tt0064116': [u"\nI can't quite find the words to even come close to describing the pure brilliance of this movie. When this movie was made, the western genre was dominated by the big hollywood studios. The western was taken by these studios and transformed into an opportunity to portray classic superheroes like John Wayne and Burt Lancaster in their fight against all sorts of smalltime crooks and outlaws in smalltime stories and smalltime towns. It was a genuine effort to portray 'Americanism', the American Way, along with a romanticised view of the west as 'Frontier country' where good always triumphed over bad and where the life was hard but honest. It was the American Way.\n\nAnd then came this film. The title, 'Once Upon A Time In The West' must have seemed to mean nothing more than 'just another western' to the unexpecting viewers at the time. Oh boy were they wrong. With this movie, Sergio Leone singlehandedly redefined the western genre and no American western would ever match the brilliant spirit in which it was made. While the story is basically the same as in any other western, it is the WAY in which it is presented that so clearly distances this western from others. Whereas other westerns are simply stories that are designed to entertain, this movie is an emotional masterpiece that will move your heart. Sergio Leone takes the ordinary western and replaces words with looks, and conversations with feelings and emotions. With his brutal but honest portrayal of the sheer hardness of life and death in those times he thoroughly destroys the old romantic idea of the west as a\n'generally-hunky-dory-kind-of-scene with the occasional bad guy and indian' and replaces it with an eerie, dark, hot and dry place where life is cheap and only the strongest will survive.\n\nI cannot adequately convey in words the way in which Sergio Leone deepens and defines the characters by pure means of visual persuasion. It starts with the three gunman in the beginning of the movie, waiting for some reason at a train station for someone or something that obviously is going to be on the next train. No explanation, no conversation; not a word is said. Even the stationmaster is ushered into captivity without a single audible threat. Then comes the waiting... Any other director would have skipped directly to the moment of arrival, but Sergio Leone takes minutes of boredom and translates it into a visual feast, deepening the characters that are portrayed and making them more human, more real to the viewer, while at the same time encompassing us with a deep dark sense of foreboding. This way in which the story is not just augmented but in times completely replaced by the sheer visual drama, is perfected by the absolute fantastic music, directed by Ennio Morricone. Who needs words and explanations when the combined forces of cinematic mastery and heart-tearing music are not just able to carry the story, but pick it up and push it up to such heights of excellence that it has no equal in it's genre?\n\nAnother great feat that adds to the power of this movie is the minimalistic way of portrayal of the characters as real, emotional people. Not a single word is said that isn't required for the understanding of the story, yet the characters feel more true than those in movies where whole conversations are added merely to explain their motives. Instead of words, the camera focuses on the characters...so that you can simply read the emotion off their faces. Often no explanation is given other than than a mere facial expression. No superheroes or supercriminals, just real, desire-laden, traumatised, obsessed people that act upon motives inherently understood by the viewer.\n\nAll in all this is without a single doubt in my mind the greatest western of all times, and even though Sergio Leone has made many more mindblowing, heart-shattering westerns like this one, like 'A Fistful of Dynamite', 'The Good The Bad and The Ugly', and 'For a Few Dollars More', none could equal 'Once Upon A Time In The West' in sheer magnitude of perfection. Western has never been the same since....\n\nI only wish I'd have been there in 1969 when the movie was new and see it, for the first time with fresh innocent eyes and an unexpecting mind..just like 2001: A Space Odyssey (also of 1969, a year of legends).\n\nA tip for those who have never seen this movie: Bribe, beg, borrow, or steal yourself into possession of a Videobeam and Hifi-audio equipment if you can't find a cinema that is showing this movie. Turn the audio up WAY HIGH (never mind the neighbors) and prepare never to be the same again.........\n\nI (obviously) gave this movie a 10 because no matter how hard I try I can't find anything less than perfect about it.", u'0.032112', u"There's two things that stand out to me always about this movie, and \r indeed about all of Sergio Leone's movies. One is his understanding of \r pacing events, and the other is using his actors/actresses to actually \r act.\r \r\nWhen you see Claudia Cardinale riding up to the ranch, all you see is \r her face, but you can tell instantly what she is looking at and \r everything she's feeling. You know Henry Fonda's the bad guy, but when \r he smiles faintly at the young boy, you feel there's something more to \r him, a personality and human qualities, even if he is evil.\r \r\nThe final shoot-out itself is a masterpiece. The two protagonists say \r nothing, but as they face off the music lets you know the moment as \r come. As they stand ready the scene that's been hinted at throughout \r the movie plays out like a dream, revealing what the whole story was \r about. Then, without warning, they draw and fire. Just as in real life, \r it's over before you notice it.\r \r\nWhat today's movies lack is how quickly they cater to MTV video \r inspired nonstop action and endless clich\xe9s. The bad and good guy duke \r it it out, the violence is so extreme that no human could actually \r survive it, and always just when you think the bad guy is dead he gets \r back up for one last shot. How much I wish today's film makers would \r learn Leone's lesson about TIMING, and let suspense build rather than \r force it in.\r \r\nThe music score, which had certain pieces and sections for various \r moods and to signify the main characters, is one of my favorites. Even \r if Clint Eastwood wasn't in it, Charles Bronson fills the role of the \r mysterious stranger and adds his own elements to the character.\r \r\nHow I wish they still made movies like this", u'0.0625607', u'\nSergio goes Hollywood for this big-name, big-budget Spaghetti Western. Fonda, Bronson, Robards and Cardinale queue up and take Leone\'s choreographic direction in an epic tale of blood and revenge.\n\nFrank is a bad guy who has killed a lot of people.  He now works for a\nrailroad entrepreneur whose ruthless sterile tracks are spreading ever westward.  The time has come for the real Americans to confront both the railroad and Frank.\n\nLeone sat down with film intellectuals Bernardo Bertolucci and Dario Argento and watched dozens of Hollywood westerns.  From this saturation-viewing emerged a 300-page treatment which was eventually distilled into the script, penned by Leone and Sergio Donati.  There are conscious echoes of "Shane" and "High Noon" in the meticulously-plotted screenplay.  Ennio Morricone apparently sat in on the planning stage and had composed the score in toto before shooting began, the reverese of the usual process of fitting music to existing footage.  The result is a tight matching of soundtrack and visuals.  Robards, Bronson and Cardinale each have musical \'signatures\' which play whenever their characters are onscreen. Bronson\'s is an eerily-wailing harmonica, Robards has the plonking banjo and Cardinale the lush strings.  So intricately was everything structured that the themes were available to be played on set, so that the actors could co-ordinate every nuance of gesture to fit with the score.\n\nThe film is a grandiose lament to the death of the Wild West.  Decay is everywhere to be seen.  Streets, bars, buildings and people all have a beat-up, grungy look.  When Cheyenne (Robards) pauses beside a rough-hewn wooden post, there is little difference in texture between his face and the post.  Morton the cripple is killing the romantic West of open spaces with his "snail trail" of railroad tracks, leaving the fine adventurous men (Cheyenne and Harmonica) nowhere to go.\n\nThere can be few opening scenes with the visual and aural brilliance of this one.  Three bad guys stake out Flagstone\'s railroad depot in a High Noon pastiche.  Jack Elam (who was actually in "High Noon") leads the villains.  The only spoken words throughout this long (but totally gripping) scene are uttered by the old station clerk.  Haunting rhythms raise the tension to an unbearable pitch ... the squeaking windmill, the chattering tickertape, the creaking bench.  This wonderful crescendo climaxes with the appearance of Bronson, a sequence as stylised and choreographed as a Shinto ceremony, all the more effective for the absence of spontaneity.\n\nEqual to and counterbalancing this scene is the very next one, the introduction of Frank.  This time it is "Shane" that gets the treatment as the McBain boy spots five men in yellow duster topcoats.  A growing sense of unease on the McBain homestead is beautifully conveyed (was the stopping of a cicada chirp ever so effective?)  A cinematic multiple orgasm ensues, with the musical theme crashing in as the boy sees the devastation, and the camera swoops round to reveal the baddie to be none other than Henry Fonda as Morricone\'s trademark solitary tubular bell peals out.\n\nCheyenne\'s entrance is also a piece of impressive cinema.  Inside Lionel Stander\'s strange labyrinthine tavern, quite unlike any saloon ever filmed before, the violence which hovers around Cheyenne like a dustcloud is heard but not seen, preparing us for his appearance in person.  The sliding of the lamp towards Bronson works brilliantly, the film\'s two good men sharing the light of humour, the symbolic forging of a meaningful friendship.\n\nBy a slow accretion, the plot reveals itself.  The leviathan of the railroad must be stopped, and there must be a reckoning with Frank. Gradually the fates of the main characters converge, and swim into sharp focus for the shoot-out.\n\nIt is not the story, excellent though that is, which lingers in the memory, but rather a hundred individual flashes of brilliance:  Claudia Cardinale (are those eyes for real?) filmed on the bed, viewed vertically downward, through a lace canopy: Cheyenne\'s surprise method of concealing himself on the train: Morton ("when you\'re not on that train, you\'re like a\nturtle out of its shell") imprisoned by the armature that helps him walk: the \'heartbeat\' of the train\'s engine during the cardgame: the tension of the ambush preparations against Frank: the eruption of guitar music as Bronson enters the frame: Bronson\'s stillness and self-possession, the emblem of his righteousness: Fonda\'s eyes flickering rapidly in his motionless head, denoting the waning of his self-confidence: the amazing super-close-ups of Bronson: and the weird brick arch, the only man-made intrusion into the entire terrain, and the focus of human depravity.\n', u'0.0714277', u'\nThank god that I\'m a Bronson fan. This was my first Leone movie, and dumb kid that I was, I actually watched it thinking I was in for a  typical Bronson "vehicle"! Looking back I\'m thankful, because if it wasn\'t for his involvement, I would never have discovered the beauty and majesty that is Once Upon a Time in the West.\n\nI absolutely love this movie. It\'s probably my all time favourite, certainly one of the few that I can watch OVER and OVER again without losing interest. I love the way Leone creates intrigue and mystery around what is a relatively thin plot. He can make even the smallest twist of fate seem like an epic turn of events, with that amazing sense of revelation that he generates out of old hackneyed situations (something Argento has since picked up). Leone proves in this film that he could seemingly take anyone, even peripheral characters, and give them screen charisma without using dialogue as a crutch.\n\nOUATITW features the most tense two man stand-offs ever, with some serious deja-vu in the direction of his "Dollars" trilogy. In fact, it does feel like those three movies were warm ups,  practice sessions in the build up to OUATITW. Here though, he perfected everything; despite the long running time, it\'s all focused, and without a single irrelevant scene. For me, the two hours plus just fly by, I wish it would never end. Leone was without question at his artistic peak when he made this, that\'s not to say that he went downhill from then on, but I honestly don\'t think he ever did another film where everything came together so perfectly.\n\nThe cast is flawless. Fonda eclipsed every good guy he ever did in one fell swoop, truly chilling. Robards is a great comic character, the lovable rogue with an edge. And Cardinale is more than just (incredible) window dressing; she switches between passionate, angry, delicate and sentimental at all the right moments.\n\nWhich leaves the hero; I\'m a huge Eastwood fan, but I honestly don\'t believe he could have done the role justice. His "man with no name" was a cool, sly character with hidden complexities. Eastwood always does these layered personalities, with some kind of mental baggage. Bronson, on the other hand, mostly does himself; simple, uncomplicated figures with only one state of mind, that\'s why he\'s put in so many revenge flicks. Plus, he looks like he\'s been seriously wronged at some point in his life, Eastwood doesn\'t have that quality. Bronson is the genuine hard-as-nails article. You can readily imagine that, had he been born decades earlier and been put in the same situation, he would resolve the problem in much the same way as his character in the movie (sometimes I affectionately refer to this movie as Deathwish part 0- could Harmonica be the great granddaddy of Paul Kersey?).\n\nOf course the other great contribution is the music. I still think that the main theme is one of the most breathtaking pieces of music I have ever heard. It affects me deeply whenever I hear it, regardless of the mood I\'m in. Maybe I should listen to more opera or something, I don\'t know, but that\'s the way I feel. And the individual character themes are just so well integrated into the film, it\'s unbelievable. Leone replaces words with music, and it conveys so much more in return. Bronson just plays that melancholy tune on the harmonica instead of answering people back, it consistently cracks me up.\n\nHigh Noon, Naked Spur, Shane, The Searchers, etc. are all classics of the genre, but I really  don\'t think it\'s possible to compare those "traditional" westerns with OUATITW. For me, it exists on a plane of it\'s own, it\'s the kind of film experience that you let wash over you, a waking dream. I recommend this movie to anyone, if you\'re on the right wavelength you\'ll be greatly rewarded.', u'0.370784', u'This one only gets better with each viewing. Leone\'s masterful storytelling and Morricone\'s crazy, beautiful, epic soundtrack; desperate, haunted faces which look like the barren landscapes the story is set in and a plot that unfolds with impeccable pacing to culminate in THE ultimate western finale.\n\nAs in Leone\'s previous films, music isn\'t just used to add to the atmosphere but is essential to the story, or perhaps even more: Morricone\'s main musical theme plays the actual role of a (or rather: the) protagonist in the film. \n\nAnyone who thought that the so called "Spaghetti westerns" were nothing but cheap, violent B-movies had to reconsider after seeing this film. It doesn\'t get any better than this: this is movie history; iconic, classic, unforgettable, epic. For this film, I just run out of superlatives.\n\nMy vote: 10 out of 10\n\nFavorite films: http://www.IMDb.com/list/mkjOKvqlSBs/\n\nLesser-known Masterpieces: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls070242495/\n\nFavorite Low-Budget and B-movies: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls054808375/\n\nFavorite TV-Shows reviewed: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls075552387/', u'0.505517', u'I thought I knew westerns, I\'d seen John Wayne, Jimmy Stewart, Glen Ford, Audie Murphy, Richard Widmark, Alan Ladd, all of them save the day many times. I was wrong, I was 14 yrs old when I went to the local movie house to see this movie in 1969. My grandmother took me, she had always been a huge fan of Henry Fonda\'s, and even though she didn\'t care for western\'s, she dragged me to this one. I\'ll never forget how engrossed I was from beginning to end. And this one movie was the basis for all my future wish\'s to have been born a cowboy. Everything about this movie impressed me one way or the other.\n\nSimply put, this movie is the most visually stimulating and engrossing movie I have ever watched. \n\nI have seen plenty of great movies in my in my fifty years of life, but this one, is in my opinion more than a movie, it\'s a piece of history unfolding in front of your eyes with no censorship or BS added for flavor. True, the movie has been chopped up some for TV and other forms of presentation, but when I was in that theater in 1969, the movie was, to use a semi modern term "AWESOME".\n\nNo one, not even if you dislike westerns, should pass on this one.', u'0.0901626', u'"Once upon a Time in the West" is Leone\'s masterpiece and certainly one of the best Westerns of all time... It is beautifully shot, perfectly cast, ambitious, erotic, humorous and wonderfully scored by Leone\'s regular composer Ennio Morricone, whose haunting melodies are just as important as the widely separated dialog occurring on the action..\n\nThe film opens with an extreme close-ups of Jack Elam, Woody Strode and Lionel Stander waiting at a station for Charles Bronson... Henry Fonda has sent them to kill him...\n\nThe railroad wants a property for its water well belonging to the newly widowed Claudia Cardinale, a fancy lady from New Orleans who just arrived in Flagstone and learns about the tragedy... We would come to understand, much later, Claudia Cardinale\'s role as the bearer of water, life, and continuity to the civilization of the New West...\n\nFonda, a despicable hired gun, kills her husband and orders, without a twinge of guilt, the slaughter of the entire family, innocents women and children...\n\nHenry Fonda, in a chilling performance, plays the cold-blooded murderer, the most vicious villain in Westerns history to ever ride the big country... the blue ice-eyed child killer, gunning down a 9-year old boy...\n\nBronson as \'The Man\' is like Clint Eastwood \'The Man With No Name,\' with only one thing in common: they are the most ruthless heroes in Westerns history sharing the same character in their quality \'not\' to say much in their need of emotions, in their fast draw, in their disinterest in women, in their air of mystery and in their macabre sense of humor...\n\nTheir differences are also very clear: \'The Man With No Name\' has no past whatsoever, and \'The Man\' is motivated by revenge to settle an old personal score... \n\nClaudia Cardinale plays Jill, the well-proportioned, husky-voiced beauty, the lady, the businesswoman, the maker of coffee involved with Fonda in an incredible perverse erotic sequence...\n\nThe blood, the violence, the humor, the several gunfights and the final showdown have been constants in Leone\'s Westerns since "A Fistful of Dollars"...\n\nThe highlights of his movie are so many: Leone\'s overwhelming shot when he raises his camera over the Flagstone train station office revealing the sprawling town; when he replaces a shot of a smoking gun with a shot of a smoking train; when he uses close-ups instead of dialog to reveal what a character is thinking; and the striking use of his extreme close-up in the final shootout... Leone builds up tension by slowly circling his two characters, focusing with his camera on their eyes, hands and guns while the level of the music is raised to evoke the action... \n\nLeone\'s film is a brave epic Western, extremely violent, immensely powerful... It\'s above all fable and fantasy, as the desire for revenge is childish and fruitless... It is the essence of a great filmmaker...', u'0.28486', u"\nI have recently commented on Leone's GBU and was intending on reviewing AFOD and FAFDM as well as this one - OUATITW, but after reading a number of the comments about these from all the avid fans on this great site, I will simply give you a short account of how these films have affected my life. I am 55years young and saw all these films on their first release in Sydney.(late '60's) They were cut, but it didn't stop me seeing the brilliance in them. I would imagine that a lot of the members of this site are much younger than myself and have only watched these films on DVD or TV quite recently. (Stood the test of time, eh!!) (WideScreen is a must for these.) Leone's films exhibit an idealism in art that surpassed his Hollywood models (eg: Ford). Although, at the time of creation, I doubt he would have thought he was. He simply had a vision.\n\nFrom film to film he improved on this. Like most artists, I don't think he was too concerned with the financial gains that might or might not be realized.(This was probably his downfall). That these little films can impress all you younger fans so much says a lot about good taste and the sad lack of it in American films of recent times.\n\nGreat directors, like Leone, don't come along every day and it saddens me greatly to know he died before he was recognised for the genius he surely was. Morricone must be 75 now, soon we will loose him too. I am a successful composer in Australia and can tell you, without bias, that Morricone is in the top five best ever film composers just from these four films alone, if not one of the best composers in general (yes, this includes Stravinsky, Bartok, Debussy and Schoenberg.) of the 20th century. Eastwood is also reaching the end of his life and although I'm not a huge fan of his recent work, he is one of the last living greats. Without the inspirations put forth by these men, I might not still be writing and recording my music these days. Plenty of times I could have stopped when things got tough but all I had to do was revisit these gems of modern art to realise that greatness does still exhist , all you have to have is the love and desire and guts to make your visions a reality. Leone, Morricone and Eastwood: I salute you.\n", u'0.278482', u'There are few movies that can combine great directing, acting ,music, cinematography, and writing into one movie, but this one does. There are no weak points. Every scene is a piece of art. I know of no other film that affects the senses as this one. Henry Fonda said this was his favorite film and role. It\'s easy to see why. He created 1 of the great "bad guy" roles in history. In a side note, Leone wanted to put brown contacts in Fonda\'s eyes,("who ever saw a villain with blue eyes", Leone said), but Fonda wouldn\'t have it, and the effect is magic in the famous Leone close-ups. Bronson, Cardinale, and Robards are equally powerful, all have great lines and the camera loves them. Speaking of cameras, the visuals are stunning. There is nothing fancy about this movie. Raw power is what you see and feel. Simply the best western if not film ever made.', u'0.302071', u"This is one true masterpiece, I can't remember any other movie (and I have seen a lot of movies) that is so powerful like this one. This movie has everything great ambient, scenes larger then life, hypnotic Morricone music and what is most important great acting. In this move Sergio Leone proved that he is one of the most unique directors in movie history. If you saw this movie you know that almost every scene is great piece of art in almost every scene you are amazed by visual style of Leone. In all other great movies (like: Godfather, Casablanca, Citizen Cane, Notorious,Big Sleep, The Third Man, etc.), you won't find these many great scenes like in this one. This is an ultimate Western and i want to say: Thank you Sergio Leone for your great vision and this masterpiece, after this one there is no need for any other western, in compare to this one John Fords westerns are movies for kids and women.", u'0.758113', u'No other films in the world have produced such sharp, raw, gritty and atmospheric yet absolutely beautiful cinematography as those directed by the Italian director, the great Sergio Leone. Audiences around the world saw first hand the power and influence "A Fistful Of Dollars" bought to the world. It made a director famous, a young Clint Eastwood a household name and the Western more popular than it had ever hoped to be since the master works of John Ford. However, Sergio Leone bought with him a whole new sub-genre - a whole new style - and the Western had never looked darker and grittier. \'The Man With No Name\' bought with it a whole new meaning to a heroic protagonist. There was no more good guy/bad guy, but only a survivalist type - ignorant and self indulgent, yet still moral and fair, tough and smart and damn good with a gun. The world fell in love with him and anticipated its sequels which only became more violent, atmospheric and realistic and gave the authentic true feeling of the West.\n\nIt is why I consider \'Once Upon A Time In The West\' to be Sergio\'s definitive masterpiece. He took everything that he ever felt about the West and made some of the most intriguing 3 hours of film ever produced. The budget had never been bigger. The plot had never been more riveting. The music and setting had never been more epic and the cinematography had never been more powerful. This film is perfect, start to finish!\n\nThis time our premise intersects the stories of five people - yes five people - and it is brilliantly crafted. And this time it isn\'t a chain smoking son of a gun without a name that carries the film, but rather a female prostitute. This isn\'t the \'Rocky Horror Picture Show\', so please continue reading. The plot revolves around a certain family and its moist establishment in the middle of a desert with hopes for it to one day be a thriving town with a railway station. It is this future town that brings our five protagonists into relation. The family is murdered by a gang led by Frank (Henry Fonda) who works the hit-man for a corrupt railway boss who wants the town out of the way so he can reach the coast and view the sea before he dies. However, unaware of her arrival, Jill (Claudia Cardinale) - the family\'s patriarch\'s fianc\xe9e - comes to claim her property and therefore possesses a threat to the railway boss. Meanwhile a man with no name nicknamed \'Harmonica\' (he always plays a Harmonica before making a kill) has come to town looking for Frank for personal reasons. Charles Bronson nails the role with extreme prejudice. Also a fugitive going by the name of Cheyenne (Jason Robards) assists in his journey to prove his innocence regarding being the wrongly accused murderer.\n\nNo spoilers, but just an assurance that this film will blow you away. It is impossible to comprehend the overwhelming powerful epic experience in one sitting. This is what motion pictures are meant to be. Masterful storytelling, a larger than life score by the brilliant Ennio Morricone, cinematography yet unmatched and a cast made in heaven. Performances from all the actors are some of the best you will ever see.\n\nIt is films like these that redefine genres and that honorable of all words, a \'classic\'. Prove me wrong. For those who experienced it, I hope it has impacted you in much the same way it has me. Upon its release, this film was unsuccessful, because the world wanted another Clint Eastwood picture. But they couldn\'t see for a mile what was coming. Sergio Leone is platinum. May the force be with him...........always!', u'0.383852', u'\nThe "fourth" and best of Sergio Leone\'s Dollars Trilogy, \'Once Upon A Time In The West\' is a sprawling, operatic masterpiece of cinematography. The languid pacing only accentuates the meticulously presented scenes and the Ennio Morricone score is powerful, poignant and haunting. Each major character has his own musical theme. Henry Fonda\'s character has a menacing and jarring score which chills and thrills me every time I hear it (I bought the soundtrack too!). Fonda as Frank is the "coldest villain in screen history" as I have read in other reviews and was cast against type in this film. When the camera pans up into his passionless blue eyes early in the movie, one sees what a brilliant piece of casting it was to have him as the villain. This movie is a metaphor on the death of The Old West and the final word on how a (spaghetti) Western should be. Not to be missed!', u'0.0678185', u"Once Upon a Time in the West (OUTW) is a piquant cocktail of style and substance in equal parts, potent enough to catapult the viewer into a whirlpool of incessant excitement transcending him beyond the usual realms of an adrenaline rush. Vintage Leone, OUTW is inarguably the best Western ever made and undoubtedly features amongst the very best works of cinema, period. Leone incredibly surpasses the brilliance of The Good, the Bad and the Ugly (TGTBTU) with OUTW by blending his favorite theme of Greed with that of Revenge. The only thing that TGTBTU lacked was the presence of a strong female character and Leone more than makes up for it in OUTW. Its eccentric yet consummate plot revolves around a female protagonist, thereby revolutionizing the very tenets associated with the genre where machismo and chivalry had solely held sway, hitherto. \n\nOUTW is a juxtaposition of the lives of five individuals, viz. Harmonica - a mysterious stranger, Cheyenne \x96 a notorious desperado, Frank \x96 a ruthless assassin, Jill \x96 a beautiful widow with an obscure past, and Morton \x96 a railroad baron, whose motives inevitably make them cross each other's paths albeit through an act of fate. \n\nHenry Fonda is a revelation as the cold-blooded assassin, a portrayal that is remarkably contrasting to his usual 'good guy' on-screen image. He goes about his business with a sublime touch of feral grandeur that makes him equally chilling and fascinating as 'Frank'. \n\nCharles Bronson plays his part with utmost conviction and incredibly manages to conjure up an element of mystery in his portrayal that not only brings 'Harmonica' to life, but also gives it a very distinct identity despite Harmonica's conspicuous similarities with Eastwood's 'Man with no name'. \n\nThe role of 'Cheyenne' is played with equal brilliance by Jason Robards. He has taken care of the various subtleties and nuances to such an extent that he perfectly fits into the shoes of notorious, yet likable, 'Cheyenne'. \n\nClaudia Cardinale is ravishing as the beautiful, yet vulnerable, 'Jill McBain'. She has fully justified the trust shown by Leone in casting her and by Bertolucci in penning down a strong feminine part in a Western. She truly entrances the viewers with her mystifying pulchritude and enigmatic charm. She meticulously highlights the flaws in Jill's character while also managing to depict the elements of tenacity and grit which represent the true spirit of femininity. \n\nGabriele Ferzetti is quite effective in his cameo as the crippled railroad baron, 'Morton'. He suffers from the tuberculosis of bones and each passing day brings him closer to his end, thereby further intensifying his desperate urge to fulfill his far-fetched ambition of taking the railroad to the Atlantic. He truly represents a man worthy of achieving the impossible, unfortunately cut short by his haplessness. Despite the inhuman and unjust means adopted by him to fulfill his naked ambition, one finds it excruciatingly hard to derive pleasure from his perpetual plight and eventual doom. \n\nContrary to the popular belief, the slow pace of the movie and laconism in dialogue pose no impediment to the viewing and in fact this deliberate pacing enormously adds to the detail and beauty of the movie, and also helps in brewing the desired level of tension before it is finally punctuated suddenly with quick bursts of action. \n\nTonino Delli Colli's cinematography is vividly descriptive and has elements which have become his and Leone's trademarks like the extreme close-ups, the quick panning of the terrain, the rotating camera shots etc.\n\nThe haunting score written yet again by the master composer, Ennio Morricone enhances the grandeur of the movie tenfold. If Leone's direction and Colli's cinematography are the backbone of the movie, then undoubtedly Morricone's plaintive score is its heart and soul. The surreal score has shades of melancholy, intrigue, and romance that become more obvious with each passing moment. The music features leitmotifs (a melodic phrase that accompanies the reappearance of a character) that relate to each of the main characters (each with their own unique theme music). The soundtrack to the opening scene is a creative orchestration of ordinary sounds like that of the dripping water, the clicking of a telegraph, a buzzing fly, and the screech of a windmill after Morricone experienced a musical performance created by the medley of these sounds. This created an exaggerated version of what had come to be known as 'Spaghetti sound'.\n\nOUTW is a magnum opus unparalleled in direction, screenplay, cinematography and music. With its slower pace and relatively somber theme (compared to Leon's previous works), Leone managed to transform his image of a satirical showman into that of an accomplished auteur capable of producing much profound works. OUTW also served as the harbinger for Leone's surrealistic masterpiece, 'Once Upon a Time in America'. \n\nP.S: OUTW is an absorbing masterpiece; an absolute gem of a movie and a must watch for those who understand the true meaning of 'A Timeless Masterpiece', and are willing to indulge themselves completely through the whole length of the movie. 10/10\n\nhttp://www.apotpourriofvestiges.com/", u'0.627353', u'I recently purchased a double DVD package of "Once Upon a Time in the West" and re-watched this film after having revisited the "Dollars" trilogy...and what a comedown. First the positives: a lovely score from Ennio Morricone (especially the "Jill"/Claudia Cardinale theme), gorgeous photography, sets, locations, lighting, and some decent (but not terribly great) acting - Gabriele Ferzetti probably comes off best in his role. You know you\'re in trouble when the very last bit in the documentary extras is a quotation of Sergio Leone worriedly admitting to co-scripter Bernardo Bertolucci that he had set the pace far too slow when filming the opening sequences, and that the ensuing film would probably be five hours long as a result. It was almost three, and it barely moves along at all. The plot is paper thin and could have easily been filmed in 90 minutes. Perhaps then the much-needed forward momentum and suspense would be in place. As it is, the film has far too protracted silences which do not advance it at all.\n\nHenry Fonda\'s villain Frank is rather drab and one dimensional, especially in comparison to Gian Maria Volont\xe9\'s romanticized villains Ramon and Indio in the first two "Dollars" films. Fonda is also not even remotely formidable as a physical opponent for Charles Bronson. I\'m not certain why Jason Robards\' Cheyenne character is even in the film---perhaps as comic relief, but he does not ever really seem to belong in the Old West, despite his grizzled appearance. He and Bronson have none of the chemistry and camaraderie that Clint Eastwood and Lee Van Cleef had in "For a Few Dollars More." Claudia Cardinale is beautiful and beautifully photographed, but even her character is rather one dimensional.\n\nBack to the music: for this film Ennio Morricone recorded the score in advance (unlike the "Dollars" films), and some of the soaring themes arrive early in the film and are far too stridently emotional for characters and situations which have not yet won the viewers\' hearts. He should have subdued some of his orchestration of the same themes earlier in the film, then revisited them in full intensity after some of the drama had likewise escalated. As such it is a bad marriage of sound and celluloid at the outset.\n\nIn the end it is director Sergio Leone\'s fault for not shooting this film so that the story would unfold at a much faster pace. It seems he didn\'t learn his lesson, though, as his next film "A Fistful of Dynamite" (1972) suffered from the very same problems. I donated the "West" DVD set to my local library just before writing this review; perhaps someone else will enjoy it.', u'-0.257196', u"Most westerns are actually about the death of the old, wild, west; and 'Once Upon a Time in the West', with its story centred on the coming of the railroad, is no exception. One thing that Sergio Leone has done in this movie is to make a truly cinematic film: it's hard to imagine how the script read, as so much of the meaning is conveyed in the facial expressions of the actors or by Enrico Morricone's score - there's a balletic quality to Leone's work. Unfortunately, I found the music intrusive, the exaggerated grimacing of the characters merely comic, and the plot contrived, difficult to follow and arbitrarily bloody; I don't believe that even in the wildest west, six people would be killed outside a bar and everyone inside would just carry on drinking as if nothing had happened. Personally, I prefer Robert Altman's treatment of a similar storyline in 'McCabe and Mrs. Miller', a film that uses rather fewer of the conventions of the western, but which seems closer to life as a result.", u'-0.347641'], u'tt0060196': [u"\nA sprawling Western epic that follows the adventures of three gunfighters looking for $200,000 in stolen gold, Sergio Leone's `The Good, the Bad, and the Ugly' is a masterpiece, one that continues to get better and better with each viewing.  In a way, it's a morality play, weighing the consequences of good and evil, but it does so in a realistic manner.  Sometimes, crime does pay, at least in the short term, and sometimes good does go unrewarded.  This film probably signaled the death knell of the traditional John Wayne `White Hat/Black Hat' Western.\n\nThe three main characters make the film.  Lee Van Cleef (`The Bad') is evil personified.  Totally ruthless, he'll do whatever it takes to get what he wants.  Clint Eastwood (`The Good') is the Man With No Name, not really `good' in a traditional sense . . . but he has a certain sense of honor and tries to do the right thing.  (Watch the scene when he gives a dying Confederate soldier a puff of his cigar - powerful, and it sums up everything that the Man With No Name is all about, without saying a single word.)  Eli Wallach (`The Ugly') is Tuco, and he's easily the most complex - if not the best - character in the film.  All impulse and rage, Tuco spins wildly throughout the movie, stealing, lying, pretending to be Clint Eastwood's best friend in one scene, trying to kill him in another - Tuco truly represents `the ugly' side of people.\n\nThe movie is long, but there's not a wasted scene in the film.  Each one slowly lets the film unfold with a certain style and grace, revealing more about each character and what's going on.  The pacing is incredible, as is the direction - Sergio Leone manages to build a lot of uncomfortable tension in the film, keeping the film from ever getting predictable.  Any typical Western clich\xe9 that you can possibly think of is either given a unique twist or utterly destroyed by Leone's masterful storytelling.  Of special mention is Ennio Morricone's score, which is absolutely perfect.  Two scenes - one in a Union prison camp, one in the climatic gunfight in the cemetery at the end of the film - are amazing on their own, but they become absolutely astonishing with combined with Morricone's powerful score. \n\nThis movie is absolutely brilliant.  If you haven't seen it yet, I strongly urge to do so.  Immediately.  (And then, go watch `Unforgiven' . . . in a way, I think that `Unforgiven' is the sequel to `The Good, the Bad, and the Ugly - it's the story of what eventually happened to the Man With No Name.) `The Good, the Bad, and the Ugly' is easily one of the best Westerns ever made.  A++ \n", u'0.315963', u'\nThis is the third,and arguably the best, of the so-called "spaghetti western" trilogy. It is ironic that, at the time the three Sergio Leone westerns were released, they were largely panned by critics as being poor and even laughable imitations of American-made westerns. The fact that they were filmed in Italy and Spain resulted in them receiving their amusing nickname which was intended to degrade them at the time.\n\nSomehow, over the quarter century or so since their release, the critics have tended to change their opinions, and now these movies are generally regarded as classics. Perhaps this is because Clint Eastwood was principally known only as the second banana, Rowdy Yates, in the television series "Rawhide" when the films were produced but since then has achieved superstardom. But I also think it goes beyond that. I believe the critics decided to take another look at these films and realized that they had been premature in writing them off. Actually, I believe the three films were considerably better than most of what Hollywood produced. In fact, I think that TGTBATU ranks among the best westerns ever produced bringing to mind the magnificent films of John Ford, the undisputed master of that genre, and his protege, the incomparable John Wayne. \n\nI have nothing but praise for this film. In fact, I rank it as one of my favorite films of all time. I could write volumes of what is good about this film. But since its qualities have been oft repeated in other viewer reviews, I will focus on what others didn\'t like about it. Most of the IMDb reviews had only one major complaint: the film is too long. I disagree. In fact, in spite of its nearly three hour length, I was disappointed that it ended. I was so absorbed in the film that I was disheartened to have to return to reality. The combination of story, cinematography, acting and musical score left nothing to be desired other than more of the same! The sequences that seemed to drag on in the opinion of other reviewers were necessary to fully create moods and to drive home important points. For example, the opening sequence might be regarded as needlessly long as Angel Eyes taunts a hapless man over a leisurely meal. But to me, scenes like that are what makes the movie great! The time allows the viewer to fully appreciate the amazing replication of the primitive home and the pitiful life of its dirt-poor inhabitants. I felt as though I was sitting there at the table; I was half tempted to reach for a bowl and spoon to partake of the meal. And all the while the suspense was building towards the inevitable climax. You know it\'s coming but not when and the length of the scene drives you crazy but makes it all the more satisfying when it does happen. \n\nAnother example is when Tuco punishes Joe by forcing him to walk through the desert. This is possibly the only time that one might become bored with the film. But again, I think the time for the scene was justified in that we are able to receive the full impact of that experience and enjoy the haunting music at the same time. Joe\'s subsequent predicament might not have had much credibility had this sequence been abbreviated. \n\nIn my opinion, one of the essential elements of a great film is creating moods that absorb our attention. This often takes time, lots of time. For example, many of the scenes in the magnificent film "Dr. Zhivago" were almost painfully long but they were necessary to create those startling surrealistic moods, and the film would not have been great without them. In many ways, TGTBATU has this same sort of greatness. It is a sweeping epic with very compelling characters and magnificent settings that draws the viewer in and doesn\'t release him until the closing credits begin to roll. When it\'s over, you feel that you\'ve been on a long and exciting journey. Such a journey takes time.\n\nIn summary, if you haven\'t seen this film, buy it right away. Don\'t rent it because you will not want to part with it once you\'ve seen it.\n\nThen curl up with it on a cold, rainy Sunday afternoon when you are in no hurry to do anything.\n', u'-0.00545575', u'\nThis is without a doubt my all-time favorite western.\n\nThe beginning of the film is so memorable, with the young, rough good-looks of Eastwood being labeled "The Good", the absolutely evil look of Lee Van Cleef being labeled "The Bad", and a dirty, unkempt, desperado Eli Wallach with booze and food flying being labeled "The Ugly".  The ending fight scene with its 3-way showdown is one of the most memorable pieces of film I have ever watched.\n\nLeone did a great job with the camera direction in this movie and the acting is impressive.  Eastwood, Van Cleef, and Wallach are absolutely fantastic.\n\nThe only thing that might scare some viewers off is the length of the film. It is long, but you just don\'t seem to notice it when you are watching the film - you are just too damn busy watching the best classic western of all time.\n\nDo yourself a favor and rent this movie if you haven\'t seen it.  If there was ever a perfect western, this is it. \n', u'0.292158', u'\nOk- first, as mentioned in another review, the geographic/historical errors in this film are GLARING. You\'ve got men carrying revolvers that look like old style cap-and-ball pistols, but they\'re loading them with metallic cartridges- historically about five years early. Eastwood carries a rifle that hasn\'t been invented yet, Tuco assembles a "superpistol" out of a Colt, a Remington, and a Smith and Wesson- impossible. And there was nothing of merit taking place between the North and South during the Civil War in the Southwest. Now, that aside, I must say that this is the Greatest western ever. I first saw this film when I was about ten. I\'d never sat through an entire Western befor, even though my Dad watched them constantly. Since then, I\'ve been through film school, watched hundreds of Westerns, learned to appreciate them- but NOTHING matches up to this. The Searchers, Stagecoach, Gunfight at the O.K. Corral, The Gunfighter, High Noon, Shane- all great films, but saddled with the standard American Western morality- the good guy never takes liberties with the eastern schoolmarm, the bad guy wears a black hat, etc. Coming from Italy, TG,TB &TU isn\'t bound by these conventions. Blondie\'s the "good guy"- but he\'s also a bounty hunter. He makes a living in a highly immoral way, but is obviously the "good"- not because we\'re told, but from small acts- giving the dying soldier a cigar, making sure the Captain knows to hold on till he hears the bridge blow, the genuine regret he feel for having to let Shorty die. And while Angel Eyes may be the Bad, we at least know he has prinicpals- when he\'s hired for a job, he always sees the job through. And Tuco may be more immoral than the other two, but he\'s so savvy and his role so humorous that one can\'t bring oneself to look upon him disfavorably. In other words, historical inaccuracies aside, TG, TB, & TU maybe one of the most accurate portrayals of the West ever put on film- there are no clear-cut lines of conduct, no black and white, or even grey, but just a swirled palette of various facets of the human condition.', u'-0.123058', u'I wasn\'t sure if I was going to comment on this film because everything has already been said by the hundreds of other people who have posted their thoughts, but I decided that I should really put my two cents in since this is my favorite movie.\n\nThis film, in my opinion, is not only the greatest spaghetti western of all time. It is the greatest movie of all time. Period. Regardless of genre. I could probably watch it every day, and be perfectly happy doing so.\n\nThe music is perfection. The way the music drives this movie is absolutely amazing. The musical genius of Morricone and the incredible direction of Sergio Leone is a combination that will probably never be equaled. The theme song will forever be etched in your brain. In fact, it probably already is, even if you haven\'t seen the movie! The scene where Tuco runs through the graveyard with the song "Ecstacy of Gold" is pure poetry. And the showdown at the end with that great music- just incredible.\n\nThe story is riveting. There is not a single dull moment. The movie is long, but Leone\'s direction is so good that you will love the fact that you can enjoy this movie for three hours.\n\nLee Van Cleef is my favorite spaghetti western actor, and he is incredible as "Angel Eyes." It is the part he was born to play. Eli Wallach is perfect as Tuco. He really shines in this movie. Some people say he steals the show, and I can see why they think so. Eastwood is excellent as "Blondie," although I don\'t think Eastwood has as strong of a presence as Van Cleef (I know many will disagree, and that\'s OK because all three actors are superb in this film so why split hairs?).\n\nThis movie is hypnotic. It\'s operatic. It\'s sad. It\'s funny. It\'s gritty. It\'s violent. It\'s art. It\'s action. It\'s pure entertainment. The film is just so incredible on so many different levels that EVERYONE should see it, regardless of what kinds of movies they are into. And it\'s so cool that the greatest flick ever just happens to be a spaghetti western. If you haven\'t seen this movie, stop what you are doing, and go get it now!!', u'0.345884', u'\noften overlooked or belittled by so-called "film critics", GBU is a monumental influential masterpiece. everything works: music, photography, acting, dialogue, directing, etc. the cinematography and music stand out as legendary film history.  who can forget the Morricone "whistles". or the harsh landscape united with a sweaty dirty super close-up of an unknown Italian actor. there\'s just too much to say about this landmark movie.  what a combo: THE "spaghetti western", directed by an Italian, starring american leads, shot in Spain, and taking place in the barren American west. wow.remember, there\'s two kinds of people in this world, my friend, those who appreciate a masterpiece like GBU, and those who don\'t know much \'bout great movies!!!!!!!! ', u'0.928167', u'On a partial first viewing, I didn\'t like "The Good, the Bad and the Ugly." I thought it was a slow, tedious story about a bunch of unpleasant jerk characters involved in a bog-standard conflict over money. It all seemed very macho and self-consciously cool, and it had obviously inspired all the overrated macho directors I don\'t like in my own generation - Tarantino, for example, and Robert Rodriguez. In short, I was unimpressed.\n\nYears later, I gave the film a second shot, watching it all the way through this time. I loved it. What had changed? \n\nFor one thing, I took more notice of the technical side of the film. I paid attention to Leone\'s famous use of close-ups, his selection of memorable character actors, and his wonderful scene-setting. I admired the detailed sets and the sweeping landscapes, the props and the costumes and all those weird, wonderful faces that Leone clearly loved to photograph.\n\nI also got hooked by some of the quieter moments that I had skipped over in my first viewing. One of the most effective scenes involves Eli Wallach\'s character, Tuco, quarreling with his brother when they meet after they\'ve been apart for years. Their argument is great, emotionally charged stuff, made all the more effective by the suggestion that they really do love and care about each other. It\'s the kind of sensitive, human scene you never get to see in a Tarantino or Rodriguez movie.\n\nBefore I get too fuzzy-wuzzy, I should also like to point out that, on my second viewing, I LOVED all the action, too. Every gunfight is great, in its own way, and they\'re all a bit different. The greatest of them all is, of course, the final confrontation between the trio, which is accompanied by some of the most rousing music I\'ve ever heard in a film. And hey, there\'s even a huge Civil War battle to provide a change of pace from all the small-scale action.\n\nUltimately, "The Good, the Bad and the Ugly" is probably just a potboiler of a film, without too much to say about, for example, the human condition. But what a potboiler! It doesn\'t have to try to be cool - it simply IS cool. In fact, it probably defined heroic coolness for an entire generation. Eli Wallach\'s performance, Leone\'s direction and Morricone\'s music alone are enough to elevate it to classic status - and the fact that everything else in the movie is great, too, helps elevate it to the level of perhaps the greatest action film ever made.\n\nAnd to think, I missed all that the first time through...', u'0.268827', u"\nThis film probably had the largest impact on my life. It set the tone for everything I then got interested in. American Civil War. Film Music. Clint Eastwood. Real Westerns. This is the best of the Dollars Trilogy and by far one of the best Westerns of all time. It has drama, comedy, cracking dialogue, some of the most brutal battle scenes - especially around the bridge - that I'd seen up to then, music to die for and set pieces that just ooze atmosphere and tension. I have never forgotten the end shoot-out. This was unique; 3 people?! You can't do that. But Leone did, and he did it brilliantly - all cameras and music. I have now seen this film too many times to count but I'll be back for another blast of buono, brutto, cattivo, someday. My son owes his name to this film. Yep, that there is Clinton.\n", u'0.348273', u'...and though those last several words could also be attributed to Leone\'s "Once Upon a Time" films (West and America) as well as the other pieces in his trilogy of films with Clint Eastwood- Fistful of Dollars and For a Few More Dollars- arguably this is the most ambitious and spellbinding one of the bunch, and one that has inspired (i.e. Quentin Tarantino, Sam Raimi, Robert Rodriguez) and will most likely continue to inspire filmmakers and fans into the 21st century. There\'s something in The Good, the Bad, and the Ugly that\'s nearly (or perhaps is) mythical in it\'s craft, certain scenes come off as being more than relevant and exquisite for that scene/sequence- it transcends into aspects of humanity.\n\nFor example, in the first part of the film (this is after the extraordinary introductions to Tuco, played by Eli Wallach, Sentenza or \'Angel Eyes\', played by Lee Van Cleef, and as Blondie by a 35/36 year old Clint), Joe gets Tuco out of a hanging, which is something of a regular practice for them, but Joe decides to leave his \'buddy\' out in the desert to walk the rest of the way back into town. A little later, the situation gets reversed, as Tuco has a horse and water and Joe doesn\'t, and they both go to cross the desert. Leone decides to not follow Tuco coming back to town as much as he follows in earnest Tuco and Joe going across that desert, as Joe starts to burn and dry up, going towards a story that will soon unfold. There is something to these scenes that I can barely describe, that they\'re executed in the mind-set of a Western, but in the abstract Leone lets the audience know this is a story that is bold and bigger than life.\n\nWhat makes much of the Good, the Bad, and the Ugly such a huge success is the trust Leone had in his own style he spun into his own after the first two westerns, his trust in his collaborators, and in his leading players as well. I, for one, had to mistakenly figure out that it is near depressing to watch this film on a regular VCR tape due to the pan & scan process. There is such a clear, distinct visual scope that Leone and camera director Tonino Delli Colli achieve that it\'s practically a must to get the DVD (preferably the extended version, which was Leone\'s original cut more or less). The editing, too, is unique in many sequences (the climax is the most noted and memorable). The score, with usual collaborator Ennio Morricone, is one of the landmark movie scores, and themes, of not just in the western genre but in all movie history. \n\nAnd the three main players who take on the screen have their own chops to show off: Eastwood, technically, was playing a Joe that took place before Fistful of Dollars, yet by this film had it down to a T (it\'s still my favorite performance from him, despite having few words and reactions); Cleef\'s cold, cunning Angel Eyes steals the scenes he\'s in; ditto for Wallach, who gets under the skin of his co-patriots as much as he sometimes does under the viewer\'s. If anyone really stays in the mind, at least for me, it\'s Wallach - especially as he gets the most \'character\', and one of the very best scenes is between Tuco and his religious brother. Without that scene, the movie actually wouldn\'t work quite as well, surprisingly enough. \n\nOverall, The Good, the Bad and Ugly, is an entirely satisfying western, at least one of my five favorites ever made, and it\'s an endearing bravo to all who were involved.', u'0.322001', u'\nRather than a review of a 30 year old movie, here is my recollection of a 30 year old movie. When was the first time you saw this movie? I remember the first time I saw this movie. Back in the \'70s, one night there was 2 things on TV to choose from, this movie or a baseball game.  How do I remember a baseball game, it was the night Hank Aaron was going after Babe Ruth\'s homerun record. Baseball or a movie. Tuned into the the baseball game, flipped to the movie -a western, cool. \'Uh, what is this no one is talking it makes no sense\'. After what seemed like an eternity somebody finally spoke, Lee van Cleef. The rest is Movie History. Since then I have seen this movie well over 25 times. Numerous lines that have been etched into my memory. Forget whatever minor flaws this movie has. Put yourself in the movie. Sergio Leon, John Ford these are the people that defined "The Western". On a scale of 1-10, The Good, The Bad, and The Ugly is nothing less than a 10. Plop the tape into the VCR, sit back and experience a classic.\n', u'-0.176175', u'Sergio Leone\'s film follows the adventures of 3 ruthless outlaws...\n\nThe \'Good\' is Eastwood\'s unchanging and unshaven \'Stranger With No Name.\' An unprincipled killer who stands only for his 45... He is quiet, inexpressive and cool, only seen once with a brief moment of humanity where his classic disinterest contrasts with the real tragedy of the American Civil War...\n\nThe \'Bad\' is an excellent supporting actor, a Western figure... With his long, thin opening eyes, deathly pale face and cruel voice, Lee Van Cleef is the merciless bounty hunter, ironically called \'Angel Eyes,\' always ready to kill for a price...\n\nThe \'Ugly\' is Eli Wallach, a wild spirit with devil attitude... Tuco is charming but extremely dangerous...\n\nThe pairing of Eastwood and Wallach is memorable for its black humor alternating each other\'s fate, motivated satisfactorily by their excessive desire for collecting the reward money... \n\nThe quest: a treasure chest containing $200,000 in gold buried in a Confederate grave in Sad Hill Cemetery...\n\n"The Good, the Bad and the Ugly" had many haunting moments: Complicated bounty-hunter\'s con-games; the Stranger, in a frantic hurry, trying to load his empty gun before 3 killers sent by Tuco; a torturous walk across the desert in a blazing sun; the epic battle between Union and Confederate soldiers for the control of a strategic bridge where Leone\'s camera takes a slow ride surveying the magnitude of the Civil War carnage; and the final showdown in a huge graveyard, where each character, naturally, wants the money all to himself...\n\nThe amusing scenes are provided by Tuco, sitting in bathtub with a lot of foam and one armed man enters his room saying: "I\'ve been looking for you for 8 months... Now I find you in exactly the position that suits me..."\n\nThe memorable scenes are when the Stranger finds himself in a dangerous situation at the hand of Tuco, who is just about to collect his vengeance by hanging his former partner... \n\nThe stunning scenes when Leone\'s camera captures the touching moment in which a young man plays sweet romantic songs on his harmonica, while his eyes are streaming tears of disgrace and grief...\n\nThe unforgettable scenes when the \'Stranger\' leaving Tuco with a rope around his neck and the bandit begs for mercy while teetering on a wooden cross...\n\nThe ultimate confrontation between the forces of good and evil when Leone spreads out long shots adjusting sound with action... Tensions mounts as the three protagonists \'shape in a triangular cinema clich\xe9\' Leone gets the audience\'s imagination with a geometric fight to the death, accompanied by a clear exciting music... \n\nLeone\'s camera captures every straight lines, every nervous energy, every tactical movement, displaying, in huge close-ups, their faces, their power of vision, the slowly progress of their fingers toward their loaded guns, their worried eyes, their sudden need to be quick, to be the fastest draw...', u'-0.048797', u"The Good, the Bad and the Ugly or the Good, the Better and the Best, as I prefer calling it, is a bizarrely sublime and a uniquely aesthetic masterpiece. The actors in title roles have given such extraordinarily superb performances, that it would be impertinent and disparaging to merely regard their swell work as acting. In fact their brilliant portrayals have immortalized Blondie, Sentenza/ Angel Eyes and the enigmatic Tuco. Lee Van Cleef is fiendishly unforgiving as the merciless Angel Eyes. Clint Eastwood is rugged yet suave, cocky yet adorable as laconic cigar-smoker Blondie, a role that laid the foundations of his illustrious career. But it is Eli Wallach, who steals the show with his captivating portrayal of Tuco, a portrayal that is as entrancing as it is enlightening. Wallach is amusing, capricious, nonchalant, uncanny and yet tenacious as Tuco, perturbed by his insecurities and dampened by his solitude. It is the tacit amicability between Blondie and Tuco and their mutual hostility towards the evil Angel Eyes owing to the vestiges of virtue present in them, redolent of their moribund morality, which gives the story, the impetus and the characters, a screen presence that is not only awe inspiring but also unparalleled.\n\nSergio Leone's magnificent and ingenious direction in synergy with Ennio Morricone's surreal music, Tonino Delli Colli's breathtaking cinematography and Joe D'Augustine's punctilious editing makes the movie, a treat to watch and ineffably unforgettable. Initially aimed to be a tongue-in-cheek satire on run-of-the-mill westerns, The Good, the Bad and the Ugly, continues to stand the test of time in its endeavor to attain apotheosis (if it hasn't attained it yet). It will always be remembered as European cinema's greatest lagniappe, not only to the Western genre, but to the world of cinema.\n\nIt's a must watch for any movie lover. 10/10", u'0.67098', u'The whole picture is superb, but the closing twenty minutes or so are simply breathtaking. From when the dust clears after the bridge blows, the movie develops a momentum that doesn\'t let up until the very last shot.\n\nThe dying soldier; Tuco being blasted from the horse and crashing into the gravestone; Tuco running round and round the graveyard (how was that shot?); the way the three protagonists come together; the shootout; Tuco and Blondie playing out their last confrontation; and then a final wail,the guitars come in one more time and Clint just rides hell for leather out across the desert.\n\nIt\'s clich\xe9 to say "they don\'t make \'em like they used to" but not only don\'t "they", "they" wouldn\'t have a clue how to make a movie like this any more.', u'-0.355958', u"Gosh, The Good, the Bad, and the Ugly, I finally saw this film! Who hasn't heard of it? First off, may I say that Clint Eastwood... what a hottie in his day! :D Sorry, had to get that off my chest. Sergio Leone from what I understood was a huge western film fanatic and in the 60's pretty much most folks had moved onto other genre's. I mean, I would agree that most western's are pretty much the same and stereotypical.\n\nSergio however took a story and added some elements to it such as comedy, drama, and war. The story flows so well and just compliments all of it's characters. By far my favorite character was The Good, played by Clint. He is a bounty hunter who captures The Ugly numerous times just to free him before every hanging and splits the winnings with him. When they learn of a coffin in the desert that has $200,000, they go for it. Of course we have the Bad who is a ruthless killer who also wants in on the doe.\n\nThe Good, The Bad, and The Ugly is a terrific film and I thank all the IMDb users for their useful comments and that pushed me to finally rent this western classic. Let's give it up for Sergio! \n\n10/10", u'0.0218258', u'After many years of barely watching any movies, I treated myself to several classics recently. And this was the best.\n\nThat I so enjoyed this movie so much came as a shock to me. I literally never before have been able to even sit through a western, which (in my admittedly limited experience) was schlock action starring John Wayne as the taciturn all-American good guy being tough and beating up the outlaws. Watching GBU, I was enthralled for the entire three hours. Twice. And if I had time, I would have watched it a third time. \n\nThe setting is typically western: a dry, dusty panorama in which men barely co-exist with each other; few wasted words; and lots of action, horses, and gunfighting in a wild west barely governed by incipient institutions of law & order \x96 all shrouded within a morality play of good vs. bad. But what I liked so much is exactly what I hate about John Wayne westerns \x96 the seriousness and honesty with which moral context is considered. In Hollywood, good vs. bad is as thoughtlessly superscripted as the protagonists\' white and black hats. In GBU every remnant of moralizing has been ruthlessly cut.\n\nGood, Bad, and Ugly are personified in the form of three characters: Bad ("Sentenza") is the easiest to understand. He is *very* bad, perhaps not so different from other villains, but much more sharply developed; murderous, sadistic, traitorous, and remorseless. Good ("Blondie") and Ugly ("Tuco") are more puzzling, but their labels are the key to the movie. Both Blondie and Tuco are outlaws and killers with only the barest hint of morality, but they\'re not evil in the same way that Sentenza is. Tuco is demonstrative, emotional, loud, wild, and unpredictable; but driven by survival rather than satanic urges. Blondie is cool, calm, rational and controlled \x96 in many ways similar to Sentenza \x96 but whereas Sentenza tortures, maims, kills, and lies for the hell of it, even apparently enjoys it, Blondie simply goes about his business coolly, and shows several poignant hints of empathy, decency, and a sense of justice.\n\nGBU takes place during the Civil War and strips away the high-level political struggle of history books, leaving us with the soldier\'s vantage point of brutality, pointless death, and some individual decency. The politics are indecipherable from this vantage point. GBU hits this point home when our protagonists wind up in a prison camp because the oncoming gray cavalry uniforms turn out to be dust-covered blue. Later, they encounter an army fighting over a worthless bridge, suffering countless pointless deaths and casualties. Because Leone has so rigorously excised traditional off-the-shelf morality, the few instances of humanity are remarkably poignant. One such instance is when Blondie shares his coat and cigar with a dying soldier; another is when prisoners are forced \x96 by Sentenza\'s orders \x96 to play music to cover up the screams of the tortured. Sentenza apparently enjoyed the irony of beautiful sounds used for such ends; the musicians are, of course, pained by it.\n\nThat was one of many extraordinarily striking scenes. The honesty of the moral context was what I liked best about the film, but I liked everything else too. Indeed the same primal, ruthless honesty that characterizes the character development pervades the film. The music is unlike anything I\'d ever heard \x96 it\'s an audible version of the arid west and the tensions and lawlessness that characterize the film. Underlying the entire score is one instantly memorable theme starting off with what sounds like a screaming hyena. The story took place in New Mexico, and even though it was filmed in Spain, it really does look like New Mexico; and just as in life in the American west, the wide, breathtaking panorama tends to subordinates dialog. Indeed, it is several minutes into the film before even one word is spoken.\n\nThe plot was extremely clever \x96 and never predictable. High level suspense is maintained for the full three hours. It was hard to imagine how it could unfold \x96 three uncompromising outlaws in search of one buried treasure; cooperation was not in their nature, but nothing was ever done out of character. Any Western clich\xe9 that you can think of is either given a unique twist or destroyed by masterful storytelling. For example there is an utterly irreverent scene in which Tuco meets his brother, a sincere Priest, and turns platitudes upside down. The brother begins with the standard rebuke of the criminal\'s behavior, but Tuco punches back and says, "Where we come from there were only two ways out. You lacked the courage to do what I\'ve done." The movie is also irreverently funny: For example, Twice Tuco gained the upper hand on Blondie and said:\n\n"There are two kinds of spurs(?), my friend. Those that come in by the door, and (crosses himself) those that come in by the window."\n\n"There are two kinds of people in the world, my friend. Those who have a rope around their neck and those who have the job of cutting." Later Blondie gained the advantage of Tuco and observed: \n\n"You see in this world there\'s two kinds of people my friend - those with loaded guns, and those who dig. You dig." In addition to all these specific attributes, a unique and strikingly cool style infuses the entire film: long scenes of tense silences \x96 never for an instant boring; and telling, startling close-ups and transitions. Most noteworthy was the film\'s climax. As the protagonists stand there with their fingers on their holsters, waiting for the first person to go for their gun(s), the transitions start out slowly, and speed up as the tension increases. As I write this, I wish I had my own copy of the film, just so I could see this scene again.\n\nNot just a great western, but easily one of the best movies of *any* kind ever made.', u'0.0541099'], u'tt0111161': [u'Why do I want to write the 234th comment on The Shawshank Redemption? I am not sure - almost everything that could be possibly said about it has been said. But like so many other people who wrote comments, I was and am profoundly moved by this simple and eloquent depiction of hope and friendship and redemption. \n\nThe only other movie I have ever seen that effects me as strongly is To Kill a Mockingbird. Both movies leave me feeling cleaner for having watched them.\n\nI didn\'t intend to see this movie at all: I do not like prison movies and I don\'t normally watch them. I work at a branch library and one day as I was checking The Shawshank Redemption out to one of our older patrons, she said to me, "Whenever I feel down or depressed, I check out this movie and watch it and it always makes me feel better." At the time, I thought that was very strange. One day there was nothing on TV except things I absolutely would not watch under any circumstance or things that I had seen too many times already. I remembered what she said, so I watched it. I have watched it many many times since then and it gets better with every showing.\n\nNo action, no special effects - just men in prison uniforms talking to each other.\n\nThe Shawshank Redemption and To Kill a Mockingbird are the best movies I have ever seen. I do not judge it by it\'s technical merits - I don\'t really care about that. I have read that Citizen Kane or The Godfather or this or that movie is the best movie ever made. They may have the best technique or be the most influential motion pictures ever made, but not the best. The best movies are ones that touch the soul. It takes a movie like The Shawshank Redemption to touch the soul.', u'0.0728153', u"\nCan Hollywood, usually creating things for entertainment purposes only, create art?  To create something of this nature, a director must approach it in a most meticulous manner, due to the delicacy of the process.  Such a daunting task requires an extremely capable artist with an undeniable managerial capacity and an acutely developed awareness of each element of art in their films, the most prominent; music, visuals, script, and acting. These elements, each equally important, must succeed independently, yet still form a harmonious union, because this mixture determines the fate of the artist's opus.  Though already well known amongst his colleagues for his notable skills at writing and directing, Frank Darabont emerges with his feature film directorial debut, The Shawshank Redemption.  Proving himself already a master of the craft, Darabont managed to create one of the most recognizable independent releases in the history of Hollywood.  The Shawshank Redemption defines a genre, defies the odds, compels the emotions, and brings an era of artistically influential films back to Hollywood.\n\nThe story begins with the trial of a young banker, Andy Dufrense, victimized by circumstantial evidence, resulting in a conviction for the murder of his wife and her lover.  After a quick conviction, Andy finds himself serving a life sentence at Shawshank prison, with no hope of parole.  He exists in this prison only in appearance, keeping his mind free from the drab walls around him.  His ability to do this results in the gaining of respect from his fellow inmates, but most of all from Ellis Redding.  Ellis, commonly referred to as Red, finds gainful use of his entrepreneurial spirit within the drab walls of Shawshank by dealing in contraband and commodities rare to the confines of prison.  Andy's demeanor and undeniable sense of hope causes Red to take a deeper look at himself, and the world around him.  Andy proves to Red and the other inmates that in the conventional walls of Shawshank prison convention will find no home in his lifestyle.\n\nBy creating the film's firm foundation, the meticulously chiseled screenplay paved the way for this film's success.  Frank Darabont outdoes himself with the phenomenal adaptation of Stephen King's equally noteworthy novella, Rita Hayworth and Shawshank Redemption.  In this novella, King demonstrates that he can break free from the genre he dominates and still create a marvelous piece of modern literature.  Though the film mirrors the novella in many ways, Darabont illustrates a focused objective of improving upon the areas where the novella came up short, resulting in one of the best book to film transitions ever.\n\nWhile maintaining some of the poetic and moving dialogue of the novella, Darabont also proves that a film's score can generate a great deal of emotional response from its audience, as dialogue does.  He employs the cunning Thomas Newman, son of the legendary Hollywood composer, Alfred Newman.  Darabont shows recognition for the film's needs by employing Newman, who makes the gentle piano chords whisper softly to the viewer, as if a part of the scripted dialogue.  Newman lends himself to individualism and tends to drive more towards the unique in the realm of score composition.  His effort in Shawshank did not go unnoticed, as his score received an Oscar nomination in 1995.  While unique and independent, Newman's score never once intrudes on your concentration or distracts from the film.\n\nWith work from vast array of talented scene designers, costume designers, composers, cinematographers, and various other Hollywood artists, the cast of The Shawshank Redemption had a strong foundation to work with.  The marvelous cast of this film will dazzle you with some of the most convincing performances you will witness in a film.  While both Tim Robbins and Morgan Freeman shine as Andy and Red, respectively, the true spectacle of acting lies within the plethora of amazing supporting actors who easily disappear into their roles.  Most noticeable of these, the veteran film star James Whitmore, who portrays the elderly Brooks Hatlen.  Brooks, a man incarcerated for an unmentioned crime for so long that he finds himself attached to the Shawshank and the daily life he has lead.  Each of these actors show a true dedication to their art, and a focused purpose in their motivations, creating a convincing setting that never once caters to anything unbelievable.\n\nWith all of the aesthetic touches and attention to cinematic detail, the most beautiful part of the film lies within its thematic material, such as its focus on the human desires for the most abstract concepts, like hope and freedom.  These themes, which concern things the human spirit undoubtedly yearns for, seem so intricately woven into the plot that it easily draws its audience in to its story.  Though full of hardened criminals, your heart will go out to these men as they display the most basic of human emotions, and deliver some of the most quotable lines in a film to date.  Like a great novel, this film manages to succeed at greater things than simply entertaining an audience.  Darabont tells his story most masterfully, illustrating principles and inspiring his audience to think.  He leaves us a\npoignant film with a powerful message of hope, and redemption, something we all seek.\n\nThis film manages to redeem Hollywood in the eyes of people who feared it long lost in a dark sea of clich\xe9s and predictability.  Darabont shows us that artists still work in the Hollywood studios and production facilities. These artists show their capability to produce art; real art that inspires you to look at the deeper aspects of life and the world around you.  The Shawshank Redemption delivers much-needed breath of fresh air for anyone who realizes the capability of film.  It proves that masters of the craft still live on this earth, and still bless us with timeless masterpieces that we will never forget.\n", u'0.564936', u"\nI have never seen such an amazing film since I saw The Shawshank Redemption. Shawshank encompasses friendships, hardships, hopes, and dreams.  And what is so great about the movie is that it moves you, it gives you hope.  Even though the circumstances between the characters and the viewers are quite different, you don't feel that far removed from what the characters are going through.\n\nIt is a simple film, yet it has an everlasting message.  Frank Darabont didn't need to put any kind of outlandish special effects to get us to love this film, the narration and the acting does that for him.  Why this movie didn't win all seven Oscars is beyond me, but don't let that sway you to not see this film, let its ranking on the IMDb's top 250 list sway you, let your friends recommendation about the movie sway you.\n\nSet aside a little over two hours tonight and rent this movie.  You will finally understand what everyone is talking about and you will understand why this is my all time favorite movie.", u'0.332937', u'In its Oscar year, Shawshank Redemption (written and directed by Frank Darabont, after the novella Rita Hayworth and the Shawshank Redemption, by Stephen King) was nominated for seven Academy Awards, and walked away with zero. Best Picture went to Forrest Gump, while Shawshank and Pulp Fiction were "just happy to be nominated." Of course hindsight is 20/20, but while history looks back on Gump as a good film, Pulp and Redemption are remembered as some of the all-time best. Pulp, however, was a success from the word "go," making a huge splash at Cannes and making its writer-director an American master after only two films. For Andy Dufresne and Co., success didn\'t come easy. Fortunately, failure wasn\'t a life sentence.\n\nAfter opening on 33 screens with take of $727,327, the $25M film fell fast from theatres and finished with a mere $28.3M. The reasons for failure are many. Firstly, the title is a clunker. While iconic to fans today, in 1994, people knew not and cared not what a \'Shawshank\' was. On the DVD, Tim Robbins laughs recounting fans congratulating him on "that \'Rickshaw\' movie." Marketing-wise, the film\'s a nightmare, as \'prison drama\' is a tough sell to women, and the story of love between two best friends doesn\'t spell winner to men. Worst of all, the movie is slow as molasses. As Desson Thomson writes for the Washington Post, "it wanders down subplots at every opportunity and ignores an abundance of narrative exit points before settling on its finale." But it is these same weaknesses that make the film so strong.\n\nFirstly, its setting. The opening aerial shots of the prison are a total eye-opener. This is an amazing piece of architecture, strong and Gothic in design. Immediately, the prison becomes a character. It casts its shadow over most of the film, its tall stone walls stretching above every shot. It towers over the men it contains, blotting out all memories of the outside world. Only Andy (Robbins) holds onto hope. It\'s in music, it\'s in the sandy beaches of Zihuatanejo; "In here\'s where you need it most," he says. "You need it so you don\'t forget. Forget that there are places in the world that aren\'t made out of stone. That there\'s a - there\'s a - there\'s something inside that\'s yours, that they can\'t touch." Red (Morgan Freeman) doesn\'t think much of Andy at first, picking "that tall glass o\' milk with the silver spoon up his ass" as the first new fish to crack. Andy says not a word, and losing his bet, Red resents him for it. But over time, as the two get to know each other, they quickly become the best of friends. This again, is one of the film\'s major strengths. Many movies are about love, many flicks have a side-kick to the hero, but Shawshank is the only one I can think of that looks honestly at the love between two best friends. It seems odd that Hollywood would skip this relationship time and again, when it\'s a feeling that weighs so much into everyone\'s day to day lives. Perhaps it\'s too sentimental to seem conventional, but Shawshank\'s core friendship hits all the right notes, and the film is much better for it.\n\nIt\'s pacing is deliberate as well. As we spend the film watching the same actors, it is easy to forget that the movie\'s timeline spans well over 20 years. Such a huge measure of time would pass slowly in reality, and would only be amplified in prison. And it\'s not as if the film lacks interest in these moments. It still knows where it\'s going, it merely intends on taking its sweet time getting there. It pays off as well, as the tedium of prison life makes the climax that much more exhilarating. For anyone who sees it, it is a moment never to be forgotten.\n\nWith themes of faith and hope, there is a definite religious subtext to be found here. Quiet, selfless and carefree, Andy is an obvious Christ figure. Warden Norton (Bob Gunton) is obviously modeled on Richard Nixon, who, in his day, was as close to a personified Satan as they come. But if you aren\'t looking for subtexts, the movie speaks to anyone in search of hope. It is a compelling drama, and a very moving film, perfectly written, acted and shot. They just don\'t come much better than this.\n\nOVERALL SCORE: 9.8/10 = A+ The Shawshank Redemption served as a message of hope to Hollywood as well. More than any film in memory, it proved there is life after box office. Besting Forrest and Fiction, it ran solely on strong word of mouth and became the hottest rented film of 1995. It currently sits at #2 in the IMDb\'s Top 250 Films, occasionally swapping spots with The Godfather as the top ranked film of all time -- redemption indeed. If you haven\'t seen it yet, what the hell are you waiting for? As Andy says, "It comes down a simple choice, really. Either get busy living, or get busy dying."', u'0.139743', u'The reason I became a member of this database is because I finally \r found a movie ranking that recognized the true greatness of this movie. There \r is nary a word or scene out of place in the entire thing. Every element \r comes together to form an exquisite story for cinema. \r \r\nI believe that one reason that this movie is under-appreciated is that \r people have not seen it multiple times. On first viewing it is the story of \r Andy Dufresne and his struggle to maintain hope despite his circumstances. \r \r\nHowever, this is really a movie about Red and his struggle to find \r meaning and purpose. The final segment of the movie testifies to the fact that the final resolution of the story comes about only when Red is faced with the same fearful situation as Brooks. Because of Andy, Red can find a\r different path-the path of freedom that is lit by hope.\r \r\nWho is your Andy Dufresne?', u'0.101671', u'\nI believe that this film is the best story ever told on film, and I\'m about to tell you why.\n\nTim Robbins plays Andy Dufresne, a city banker, wrongfully convicted of murdering his wife and her lover. He is sent to Shawshank Prison in 1947 and receives a double life sentence for the crime. Andy forms an unlikely friendship with "Red" (Morgan Freeman), the man who knows how to get things. Andy faces many trials in prison, but forms an alliance with the wardens because he is able to use his banking experience to help the corrupt officials amass personal fortunes. The story unfolds....\n\nI was so impressed with how every single subplot was given a great deal of respect and attention from the director. The acting was world-class. I have never seen Tim Robbins act as well since, Morgan Freeman maybe (e.g. Seven). The twists were unexpected, an although this film had a familiar feel, it wasn\'t even slightly pretentious or cliched, it was original. The cinematography was grand and expressive. It gave a real impression of the sheer magnitude of this daunting prison.\n\nBut the one thing which makes THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION stand above all other films, is the attention given to the story. The film depends on the story and the way in which it unravels. It\'s a powerful, poignant, thought-provoking, challenging film like no other. If Andy were to comment on this film, I think he might say: "Get busy watching, or get busy dying." Take his advice.\n\nThoroughly recommended.', u'0.2121', u'\nOne of my all time favorites. Shawshank Redemption is a very moving story about hope and the power of friendship. The cast is first rate with everyone giving a great performance. Tim Robbins and Morgan Freeman carry the movie, but Bob Gunton and Clancy Brown are perfect as the Warden Norton and prison guard captain Hadley respectively. And James Whitmore\'s portrail of an elderly inmate Brooks is moving. The screenplay gives almost every actor at least one or more memorable lines through out the film. As well as a very surprising "twist" near the end that almost knocked me out of my chair. If you have not seen this movie rent it or better yet buy it. As I bet you\'ll want to see this one more than once.', u'0.303163', u'\nOne of the finest films made in recent years. It\'s a poignant story about hope. Hope gets me. That\'s what makes a film like this more than a movie. It tells a lesson about life. Those are the films people talk about 50 or even 100 years from you. It\'s also a story for freedom. Freedom from isolation,  from rule, from bigotry and hate. Freeman and Robbins are majestic in their performances. Each learns from the other. Their relationship is strong and you feel that from the first moment they make contact with one another. There is also a wonderful performance from legend James Whitmore as Brooks.\n\nHe shines when it is his time to go back into the world, only to find that the world grew up so fast he never even got a chance to blink. Stephen King\'s story is brought to the screen with great elegance and excitement. It is an extraordinary motion that people "will" be talking about in  50 or 100 years.  ', u'0.391415', u"Misery and Stand By Me were the best adaptations up until this one, now you can add Shawshank to that list.\n\nThis is simply one of the best films ever made and I know I am not the first to say that and I certainly won't be the last. The standing on the IMDb is a true barometer of that. #3 as of this date and I'm sure it could be number 1. So I'll just skip all the normal praise of the film because we all know how great it is. But let me perhaps add that what I find so fascinating about Shawshank is that Stephen King wrote it.\n\nKing is one of the best writers in the world. Books like IT and the Castle Rock series are some of the greatest stories ever told. But his best adaptations are always done by the best directors. The Shining was brilliantly interpreted by Kubrick and of course the aforementioned Misery and Stand By Me are both by Rob Reiner. Now Frank Darabont comes onto the scene and makes arguably the best King film ever. He seems to understand what King wants to say and he conveys that beautifully. \n\nWhat makes this film one of the best ever made is the message it conveys. It is one of eternal hope. Andy Dufresne, played by Tim Robbins, has been sent to prison for a crime he did not commit. But he never loses hope. He never gives up his quest to become a free man again. His years of tenacity, patience and wits keep him not only sane, but it gives his mind and a spirit a will to live. This film has a different feel to it. There has never been anything like it before and I don't know if there will again.\n\nI'm not going to say any more about this film, it has already been said, but just suffice to say that I am glad that Forrest Gump won best picture in 94. I would have been equally glad if Pulp Fiction or Shawshank would have won. It is that good of a movie and one that will be appreciated for years to come.", u'0.557774', u'\nThe Shawshank Redemption is without a doubt one of the most brilliant movies I have ever seen. Similar to The Green Mile in many respects (and better than it in almost all of them), these two movies have shown us that Stephen King is a master not only of horror but also of prose that shakes the soul and moves the heart. The plot is average, but King did great things with it in his novella that are only furthered by the direction, and the acting is so top-rate it\'s almost scary.\n\nTim Robbins plays Andy Dufrane, wrongly imprisoned for 20 years for the murder of his wife. The story focuses on Andy\'s relationship with "Red" Redding (Morgan Freeman, in probably his best role) and his attempts to escape from Shawshank. Bob Gunton is positively evil and frightening as Warden Norton, and there are great performances and cameos all around; the most prominent one being Gil Bellows (late as Billy of Ally McBeal) as Tommy, a fellow inmate of Andy\'s who suffers under the iron will of Norton.\n\nIf you haven\'t seen this movie, GO AND RENT IT NOW. You will not be disappointed. It is positively the best movie of the \'90\'s, and one of my Top 3 of all time. This movie is a spectacle to move the mind, soul, and heart. 10/10', u'0.108792', u'This movie is not your ordinary Hollywood flick. It has a great and deep message. This movie has a foundation and just kept on being built on from their and that foundation is hope.\n\nOther than just the message of this movie the acting was phenomenal. Tim Robbins gave one of the greatest performances ever. He was inspiring, intelligent and most of all positive. His performance just made me smile. Robbins plays Andy Dufresne who was wrongfully convicted of murdering his wife and her lover. He is gets to life sentences but yet never gives up hope. In he becomes friends with Ellis Boyd "Red" Redding played by Morgan Freeman. Freeman who gives the finest performance of his career has unlike Robbins lost hope. He is in deep regret of the crime that he committed. His way of deflecting the pain away is by trying to not feel anything at all. With his friendship with Andy he learns that without our hopes and dreams we have nothing. Andy also becomes friends with the rest of Red\'s group. James Whitmore also gave a great performance as Brooks Halten who gets out of prison parole but in the words of Red he has been "institutionalized". \n\nThe directing by Frank Darabont was just magnificent. He kept this movie at a great steady pace along with the writing and great cinematography. He portrayed prison life in such a horrifying way, but not in terms of the physical pain but the stress and pain that wares mentally on the inmates, some of which deserve a second chance. \n\nWhatever you do, don\'t listen to the people who say this movie is overrated because this is one of the most inspiring and greatest movies ever. It has everything you could possibly want.', u'0.183172', u'\nWhenever I talk about this movie with my friends, I do not even refer to it by title, but rather as "The Movie".  When I say "The Movie", my friends know exactly what I\'m talking about.  In fact the main reason that me and my friends don\'t refer to it by title is because this movie is so great, that we do not feel worthy enough to say it\'s name in vain! I still remember the first time I saw The Shawshank Redemption.  Some friends of mine and I went to see it at one of those "Budget Theaters" over the summer of 1995.  None of us really knew anything about the movie, but we had heard that it was pretty good.  So, not having any real expectations, we saw it.  When the final credits rolled and the lights came on in the theater, all of us just sat there with our jaws hanging down on the floor. I turned my head towards my friend Bob and said "That was the greatest movie I have ever seen in my entire life!" There\'s really no other way I can put it in words.  Every moment of this movie captivated me and inspired me to believe in the one true thing in life...... "HOPE".  This movie is sad, uplifting, inspiring, harsh, cold, funny (at the right times), jaw-dropping, and heart-warming all at the same time.  I get chills every time I watch this film and this film contains the greatest ending (which takes place over the last 30 minutes or so)in movie history!  How it all just "comes together" is so incredible and uplifting. I should also mention the music in this movie is nearly flawless as well, and the soundtrack is a "must buy" for any music fan. The only bad thing about this movie is the fact that I know I will never see a better movie, no matter how many I may see.  I\'ve seen many movies over the past few years, many excellent films.  However, every time I walk out of the theater, I turn to my friend or family member that I saw it with and I say, "That was a great movie, but it wasn\'t nearly as good as \'you know what\'!"  There have been many movies over the past few years that thought would really move me or that I might one day call my "favorite of all time", but they\'ve all fallen far short of "The Shawshank Redemption". So, if you have yet to see this movie, please run to the video store immediately.  You\'re guaranteed to find it in the "employee picks" section. And if it isn\'t in that section, then you should tell the employees there that there is something seriously wrong with them.  If you have seen this movie, go see it again.  If you haven\'t bought your own copy yet, buy one. In fact buy two, and put one in a fire-proof safe, just in case of an emergency. :o) So, you want a 1-10 rating???  I give it a 13!!!!!!\n\n', u'0.183461', u'I\'m trying to save you money; this is the last film title that you should consider borrowing. Renting Shawshank will cost you five bucks... just plunk down the $25 and own the title. You\'ll wind up going back to this gem time and time again. This is one of few movies that are truly timeless. And it\'s entertaining and moving, no matter how many times you view it.\n\nForget about what others (including myself) might suggest you\'ll discover in "The Shawshank Redemption;" when you watch it, you\'ll identify something very personal in your own life with a scene, a character, or a moment in this uncomplicated movie. When you need hope, you\'ll look for Shawshank. When you want to believe in the will of overcoming even the greatest obstacles, Shawshank will uplift you in ways that you can\'t find in movies today. \n\nSome liken the film to some kind of spiritual awakening. Of course, some can go to a church or mosque to find enlightenment and Faith in humanity, but most places of worship are open only certain days or times. But when you need affirmation of the lasting bond of friendships that prevail over the most dire circumstances, Shawshank will give it to you. It makes grown men (like me) cry, still. I wonder whether Shawshank was truly meant for viewing in the privacy of the home, because it is a personal experience that really makes you look inward. Nominated for seven, this is the best film that never one a single Oscar. \n\nHow ironic that an innocent man winds up being surrounded by the corruption of the legal system. Shawshank itself is similar to the character of Andy Dufresne. Prejudging this classic film, critics couldn\'t get past the title. The public followed suit, initially dismissing Shawshank, which failed in the box office just like "It\'s a Wonderful Life" and "Citizen Kane." It could have just whithered away on the store shelves, like Andy Dufresne could have in his own cell. But the characters prevailed, because Andy -- And Shawshank -- stayed true. Now, these movies are right up there as the most popular films of all time. \n\nAnyone who has yet to watch Shawshank may be so jaded of movies, or the film\'s title, or how a 2-1/2- hour movie set inside the walls of a prison can manage to tap the soul of such a wide range of people. Shawshank has not one explosion. I wonder if it even has a single special effect or digitally- enhanced frame. \n\nBut every aspect of Shawshank fit together. The acting from the top to the bit part. The musical score. The editing. The photography. The story, from opening credits to final scene. All involved, including the town of Mansfield, Ohio (where Shawshank was actually filmed) played their roles perfectly. Shawshank is a must- see, must- own title.', u'0.179076', u'The Shawshank Redemption is written and directed by Frank Darabont. It is an adaptation of the Stephen King novella Rita Hayworth and Shawshank Redemption. Starring Tim Robbins and Morgan Freeman, the film portrays the story of Andy Dufresne (Robbins), a banker who is sentenced to two life sentences at Shawshank State Prison for apparently murdering his wife and her lover. Andy finds it tough going but finds solace in the friendship he forms with fellow inmate, Ellis "Red" Redding (Freeman) . While things start to pick up when the warden finds Andy a prison job more befitting his talents as a banker. However, the arrival of another inmate is going to vastly change things for all of them.\n\nThere was no fanfare or bunting put out for the release of the film back in 94, with a title that didn\'t give much inkling to anyone about what it was about-and with Columbia Pictures unsure how to market it, Shawshank Redemption barely registered at the box office. However, come Academy Award time the film received several nominations, and although it won none, it stirred up interest in the film for its home entertainment release. The rest, as they say, is history. For the film finally found an audience that saw the film propelled to almost mythical proportions as an endearing modern day classic. Something that has delighted its fans, whilst simultaneously baffling its detractors. One thing is for sure, tho, is that which ever side of the Shawshank fence you sit on, the film continues to gather new fans and simply will never go away.\n\nIt\'s possibly the simplicity of it all that sends some haters of the film into cinematic spasms. The implausible plot and an apparent sentimental edge that makes a nonsense of prison life, are but two chief complaints from those that dislike the film with a passion. But when characters are this richly drawn, and so movingly performed, it strikes me as churlish to do down a human drama that\'s dealing in hope, friendship and faith. The sentimental aspect is indeed there, but that acts as a counterpoint to the suffering, degradation and shattering of the soul involving our protagonist. Cosy prison life you say? No chance. The need for human connection is never more needed than during incarceration, surely? And given the quite terrific performances of Robbins (never better) & Freeman (sublimely making it easy), it\'s the easiest thing in the world to warm to Andy and Red.\n\nThose in support aren\'t faring too bad either. Bob Gunton is coiled spring smarm as Warden Norton, James Whitmore is heart achingly great as the "Birdman Of Shawshank," Clancy Brown is menacing as antagonist Capt. Byron Hadley, William Sadler amusing as Heywood & Mark Rolston is impressively vile as Bogs Diamond. Then there\'s Roger Deakins\' lush cinematography as the camera gracefully glides in and out of the prison offering almost ethereal hope to our characters (yes, they are ours). The music pings in conjunction with the emotional flow of the movie too. Thomas Newman\'s score is mostly piano based, dovetailing neatly with Andy\'s state of mind, while the excellently selected soundtrack ranges from the likes of Hank Williams to the gorgeous Le Nozze di Figaro by Mozart.\n\nIf you love Shawshank then it\'s a love that lasts a lifetime. Every viewing brings the same array of emotions-anger-revilement-happiness-sadness-inspiration and a warmth that can reduce the most hardened into misty eyed wonderment. Above all else, tho, Shawshank offers hope; not just for characters in a movie, but for a better life and a better world for all of us. 10/10', u'0.221065', u'At the heart of this extraordinary movie is a brilliant and indelible performance by Morgan Freeman as Red, the man who knows how to get things, the "only" guilty man at Shawshank prison. He was nominated by the Academy for Best Actor in 1995 but didn\'t win. (Tom Hanks won for Forrest Gump.) What Freeman does so beautifully is to slightly underplay the part so that the eternal boredom and cynicism of the lifer comes through, and yet we can see how very much alive with the warmth of life the man is despite his confinement. Someday Morgan Freeman is going to win an Academy Award and it will be in belated recognition for this performance, which I think was a little too subtle for some Academy members to fully appreciate at the time.\n\nBut Freeman is not alone. Tim Robbins plays the hero of the story, banker Andy Dufresne, who has been falsely convicted of murdering his wife and her lover. Robbins has a unique quality as an actor in that he lends ever so slightly a bemused irony to the characters he plays. It is as though part of him is amused at what he is doing. I believe this is the best performance of his career, but it might be compared with his work in The Player (1992), another excellent movie, and in Mystic River (2003) for which he won an Oscar as Best Supporting Actor.\n\nIt is said that every good story needs a villain, and in the Bible-quoting, Bible-thumping, massively hypocritical, sadistic Warden Samuel Norton, played perfectly by Bob Gunton, we have a doozy. I want to tell you that Norton is so evil that fundamentalist Christians actually hate this movie because of how precisely his vile character is revealed. They also hate the movie because of its depiction of violent, predatory homosexual behavior (which is the reason the movie is rated R). On the wall of his office (hiding his safe with its ill-gotten contents and duplicitous accounts) is a framed plaque of the words "His judgment cometh and that right soon." The irony of these words as they apply to the men in the prison and ultimately to the warden himself is just perfect. You will take delight, I promise.\n\nHere is some other information about the movie that may interest you. As most people know, it was adapted from a novella by Stephen King entitled "Rita Hayworth and the Shawshank Redemption." Rita Hayworth figures in the story because Red procures a poster of her for Andy that he pins up on the wall of his cell. The poster is a still from the film Gilda (1946) starring her and Glenn Ford. We see a clip from the black and white film as the prisoners watch, cheering and hollering when Rita Hayworth appears. If you haven\'t seen her, check out that old movie. She really is gorgeous and a forerunner of Marilyn Monroe, who next appears on Andy\'s wall in a still from The Seven Year Itch (1955). It\'s the famous shot of her in which her skirt is blown up to reveal her shapely legs. Following her on Andy\'s wall (and, by the way, these pinups figure prominently in the plot) is Rachel Welsh from One Million Years B.C. (1966). In a simple and effective device these pinups show us graphically how long Andy and Red have been pining away.\n\nFrank Darabont\'s direction is full of similar devices that clearly and naturally tell the story. There is Brooks (James Whitmore) who gets out after fifty years but is so institutionalized that he can\'t cope with life on the outside and hangs himself. Playing off of this is Red\'s periodic appearance before the parole board where his parole is summarily REJECTED. Watch how this plays out at the end.\n\nThe cinematography by Roger Deakins is excellent. The editing superb: there\'s not a single dead spot in the whole movie. The difference between the good guys (Red, Andy, Brooks, etc.) and the bad guys (the warden, the guards, the "sisters," etc.) is perhaps too starkly drawn, and perhaps Andy is a bit too heroic and determined beyond what might be realistic, and perhaps the "redemption" is a bit too miraculous in how beautifully it works out. But never mind. We love it.\n\nAll in all this is a great story vividly told that will leave you with a true sense of redemption in your soul. It is not a chick flick, and that is an understatement. It is a male bonding movie about friendship and the strength of character, about going up against what is wrong and unfair and coming out on top through pure true grit and a little luck.\n\nBottom line: one of the best ever made, currently rated #2 (behind The Godfather) at the IMDb. Don\'t miss it.\n\n(Note: Over 500 of my movie reviews are now available in my book "Cut to the Chaise Lounge or I Can\'t Believe I Swallowed the Remote!" Get it at Amazon!)', u'0.174359'], u'tt0038650': [u"Honestly, I don't think I've ever seen anything quite like It's A Wonderful Life. \n\nDoes it take me back to that place in my heart, that makes me long for everything that once was great and it could be again? Does it remind me of my childhood, Christmas in my home? No. Maybe it's just simply what I always wanted from life and every man I want to be. \n\nEverything about this film is well for lack of better words, perfect. No question to it any longer, the best performance by an actor I have ever seen. It's more than just beautiful, timeless or fair. All of Stewart is revealed. Everything coming together for Capra. Lionel Barrymore at his best, which seems to be his worst. \n\nSometimes I think there is a reason why somethings happen. And I'm pretty sure there is some magical reason why this film was made. I'm 27 years old and saw it for the first time Christmas Eve of this year. I've watched it 3 times since. The only movie to ever make me cry. I probably wouldn't have all the answers for you, if you asked me why. I'm still trying to figure Stewart out and just how beautiful was Reed.\n\nWhat can I say? This movie is a life changing experience. \n\nMakes me feel good to be alive. What a wonderful little world it is. And if I waited my entire life, it would not be a waste of time.", u'0.144697', u'\nI am a film lover from \'way back, having even served a stint as a newspaper movie critic. Entries in my personal list of Greatest Films of All Time include "Fantasia," "To Kill A Mockingbird," "Casablanca," "Singin\' in the Rain," "North by Northwest," and "The Sound of Music. But sitting atop all of them, as undisputed champ, is "It\'s a Wonderful Life."\n\nI have seen it hundreds of times (dating back to, oh, when I was a teenager I suppose, and our local PBS station ran it as part of a pledge drive). I drive my wife and family to distraction when we watch it together because I quote all the dialogue along with the actors.\n\nI cry every time--and this is after viewing upon viewing--when Harry Bailey toasts his big brother George as "...the richest man in town." The emotions in that scene are so true and pure that I can\'t help but be affected by them.\n\nThe performances are unparalleled. Stewart is brilliant as a small-town dreamer who loses and finds his way. His superlative acting abilities cause us to identify strongly with him (how many of us have lamented--even to ourselves--that no one seems to notice the sacrifices we\'ve made?), which is, I think, why the movie bears up under so many repeat viewings. Reed is just lovely here, the epitome of sunny girlfriend, caring lover, devoted wife, dedicated mother.\n\nCapra\'s talent as a screenwriter are all over this script. He knows just how hard to tug the heartstrings without becoming overblown or phony. And his technical wizardry is evident too. I\'ve never seen--before or since--more natural-looking onscreen snow.\n\nWatching IAWL has become a tonic, a pick-me-up when I really need one--whether it\'s the Christmas season or not. Its message--that each one of us is important and has *something* to contribute to the greater good--is one about which the world could use some reminding from time to time.\n', u'0.120428', u"\nNo movie ever made has influenced me more than this classic. I had the honor of doing a play version of it about 5 years ago. I had seen the film thousands of times, had loved it, but I never really knew what it meant. During the course of the production, I suddenly felt alive. I felt that I wasn't having enough fun. I felt that I wasn't doing enough in my life. Crazy things, like kissing my mother or my father. I hadn't really hugged one of them in a while. It makes you think. It's more of a thinking person's film than a mere Christmas film. If you think it's just a Christmas film, I insist you watch it again and again, until you get the message.\n\nStewart gives the finest performance of his career, in one of the most difficult characters ever portrayed. A character all of us are familiar with...a person looking to find himself/herself. It's the great struggle for finding what it is in life you really want to do. George Bailey teaches us so lessons throughout the film and in the end he teaches us the most important lesson of all, that life, although a long and winding road, truly is (for lack of a better word) wonderful...\n\n\n", u'0.0319968', u"\n\nThis film has become a Christmas tradition in my family.  We watch it every year and never tire of it.  Frank Capra is a master of creating films with a message that reinforce strong values.  This is probably his greatest film in that regard.  Both he and Stewart have publicly stated that this is their favorite film.\n\nThe message in this film is one of courage and sacrifice for the greater good as George Bailey, a man with big ideas about seeing the world, continually forsakes his own desires to do what is right for the town.  The second message is that each life important.  No matter how insignificant we feel we are, we are all inextricably linked to each other and play an important part in the fabric of one another's lives.\n\nCapra's direction is brilliant.  His genius is bringing human stories to life in a ways that not only make a point, but that totally involve the audience in the lives of the characters.  He is always extremely optimistic about the human condition.  He is known for testing his characters with overwhelming adversity to make them struggle to triumph in a way that causes the world to change and the character to grow.  For this reason his films were always crowd pleasers and this film was the best of all in that regard.\n\nLed by Capra's understanding hand, the actors all did a magnificent job.  Stewart's wide-eyed enthusiasm and boyish charm, coupled with an unbending strength of character made him the perfect folk hero.  Donna Reed was lovely and charming and attained the right balance between being supportive and inspirational.  The romantic chemistry between her and Stewart was subtle and charming.  Lionel Barrymore was towering as the greedy old skinflint who was trying to take over the town.  Thomas Mitchell plays one of my favorite characters, as the bumbling Uncle Billy in probably his most memorable role.\n\nThis film is number eleven on AFI's list of best films of the century.  It was nominated for five academy awards and won none.  It was swept in 1947 by `The Best Years of Our Lives', a great film that won seven Oscars that year but in my opinion was the lesser film.  History has corrected that minor injustice by rendering `It's a Wonderful Life' an enduring classic that is viewed and loved by generation after generation.  Of course, I rated it a 10/10.  I can't wait to see it again this Christmas.\n", u'0.663484', u'\nAfter strong performances in films such as "Mr Smith Goes to Washington" and "The Philadelphia Story", James Stewart confirmed his status as one of the greats with his performance as George Bailey in "It\'s a Wonderful Life". This movie is, without a doubt, the best of all time.\n\n"It\'s a Wonderful Life" is a movie that you can watch over and over again. It\'s movie that makes you think, about life in general and how each person makes a difference, and about how great life can be (hence the title "It\'s a\nWonderful Life). Whilst making you think, it also entertains with many light hearted moments, particularly towards the end of the film.\n\n\nThe direction, sound and casting in "It\'s a Wonderful Life" are second to none.  Yet it is the fact that almost any person can watch this movie and come away feeling inspired that makes it easily the best movie of all time!\n\nA 10/10 without a doubt!', u'0.671448', u'I am so glad Frank Capra had a vision to make "It\'s A Wonderful Life". I\'m glad he chose Jimmy Stewart to play George Bailey. There are some little gems in life that help make life pleasant. It is not officially the Christmas season without watching this little gem. The supporting cast is perfectly matched. Donna Reed is wonderful as well as all the characters of the town. This would be a great movie, even if it were not in a Christmas setting. The holiday flavor makes it even more charming and memorable. A angel trying to get his wings is a little far-fetched, but Capra pulls it off. The impact of living a good life cannot be underestimated. What would life be like for your family if you had never been born? Our actions do speak loudly. In an age of 9-11, we need this movie more than ever. The values of "It\'s A Wonderful Life" still hold true today. Yes, I\'ll say it, it\'s a wonderful movie.', u'0.443023', u"\nThis is one of the best films of all time, without a doubt. I challenge anyone to watch this film and not be touched, if you can, you have no heart!\n\nJames Stewart is one of my favourite actors, and in this film he acts so naturally you even forget he's an actor playing a part, you really believe his story. You're pulled on a roller coaster of emotions throughout this film, and by no means is this a light hearted look at life, as many believe. This is not a rose tinted look at the wonderful life we have, this is a dark, downtrodden start to a film where the lead character is about to commit suicide.\n\nHowever, it is a beautiful film, and is one of the few that you can watch again and again and walk away with the same glowing feeling as you did when you first watched it.", u'0.272364', u'\nHere\'s a new definition of cold-hearted: a man or woman who remains completely untouched by the 1946 Capra classic "It\'s a Wonderful Life". You can\'t not be moved by this wonderful little gem.\n\nThe acting is all great. One of the film\'s greatest strengths for me is making George Bailey - the star of the movie played by James Stewart - a nice normal man. He\'s not perfect and that\'s pretty much essential to the film\'s success because Bailey could be *any* man. The lesson of the movie is fairly simple - we all have our role to play in the world and we are all important. Most movies would make this into a schmaltzy affair but Capra delivered a touching, heart warming tale. Bailey consistently denies himself to allow others to live as he sacrifices his life to make sure people can have enough money to avoid having to sell-their-soul in debt to the evil H. Potter (alas not a Harry Potter...). His complete and utter humility is great - he doesn\'t see how much he accomplished until his guardian angel Clarence shows him. Again Clarence isn\'t played in the usual clich\xe9d manner but more as a believable character who honestly loves Bailey for his strengths.\n\nThe movie is a success because you can\'t but want Bailey to succeed. The manner in which he does could be classified as corny but, because it\'s so deserved, that doesn\'t matter. The music, the set pieces, all the touches add to a wonderful movie and give you hope that life can indeed also be wonderful. A lovely mood-lifter. 8.8/10.\n', u'0.596929', u'I\'ve always thought that the reason It\'s A Wonderful Life has had such enduring popularity is that more than in any other film it shows what can be the value of a single individual and the contribution to the greater good they can make.\n\nGeorge Bailey as portrayed by James Stewart is the kind of every man hero we can all identify with. He\'s got the every day problems to be sure, raising and providing for a family, but he\'s got bigger problems than that. Fate has made him the rallying point of opposition in his small town of Bedford Falls to the "richest and meanest man in town", embodied in Lionel Barrymore.\n\nIt\'s a real David vs. Goliath battle. Barrymore seems to have unlimited resources at his disposal. Samuel S. Hinds as Peter Bailey put it so well to him in asking what are you doing all this for? Barrymore does have more money than he could ever possibly use. A little charity wouldn\'t hurt him.\n\nRemember the basic plot outline. A whole lot of people in Bedford Falls one post World War II Christmas Eve see that their friend George is toting a heavy load of mysterious origins. Their prayers reach the heavens where an angel is dispatched to aid.\n\nBut before Henry Travers the angel arrives, he\'s given the story of George Bailey\'s life. And we see the kind of struggles he\'s had, the sacrifices he\'s made for the good of a whole lot of others. We\'ve also seen a greedy and grasping Potter, grabbing everything that George Bailey cannot save. \n\nSomething happens that day before Christmas through no fault of his own, Bailey is in big trouble. It\'s driven him to the brink of despair. That\'s why the angel is sent down. He shows him the alternate universe that would have been had he never existed. It\'s something each and every one of us should try to do, step outside ourselves see just what our contributions can be.\n\nBut I think what Frank Capra is trying to say in this greatest of his films is that having done that and we realize we haven\'t contributed to the greater good of humankind, we resolve to do so. It\'s a simple, but profound lesson.\n\nWhat if Potter got the same opportunity? In a sense Charles Dickens did just that in A Christmas Carol. Would Lionel Barrymore change? It\'s an interesting point of speculation.\n\nIn addition to those cast members already mentioned a whole group of players who worked with Capra before grace this film. Add to that some others and you have a perfectly cast feature picture.\n\nDonna Reed has an interesting part as well. Your choice of mate is real important in life. Had she not been as loving and supportive to George Bailey, he might very well have taken a different route in life. Mary Hatch Bailey became a signature part for her, more identified than her role in From Here to Eternity which got her an Oscar. It certainly was the basis for her TV series.\n\nWhen Todd Karns who plays Harry Bailey toasts his brother he\'s saying that the riches of the world are not necessarily things that can be quantified. Your life is not measured in material things, but in how you use the material things given you. \n\nAnd that universal lesson will be taught into eternity as long as It\'s A Wonderful Life is shown every year. Wouldst we all learn it.', u'0.237611', u'\nNo other film comes anywhere near to getting people to find out what things would have been like if an event had or had not taken place - Groundhog Day comes close (my second favourite) and Sliding Doors tries.\n\nFor sheer emotion this film has the lot. I have watched it over 40 times now and I still get tearful towards the end of the film. If anyone wants to find out why life is worth living, this is the one to watch.', u'-0.00723833', u'Review edited and therefore quite choppy due to maximum word limit. \r \r\nHas there ever been a truer and more heartfelt character than George \r Bailey? This is a man whose life is one of great significance, but he, \r like all of us, does not always realize that this is so. He does not \r recognize his impact on the world until an angel erases his existence \r like chalk on a board. It is then that he is hit by the fact that one \r man\'s failing life isn\'t always as inconsequential as it may seem.\r \r\nWe all remember when Clarence (Henry Travers) first appears on that \r snowy bridge and saves George Bailey (James Stewart) from committing \r suicide. He explains nonchalantly that he is an angel and George is \r incredulous--until Clarence wipes away his entire past. His mother \r doesn\'t recognize him. George tells her about his uncle as a source of \r belief. She states that his uncle has been dead for some time, now.\r \r\nThe best scene in the entire film is that following when George is \r thrown out by his mother. He runs towards the camera in an intense wide \r shot, his face registering emotions of fear, horror, and ultimately the \r horrid understanding of what has happened. This role is the highlight \r of James Stewart\'s career--he never came anywhere close to the superb \r performance he gives in this movie. There is a reason it was his \r favorite film he ever starred in.\r \r\nStewart\'s portrayal of George Bailey is the grown image of all of us: \r As a child he dreamed of nothing but exotic locations and adventurous \r travels to foreign lands. But now he is a family man, a father and a \r husband. He has left behind his silly bachelor notions, but they still \r come back to haunt him. Bailey owns the town savings and loan, left to \r him by his father. The cranky Mr. Potter (Lionel Barrymore) wants \r complete monopoly over the town, and all that stands in his way is \r Bailey and his little bank. But Bailey, an inner disgust and hatred \r towards Potter brewing since his childhood days, refuses to cave in and \r give it all away.\r \r\nThen one day, George\'s absentminded and quite eccentric uncle (Thomas \r Mitchell), misplaces a large sum of money, leaving George hopeless and \r Potter with a serious advantage. After blowing up at his wife (Donna \r Reed) and kids at home, George gets drunk at a local bar, is scorned at \r by a schoolteacher\'s wife, and left dazed and confused, walking through \r the snowy town at night during the happy Christmas season without a \r hope in the world. Battered and delirious, thinking back over his \r apparently pointless and wasted life, he contemplates suicide. He prays \r to God and wishes that he had never existed. Which is why Clarence \r comes down from heaven to sort things out and answer his prayer.\r \r\nEssentially bombing at the box office when it was first released, and \r then proceeding to fall into copyright problems for years, "It\'s a \r Wonderful Life" resurfaced only years later when it was brought back \r into the public domain circa 1970. When other channels were airing \r expensive Hollywood movies during the Christmas season, PBS picked up \r the film and played it as a counter attack, a weak hope prevailing in \r them that the classic film buffs out there would tune in. They did. And \r so did families across the nation. Every year the ratings got stronger \r and stronger and now, almost sixty years following the movie\'s initial \r release, it is considered a holiday tradition.\r \r\nGeorge considers suicide as a way of escaping his problems without \r really thinking over the possible outcomes given his final choice. He \r looks back upon his life as wasted potential; he wanted to become an \r adventurer, break his family\'s small-town tradition and become \r something huge. Mentally scanning his life to the point in time when he \r stands on that bridge, George Bailey believes that he has simply and \r truly created a waste of space. He\'s ready to end his (assumed) \r pointless life when his entire point of view is wholly altered by the \r power of God. George suddenly realizes that though he never lived out \r his boyhood fantasies, he did so much more than he ever dreamed of. He \r saved his brother\'s life, which resulted in a huge impact in later \r years; he made an influence in the lives of others and brought peace \r and harmony to an otherwise small town by prevailing at the requests of \r Mr. Potter; he married a beautiful wife and had children, all of whom \r will no doubt have some measure of significance later in the world. And \r his wish on that bridge was that he had never been born.\r \r\nOften I am asked to name my favorite movie, and though I ignore \r requests and state that I have not seen every existing movie and \r therefore my judgment carries no significance, I have the lightest \r whimsy that "It\'s a Wonderful Life" may be my favorite motion picture \r to date. I cherish few other films just as close, but to me, "It\'s a \r Wonderful Life" is more moving than "Casablanca," a better study of one \r man\'s life than "Citizen Kane," and a movie that will live on in the \r hearts and memory of viewers long after we are gone. I believe that \r this is the definitive Americana motion picture, regardless of how I \r compare it to my other favorites, which may carry the same weight but \r not the same true significance. Few films come as close to the heart as \r "It\'s a Wonderful Life." And few films come as close to "It\'s a \r Wonderful Life" at all, for that matter.\r \r\n5/5.', u'-0.0242885', u"When I heard about this movie for the first time, I thought it was just a forgettable and funny movie. But I was wrong. I saw this movie last Christmas and I did not find it funny, but I loved it, though! Everything is so great in this movie. The story is amazing. The characters are great, and the character's development is fantastic! the cinematography is grea, and the acting is fantastic. James Stewart was mind blowing. The whole movie is amazing,touching and encouraging. You cannot describe how good this movie is. Nor can you describe how good the message is.\n\nThis is the best feel-good movie ever. It's a life changing movie, actually. It makes you feel good to be alive. Do me a favor and watch this movie as soon as possible! When you're sad, think about the message this movie delivers, because you will get a smile on your face! I'm 14 years old. My English is not very good, but I hope this review was useful!", u'0.394321', u'\nI just re-watched this film with my family as an annual Christmas tradition (first time on DVD though). I have to say, despite the 10-11 times i\'ve seen this, it still holds up with magnificent strength and emotion. The scenes where Bailey has "never been born" with Clarence the angle and the triumphant concluding scene in Stewart\'s house where all his friends come to his aid are famous beyond comparison, but still are mesmerizing and emotional. What often is overlooked is the mountain of great dialogue in this film. Barrymore and Stewart have so many great lines-"I\'m and old man and most people hate me, but I don\'t like them either"; "Oh, why don\'t you stop annoying people!"; "Is it too much to ask that people can live their lives with a few nice rooms and a bath and not have to live in your slums? We need this run-down old building just so there can be somewhere people can go and not crawl to Potter." Jimmy Stewart gives one of THE performances of all time as the ultimate put-upon good guy George Bailey. All he wants to do is get out of Bedford Falls, travel the world and go to college. But, because of a string of coincidences and occurences where George puts others above himself, he ends up never leaving the town. Donna Reed is his loving wife Mary, who waits around for George to realize that he loves her. This situation leads to one of the most touching and romantic scenes on film, where as the plastic magnate Sam Wainwright talks to George and Mary on the same phone, they look into each other\'s eyes and you see the what they truly feel for eachother. George grabs Mary, saying "I don\'t wanna get married to anyone anywhere at anytime", but he is cut off in the middle of his speech by the emotion, and they embrace. Rob Reiner claims he can\'t watch or discuss this scene without tearing up. How Stewart and Reed didn\'t win Oscars for this scene alone is unthinkable. Also, Lionel Barrymore is great as the evil Mr. Potter (with his wheelchair pilot/crony, Potter is the predecessor to everyone from the Beatles "Mean Mr. Mustard" to Mr. Burns on "The Simpsons")-who you believe is just a mean old man at the beginning, but then when he gives his final major speech to Stewart you realize what a twisted and cruel monster he truly is. The director, Frank Capra, must also be given credit when praising this film. He directs the actors and frames them in such a way that the true relationships and actions between them are so much more meaningful. He really knew what he was doing when making this film. The make-up and lighting department also successfully show the wear of 18 years on the principle actors-this movie takes place with the same actors from the period of 1928-1946, and Reed\'s and Stewart\'s make-up jobs are extremely convincing. Some great moments: The close-ups of Stewarts face when 1.) He lears if he doesn\'t take over the Bailey Building and Loan, the board of trustees will vote with Potter and drive the institution out of business, and 2.) In the fantasy scenes, where he runs away from "Ma Bailey\'s Boarding House" and realizes that not even his own mother regognizes him. The speech Bailey gives condemning Mr. Potter after Pa Bailey\'s death and Potter\'s appeal to liquidate the Building and Loan. A young George Bailey reveals to the pharmacist Mr. Gower that because he was so grief-stricken over the death of his son that he put the wrong medicine in the wrong tablet, and the look from Gower when he realizes that if not for Bailey, he would have done a terrible, terrible thing (this moment always gives me goosebumps). The look of disgust and horror on Stewart\'s face after shaking Potter\'s hand after being offered a job, then wiping his hand on his jacket-symbolising his realization that if he had agreed to work for Potter, he would have been selling his soul to the devil. This scene is followed by the wonderfully tender moment between Stewart and Reed where he stares at her in the dark as she tells him she is pregnant. Capra\'s greatest gift to the common man, "It\'s a Wonderful Life" still holds up beautifully. It is a morality tale with a timeless message that no man is poor who has friends. It\'s the ultimate happy ending, and the ultimate Christmas story.', u'0.108025', u'George Bailey is a man with goals, ambitions - a man of courage, integrity and pride. But all he has ever done his whole life is assist those in need, never for a second thinking about himself. Wanting to see the world before he sets off to college for an architect degree, he finds that he can\'t let his town crumble against the miserable, hateful, greedy and powerful \'Potter\' and so he decides to stay. His father passes away, and so he must find a way to run the \'Loans\' business that his father has kept from the mad man \'Potter\'. All goes well for Bailey - a beautiful wife, a few children and a lot of friends. Although still handing out loans like his father before him, he pursues his dream of building and constructs a home village with affordable houses despite Potter\'s mass influence on the township. Unfortunately for Bailey, things begin to point downhill following the Depression and later bankruptcy where Bailey just can\'t handle the weight of burden of all the people\'s money he cannot repay. He comes to the harrowing conclusion that he should never have been born and decides to leave his family and friends and take his own life off a bridge. But the world cannot dispose of itself such a man, so god sends an Angel on a mission to get its wings, or better yet to save George Bailey\'s life. The Angel shows George what life would have been like had he not been born at all and of what became of the people he took dearly. Miserable under Potter\'s absolute influence, the town looks like an over indulgent, over spent, money making machine. George gets a glimpse of his own powerful influence on his friends and family and realises just what a wonderful life he really had.\n\nFew films have portrayed the value (not the meaning) of life like \'It\'s a Wonderful Life\' has. In contemporary times, we have been fed with recycled stories such as "The Family Man" and "It can happen to you", but none have captured the raw beauty of life like the original, "It\'s a wonderful Life"- its success partly due to its simplicity. And it sustains your attention from start to finish due to its simple and riveting storytelling. Sets aren\'t big, the story is quite small and the film is in black and white. \n\nWhat makes this film stand taller than others is the great dialog between the characters which consistently remains on the story throughout the film and not on irrelevant topics - this is what keeps us glued to the screen (unlike with modern films, most of the dialog is blabber about nothing). The acting is superb from the whole cast, but you have got to hand it to James Stewart for one of the best performances of his career portraying the discouraged George Bailey - arguably his best performance - and one of the best performances you will see in any film. What I really love about this film is the lack of music, which gives a sense of realism to the story, like we are there with the characters in George Bailey\'s world.\n\nFrank Capra creates an unforgettable atmospheric experience that remains tattooed in your memory years after viewing. The outdated effects aside, this film has stood the test of time as a timeless classic. The direction was subtle and superb - rarely equaled and I think this film is best in Black and White, even though they already had color in 1939, seven years before this masterpiece was released.\n\nI recommend this film to anybody who feels down and depressed, sad and lonely. It really makes you think about the importance and beauty of this life in which you are living. All I can say is that I will be watching this film yearly until the day that I die due to its poignancy. A real classic in cinema history. It really is a wonderful Life!', u'0.432188', u'I once read that It\'s A Wonderful Life is the holiday gift for all time. Never a truer statement has been made about one of the most popular films to have ever been made.\n\nThe Plot is a simple one that has since been regurgitated and trundled out almost yearly it feels like. James Stewart plays George Bailey, an all round swell fella, who because of a number of life\'s circumstances finds himself forever a resident of Bedford Falls. Here he is the principal guy in the running of the family Building & Loan business. When a substantial amount of money goes missing during the run up to Christmas, Bailey finds himself at the mercy of family nemesis, and nefarious town banker, Mr. Potter {Lionel Barrymore}. But George, tipped over the edge by an incident involving the bank funds, has an idea that taking his own life would greatly improve the fortunes of his family and the family business. But as he stands at the precipice of death by suicide, George is saved by his guardian angel Clarence {Henry Travers} and given the chance to see what Bedford Falls would be like having not had George Bailey\'s influence.\n\nFew, if any, directors have rivalled Frank Capra when it comes to successfully portraying the human heart on screen. It\'s A Wonderful Life is Capra\'s masterpiece. Rightly so, it is unashamedly sentimental, but also it\'s rich with the directors faith in community spirit and a belief in the strong bond of family love. The story is loosely worked from "The Greatest Gift," a Phillip Van Doren Stern story that he had sent to his friends as a Christmas card. Aided on screen writing duties by Frances Goodrich & Albert Hackett {Dalton Trumbo is in there sometimes too}, Capra fashioned an ultimate feel good movie that is flecked by sheer darkness and disconcerting "life is tough" undertones. It\'s most likely that the more dark side of the film, and the wait for Christmas cheer, is what made It\'s A Wonderful Life a flop on its release. The film made a huge loss, tho not quite as gargantuan as many today believe, and was quickly consigned to the forgotten bin. But annual yuletide repeats on television over the following decades garnered it a cult following. A cult following that eventually swelled to a near universal one, to the point that now Christmas just wouldn\'t be the same without it. It is by definition, the ultimate comeback movie.\n\nTho all the cast are superb {special mention to Donna Reed as George\'s wife, Mary} it\'s Stewart who leads the way in the class stakes. As he drifts from homely, lovable dreamer, a man sacrificing those dreams for others to benefit. To his descent into despair and the undertaking of a nightmarish odyssey, Stewart captivates in every frame, and more telling is that he is believable with each transformation of George\'s state of mind. However, when all is said and done, it\'s with the ending that basically the film rewards those who have trusted in Capra and Jimmy. It\'s an ending warm enough to melt the coldest of hearts. So see it with someone you love {always nice to have someone else to cry with} or introduce it to the poor souls who haven\'t seen it yet. Either way, it\'s here to stay forever the timeless classic that it so most certainly is. 10/10', u'0.426968'], u'tt0110912': [u'One of the early scenes in "Pulp Fiction" features two hit-men discussing what a Big Mac is called in other countries. Their dialogue is witty and entertaining, and it\'s also disarming, because it makes these two thugs seem all too normal. If you didn\'t know better, you might assume these were regular guys having chit-chat on their way to work. Other than the comic payoff at the end of the scene, in which they use parts of this conversation to taunt their victims, their talk has no relevance to anything in the film, or to anything else, for that matter. Yet without such scenes, "Pulp Fiction" wouldn\'t be "Pulp Fiction." I get the sense that Tarantino put into the film whatever struck his fancy, and somehow the final product is not only coherent but wonderfully textured.\n\nIt\'s no wonder that fans spend so much time debating what was in the suitcase, reading far more into the story than Tarantino probably intended. The film is so intricately structured, with so many astonishing details, many of which you won\'t pick up on the first viewing, that it seems to cry out for some deeper explanation. But there is no deeper explanation. "Pulp Fiction," is, as the title indicates, purely an exercise in technique and style, albeit a brilliant and layered one. Containing numerous references to other films, it is like a great work of abstract art, or "art about art." It has all the characteristics we associate with great movies: fine writing, first-rate acting, unforgettable characters, and one of the most well-constructed narratives I\'ve ever seen in a film. But to what end? The self-contained story does not seem to have bearing on anything but itself.\n\nThe movie becomes a bit easier to understand once you realize that it\'s essentially a black comedy dressed up as a crime drama. Each of the three main story threads begins with a situation that could easily form the subplot of any standard gangster movie. But something always goes wrong, some small unexpected accident that causes the whole situation to come tumbling down, leading the increasingly desperate characters to absurd measures. Tarantino\'s originality stems from his ability to focus on small details and follow them where they lead, even if they move the story away from conventional plot developments.\n\nPerhaps no screenplay has ever found a better use for digressions. Indeed, the whole film seems to consist of digressions. No character ever says anything in a simple, straightforward manner. Jules could have simply told Yolanda, "Be cool and no one\'s going to get hurt," which is just the type of line you\'d find in a generic, run-of-the-mill action flick. Instead, he goes off on a tangent about what Fonzie is like. Tarantino savors every word of his characters, finding a potential wisecrack in every statement and infusing the dialogue with clever pop culture references. But the lines aren\'t just witty; they are full of intelligent observations about human behavior. Think of Mia\'s statement to Vincent, "That\'s when you know you\'ve found somebody special: when you can just shut the f--- up for a minute and comfortably enjoy the silence."\n\nWhat is the movie\'s purpose exactly? I\'m not sure, but it does deal a lot with the theme of power. Marsellus is the sort of character who looms over the entire film while being invisible most of the time. The whole point of the big date sequence, which happens to be my favorite section of the film, is the power that Marsellus has over his men without even being present. This power is what gets Vincent to act in ways you would not ordinarily expect from a dumb, stoned gangster faced with an attractive woman whose husband has gone away. The power theme also helps explain one of the more controversial aspects of the film, its liberal use of the N-word. In this film, the word isn\'t just used as an epithet to describe blacks: Jules, for instance, at one point applies the term to Vincent. It has more to do with power than with race. The powerful characters utter the word to express their dominance over weaker characters. Most of these gangsters are not racist in practice. Indeed, they are intermingled racially, and have achieved a level of equality that surpasses the habits of many law-abiding citizens in our society. They resort to racial epithets because it\'s a patter that establishes their separateness from the non-criminal world.\n\nThere\'s a nice moral progression to the stories. We presume that Vincent hesitates to sleep with Mia out of fear rather than loyalty. Later, Butch\'s act of heroism could be motivated by honor, but we\'re never sure. The film ends, however, with Jules making a clear moral choice. Thus, the movie seems to be exploring whether violent outlaws can act other than for self-preservation.\n\nStill, it\'s hard to find much of a larger meaning tying together these eccentric set of stories. None of the stories are really "about" anything. They certainly are not about hit-men pontificating about burgers. Nor is the film really a satire or a farce, although it contains elements of both. At times, it feels like a tale that didn\'t need to be told, but for whatever reason this movie tells it and does a better job than most films of its kind, or of any other kind.', u'-0.0309984', u"To put this in context, I am 34 years old and I have to say that this is the best film I have seen without doubt and I don't expect it will be beaten as far as I am concerned. Obviously times move on, and I acknowledge that due to its violence and one particularly uncomfortable scene this film is not for everyone, but I still remember watching it for the first time, and it blew me away. Anyone who watches it now has to remember that it actually changed the history of cinema. In context- it followed a decade or more of action films that always ended with a chase sequence where the hero saved the day - you could have written those films yourself. Pulp had you gripped and credited the audience with intelligence. There is not a line of wasted dialogue and the movie incorporates a number of complexities that are not immediately obvious. It also resurrected the career of Grease icon John Travolta and highlighted the acting talent of Samuel L Jackson. There are many films now that are edited out of sequence and have multiple plots etc but this is the one they all want to be, or all want to beat, but never will.", u'-0.0974129', u'\nIf you think "Pulp Fiction" is brilliant, you\'re wrong. It\'s more than that. It\'s a milestone in the history of film making. It\'s already a classic. But why? Because of the many "f" words, or maybe because of the brain and skull pieces on the rear window of a car? No, that\'s surely not the point (unfortunately some other users - fortunately the minority - don\'t get it). Tarantino has made a movie that\'s someway different from many other action, gangster or crime movies. What\'s so different? He knows the subject of the movie is "cool", he knows it\'s a product of mass culture, and he even likes it by himself. But he smiles at it and tells three great stories with a lot of irony. And this irony is the first point. The second point is that he gave souls to extremely schematic characters. They surely aren\'t another action heroes who you forget as fast as you can twinkle. They are human beings like we are, talking about Burger King and McDonalds, about TV series and a foot massage. They just earn their money with killing others or selling drugs. What else is so great about "Pulp Fiction"? It\'s the acting, the directing, the cinematography, the soundtrack, the sense of humour and the whole rest. In my opinion it\'s all worth nothing less than a 10 out of 10. A masterpiece.', u'0.171606', u"Pulp Fiction may be the single best film ever made, and quite appropriately it is by one of the most creative directors of all time, Quentin Tarantino. This movie is amazing from the beginning definition of pulp to the end credits and boasts one of the best casts ever assembled with the likes of Bruce Willis, Samuel L. Jackson, John Travolta, Uma Thurman, Harvey Keitel, Tim Roth and Christopher Walken. The dialog is surprisingly humorous for this type of film, and I think that's what has made it so successful. Wrongfully denied the many Oscars it was nominated for, Pulp Fiction is by far the best film of the 90s and no Tarantino film has surpassed the quality of this movie (although Kill Bill came close). As far as I'm concerned this is the top film of all-time and definitely deserves a watch if you haven't seen it.", u'0.812154', u"Viewers are taken on a ride through three different stories that entertwine together around the world of Marcellus Wallace. Quentin Tarantino proves that he is the master of witty dialogue and a fast plot that doesn't allow the viewer a moment of boredom or rest. From the story of two hit-man on a job, to a fixed boxing match to a date between a hit-man and the wife of a mob boss. There was definitely a lot of care into the writing of the script, as everything no matter the order it is in, fits with the story. Many mysteries have been left such as what is inside of the briefcase and why Marcellus Wallace has a band-aid on the back of his neck, which may be connected. The movie redefined the action genre and reinvigorated the careers of both John Travolta and Bruce Willis. This movie is required viewing for any fan of film.", u'0.349688', u'\nMy oh my.  "Pulp Fiction" is one of those roller-coasters of a movie.  It is both a joy and a trial to sit through.  Amazingly original and unforgettable, Quentin Tarantino\'s trash masterpiece never gets old or seem outdated.  It put a face on American independent film making in 1994.  Miramax had been around since the 1970s and no one had heard of it before this film.  Studios went into a panic when this film came out because they knew it would be an amazing hit.  Of course it was.  Independent film making became the rage and hit its peak in 1996 when four of the five nominated Best Picture films were from independent studios.  The screenplay and direction by Tarantino are quite amazing, but the cast makes the film work.  John Travolta (Oscar nominated) re-invented his career with this film.  Bruce Willis cemented his celebrity.  Samuel L. Jackson and Uma Thurman (both Oscar nominees) became marketable superstars.  Others who make appearances include: Ving Rhames, Christopher Walken, Eric Stoltz, Rosanna Arquette, Steve Buscemi, Frank Whaley, Harvey Keitel, and of course Quentin Tarantino himself.  They all leave lasting impressions as well.  Samuel L. Jackson stood out the most to me, his lack of substantial screen time may have cost him the Oscar.  Just an amazing accomplishment, all involved deserve recognition.  Easily 5 stars out of 5.    ', u'0.332159', u'I can only speak for myself, but I had never seen anything as stylish, cleverly constructed, well written and electrifying as this milestone when I first saw it in 1994. What really pulled me in right from the start is what we\'ve now come to know as a Tarantino trademark: the dialogue. When gangsters Jules and Vincent talk to each other (or all the other characters, for that matter) there is a natural flow, a sense of realism and yet something slightly over the top and very theatrical about their lines \x96 it\'s a mixture that immediately grabs your attention (even if it\'s just two dudes talking about what kind of hamburger they prefer, or contemplating the value of a foot-massage). Then there\'s the music: the songs Tarantino chose for his masterpiece fit their respective scenes so perfectly that most of those pieces of music are now immediately associated with \'Pulp Fiction\'. And the narrative: the different story lines that come together, the elegantly used flashbacks, the use of "chapters" \x96 there is so much playful creativity at play here, it\'s just a pure joy to watch.\n\nIf you\'re a bit of a film geek, you realize how much knowledge about film and love for the work of other greats \x96 and inspiration from them - went into this (Leone, DePalma, Scorsese and, of course, dozens of hyper-stylized Asian gangster flicks), but to those accusing Tarantino of copying or even "stealing" from other film-makers I can only say: There has never been an artist who adored his kind of art that was NOT inspired or influenced by his favorite artists. And if you watch Tarantino\'s masterpiece today, it\'s impossible not to recognize just what a breath of fresh air it was (still is, actually). Somehow, movies - especially gangster films - never looked quite the same after \'Pulp Fiction\'. Probably the most influential film of the last 20 years, it\'s got simply everything: amazing performances (especially Sam Jackson); it features some of the most sizzling, iconic dialogue ever written; it has arguably one of the best non-original soundtracks ever - it\'s such a crazy, cool, inspirational ride that you feel dizzy after watching it for the first time. It\'s \x96 well: it\'s \'Pulp Fiction\'. 10 stars out of 10.\n\nFavorite films: http://www.IMDb.com/list/mkjOKvqlSBs/\n\nLesser-known Masterpieces: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls070242495/\n\nFavorite TV-Shows reviewed: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls075552387/', u'0.794045', u'\nTarantino is without a doubt one of the best directors of all time and maybe the best of the 90\'s. His first film, Reservoir Dogs was amazing and claustrophobic, his segment in Four Rooms was by far the greatest (even though Rodriguez\'s was excellent too)and Jackie Brown is a wonderful homage to the Blaxploitation films of the 70\'s. However, Pulp Fiction remains my favourite.\n\nIt was nominated for so many Oscars that I still find it hard to believe that it only got one: Best original script. I\'m not complaining because Forrest Gump got best picture, since that film was also Oscar-worthy, but come on, movies like Tarantino\'s or the Shawshank Redemption deserved much more.\n\nAnyway, going back to the movie, I particularly liked the first and second chapters, and that\'s really a contradiction because one of the movie\'s finest characters, Mr. Wolf, appears on the third. Bruce Willis also does a great job, and as far as I\'m concerned he fell in love with the movie right after having read the script. I like the way his character gives a "tough guy" image at the beginning and then we discover he\'s so affectionate and tender to his wife. Travolta is obviously the star of the movie and his second encounter with Bruce Willis in the kitchen along with the scene where he dances with Uma Thurman is when the movie reaches it\'s highest point.\n\nThe other star is Samuel L. Jackson, who plays a wise assassin that obviously knows how to handle situations. "And I will strike down upon thee with great vengeance and furious anger..." is my favourite quote.\n\nSummarizing, Pulp Fiction is a modern classic and a must-see for anyone who is at least aware of what a movie is. I give it a 9 out of 10.\n', u'0.477108', u"Quentin Tarantino's Pulp Fiction is a terrific film. It also gets better with each viewing, especially if one of those happens to be on a big theatrical screen where all of the BIG compositions get bigger and more detailed. How much else is there to talk about it after all these years? It's filled with dynamite, sudden and always interesting action, great and naturally clever dialogue, and memorable characters. Also, the acting is always something to behold as by turns straightforward, over the top, subtle, and just downright menacing and spot-on. The directing is one of the strongest that we've seen from Tarantino, as he makes his choices in pacing with shots in unconventional ways but never in a way that would be distracting. And writing, already noted, has been copied by many, and only equaled by a select few. \n\nThe dance sequence. Samuel L. Jackson's superlative monologuing. It has loyalty among low lifes, and many other odd characters that are all bad and not one is a villain or hero. And somehow even after years of parody and terrible rip-offs, it holds its own and- as one can say after seeing it at a midnight screening- holds its audience as much as it had the countless times before they saw it (or if they are, the first time). The first time you're surprised, the second time you look for the clues or other ambiguity, and then the third time you laugh you head off. The fourth time... I'll leave to you.", u'0.135657', u'I just finished screening this movie for the first time after putting it off for a number of years because of what seemed like equivocating appraisals from some of my friends. In hindsight, however, it seems to me that while the movie must have definitely bowled them over, overall they weren\'t sure exactly what to make of it or how to articulate what were probably a confused mix of feelings. But I am so impressed that I feel compelled to add a few specific observations to the many fine reviews already on this database.\n\nFirst, this movie hits you with an impact somewhere in between, say, APOCALYPSE NOW and A CLOCKWORK ORANGE, and for some people may be just as disturbing (however, in this respect I am happy to report I didn\'t think it rose to the level of NATURAL BORN KILLERS). Full of graphically violent action and language, PULP FICTION is not a picture for everyone - I would definitely not recommend it to my parents, born in the 1930\'s (even to my one fairly "hip" relative of the same generation who, at age 66, still teaches high school sex education and likes to talk about things like sunbathing nude, among other potentially sensitive issues).\n\nIrrespective of audience sensibilities, however, the film-makers, supported by superb acting in every role, manage to create a world full of the most fascinating sleazy characters possibly ever to appear on screen. From Travolta\'s pronounced almost-child-like curiosity about the world to Jackson\'s sincere and thoughtful philosophical ruminating and Willis\'s deep devotion to the memory of his father, I think such fascination lies not only in the characters\' personalities as they are portrayed but in the way they tantalize the viewer into considering the possibility that such people could actually exist. As a lawyer of some years\' experience dealing with all sorts of people I was particularly drawn to this aspect of the film.\n\nThus, and in response to some other reviewers\' comments, I think this movie is more character-driven than plot-driven. Instead of a story peopled by basically weakly developed characters employed primarily as a mere device to move the plot along, as is too frequently the case in the movies (especially these days), the undeniably strong, clever, and unpredictable plot lines in PULP FICTION are actually of essentially secondary interest and importance, serving primarily as vehicles to get you worried about the fate of characters you can\'t help caring about despite the truly low attributes that otherwise form the basis for their respective personas. As at least one other reviewer noted, when the film ends you are actually disappointed, left craving more of these crazy people and their explosive lives.\n\nFinally, and as strange as it may sound, this film reminds me of another Monumentally Great Film which one would never typically associate with it in any way in a million years - CASABLANCA. As in that film made way back in 1942, and as another reviewer has suggested, perhaps its special appeal - its unusually high degree of emotional impact - lies in its distinctly successful simultaneous application of several different genres in a single film - drama, action, dark humor - with the whole thing bound together by essentially flawless execution in every department. And while CASABLANCA is no doubt clearly much more wholesome and high-minded, like the older film PULP FICTION is not without a pronounced theme of redemption, even if it is not as strongly felt, considering all the later film\'s sleaze and violence.\n\nIn sum, when people say that this is probably the best film of the 1990\'s, it is easy to see why. Fundamentally a truly outstanding movie, it is a must-see for anyone who considers themself a film buff and can handle graphic subject matter.\n\n(Incidentally, if you would like a more toned-down, much more overtly humorous and less serious picture with a not-altogether dissimilar look and feel, don\'t miss another 1990\'s Travolta picture, GET SHORTY.)', u'0.237155', u"Pulp Fiction is the quintessential 90's crime film. Pulp Fiction changed the cinematic landscape when it was released, it broke new grounds in terms of screen writing and revived the career of John Travolta. And so on and so forth. In other words, Pulp Fiction is important film in the history in cinema, but it's not the best film ever. \n\nI have seen Pulp Fiction several times and after each time seeing it, I tend to enjoy it less. I saw it first time a few years ago and loved every second of it. But after seeing few hundred more films and especially grindhouse/exploitation films, Pulp Fiction starts to loose its charm. \n\nBefore I continue this thought, I should name the good stuff first. I loved every moment with John Travolta and Samuel L. Jackson. They did a phenomenal job and elevated the already strong dialog. Uma Thurman and Harvey Keitel were also great and so are the scene with Christopher Walken is still amazing. \n\nBut aside from the strong acting and great dialog, there isn't a whole lot to Pulp Fiction. It's just bunch of stories that happened in non- linear fashion. It's all being hip and cool and saying clever dialog. There isn't any complex characters like in Jackie Brown and it lacks the creative visuals of Django Unchained or the tension of Inglorious Basterds. I won't deny that Pulp Fiction is very entertaining but there just isn't enough substance or craftsmanship involved to endure multiple viewings.\n\nFilms like Apocalypse Now, Lady Vengeance, Taxi Driver, Clockwork Orange and many others, holds up much better after watching them multiple times. Those films can be enjoyed purely from the technical aspects and as well as the story and characters. Pulp Fiction is a popcorn film for those who enjoy dialog, cool characters and movie references. I like films with an emotional core, strong characters and impressive visuals. \n\nPulp Fiction is a film that most of the people have seen. If you haven't then go watch it because it's entertaining, very accessible 90's crime film. To me Pulp Fiction feels dry and lacks the elements that draw me in films.", u'0.256375', u"I really find it difficult to believe this movie is rated highly by people. It's hands down the worst movie I've seen in my life (58 years). When my wife and I went to see it, soon after it came out, multiple people walked out of the theater saying either it was a terrible movie and/or it sickened them. Maybe all of us were just allergic to Tarantino's sick fascination with violence. The violence is just so gratuitous and casual as to make it seem like a bad video game. Outside of that, the overall movie has the feel of being viewed through the eyes of someone high on bad drugs. Please excuse my lack of specifics regarding the film, but I've fortunately blocked most of them from my memory. In any event, I worry about a society that thinks this is a good film, I really do.", u'-0.231099', u'\nIt is neat to believe in your heart that you are hip. And if you can obtain coolness by watching a movie, wow! I believe that everybody who says they like Pulp Fiction thinks they are cool. They think that a movie with such style and witty banter is only for the hip. The only problem is that this film is as empty as a Scottish pay toilet and perhaps the most pretensious piece of nothing ever. If you have not figured it out yet, there is no story here. Tarantino simply shoots a pointless movie and then breaks it up so that we do not see it in its proper sequence. So things that happen last come before things that finished before and vice versa. You start to wonder, gee, am I not intelligent enough to follow this? Then you realize, uhhh, no, it is actually fairly simple. He is just stringing a bunch of scenes along in no particular order. Then he gives unrealistic and long-winded speeches to characters that are not particularly realistic. It does not make the film really bad, but at the same time, it does not make it good either. You can paint a piece of crap all kinds of different colors, but it is still a piece of crap. I wonder if Tarantino has the talent to actually tell a real story without having to resort to fancy tricks, shocking scenes and other gimmicky tricks. I doubt it. Oh well, I guess I am just not that cool. I mean, Samuel Jackson sure did say some funny things.', u'-0.297784', u"I have to agree with those reviewers that find this film disjointed, overly and unnecessarily violent, and just plain difficult to understand. I, for one, fail to see how this movie resurrected the career of John Travolta as his performance was just totally unbelievable. Focusing on what appears to be several unrelated life experiences, Tarrantino once again utilizes his penchant for violence, drug addiction, rape, and other assorted seedy topics. The plot (if you want to call it that) is non-existent and the scene involving Ving Rhaimes is just flat-out disgusting. For Tarrantino fans, this may be the ultimate. But for me, it's just not a good film.", u'-0.819581', u'You want to do something really neat? Take the movie "Pulp Fiction" and re-cut it, so that, instead of being out of sequence, it is actually in proper sequence. It can be done. Why do this? Because if you do, you will see what a nothing movie this really is. There is no central plot, there is no real theme, or story or climax. It is just a bunch of tricks and overly snappy dialog, masquerading a piece of fluff that has as much depth as the kiddie pool. Hey, more power to Tarantino, the guy is a Houdini, full of slight of hand. But are we really so simple, that we are ranking this one of the ten greatest movies ever made? Come on! OK, I know that Travolta is cool and Jackson is funny. However, let\'s reserve the greatest films of all-time category for real masterpieces and real stories, and not some overly slick pulp geared towards video store geeks.', u'0.176574'], u'tt0071562': [u'\nThis movie is way to be good to be labelled a sequel to The Godfather . Rather it is more of a companion piece to the original and the two perfectly compliment each other . IT is both a sequel and prequel showing the rise of the young vito and moral decline of Micheal . Both characters are brought to life with uncanny ability by Robert  DeNiro and Al Pacino . To say that these two are good actors is like saying that a nuclear bomb makes a loud noise and in this movie they prove why they are at the top of their respective crafts .\n\nAl Pacino is the standout in the ensemble cast and its amazing how his eyes have changed from the first part . They are now cold , ruthless and unemotional and betray the price which Micheal Corleone has paid for power .\n\nWatch this movie and learn why it is the greatest gangster film of all time.\n', u'0.280592', u'\nThe original Godfather is a brilliant work. It is in a sense a voyeuristic delight, allowing us to see the mafia from the inside - we become part of the family. It single-handedly change the world\'s view of organized crime, and created a cast of sympathetic characters, none of whom have a shred of common morality. It was the highest grossing movie of its time and Brando created a cultural icon whose influence resonates as strong today as it did in 1972.\n\nAs extraordinary an achievement as this is, Part II is even better. It easily receives my nod as the best picture ever made. I have seen it at least 20 times, and each time its 200 minutes fly by.\n\nThe movie uses flashbacks to brilliantly weave two tales. The main story is the reign of Michael Corleone as the world\'s most powerful criminal. Now reaping the benefits of legalized gambling in Las Vegas, Michael is an evident billionaire with an iron fist on a world of treachery.\n\n\nBehind this, Director Francis Ford Coppola spins the tale of the rise of Michael\'s father, Vito, to the center of the New York mafia. It is these scenes that make the film a work of art. Without spoiling, I will simply say the Robert DeNiro as the young Vito is the best acting performance of all time, a role  for which he won a richly deserved Oscar.\n\nThe screenplay is full of delicious little underworld nuggets ("Keep your friends close .....", "I don\'t want to kill everyone, just my enemies"), while it blows a dense, twisted plot past you at a dizzying and merciless pace. The cinematography is depressing and atmospheric. The score continues in the eerie role of its predecessor, foretelling death and evil.\n\nAll of this makes the movie great and infinitely watchable. But it\'s what\'s deeper inside this film ... what it is really about ... that is its true genius.\n\nThe Godfather Part II is not really a movie about the mafia, it is a movie about a man\'s life long struggle. Michael controls a vast empire that is constantly slipping out of his hands. He grows increasingly distrustful and paranoid, and even shows signs that he hates his own life. Michael almost seems to resent the fact that he is a natural born crime lord, a man who puts the family business ahead of everything.\n\nThe great Don Michael Corleone can never come to terms with one simple fact.... his father\'s empire was built on love and respect, Michael\'s empire is built on fear and violent treachery.\n\nSee this movie. It\'s three-and-a-half hours very well spent.', u'0.348696', u'\nYou can count on one hand the movie sequels that measure up to the original; GODFATHER II makes the cut. This movie is just as fine as GODFATHER I. Here the director goes back and forth between the early days of the young Vito Corleone, played by Robert De Niro, and the family after the action in GODFATHER I in the 1950\'s just before Castro came to power. Michael Corleone (Al Pacino) has moved the family and most of his business to Nevada. Once again the acting is flawless. Diane Keaton as Michael\'s wife who quickly becomes disillusioned with her life with him and the lies he continues to tell her, assuring her that he is going legitimate soon; Robert Duvall as Michael\'s adopted brother and adviser; and Lee Strasberg as Hyman Roth all give outstanding performances; but the film really is Al Pacino\'s. We see him become a ruthless, cold-blooded killer who alienates himself from his family in ways his father would never have done. He has come so far from the idealistic young man in "GODFATHER I, who joined the Marines in World War I to serve his country and die for it if necessary, to a lonely, paranoid tragic man. There are many poignant scenes concerning his wife and children-- the drawing his son leaves for him in his bedroom, the gift that Tom buys the child because Michael is too busy, his wife Kay\'s being kept a virtual prisoner at his orders in the family compound, etc.\n\nOnce again many acts of violence are interwoven with religion: Michael\'s son\'s first communion, the religious parade in New York, Fredo\'s repeating the Rosary in order to catch a fish, for example. \n\nThe cinematography is stunning; the footage from Sicily and New York around the turn of the century and the snow scenes from the American West are beautiful and rich in detail. Mr. Coppola has directed yet another masterpiece.\n', u'0.190668', u"\nThe Godfather Part 2 is the finest sequel ever made and is arguably a finer film than the original Godfather. The film is divided into two main parts - the story of a young Vito Corleone (flawlessly acted by Robert De Niro and a worthy Oscar winner) and the rise to power of Michael as the head of the family. Francis Coppola recollaborated with many of the crew members of the first film and again achieves a quite superb period piece thanks to the cinematography of Gordon Willis and set design of Dean Tavoularis. The acting performances are outstanding, hence three supporting oscar nominations for acting guru Lee Strasberg (Hyman Roth), Michael Gazzo (Frank Pentangeli) and Robert De Niro (young Vito Corleone). Duvall, Keaton, Cazale and Shire all provided first rate performances but it is the performance of Al Pacino which steals the show, expertly portraying Michael as a cool, calculating, suspicious Don Corleone. The film expands upon the original movie and brings us into the family's activities in Nevada, Florida and Havana. Arguably the finest movie of the 70s, a cinematic masterpiece with the greatest ensemble acting you will probably see.   ", u'0.857582', u'Coppola\'s masterpiece is rivaled only by "The Godfather, Part II" in which the 1940s setting of the first movie is extended backwards and forwards to reveal the corrupting effect of power...The film, breathtaking in its scope and tragic grandeur, shows two parallel stories extending two different time periods: the early career of young Vito Corleone seen first around the turn of the 20th century in Sicily, and then in 1917, building his criminal underworld in the Italian ghettos of New York City, post World War I, plus that of his son, Michael (Al Pacino) desperately trying to keep his family together...\n\nAl Pacino\'s performance is quiet and solemn... He is cold and ruthless, with a whole contrast from the idealistic innocent war hero we initially met at the beginning of the first film... Here he\'s a calculating and frightening force, seeking to expand casinos into Pre-Revolutionary Cuba and consolidating an empire surrounded by perfidy and treason, maintaining total confidence in his ability to control the situation whether testifying before enraging Senators or trying to outface his worst enemies...\n\nThe film\'s haunting final shot of a lonely, isolated paranoid Michael in his empty compound, is an unforgettable movie scene, a tragic portrait of a lonely and fully damned person, emotionally empty and finished, far from a waspish wife, more distant from a faithful lawyer...\n\nDe Niro\'s rise, from an orphan child by a family feud back in Italy to a hood in New York and his position as a respected Don, provides a welcome break from Pacino\'s relentless attitude... Since the people he kills seem to deserve it, Vito comes off better than Michael does, and it was wise of Coppola to shuffle the two stories together despite lengthy flashbacks and the disturbance of continuity...\n\nThe entire cast contributes greatly to the success of the film: Lee Strasberg, a fascinating mixture of lust and ruthlessness; G. D. Spradlin, absolutely right as the sinister and corrupt Nevada Senator; Michael V. Gazzo, unforgettable as the troubled gray-haired informer; Gastone Moschin, excellent as the blackmailer in white suit; John Cazale, marvelously timid as the vague, confused, and hesitant Fredo; Diane Keaton, clearly irrational as the long-suffering wife Kay; Talia Shire, too extravagant as the lousy mother; Troy Donahue too ambitious as the fortune-hunting suitor; and Robert Duvall excels as the confidant, and retainer to the all-powerful Corleone family...\n\nCoppola\'s motion picture is not just a mere supply with new characters and events from the original, it\'s a far more complex and intimate movie than its predecessor... It is not really a sequel... It\'s just more... It cleverly shifts in time between two distinct narratives with extreme realistic violence and criminal mentality of gangsters...', u'0.212788', u'The Godfather Part II (1974)\n\nNumber 1 - 1974\n\nTop 3 - 1970s\n\n"My father taught me many things. Keep your friends close but keep your enemies closer"\n\n"The Godfather Part II is truly a masterpiece. Timeless, Classic, Beautiful and endlessly watchable"\n\nThe second part of Francis Ford Coppola\'s Epic and violent Gangster Trilogy, follows the reign of Don Michael Corleone as the head of the Corleone family. As well the film shows us the early years of Vito Corleone (Marlon Brando) played flawlessly by Academy Award Winner Robert De Niro, and how he created his empire of money, gambling and respect. Beautifully directed by Francis Ford Coppola, Godfather Part II exceeds every expectation with outstanding performances from Academy Award winners Al Pacino,Diane Keaton, Robert Duvall and Robert De Niro. The second part of this unforgettable trilogy is one of the finest films ever made. \n\nThis is cinematic art. A treasure of film history. The finest sequel ever made. A faultless, flawless gripping drama; Coppola\'s second part of his crime saga is in my opinion one of the top 5 films of all time and perhaps towering over the first part. \n\n"As close to perfection as movies get"\n\n"Pacino at his best"\n\n-10/10-', u'0.758767', u"\nAfter seeing The Godfather and improving it as one of my favorite films, I wanted to get more into The Godfather so I rented this. Words can't describe how great this sequel was. The acting once again was amazing and the story and how the movie went on just never got me bored. Everything in this movie was clearly beautiful. The ending by far was my favorite when there all sitting at the table talking. There were so many great scenes like Vito when he was younger, Fredo at the lake, and many many more. You have to see this movie because it's just brilliant filmaking. It's not better than it's first film but still an extremely worth sequel.\n\n10/10\n", u'0.248188', u'Series note: It is almost unthinkable to watch this film without having seen The Godfather (1972) first. This is a direct continuation of that story.\n\nThe good news is that The Godfather Part II has many amazing qualities, including fantastic performances from a superb cast, sublime, unprecedented visuals that no one else has been able to capture since, and very engaging stories. The bad news is that this should have easily been a 10, but overall, it is so sprawling and unfocused that I can\'t possibly give it more than a 9, which it only earns because the assets transcend what\'s basically a mess overall. Because it should have been a 10, and most other reviews will tell you about the positive points at length, I may pick on more things in my review than you would think I would for a 9, but rest assured that even with the flaws, The Godfather Part II is still essential viewing.\n\nDirector/co-writer Francis Ford Coppola cleverly begins the film with parallels to The Godfather. We see Michael Corleone (Al Pacino) "in the role" of his father, Vito (Marlon Brando), from the first film, accepting prostrating guests while a party is going on outside. Like the first film, the party consumes a lot of time while we get to know some of the principal characters. Perhaps during this segment, perhaps a bit after, we realize that maybe the beginning wasn\'t so clever after all, because the structure of The Godfather Part II parallels The Godfather from a broad perspective, as if Coppola and co-writer Mario Puzo used the first film as something of a template to create this one.\n\nAfter the party is over, there is an attempted hit on Michael, and we quickly learn that not everything is rosy in the Corleone\'s mafia world. Michael believes that someone on the "inside" was involved with the hit. This launches a complicated sequence of events that has Michael, who is now living in Nevada, traveling to Miami, Cuba, New York, and so on. He accuses different people of involvement in the attempted hit depending on whom he is talking to. This may have all been part of a grand scheme to set up the responsible parties, but one of the flaws of the film is that Coppola doesn\'t convey Michael\'s underlying thoughts about this very well, not even later, and not through his actions. Rather than feeling like a clever set-up, it starts to feel like slightly muddled writing.\n\nDuring the middle section of the film, which goes on for hours, we also have a hint of a problem that plagued The Godfather--a bloated cast. There are bit too many characters who aren\'t well enough presented or explained. You may need to keep a scorecard.\n\nCoppola and Puzo also treat us to many extended "flashback" segments, and I mean way back, to Vito as a boy and young man, played by Robert De Niro. For my money, these were the best scenes of the film, although maybe that\'s a bit of my bias creeping in, as I\'m a huge De Niro fan.\n\nBut let\'s talk about the main plague of the film--sprawl. This is maybe first evident in the flashbacks. As good as they are, they go on far too long, and happen far too frequently, to sustain the momentum of either the Michael story or the Vito-as-a-youngster story. It begins to feel like we\'re toggling back and forth between two films, which is the track that should have been taken. The prequel, at least, would have been a solid 10.\n\nThere\'s also a lot of sprawl in the Michael Corleone segments. Coppola appears to have been suffering from what I\'d now call "J.K. Rowling Syndrome". That happens when an artist becomes successful enough that they can fire or ignore their editor(s). Instead of taking good advice about where to trim fat, the artist decides to just leave much of it in, and they now have the clout to override any dissenting and more sensible opinions. The Michael Corleone story has a lot of fat, including much of the Cuba material (for example, sitting around the table with the President, laboriously passing around a solid gold telephone), the Senate hearings (which go on far too long to make and provide the dramatic points), and so on.\n\nThe film begins to feel more like a couple seasons of a television show that Coppola tried to cram into a 3 and a half hour film, or worse, a collection of deleted scenes. The scenes, except for the fat that needed to be trimmed, are excellent in isolation. But by the time the climax rolls around, the whole has more of an arbitrary feeling--this is especially clear in the d\xe9nouement, which seems to just end.\n\nI\'ve barely left myself room to talk about the good points. The first one, which most people mention, is the acting. There isn\'t a bad performance in the film, but Pacino, De Niro, and some relatively minor characters, like those played by Diane Keaton, Talia Shire and John Cazale, really stand out.\n\nThe second outstanding point, similar to the first film, is the beautiful visuals. Although all of the cinematography and production design is great, what really impressed me were some of the darkly lit scenes. Characters and features of sets emerge from pitch-blackness, and everything is rich, deep shades of burgundy, brown, and orange. Amazingly, nothing gets lost in these scenes. It must be incredibly difficult to achieve without making the shots too dark, because I can\'t remember another film since that has been able to capture the same look. The flashback scenes are also in similar, but lighter, colors, creating an appropriate sepia-tone feel.\n\nAlthough the broad perspective problems are unfortunate, a closer focus on most segments of the film provides exemplary artistry. Given that, and the film\'s importance culturally, The Godfather Part II is a must-see.', u'-0.0763011', u"The Godfather Part Two is possibly the best film ever made, every part of this film is amazing, it is even better than the original, I was very surprised by this. The story is amazing, everything makes perfect sense. The Oscar winning screenplay is amazing, the dialogue is some of the most original, and realistic ever putt on screen, the characters are flawless, and it's in every way perfectly written. The acting is just as fantastic, I can't believe Al Pacino lost the Oscar, and for once Robert De Niro was even better, he was truly amazing, and interestingly he fails to say a single word in English. The direction is also amazing, Francis Ford Coppola even does a better job than he did in The Godfather, and Apocalypse Now. The visual effects are so much better than the amazing one's in the original Godfather. One of the best films ever, a must see. Flawless.", u'0.691696', u'\nFrancis Coppola and Mario Puzo continue their epic saga into the lives of the infamous Corleone family, which is headed by Michael Corleone (Al Pacino).  It is a film which does better than its predessor, "The Godfather".  The film flip-flops graciously and beautifully between Michael\'s struggle over the family business and the life of young Vito Corleone (Robert De Niro, in a brilliant, Oscar-winning performance) in his rise to power as well.  Robert Duvall, Diane Keaton, Lee Strassberg, and John Cazale give excellent supporting performances.  Carmine Coppola\'s and Nino Rota\'s score is a masterpiece of music.  The movie is expertly filmed and the cinematography is superb. ', u'0.813307', u'\n"The Godfather, Part II" is excellent just like its predecessor. While the first is arguably the greatest film ever made, the second installment is easily the best sequel produced hands down. The film is split between the stories of Michael Corleone (Al Pacino, Oscar-nominated) and a young Vito Corleone (Robert De Niro, in his star-making, first Oscar-winning performance). In the 1950s, Michael is trying to expand his crime empire to locales such as Las Vegas, Hollywood, and even turbulent Cuba. However, there are numerous problems as older brother Fredo (John Cazale) may have double-crossed the family. Also two prominent crime bosses pose a considerable threat as well (Lee Strasberg and Michael V. Gazzo, both Oscar-nominated). Younger sister Connie (Oscar nominee Talia Shire) is still reeling from her husband\'s murder and her father\'s death at the conclusion of the original film. Michael is also distancing himself from his wife (Diane Keaton) and some of his most trusted friends (Robert Duvall). While all this is occurring we get glimpses into the early life of Michael\'s father (De Niro). We learn that his parents and older brother have been killed in early-1900s Sicily and that he has immigrated to New York. Vito pays his dues and learns the tricks of the trade, buying his time, before deciding to create his own small empire which would of course grow and become what we saw in the original. It would seem that the film would be confusing by jumping back and forth between Michael and his father, but that is not so. Coppola gives you just enough information to keep the audience intrigued through each segment. The film is very well-made and runs very smoothly even though it lasts over 200 minutes. Many think that this installment is the best of the series. Even though I still think that the original is the best, I cannot totally disagree with this assertion as this is the definitive sequel. 5 stars out of 5.   ', u'0.412734', u"To me and probably to many other people The Godfather Part II is more of a continuation than sequel to The Godfather. Just look at the IMDb rating and you'll see I'm not the only one who feels this way. To me it as good as the first.\n\nThe acting may have been better than the acting in the original. Robert De Niro gave a perfect subtle performance as Vito Corleone. His portrayal was powerful and breathtaking. When I think De Niro I definitely do not think subtle and smooth but that is exactly what he was in here. It is definitely one of his top three performances in his career. The depth in his portrayal was able to justify the Vito Corleone that Marlon Brando portrayed in the first. Al Pacino gave a very strong performance playing Michael Corleone. In here we get to see more of the tough decisions that have to be made and the consequences of certain actions. Al Pacino perfectly displayed the amount of thought and struggle that goes into and comes out of every action you make; the way it affects relationships, family, power and influence. Diane Keaton was not really given a lot of room to act in the first but in here she is very good. She did not play the stereotypical wife who always stands behind her husband but rather the woman with a mind of her own who is willing to go after what she feels she deserves. Robert Duvall again to me was the glue to the movie. Just having him in there kind of makes you feel safe. John Cazale also had more of an impact in here than in the first playing the half-witted brother always needing to be bailed out. A lot of these characters sound so familiar and stereotypical but in The Godfather Part II every character is played out with such extraordinary depth. Everyone from Talia Shire who gave a fine performance to Lee Strasberg all the way down to the kid who played young Vito Corleone were perfect. Part II seems to me to be more of a character study than the original.\n\nThe directing once again is perfect. Francis Ford Coppola know or at least knew how to make a movie. The first to Godfather movie are done so precisely and perfectly that nothing really sticks out because they are so perfect throughout. Coppola just lets his actors play everything out as he should with type of cast he has here. Not to many movies can maintain such a consistent flow over 3 hours let alone even an hour and 45 minutes.\n\nThe writing may not have been quite as good as the first in terms of quoting but the storyline was perfect. Seeing the decisions made by new mob boss Michael Corleone was common sense but flashing back on Vito Corleone's life was genius. The storyline to me could not have been better and Coppola and Puzo do a great job with it all the way.\n\nLike the first the cinematography was amazing but it had a slightly different tone to it. The first had more of a majestic, mythical look to it. In Part II you feel the modern times creeping in and the Corleones having to adjust to it. Part II has more of a corrupt and evil twist to it but I guess the end signifies that. The music obviously the same as the first was perfect and just fit so greatly with the rest of the movie.\n\nThe first to movies of The Godfather series are really like the same movie. They are not the same though, they are actually very different but the greatness of them both and the continuation of the storyline from the first to the second really create a strong band between each other. To me it is only a sequel in that it was the second movie of a great series. No let downs, no disappointments just a continuation of of the greatness from the first one.", u'0.375555', u'This sequel is just as terrific as the first film, if not more so. I hesitate to call it a sequel, as "sequel" is quite simply the wrong word I am looking for. A film like "The Matrix Reloaded" is a sequel - "The Godfather Part II" is something more. It\'s just too good to be called a sequel.\n\nThe film won six Oscars in 1974, including Best Picture and Best Supporting Actor (Robert De Niro). It deserved every one. It involves the viewer from the start and never lets up. Particular aspects I enjoy in this film are the flashbacks to Don Vito Corleone as a child immigrating to New York City after social problems in his homeland, Sicily. I like the intertwining of Michael Corleone (Al Pacino), his son, in present day, dealing with his crime inheritance, and Vito (Robert De Niro), his father, years ago. I like how, as Michael comes to terms with his family legacy, the film shows us Vito coming to terms with his future. The day he shoots that man in a gritty apartment complex is a turning point in his life. \n\nEvery actor is in top form here. Al Pacino has gradually made the move from a man who denies his future to a man who is accepting it. His character is the spotlight of this film, much more so than in the first film (though both center around his decisions).\n\nRobert De Niro is particularly wonderful and convincing as a young Vito Corleone, who was of course played by the constantly-spoofed Marlon Brando in the original. De Niro takes an iron grip on his character and completely engulfs himself; this was, in 1974, the sign of an actor who would go places. Indeed, he did.\n\nCoppola\'s magical sense of direction is at work here, as is the script by Coppola and Mario Puzo (whose novels the series is based upon). The original was a wonderful film, but the sequel presents more of a challenge. Flashbacks are often intercut in the middle of other films are awkward times, but in "The Godfather Part II," Coppola uses them at precisely the right moments, managing to careen in and out of scenes and time periods with free abandon.\n\nIt takes a great kind of skill to master something like this, much less a sequel to one of the most beloved films of all time. "The Godfather" was an instant classic upon its release in 1972. Coppola had two years to plan for his continuation of the film. People told him it wouldn\'t work, he would never beat the original, and he would never pull it off. But he showed them all. "The Godfather Part II" may well be the best sequel I have ever seen in my entire lifetime. I wish they were all this good. To call it a "sequel" almost seems insulting.', u'0.208837', u"\nIt's rare to see a sequel that is as good as the first; it's even rarer to see the two acting veterans, De Niro and Pacino, together in a film. This is the only film that delivers both. I loved the first Godfather film, for it's acting talent, for it's cinematography, and for it's fantastic story. The acting is every bit as great, and the cinematography is about as good, but the story wasn't exactly as good as the first; had it not been for the flashbacks that showed Vito as young(beautifully portrayed by De Niro), it wouldn't have gotten a perfect rating from me. He saved the film, that was otherwise slow and a little bland, due to the story not being as great as the first. The first showed us a mafia war; this just shows the aftermath, and Michael Corleone's further rise to power, after the fall of Vito in the first. However, the film has a number of flashbacks, that show us Vito as young, and here De Niro perfectly shows us the entire range of his talents, by mimicking Brando's performance to perfection. The plot is good, but not as good as the first; it's saved by the flashback sequences that show us how and why Vito Corleone came to power. The acting is every bit as great as the first. Al Pacino still gives a great performance, like he did in the first, and the other cast members who came back from the first, including Robert Duvall and Diane Keaton, also give as great performances as they did in the first. The new actors also give great performances, though the following stand out as the best; Robert De Niro, Lee Strasberg and Michael V. Gazzo. The characters are as well-written as they were in the first. The mafia is portrayed as menacingly in this as it was in the first. The film, like the first, has it's share of memorable quotes, but not really any scenes that were memorable, like the first one had. All in all, a great film, but mainly because of De Niro and Pacino. De Niro fills Brando's part fairly well, but overall, the film isn't as entertaining and exciting as the first, though it does reach about the same quality overall. I recommend it to fans of the various actors involved, and of course anyone who enjoyed the first, as they should enjoy this one too, but possibly to a lesser extent. 10/10", u'0.300824', u"The Godfather Part II is a consummation of the saga of the Corleone Crime family. Regarded by many as the best sequel ever, the Godfather Part II is equally brilliant as its precursor and good enough to stand on its own. The movie juxtaposes, the early life of Vito Corleone (from his orphaned childhood to his rise in power in New York), with the life of his son, Michael (after Vito's death to Michael becoming the most powerful Mafia head). Al Pacino picks up from where he left in the first part, consummating Michael's journey to the dark side and in the process, presenting him as the greatest anti-hero, the western cinema ever embodied. The movie gave Pacino his third consecutive Oscar nomination and a perpetual stardom that catapulted him above the ruck, laying the foundations of his illustrious career. Just like in part I, his performance in this movie is absolutely worthy of an Oscar, but the Academy once again robbed him of the glory.\n\nRobert De Niro in his Oscar winning portrayal of Vito Corleone, gives a great performance without uttering a single word in English. The synergy imparted by the brilliance of these two outstanding performers, makes the movie, a treat to watch. Robert Duvall reprises his role of Tom Hagen with a desired degree of subtlety and equanimity, reminding the viewer of Brando's portrayal in Godfather part I. The entire cast is brilliant with special mention of John Cazole as Fredo, Lee Strasberg as Hyman Roth and Michael V.Gazzo as Frankie Pentageli, who are outstanding, to say the least. Cuppola's brilliant and innovative direction gives Puzo's masterful story, an incredible impetus, which is well complemented by Nino Rota's poignant score and Gordon Willis' vivid cinematography. In a nutshell, the movie, though sanguinary and lengthy than its precursor, is an equally brilliant work of cinema, a profound and a deeply engrossing master piece.\n\nhttp://www.apotpourriofvestiges.com/", u'0.816361'], u'tt2582802': [u'http://switchingreels.com/2014/01/28/sundance-review-whiplash/\n\nEver had a dream of being a great football player? A great dancer? A great singer? A great musician? Our protagonist has a dream of being a great drummer, a drummer that will be remembered forever. Maybe you are still fighting for your dream. Maybe you have given up on greatness. Greatness doesn\'t come easily, you need to practice at it. Andrew practices until his hands bleed.\n\nAndrew (Miles Teller) is 19-year old student at a music conservatory in Manhattan. Terrence Fletcher (J.K. Simmons) is a teacher at the conservatory with a ruthlessly brutal teaching style. After picking Andrew to play in the school band, he pushes Andrew to his limits in order to realize his full potential, at the risk of his humanity.\n\nI had a billiards teacher at one point in my life, who was close to becoming a pro in his craft but a grease fire accident changed all that. His perspective changed, to paraphrase, he realized he was becoming an asshole. He became a teacher of pool instead of becoming a pro player. Through him, I can understand what Terrence Fletcher was trying to instill into Andrew. My teacher would push me a little bit. When he gave me opportunities to show him up, "run the table now," he would tell me, I failed. It\'s embarrassing when that happens but it\'s also a learning tool because more work needs to be done. You can\'t get by on talent alone but it certainly helps. On the other side of it, I saw a little bit of my teacher in Andrew. Losing who you are to perfect something you love. Good thing my teacher realized before it was too late.\n\nI lost myself in the story. It had something to say about not settling and asking more of yourself. Two fantastic performances from Miles Teller and J.K. Simmons. Perhaps it will push you to maybe pick up that guitar again, put on your ballet shoes, or hit the gym to bulk up. Whiplash is an incredibly powerful film. And after the final shot cuts to black, the film will stick with you for days.\n\nMy expectations: Medium. I did not expect the film to be so powerful for me. Expectations exceeded.\n\nRecommendation: Cinema lovers and casual movie goers, I believe will enjoy this film.\n\nRe-watch value: I can watch this film again and I actually can\'t wait until it hits distribution.\n\nMemorable: I am still thinking about this film.', u'0.218045', u"Taking the festival circuit by storm since its Sundance premiere in January, Whiplash is starting to feel like the underdog that could go far with its crowd-pleasing intensity. On the surface, it's a gritty story about a brutal student-mentor relationship that oversteps boundaries. Underneath, it's a piercing examination of the psyche of unbridled ambition. Whiplash is a film that stops at nothing. As a result, it's the best film I've seen in years, and I say that without hesitation. This is a film that resonates on every single level and every moment counts. If writer/director Damien Chazelle was striving for greatness as much as his protagonist, then he has achieved it. \n\nMiles Teller, who's been steadily growing on me since The Spectacular Now, stars as Andrew Neyman, a 19-year-old aspiring jazz drummer who's pushed and inspired by the abuse and aspirations of his school band leader Fletcher, played by the ferocious J.K. Simmons like we've never seen him before. Chazelle has described the film as an origin story to the jazz musicians of the golden age, and it thrives on the myths of jazz heroes such as Charlie Parker. They're urgently looking for the next Parker, in search of perfection. But with that comes a great irony. The music genre is known as one for freedom of expression but here the jazz is soulless and mechanical, and that clouds the ethical judgment of the characters. Even so, Fletcher is a man who can tell if you have the right tempo within a bar. Although most of the audience for the film may not know much about music including myself, you get a feel for what he's looking for and when someone's wrong even if you don't know why. Simmons is as good as they say he is. He's a force of nature, with a terrifying presence that incites the fear Bryan Cranston achieved with the peak of his Walter White. But it's not a one-note performance. Simmons is still subversive with moments of weakness, insecurity, approachability, and he also sometimes brings in the lightness he's known for in other roles with Jason Reitman, exec producer here. \n\nEven though he's an unlikeable character with nothing nice to say, he's still somewhat endearing and enigmatic, much like R. Lee Ermey's drill sergeant in Full Metal Jacket. This demasculinisation through a barrage of insults is a theme explored in Whiplash and it argues whether it's a crime or an 'ends justifying the means' factor of life. It's not just a music film, but also one that adapts to the elements of sports training, war at boot camp and biopic genres with the way it frames its elements. Fletcher is representative of the devil on our shoulders that yells at us that we're not good enough and that symbolic idea resonates deeply for me. His poisonous words are more a part of Andrew's psyche than legitimate coaching techniques. What grabs me about the film is its discussion on artistic perfection, and especially in these intimate and rough sequences of practicing. What is objectively great in art? When is it good enough, and why? It toes a fascinating line. That's why drumming is such an interesting choice for the film to explore because it's so instinctive. Drummers have to make decisions within a fraction of a second and talent can only take you so far. The roaring beat in Whiplash puts your heart in your throat. Teller's performance as Andrew is terrific, one to match Simmons. \n\nChazelle is committed on expressing the physicality of drumming and Teller captures it exhaustively without feeling contrived. It's the virtuosity of the writing that allows us into Andrew's head however. It's a long road to the top, but the script makes the right decision to allow him to revel in the little moments of success, but then to immediately test him in surprising and involving ways. Each turn of the story shapes his expectations and ambitions and then escalates it to the right point. While the film is a gripping experience nonetheless, in retrospect perhaps it is too bitingly cynical. It does suggest that you have to be deprived of a meaningful relationship to achieve your goals. It does appear to be very anti-positive reinforcement, but perhaps it's merely a statement on the abundant sheltering that the latest generation is enduring. Whiplash is refreshing to see, we all know we wouldn't be resilient enough to take that kind of punishment so it's cathartic to watch Andrew go through it all and see how far he'll go. His frustration, regrets, fear and rage with himself cuts to the core of the human condition as he's pushed further and further. \n\nThe technical aspects of the film help it become so stimulating with dizzying closeups tightly edited together and its the stark orange tinted cinematography. It's thoroughly impressive that the film was shot in only 19 days for them to get shots so immaculately timed and performed with all those complicated movements. There's a refreshing brevity to the film with its sharp atmosphere, but it's so rich in emotion, psychological tension and personal subtext. It neither rushes nor drags, on paper nor on screen. It really is a film that lingers in your mind for days, nagging you, like Fletcher over your shoulder. Maybe it'll continue to linger for weeks. I hope so too, especially for Oscar voters. It seems that J.K. Simmons is building momentum to be a lock for Best Supporting Actor at this point. However, Whiplash isn't just a best of year film, nor best of decade. It approaches best of all-time worthy with its identifiable themes of meticulous work ethics, fulfilling aspirations, resilience of the soul, and knowing when to no longer measure yourself to your mentor. I'll take this film with me for a while as a screaming motivator.\n\n10/10. Best film of the decade.\n\nRead more @ The Awards Circuit (http://www.awardscircuit.com/)", u'0.332729', u'After seeing Damien Chazelle\'s Whiplash - a film the young up-and- coming director wished to do for some time now - being so beautifully realized and brought to life by everyone involved in the project, I was glad and relieved, mainly because I have seen the short film, which was pretty incredible.\n\nI believe that among the most telling facts about a film\'s fortunes and qualities, is the ability to broaden it\'s public, but in the same time not forgetting that cinema is not all about commercial success and mass audiences.Or with other words - a film that is not just eye candy and booms and explosions, but also craft, soul, dedication and wits.\n\nThose are some of the things not only the film itself possesses, but the people behind it have in abundance as well.\n\nThe upcoming Miles Teller plays the young and dedicated student Andrew Nieman, who has the drive, the ambition to succeed and to be great, which is fine, as long as it doesn\'t derail your personal life.A lesson the young drummer learns the hard way.\n\nBlind ambition is the thing, that can describe our anti-hero of sorts, Terrence Fletcher a.k.a the brilliant J.K. Simmons, who has a thing for mindeffin\' his students to the point of total physical and mental exhaustion and even depression.But he does it for a reason, for the sole purpose of finding the next big, even great, thing in jazz and in music as a whole.The next prodigy, the next "Yardbird" Charlie Parker that will be otherwise lost, if not being pushed to the very limit.\n\nAnd boy, does J.K. Simmons nails it.Chazelle has done a masterful job in casting the two leads in Teller and Simmons.Their respective acts are full of purpose, full of tension and ultimately terrific.\n\nExpect some awards going in the way of "Whiplash" and look out for Simmons in the Oscars shortlist, that\'s how good he is in it.And in his own words: "What a shame we wrapped it up in only 19 days".It must have been really fun playing a part like Terrence Fletcher and Simmons completely sold it.\n\nAs I said, the best movies are those, that reach out to the most diverse and wide spectrum of audiences, not those, who can connect to a massive number of people, who are representatives of only one specific audience type.And Chazelle has achieved just that with "Whiplash" - a precise, tension-building film, full of beautifully staged pieces and above all else, a love towards music and the challenges it often represents if you want to get to the very top.\n\nThe film ended in a big round of applause from the packed theater and I am sure that will be the case a long time from now!\n\nMy grade: 9/10', u'0.458447', u"There is so many excellent great things to say about this film. To start off I will say it may be slow and to different for some to enjoy and so that I warn you. Now I will say that I can not express the idea enough of how surprising this film is. Jk Simmons does an outstanding performance as the highly unpredictable hair trigger tempered teacher Fletcher, Miles Teller an actor who I've only seen in mediocre comedies also shines in a breakthrough performance as the ambitious drummer Andrew. The performance are outstanding and that's just the tip of the iceberg.\n\nMy favorite thing about this film is how it has created it's own one of a kind spot in the music genre of film, it's atmosphere is unlike any other as well. The idea that this film is one of a kind can't be stressed enough, I guarantee you cannot find another film out there like this. This film expresses a shockingly high intensity for a music film. I believe that Jk Simmons acting is what fueled a lot of the intensity. When you watch this film even though it's pace will seem slow to most it's intensity is impossible to miss. \n\nI can see how a lot of certain people may find this film hard to enjoy but for me this film as slow as it is couldn't have been more intense. The mere fact that a music film shows some strong intensity like this one did is mind blowing to me. I don't know how many of you had this same experience or something similar then you already know what I'm talking about. I have a good feeling and I'm hopeful this film rakes in some acting Oscars because this film deserves at least one. I haven't read anything on this films page and I'm sure others have expressed similar opinions and all I can say is listen and trust me. I'm praying you enjoy this film and experience it's one of a kind intensity just as I did. Thanks for reading my review and enjoy.", u'0.447482', u'I saw this about 24 hours ago at the Best of Fest for Sundance, and this last 24 hours I have done little but think about and marvel at this film. I really had zero expectations going in, I heard the buzz surrounding it in town, but knew very little about it as the film began. I have yet to get the words that do my thoughts justice for this movie but I am going to try. \n\nFirst everything about this film was stellar; casting, writing, acting, directing, music and cinematography all came together to just tell an incredible story. I want to say a bit more about a couple of these aspects. \n\nActing, first of all I don\'t know who impressed me more Miles Teller in the lead as Andrew Nieman or JK Simmons playing Band teacher Terence Fletcher. Both did so great that had either been a lesser actor they would have been out shined by the other. Simmons\' performance really reminded me of Gunnery Sargent Hartman from Full Metal Jacket, except rather than emotionally destroying and rebuilding marines he was doing it to 18 year old kids. His character could have easily been cartoony and 2 dimensional but Simmons gave him such depth that the whole film I felt compassion for and even understood his motives, even before he lays them out for Nieman in the third act. Two scenes bring you to the core of this character and the line that has intrigued me for 24 hours is "No words in the English language are more dangerous than \'good job.\'" (thus why I titled my review as such, sorry I couldn\'t resist). Then on to Teller\'s performance, for a younger actor who I haven\'t seen in much I must say he played his role like a seasoned actor. His performance just wrapped me up and to find out he did much of the drumming himself is insane. Whilst watching some of the intense scenes I felt like I was watching him be executed, and other times it feels like the fight in Rocky, you feel like you are just watching him get demolished, except all of this is emotional rather than the easier physical. Whether it is the discouragement, the socially awkwardness, the single parent household, the internal conflict, the hubris, the arrogance, and at times the mental torture that he put himself through, all just blew me away. Teller reminded me of a much much more talented John Cusack and had the charisma and electricity to connect to the audience. \n\nThe one other thing I must commend is the writing, so often you kind of know where a movie is headed but this movie stayed very unpredictable and just when you think for certain how a scene or sequence of scenes will play out they take a hard left and keeps you off balance (in a good way). It was so refreshing, a few times I thought the bow was on the film but then something disrupts how "it should go or end". \n\nSorry if I rambled, perhaps after thinking on it more I can get a more focused review, needless to say this film is a must-see when it gets a broad release. Great job to all involved and congrats on winning the award at Sundance, you certainly earned it. \n\nOne last thing if this gets attention in wide release this could see a heightened interest in Jazz, this is certainly a film that can make even the not-so musically inclined want to throw on a Jazz record and just drown in it.', u'-0.0340783', u'The good parts:\n\nThe movie is very sensitively filmed. The camera relentlessly explores every bump on Teller\'s and Simmons\'s heads like a documentary about Greek sculpture. It adds a lot to the feel of the movie in a wonderfully subtle way.\n\nSimmons and Teller (as the "Studio" band director and the, I guess, protagonist young drummer) do a great job. Simmons in particular is really the nexus of energy for the entire movie, and owns that role with absolute precision.\n\nThe music, when it\'s actually music, is well-chosen and well-performed.\n\nThe terrible parts:\n\nSimmons ("Fletcher") and Teller ("Andrew") are essentially the only characters in the film. Andrew\'s dad and his not-really girlfriend are secondary characters that serve to remind the audience what actual humans are like. Andrew is an insufferable jerk, and Teller does an amazing job of maintaining (mostly) a stone-faced, blankly insensitive look throughout almost every tense moment of the film. Simmons\'s Fletcher is a superb sadistic maniac. He\'s not "intense" or "volatile" - he\'s a psychotic monster.\n\nI\'m debilitated as a reviewer because my son is a talented young drummer, so I get to see good drumming all the time. The persistent trope in the film of Andrew drumming until his hands bleed is wildly unrealistic; that basically cannot happen if you\'re a drummer good enough to get into a prestigious music school in the first place. Everything else about Andrew at the fancy school, upon further examination, is completely unreal. He basically never talks to the other complete non-entities in the band. They\'re all like POWs, obeying the maniac director unflinchingly (except when they fail, when they\'re abused and ejected). My son (whose judgment I trust because he\'s also obsessed, but not a jerk) described the silly drum "competition" as "three people who can\'t drum doing shitty grind-core break beats". (To be fair, he liked the movie. What can you do.)\n\nSo OK, the movie is an allegory, and not intended to be realistic. So it\'s an allegory about how a sadist can really help a self-absorbed jerk with some obsession get better at what they want to do? I can\'t find any way to sympathize with that. I mean, who is that speaking to?\n\nFinally, the actually appropriate and yet irritatingly obtrusive product placement (pristine cymbal labels, super-clean Zildjian logo on Andrew\'s stick bag, etc) got pretty hard to take by the (truly weird) ending.\n\nGo see this movie because everybody else thinks it\'s great, but if you feel funny afterwards maybe this review will offer some comfort that you\'re not alone.', u'0.232328', u"Inspiring, intense, reverent, Damien Chazelle's jazz-infused drama is an incredibly complex character study that has Miles Teller and J.K. Simmons at the top of their game in this brilliant effort. Whilst I was fixated by 'Birdman' and found 'Boyhood' a generally entertaining watch, 'Whiplash' is by far the most riveting and sensational drama I have viewed from 2014. J.K. Simmons stars as antihero Terence Fletcher, a character we look at as the opportunity of Andrew's success, but also we hate for his brutal portrayal. His performance is flawless and breathless, a truly resonant achievement. The final drum solo ends the film on a high note and keep its audience lingering on the edge of their seats, it is powerful, it is intense, it is a near-masterpiece!", u'0.950227', u"This movie was far better than the trailer made it look.\n\nJK Simmons gave a stellar performance as a music teacher in the best Jazz school, trying desperately to find and develop the next jazz legend. From the moment he appears he demands the screen, literately. There's a part in the flick were he just burst open the door putting a halt on whatever is going, and makes it all about what he wants, which sets the tone for the entire movie. One of the best antagonist I've seen at the movies.\n\nMiles Teller plays the protagonist, A first year Jazz student who wants to be the next Jazz legend and is willing to go through the pain needed to become just that. I've been a fan of Miles Teller for a while and this movie just increase my fandom\n\nIt does not matter whether you are into jazz or not, this flick is about and boy willing to kill himself to become the best and the man willing to kill the boy so he can be the best. For anyone who has ever been in that kind of pressure, weather it be at college or on the playing field(I kid you not, watching these guys play Jazz played out like I was watching a Football movie with Miles being the Quarterback and JK being the coach) \n\nIt was an emotion trill ride with a lot of ups and downs, and just when you think the ride is over, we go for a second time around. \n\nExcellence!!", u'0.406657', u'Greetings again from the darkness. The pursuit of greatness is not always pretty. No matter if your dream is athletics, dancing, music or some other; you can be sure hard work and sacrifice will be part of your routine. You will likely have a mentor, teacher or coach whose job is to cultivate your skills while pushing you to new limits. This film questions whether the best approach is intimidation or society\'s current preferred method of nurturing.\n\nMiles Teller plays Andrew, a first year student at an elite Manhattan music conservatory. Andrew dreams of being a great jazz drummer in the vein of Buddy Rich. When offered a rare shot at the top ensemble, Andrew quickly discovers the conductor is a breed unlike anything he has ever encountered. The best movie comparison I can offer for JK Simmons\' portrayal of Terence Fletcher is R Lee Ermey\'s Drill Instructor in Full Metal Jacket. This is no Mr Holland\'s Opus. Fletcher bullies, intimidates, humiliates and uses every imaginable form of verbal abuse to push his musicians, and especially young Andrew, to reach for greater heights.\n\nAndrew and Fletcher go head to head through the entire movie, with Fletcher\'s mental torment turning this into a psychological thriller ... albeit with tremendous music. We witness Andrew shut out all pieces of a personal life, and even take on some of Fletcher\'s less desirable traits. Andrew\'s diner break-up with his girlfriend (Melissa Benoist) is much shorter, but just as cold as the infamous opening scene in The Social Network. At a small dinner party, Andrew loses some of the sweetness he inherited from his dad (Paul Reiser), and unloads some Fletcherisms on some unsuspecting family friends.\n\nWriter/Director Damien Chazelle has turned his Sundance award-winning short film into a fascinatingly brutal message movie that begs for discussion and debate. The open-ended approach is brilliant, though I found myself initially upset at the missing clean wrap that Hollywood so often provides. What price greatness? Is comeuppance a reward? Are mentors cruel to be kind? For the past few years, I have been proclaiming that Miles Teller (The Spectacular Now) is the next John Cusack. Perhaps that bar is too low. Teller just gets better with each film. His relentless energy draws us in, and we find ourselves in his corner ... even though this time, he\'s not the greatest guy himself. Still, as strong as Teller is, the film is owned by JK Simmons. Most think of him as the dad in Juno, or the ever-present insurance spokesman on TV, but he previously flashed his bad side as the white supremacist in "Oz". Even that, doesn\'t prepare us for Simmons\' powerhouse performance ... just enough humanity to heighten his psychological torturing of musicians.\n\nYou should see this one for Simmons\' performance. Or see it for the up and coming Teller. Enjoy the terrific music, especially Duke Ellington\'s "Caravan". See it for the talking points about teachers, society and personal greatness. See it for any or all these reasons - just don\'t tell director Damien Chazelle "good job".', u'0.274411', u"this is played out as if the young musicians are in boot camp. the head teacher is more vicious drill sergeant than music teacher. anyone who has played an instrument will tell you, yes that practise is hard and you have to be committed, but it is always enjoyable and fulfilling. no one in this film seems to take pleasure in playing music. it is so ludicrous, over the top and ultimately just plain corny. they spell out what the film is about in very childish dialogue as if an audience cannot pick up on what the teacher is trying to do. scene after scene of bombastic emotional and physical brutality. any teacher teaching as this sadist does would not last a week, let alone manage to impart any kind of knowledge into his pupils. then we have the ending the kid races against time, survives a head on car collision and still makes it to the gig, (whereupon the teacher has change what they are going to play just for spite, this is the kind of character he has been throughout this one note film,) and then still manages that old clich\xe9 of killing them dead with his boring drum solo. drumming is not about speed its about making melody from skins. Overrated by critics who by now really don't know what makes a good film", u'-0.607075', u'When it comes to cinema, there are often little gems in a sea of bigger spectacles, that can break through in the most proficient way. Last year, I pleaded to the entire film universe that discover and understand "Inside Llewyn Davis" from the Coen Brothers after seeing it for the first time at NYFF. This year, I\'ve seem to already come to terms that the next film that will utilize all my energy and resources this year will be Damien Chazelle\'s highly intense psychological drama "Whiplash." An impeccable and tightly wound experience that brings your anxiety to a feverish level. As small, and utterly different as I\'m about to compare, I haven\'t felt this uneasy with a film\'s tension since Paul Greengrass\' "Captain Phillips," coincidentally also was a NYFF title. Two other similar traits that embody the two are the intense and completely submersible performances that inhabit them. Stars Miles Teller and J.K. Simmons are absolutely astonishing, featuring two of the year\'s very best turns.\n\nChazelle\'s film tells the story of Andrew (Teller), a first year music student that seeks out and joins the prestigious school band, headed by an intense and frightening teacher Mr. Fletcher (Simmons).\n\nWalking out of the screening I fully knew (though I fully hope to be proved wrong this year) that Miles Teller would be my "Oscar Isaac" this year. A performance that should shoot to the top of any awards consideration for a lead actor, but unfortunately will be passed over show after show. Teller is submerged in a way that we haven\'t seen the young actor achieve at this stage in his career. After plowing onto the scene opposite Nicole Kidman in "Rabbit Hole," and then helming "The Spectacular Now" with complete ease and intensity, I was not expecting him to be the machine of fury and magnitude that is on display in "Whiplash." There are moments where he channels the emotional aura of performances like Tom Hulce/F. Murray Abraham in "Amadeus," as crazy as that sounds. I am so excited to see where Teller goes from here. It makes the future of film a lot more bright, knowing that someone like him will be rising up in the ranks.\n\nEverything you\'ve heard about J.K. Simmons is true and then some. A fully fleshed out supporting role, Chazelle doesn\'t write Fletcher as a caricature. He\'s a deeply acute individual, full of passion and acrimony. Chazelle doesn\'t keep Simmons at a "10," he and Simmons allow him to find a range of empathy, hatred, and cryptic allowances that will keep you at the edge of your seat. As I watched Simmons flesh out a performance that can only be described as magnificent, I kept coming back in my mind to Christoph Waltz in the Oscar-winning "Inglourious Basterds," a role that found much heat on the awards circuit. The world/all film lovers will not be able ignore the stunning presence of Simmons. A Supporting Actor nominations (maybe even a win) seems all but assured (and deserved). Looking back at the veteran actor\'s career that included memorable roles in "Juno," "Burn After Reading," and "Up in the Air," a role like this could not have come at a better time. Already impressive in his brief work in Jason Reitman\'s "Men, Women & Children," writers, directors, casting agents, and producers will be pounding on the actor\'s door.\n\nYou can\'t credit "Whiplash" without citing the words and control by writer/director Damien Chazelle. An amazing and outstanding sophomore effort (unfortunately have not seen his debut "Guy and Madeline on a Park Bench") that channels a young Bennett Miller. Vigorous, self-assured, and innovative, Chazelle is a brilliant auteur filmmaker that knows exactly what type of films he wants to make. He takes inspiration from his own life, his love of film and music, and other places I\'m sure we don\'t know about, and molds them into a gritty, layered experience, conditioned with rich characters, all realized through the writer\'s story. It\'s one of the best scripts of the year.\n\n"Whiplash" features some of the best minutes of film seen in 2014. An ending that will bring tears to your eyes, dual performances that will have you applaud, and an experience that you surely will not forget. Drumming has never felt like such a personality. It acts as a visible tool for the viewer to understand and try. If you love music, appreciate education, and dare to be better than your current state, you will find something very real to latch onto. Hold on, and hold on tight.\n\n"Whiplash" is being distributed by Sony Pictures Classics and will be released October 10 in limited release (and then expanding after). A must-see for all movie lovers!', u'0.427759', u"I find it very sad that so many people - including so-called professional reviewers - have rated this crap so highly. I did not walk out (although I was greatly tempted to do so) but saw it to the end. A total waste of time.\n\nHere's what might spoil it for you, should you believe the BS that's being spread around this stinking pile of excrement: It could have actually been OK if it hadn't been so laughably impossibly ridiculous. Perhaps if it had been set in the fifties or the forties when people had much less developed consciousness of human rights? But even so... \n\nI suppose the moral/lesson we are supposed to learn is... if you can't warp your students enough by abuse to force them to become great musicians then it is perfectly alright to discard or destroy them in the attempt. \n\nThis glorified tyrant and bully can himself only produce music at a grade one level and so because he cannot 'do' he 'teaches?'\n\nHe does not teach, he does not inspire; he withholds approval, negatively reinforces and rules by fear, and is feared rather than respected. I would have a difficult time to point to a single (pedagogical) scene in the film that had any merit whatsoever or was worth watching for any reason. Maybe I should say that its evident popularity may be evidence that we are truly living in the end times... ha! \n\nSee the film if you want to be current, but please decide for yourself from watching it and don't believe the hype about its 'genius' or 'brilliance.' It is not either of those things; it's a poorly written, sad joke.", u'-0.436884', u"Whiplash is low budget film making at its finest, and surely promises big things from rookie director/writer Damien Chazelle. Seeing this film in theaters was the first time this year that I have completely enraptured (granted, I have not seen all of the top films that have come out so far). Also, I am a succor for quality films about musicians, and Whiplash ranks in my all time favorites in that genre. The tension did not let up from the very first scene, especially as soon as the incredible J.K. Simmons enters. Simmons, along with Miles Teller (who's Project X days are now long behind him) have some of the best on screen chemistry I've seen. They're connected; one cannot act without it affecting the other. The film is almost entirely focused on this relationship, and the simplicity definitely services the film. I hope people will go and see it and vote with their pocketbooks for excellent low budget films.", u'0.426787', u"This movie tries so hard to display the hardships of training to be a musician that the whole image shifts into simple physical and mental abuse of human beings, in this case teenagers. As another reviewer said: it is the boot camp of music. I did not believe what I was seeing. If there was a movie where some dog-whisperer is hitting the dog and yelling at it and this would prove to be working as a method to 'educate' the dog, then people would be upset. But treating a human like that is OK? this just sickens me. yes, you can get humans to do some things by pushing them with violence. Get them into an obedient state of mind, that is simply following orders. But there is a reason why this strategy of motivation has proved to be only effective in the military: There, human lives are indeed worthless. This treatment will make you 'harder', meaning it will make you less of a human being.\n\nWhen it comes to music however it is impossible to achieve great results with these methods. It can only lead to a soul- and heartless disaster. A fitting result would have been an aggression build-up in the main character which would have prevented him from ever playing anything worth listening to again. This reaction has been seen in other movies where usually the people that are socially connected to the main character will have to suffer from the violent state of mind that this mistreatment is causing. The other possibility is a simple resignation, either by quitting music or by quitting life.\n\nBut what is displayed here is wrong on many levels, because it tells you that this abuse leads to something beautiful. That it is all worth it because it pushes you to your limits and then you will be a great musician. Whoever made up this story is either suffering from a severe psychosis or has the intent to justify abusive methods in education by presenting them as effective.\n\nIf you treat people with violence they will get violent too. Either towards others or towards themselves. This is the only result you will achieve. And in this case it would also completely destroy the main character's ability to be a musician. Music is not the military. You do need discipline and training, but this comes from mental strength. And you do not get stronger by being abused. It will only weaken you.\n\nIt makes me sad seeing that apparently this movie is entertaining to people. This can only be the case if they do not see the utter failure in judgment that is presented here. And if they do not see it then they are blind in a way that is worrying.", u'-0.448924', u'"Music is your own experience, your own thoughts, your wisdom. If you don\'t live it, it won\'t come out of your horn. They teach you there\'s a boundary line to music. But, man, there\'s no boundary line to art." \n\nCharlie Parker sums it all, Cinema is true Art. I wasn\'t expecting to feel this way after watching this movie. Every moment has tension and something unexpected occurring. It is as if the director had chosen to apply the tempo of the drums to the script. Anyone can relate to this story. We all have pursued a dream, a passion ... Rather or not we made it our everyday job or maybe just a hobby aside, some of us strive for something bigger. \n\nThis film is a journey in the search of your inner spirit, inner creativity ... not only will it make it clear that you cannot succeed without effort and hard work, it will also make you realize there are two different kinds of artists : - those who make art, - and those who make beautiful art\n\n"Beautiful" because they are stimulated by a special strength within, a GIFT. \n\nIs it because I reminisce N.Y.C. or that I play the drums? I simply believe the performances were astonishing and the actors perfectly chosen to embody these terrific characters. I won\'t say "good job" but rather "thank you", to the promising Franco-American director Damien Chazelle\ufeff for sharing his vision.', u'0.255456'], u'tt0034583': [u'Spoilers ahead, but then again, who isn\'t familiar with Casablanca, even if one hasn\'t seen it?\n\nI\'ve been watching \'Casablanca\' over and over again since I bought the Special Edition DVD, and is there any film out there one can watch again and again without ever being tired of it? And does any film appeal to a broader audience? Just everything about it seems to be as close to perfection as it only can be.\n\nBut what exactly is so special about it? Is it its great genre mix, never equaled by another film? When we think of \'Casablanca\' first, we remember it as a romantic film (well, most of us do). But then again, its also a drama involving terror, murder and flight. One can call it a character study, centering on Rick. And there are quite a few moments of comedic delight, just think of the pickpocket ("This place is full of vultures, vultures everywhere!") or the elderly couple on the last evening before their emigration to the US ("What watch?").\n\nBut \'Casablanca\' is not only great as a whole, it still stands on top if we break it apart and look at single lines of dialog, scenes or performances alone. Is there any other film which has more quotable dialog than \'Casablanca\'? \'Pulp Fiction\' is on my mind here, and \'All About Eve\' and \'Sunset Blvd.\' come close, too, but still I think \'Casablanca\' tops everything else. And not only is the dialog great, it\'s unforgettably delivered, especially by Humphrey Bogart ("I was misinformed.") and Claude Rains ("I am shocked, shocked to find that gambling is going on here"). Many of scenes have become a part of film history; the duel of \'Die Wacht am Rhein\' and \'La Marseillaise\' is probably one of the greatest scenes ever shot (the only I can think of that would rival it for the #1 spot is Hynkel and the globe from Chaplin\'s \'The Great Dictator\'), and the last scene is probably even familiar to the few people who\'ve never seen \'Casablanca\'. Am I the only one who is absolutely convinced that the film wouldn\'t have become what it is today if Rick and Ilsa would have ended up as the lucky couple?\n\nAbout the performances: So much has been said about the uniqueness of Humphrey Bogart\'s and Ingrid Bergman\'s chemistry as Rick and Ilsa, about Claude Rains\' terrific turn as Renault, about the scene-stealing performances by Peter Lorre (one of the 10 all-time greatest actors) as Ugarte and Sydney Greenstreet as Ferrari and about Dooley Wilson stopping the show as Sam. I\'d love to emphasize here two other performances, one that is not mentioned quite as often and one which is blatantly overlooked: Conrad Veidt as Major Strasser had a really difficult task here, as his character is the only evil one, but still Strasser is not a one-dimensional character, and it took more than 50 years until another actor gave an equally (maybe even more) impressive performance as a Nazi, Ralph Fiennes in \'Schindler\'s List\'. But why no one ever mentions S. K. Sakall, who plays Carl, the jolly waiter at Rick\'s Caf\xe9 Am\xe9ricain, is beyond me. He has definitely more screen time than Lorre, Greenstreet and Wilson, and probably about as much as Veidt, and he\'s a joy whenever he\'s on the screen. I simply love his reaction when the pickpocket ("Vultures everywhere!") accidentally bumps into him, or the reaction to the "What watch"-dialog. Or how he says he gave Strasser the best table, "being a German, he would have taken it anyway". His performance is simply criminally overlooked.\n\nSo is there a weakest link in \'Casablanca\'? Every film, no matter how close to perfection, has a minor flaw or two, so one can find them in \'Casablanca\', too, if one really tries hard. So yes, one might ask how much sense the entire mumbo jumbo about the letters of transit makes. One might point out that Paul Henreid, although his performance is certainly good, doesn\'t come close to the greatness of any of his co-stars. However, the film is so close to perfection that I\'m almost ashamed that I\'m so desperately trying to find less-than-perfect elements.\n\nSo whatever films will come, how many sequels will overflow the screen, and how much junk we will have to sit through, one thing is certain if we\'re desperate to see a great film: We\'ll always have Casablanca!', u'0.00832185', u"There is a scene about halfway through the movie Casablanca that has become commonly known as 'The Battle of the Anthems' throughout the film's long history. A group of German soldiers has come into Rick's Caf\xe9 American and are drunkenly singing the German National Anthem at the top of their voice. Victor Lazlo, the leader of the French Resistance, cannot stand this act and while the rest of the club stares appalled at the Germans, Lazlo orders the band to play 'Le Marseilles (sic?)' the French National Anthem. With a nod from Rick, the band begins playing, with Victor singing at the top of HIS voice. This in turn, inspires the whole club to begin singing and the Germans are forced to surrender and sit down at their table, humbled by the crowd's dedication. This scene is a turning point in the movie, for reasons that I leave to you to discover. \n\nAs I watched this movie again tonight for what must be the 100th time, I noticed there was a much smaller scene wrapped inside the bigger scene that, unless you look for it, you may never notice. Yvonne, a minor character who is hurt by Rick emotionally, falls into the company of a German soldier. In a land occupied by the Germans, but populated by the French, this is an unforgivable sin. She comes into the bar desperately seeking happiness in the club's wine, song, and gambling. Later, as the Germans begin singing we catch a glimpse of Yvonne sitting dejectedly at a table alone and in this brief glimpse, it is conveyed that she has discovered that this is not her path to fulfillment and she has no idea where to go from there. As the singing progresses, we see Yvonne slowly become inspired by Lazlo's act of defiance and by the end of the song, tears streaming down her face, she is singing at the top of her voice too. She has found her redemption. She has found something that will make her life never the same again from that point on. \n\nBasically, this is Casablanca in a nutshell. On the surface, you may see it as a romance, or as a story of intrigue, but that is only partially correct.\n\nThe thing that makes Casablanca great is that it speaks to that place in each of us that seeks some kind of inspiration or redemption. On some level, every character in the story receives the same kind of catharsis and their lives are irrevocably changed. Rick's is the most obvious in that he learns to live again, instead of hiding from a lost love. He is reminded that there are things in the world more noble and important than he is and he wants to be a part of them. Louis, the scoundrel, gets his redemption by seeing the sacrifice Rick makes and is inspired to choose a side, where he had maintained careful neutrality. The stoic Lazlo gets his redemption by being shown that while thousands may need him to be a hero, there is someone he can rely upon when he needs inspiration in the form of his wife, who was ready to sacrifice her happiness for the chance that he would go on living. Even Ferrai, the local organized crime leader gets a measure of redemption by pointing Ilsa and Lazlo to Rick as a source of escape even though there is nothing in it for him. \n\nThis is the beauty of this movie. Every time I see it (and I have seen it a lot) it never fails that I see some subtle nuance that I have never seen before. Considering that the director would put that much meaning into what is basically a throw away moment (not the entire scene, but Yvonne's portion) speaks bundles about the quality of the film. My wife and I watched this movie on our first date, and since that first time over 12 years ago, it has grown to be, in my mind, the greatest movie ever made.", u'0.142226', u'"Casablanca" remains Hollywood\'s finest moment, a film that succeeds on such a vast scale not because of anything experimental or deliberately earthshaking in its design, but for the way it cohered to and reaffirmed the movie-making conventions of its day. This is the film that played by the rules while elevating the form, and remains the touchstone for those who talk about Hollywood\'s greatness.\n\nIt\'s the first week in December, 1941, and in the Vichy-controlled African port city of Casablanca, American ex-pat Rick Blaine runs a gin joint he calls "Rick\'s Cafe Americaine." Everybody comes to Rick\'s, including thieves, spies, Nazis, partisans, and refugees trying to make their way to Lisbon and, eventually, America. Rick is a tough, sour kind of guy, but he\'s still taken for a loop when fate hands him two sudden twists: A pair of unchallengeable exit visas, and a woman named Ilsa who left him broken-hearted in Paris and now needs him to help her and her resistance-leader husband escape.\n\nHumphrey Bogart is Rick and Ingrid Bergman is Ilsa, in roles that are archetypes in film lore. They are great parts besides, very multilayered and resistant to stereotype, and both actors give career performances in what were great careers. He\'s mad at her for walking out on him, while she wants him to understand her cause, but there\'s a lot going on underneath with both, and it all spills out in a scene in Rick\'s apartment that is one of many legendary moments.\n\n"Casablanca" is a great romance, not only for being so supremely entertaining with its humor and realistic-though-exotic wartime excitement, but because it\'s not the least bit mushy. Take the way Rick\'s face literally breaks when he first sees Ilsa in his bar, or how he recalls the last time he saw her in Paris: "The Germans wore gray, you wore blue." There\'s a real human dimension to these people that makes us care for them and relate to them in a way that belies the passage of years.\n\nFor me, and many, the most interesting relationship in the movie is Rick and Capt. Renault, the police prefect in Casablanca who is played by Claude Rains with a wonderful subtlety that builds as the film progresses. Theirs is a relationship of almost perfect cynicism, one-liners and professions of neutrality that provide much humor, as well as give a necessary display of Rick\'s darker side before and after Ilsa\'s arrival.\n\nBut there\'s so much to grab onto with a film like this. You can talk about the music, or the way the setting becomes a living character with its floodlights and Moorish traceries. Paul Henreid is often looked at as a bit of a third wheel playing the role of Ilsa\'s husband, but he manages to create a moral center around which the rest of the film operates, and his enigmatic relationship with Rick and especially Ilsa, a woman who obviously admires her husband but can\'t somehow ever bring herself to say she loves him, is something to wonder at.\n\nMy favorite bit is when Rick finds himself the target of an entreaty by a Bulgarian refugee who just wants Rick\'s assurance that Capt. Renault is "trustworthy," and that, if she does "a bad thing" to secure her husband\'s happiness, it would be forgivable. Rick flashes on Ilsa, suppresses a grimace, tries to buy the woman off with a one-liner ("Go back to Bulgaria"), then finally does a marvelous thing that sets the whole second half of the film in motion without much calling attention to itself.\n\nIt\'s not fashionable to discuss movie directors after Chaplin and before Welles, but surely something should be said about Michael Curtiz, who not only directed this film but other great features like "Captain Blood" and "Angels With Dirty Faces." For my money, his "Adventures Of Robin Hood" was every bit "Casablanca\'s" equal, and he even found time the same year he made "Casablanca" to make "Yankee Doodle Dandy." When you watch a film like this, you aren\'t so much aware of the director, but that\'s really a testament to Curtiz\'s artistry. "Casablanca" is not only exceptionally well-paced but incredibly well-shot, every frame feeling well-thought-out and legendary without distracting from the overall story.\n\nCurtiz was a product of the studio system, not a maverick like Welles or Chaplin, but he found greatness just as often, and "Casablanca," also a product of the studio system, is the best example. It\'s a film that reminds us why we go back to Hollywood again and again when we want to refresh our imaginations, and why we call it "the dream factory." As the hawker of linens tells Ilsa at the bazaar, "You won\'t find a treasure like this in all Morocco." Nor, for that matter, in all the world.', u'0.339044', u'\nCasablanca is a film about the personal tragedy of occupation and war.  It speaks to the oppression of the one side - and the heroism and self-deprecation of the other.  From opportunists, to isolationists - from patriots to disenchanted lovers - the film has everything a man or woman would enjoy.  Bravery, courage, intrigue, romance, beauty and love. Leading actors to please any appetite.  Watching this film is to step back to a world that doesn\'t exist - yet to know it.  It is to experience lives that have never been lived - but are "real to you."  It is to know pain and joy, pride and pity for characters that are a fiction - yet are so real that you can\'t help but get lost in their story.\n\nAmazing cast, memorable dialogue, unforgettable story.  Through this film, Casablanca will always live in my heart and I will think of its characters as family.\n\nSeeing it for the first time is truly the start of a romance with ideals that will live in you long after credits end.', u'0.428401', u'\nThis is a film that MUST belong in every video collection in the U.S. is not in the world. The stories about it\'s making are legendary from the constant rewrites to the apocrypha of casting stories.\n\nWhat is amazing to me, and the reason I believe it holds audiences almost spellbound in successive viewings, is the connection with the horrors of World War II was almost every single cast member.  Sidney Greenstreet had lost a son in combat, and a number of the cast members fled Europe to escape the ravages of a Hitler regime.  Even the evil Nazi character Major Strasser (played with relish by Conrad Veidt) had left Nazi Germany to escape  almost sure internment and possible death in a concentration camp. Here was a man who was a legend in German film history as the murdering somnambulist (a possible warning about the Nazi soldiers to come?) and because of the vicious anti-Semitism and racism of the Germany of the \'30s and \'40s, we in America and in Hollywood were given a great gift.\n\nEveryone in this film is fabulous, but it is the chemistry of Rick (Bogart) and Ilsa (Bergman) been truly holds the film together.  When I saw this film almost frame by frame in the limited book series of classic films that were produced in the late 1960s, I was stunned by the subtlety of facial expressions that conveyed so much of Rick Blaine\'s character by a marvelous actor Humphrey Bogart.  There is a reason why he was named the actor of the century.\n\nWhile every person in the film becomes a real flesh and blood presence, the story of Rick and Ilsa is the center of this cinema feast.\n\nI must confess that I have seen this picture so many times that I can recite every single line in the movie to the consternation of my wife who can\'t watch it with me anymore. \n\nThe line that sticks out the most for me, and which against cheers from New Yorkers whenever it plays in the theater.  It is when Bogart says to the Nazis seated at his table, "There are parts of New York I wouldn\'t advise you to invade."  And what makes this line so memorable is that Humphrey Bogart did indeed star in another motion picture for Warner Brothers where that very thing formed the basis for the script.  That movie was "All Through The Night." I love this movie too, and I\'m not even a New Yorker.\n\nThere have been many attempts to revisit "Casablanca," but only the original makes you really feel what it was like to live through "The Good War" in a faraway place like Casablanca in French Morocco.\n\nEven  though such trickery as midget airport workers, fog machines and cardboard cutout airplanes were utilized, this film convinces through its beautiful story with many layers, and characters that are so well realized.\n\nIf you\'ve never seen this movie before, shame on you and see it immediately. If you only seen it once, I believe you will come back to it more than once. This is just about the most perfect film ever made and it is a miracle that that is so considering that there were so many hands in the pie.  (Excuse me for my mixing my metaphors.  It\'s late, and I get emotional just thinking about this classic film masterpiece.)\n\nPlay it again and again and again and again, Sam.', u'-0.0156794', u'The Petrified Forest convinced the world Bogart was a bad guy. And for years he shocked and awed the audience with roles fitting that image. The Maltese Falcon showed a new kind hero, one with an edge. Bogart, with all the right things to say and seemingly never losing his cool. Then came Casablanca and the ages. The man\'s \x96 man comes with a heart. Arguably, three of his best pictures. All showing a change in a man\'s character and the depths of what acting is supposed to be. Maybe it was Warner Bros all along. Maybe Bogart was simply Bogart.\n\nWhat can I say about this film that hasn\'t been said in over 60 years since its release. Is it a great film? Yes. Is it a showcase for Bogart? If not, than what else. Was Bogart the coolest guy to ever live? Absolutely. Casablanca is a different kind of love story, more likely to infect rather than effect.\n\nShe almost makes me believe it every time. When she says, "You\'re very kind." Bergman was more than just beautiful. And with Paul Henreid, Claude Rains, Conrad Veidt and Peter Lorre, cinema magic was created. But to me, Bogart was the greatest actor of all time. It\'s hard for me to believe he died almost 50 years ago. Every time I watch his films, it\'s like they were made yesterday. And that\'s why he is timeless. I\'m still trying to figure him out.\n\n"I should never have switched from scotch to martinis." Is said to be Bogart\'s last words. A legend, indeed.', u'0.191884', u"It's one of the great Hollywood legends how George Raft helped make Humphrey Bogart a leading man by turning down in succession, High Sierra, The Maltese Falcon, and Casablanca. Maybe Raft showed some good sense in letting a better actor handle those roles. In any event we've got some proof in the case of Casablanca.\n\nCheck out some time a film called Background to Danger that Warner Brothers did with George Raft that also featured Peter Lorre and Sydney Greenstreet. Had Raft ever done Casablanca the film would have been a routine action/adventure story just like Background to Danger. Instead with Bogey we get that, but also one of the great love stories of the century. \n\nHumphrey Bogart set the standard for playing expatriate American soldiers of fortune in Casablanca. Right now he's between wars running Rick's Cafe Americain in Casablanca in Morocco, an area controlled for the moment by the Vicky French government. He's got his fingers in a whole lot of pies, but Bogey operates with his own code of ethics. He sticks his neck out for nobody.\n\nNobody except the great love of his life Ingrid Bergman who left him mysteriously in Paris as he was fleeing the oncoming German occupation. She walks back into his life with a husband, Paul Henreid who is a well known anti-fascist leader.\n\nThe rest of the film is a contest for Bogey's soul. Torn between his great love, his own anti-fascist beliefs, and certain practical necessities of operating a liquor and gaming establishment in a hostile environment. \n\nSo many things combine to make Casablanca the great film it is. Ingrid Bergman's lovely incandescence melding and melting Bogey's cynical screen persona. The indelible characterizations of Peter Lorre, Sydney Greenstreet, Claude Rains, Conrad Veidt and the whole rest of a 100% perfectly cast film. And the revival of a great ballad which serves as Casablanca's theme song.\n\nI say revival because As Time Goes By was introduced in 1931 in the George White Scandals on Broadway by Rudy Vallee. He made a record of it which sold quite a few disks back then. But by the merest of coincidences there was a strike that lasted two years that just began around the time Casablanca came out. The Musicians Union struck against the record companies. With no new records being made RCA Victor re-released Vallee's record and it became a monster hit on revival.\n\nAlso when Casablanca came out as if the White House had a personal interest in the film FDR and Churchill had the first of their wartime conferences in----Casablanca of all places. Jack Warner must have said a prayer for that to happen.\n\nThere are so many classic scenes and lines from Casablanca you can write a comment just by listing them. But my favorite has always been when the Germans have taken over Rick's place and are singing some of their songs, Paul Henreid goes to orchestra leader and asks him to lead La Marsellaise. With a nod from Bogey, the orchestra plays, Henreid leads them and the rest of the non-Germans in the cafe join in. Over 60 years later, one still gets a thrill from that act of defiance.\n\nBogart and Rains were nominated for Best Actor and Best Supporting Actor. Any of the others could have been as well. As I said before Casablanca is perfectly cast right down to minor roles like Curt Bois as a pickpocket, John Qualen as a fellow resistance leader, and S.Z. Sakall as a waiter at Rick's. If there was an award for ensemble cast, Casablanca would have won it. As it was it did win for Best Picture of 1943 and best director for Michael Curtiz.\n\nCasablanca will be seen and loved by filmgoers for generations unto infinity, as time goes by.", u'0.21089', u'\nWhile there\'s not anything new to be said about "Casablanca", it\'s good to see one of the classics still getting some attention.  By most standards it is at least very good, and there are good reasons why so many still remember it so fondly.  Not everyone who watches it today shares the opinion that it is a classic, but it\'s still good to see fans of modern movies giving it a try for themselves.\n\nThe cast is one of its main strengths, not just Bogart and Bergman but also the fine supporting cast.  Rains, Greenstreet, Lorre, and the others are indispensable to the atmosphere and the story, and each has some very good moments.  It does have its imperfections, but it was not expected to be a classic or blockbuster - everything you read about the production suggests that it was made in a rather slap-dash fashion, under constraints that would have wrecked most other films.  It\'s not hard to see the little ways that this affected the finished product, such as the times when the plot strains credibility a bit, or the characters seem to behave somewhat oddly.  (In particular, it might have been even more satisfying if Bergman\'s character had been a little stronger - Ilsa is charming, but that\'s entirely thanks to what Bergman does with her; the character herself as written seems somewhat shallow.)\n\nBut it turned out anyway to be an excellent combination of actors, characters, and story, a combination that more than makes up for everything else.  Different viewers probably remember and enjoy "Casablanca" for different reasons, because it seemingly has a little of everything.  While perhaps not perfect, it is well worth remembering and watching.', u'0.515614', u'Michael Curtiz\'s "Casablanca" opens on maps while a narrator gives a detailed exposition of the many twists and turns of Casablanca in the French Morocco, as a refugee route from wartime Europe...\n\nThe Nazi envoy, Major Heinrich Strasser puts it: \'Human life is cheap in Casablanca." Of course because a man may be executed in its crowded market before Marshal P\xe9tain\'s portrait or where a charming girl may guarantee an exit visa by spending her night with the Prefect of Police...\n\nRick\'s Caf\xe9 is the point of intersection, the espionage center, the background for Allied offensive, the focal point as refugees from Nazi-occupied Europe seek to gain exit visas to Lisboa... The interesting club so well organized, leads to an open arena of conspiracy, counterspies, secret plans, black market transactions, in which the games and fights are between arrogant Nazis, patriotic French, idealists, murderers, pickpockets and gamblers around a roulette wheel, where a ball could rest on Rick\'s command against the settled number 22...\n\n"Casablanca" is an adventure film which victory is not won with cannons and guns... The action, the fight, the war takes place inside Rick\'s walls rather than outside...\n\nBut who is this Rick? What is his magical power? His secret weapon? Rick is the anti-fascist with hard feelings, the former soldier of fortune who has grown tired of smuggling and fighting, and is now content to sit out the war in his own neutral territory... Even loyalty to a friend doesn\'t move him as he refuses to help Ugarte, a desperately frightened little courier who is fleeing from the police...\n\nEmphatically, Rick says, "I stick my neck out for nobody." But we know he will do just that in a very short time, for into his quiet life comes a haunting vision from his past, the beautiful woman he still loves and bitterly remembers... She is married to an underground leader and she desperately needs those papers Rick conveniently now has in his possession... The cynical Rick\'s facade of neutrality begins to weaken as he recalls the bittersweet memories of his past love affair, memories triggered repeatedly when the strains of "As Time Goes By" come from Sam, his piano-playing confidante...\n\nBut "Casablanca" basic message is a declaration of self-sacrifice... War World II demanded all! The words stated by Rick at the airport had their impact: \'The problems of three people don\'t amount to a hill of beans in this crazy world.\' It goes without saying that Bogart is incomparable when he seems most like himself... His way with a line makes "Casablanca" dialog part of the collective memory: \'I remember every detail. The Germans wore gray. You were blue.\' \n\nIntermixed in this intrigue are all the fascinating and beautifully acted supporting roles\x85 With his customary skill, Claude Rains plays Major Renault, a prefect of police who is like Bogart in many ways... He, too, claims neutrality, but is definitely against the Nazis... He is Rick\'s most devoted adversary, tauntingly calling the man a "sentimentalist" and delivering his share of cynically amusing lines... When he makes a small bet and is encouraged to make a bigger one, he remarks that he is only a "poor corrupt official." \n\nIngrid Bergman is fascinating as the lovely heroine, the mysterious impossible woman of an impossible love, the tender mood of every man, the love-affair, the quality of being romantic, the traditional woman enclosed by two rivals, symbol of a besieged Europe...\n\nPaul Henreid is Victor Laszlo, the anti-Nazi resistance leader, seeking in Morocco the two letters of transit signed by General De Gaulle...\n\nSidney Greenstreet is the black marketeer on good terms with Rick, the rival owner of the \'Blue Parrot,\' the acceptable face of corruption...\n\nPeter Lorre is Ugarte, the racketeer, the dealer of anything illegal, the killer, driven into a corner by the Vichy police, who has given Rick two letter of transit...\n\nConrad Veidt is the very essence of German rigidity, unfeeling, unconcerned about life, but firmly believing in the foolish ideology of his Nazi compatriots...\n\n"Casablanca" covers many highlights: The Marseillaise against the Horst Wessel song inspiring sequence; the blissful days in Paris; Ilsa\'s emotional words to Rick in occupied Paris; the champagne toast; Ilsa\'s request to Sam; the poetry of the magic words and the beautiful voice of Dooley Wilson; Captain Renault\'s words in the airport; and the farewell...\n\nThe magic that developed from the teaming of Bogart and Bergman is enough to make a new romantic figure out of the former tough guy... To his cynicism, his own code of ethics, his hatred of the phoniness in all human behavior, he now added the softening traits of tenderness and compassion and a feeling of heroic commitment to a cause... They helped him complete the portrayal of the ideal man who all men wished to rival...\n\nOne can look at hundreds of films produced during this period without finding any whose composite pieces fall so perfectly into place... Its photography is outstanding, the music score is inventive, the editing is concise and timed perfectly... Bogart\'s and Bergman\'s love scenes create a genuinely romantic aura, capturing a sensitivity between the two stars one would not have believed possible...\n\n"Casablanca" is a masterpiece of entertainment, an outstanding motion picture which brought Bogart his first Academy Award nomination (he lost to Paul Lukas for "Watch On the Rhine") and won Awards for Best Picture of the Year, Best Director and Best Screenplay...', u'0.209445', u'\nCASABLANCA is the best treatment ever of the ancient theme of the love triangle.  Set in World War II Casablanca, a Moroccan city under the control of the collaborationist Vichy French government, the movie starts with a news wire that two German couriers have been murdered and their letters of transit stolen.  Each letter will permit one person to leave Casablanca to a neutral country.\n\nEnter Humphrey Bogart as Rick Blaine, owner of the shady but cheerful Cafe Americaine.  Rick is a cynical and hard-nosed man whose motto is, "I stick my neck out for nobody."  Like many a cynic, Rick is an embittered ex-idealist, still nursing his wounds from being abandoned by his lover Ilsa (Ingrid Bergman).  By chance he falls into possession of the missing letters of transit.\n\nEnter Ilsa, who comes to Casablanca on the arm of Czech Resistance leader Victor Laszlo (Paul Henreid), a few steps ahead of the Nazi police.  We now have three people and two letters of transit.  Who will reach America, and who will stay in Casablanca?\n\nI know no other movie that so perfectly balances humor, romance, and drama.  The soul of good drama lies in presenting characters with hard choices, and few choices are as hard, or as illuminating of the protagonists\' makeup, as the choices in CASABLANCA.  All of the characters must decide what they will give up for love, for honor, and for themselves.  The scenes of Rick and Ilsa\'s love, years ago in Paris, are some of the finest romantic scenes in cinema.  And the humor, particularly in the person of Casablanca\'s Prefect of Police, Louis Renault, has contributed dozens of dry witticisms to our everyday language - "I am shocked! Shocked! - "The Germans wore gray, you wore blue." - "I was misinformed." - "It would take a miracle to get you out of Casablanca, and the Germans have outlawed miracles."  So perfectly blended are these three major elements that you cannot point to a single shot or scene that should have been eliminated from the movie.  Never try to watch only one scene from CASABLANCA; you will inevitably be absorbed until the very end of the film.  It is little short of miraculous that the chaotically mismanaged shooting of this movie resulted in such a magnificent final product; it speaks volumes for luck and for Owen Marks\' and Michael Curtiz\' post-production editing.\n\nI have never encountered a movie whose supporting cast was so perfectly realized.  Every minor character is a fleshed-out, realistic individual, from Sasha to Carl the headwaiter to Rick\'s competitor Ferrari to the self-effacing criminal Ugarte.  Claude Rains\' Captain Renault ("I\'m only a poor corrupt official") steals scene after scene, and Dooley Wilson\'s Sam is a refreshingly loyal, charismatic and sympathetic conception from an era when almost all black characters were rendered as demeaning stereotypes.  The only character who tastes of the cliche is the villainous Major Strasser, which can be forgiven in a wartime production.\n\nThe only film I have ever seen as tautly effective as CASABLANCA is GLORY.  Although the 54th Mass.\'s story is arguably superior even to CASABLANCA for sheer dramatic power and acting talent, GLORY lacks CASABLANCA\'s wonderful humor and romance, which causes me to give the edge to Curtiz\' classic as the better-rounded movie.  I have yet to see CASABLANCA surpassed.\n\nRating: **** out of ****.\n', u'0.188823', u'\nWhile my personal Bogey favorite is still his Sam Spade in \'The Maltese Falcon\', his cynical nightclub owner, Rick, in \'Casablanca\', is also a standout. Rather than some "off the cuff" comments, I\'ll quote instead from my article on Claude Rains (from March 2000 issue of CLASSIC IMAGES) that pretty well sums up the film:\n\n"It was 1943\'s \'Casablanca\', bustling with melodramatic wartime intrigue, that really put him (Claude Rains) in the forefront as one of the screen\'s smoothest character actors, almost--but not quite--stealing the film from Humphrey Bogart and Ingrid Bergman, as the uniformed Captain Louis Renault who investigates the goings-on at Rick\'s notorious cafe.\n\n\nNobody associated with the film guessed that it would become a screen classic, least of all its director, Michael Curtiz, the prolific WB director to whom it was just another assignment.  It went on to win the Oscar for Best Film of 1943 with an award for Curtiz\' taut direction.\n\nOddly enough, the film\'s memorable airport ending was written and conceived just shortly before filming wrapped up, with neither Bergman nor Bogart knowing whether or not she would leave him for husband Paul Henried. Wartime audiences loved the film. Sydney Greenstreet, Conrad Veidt, Victor Francen and Peter Lorre all gave sterling performances and Rains was again nominated for Best Supporting actor."\n\nAnd by the way, I disagree with a former comment indicating the black and white photography of this film was primitive as compared to today\'s. Incredible nonsense!!  As a matter of fact, the film\'s black and white cinematography was nominated for an Oscar!\n\nIngrid Bergman was at the peak of her radiant beauty in this one--and Bogey was firing on all six cylinders. Great chemistry! \n\nAs time goes by, we still have \'Casablanca\'...', u'0.286855', u"\nCasablanca is the consummate Hollywood film.  It is superbly directed, acted, and filmed.  Bogart is amazing, the characters are deep and engaging.\n\nThis is easily one of the greatest films of all time.  The story is timeless and meaningful, full of heart and should endure for another fifty years with no problems.  A true masterpiece and the benchmark by which all other films should be measured.  If you haven't seen it, you are at a profound loss.  If you have then you know the greatness of this film.", u'0.601947', u"Sunday, November the 20th is the anniversary of Marcel Dalio's death in 1983. It was the end of a serendipitous life. You know him. He was a citizen of the world. Born Israel Moshe Blauschild, in Paris, in 1900, he became a much sought-after character actor. His lovely animated face with its great expressive eyes became familiar across Europe. He appeared in Jean Renoir's idiosyncratic Rules of the Game, and Grand Illusion, arguably the greatest of all films. True to his Frenchman's heart, he married the very young, breathtaking beauty Madeleine LeBeau. He worked with von Stroheim and Pierre Chenal. He had it all.\n\nBut then the Germans crushed Poland, swept across Belgium and pressed on toward Paris. He waited until the last possible moment and finally, with the sound of artillery clearly audible, with Madeleine, fled in a borrowed car to Orleans and then, in a freight train, to Bordeaux and finally to Portugal. In Lisbon, they bribed a crooked immigration official and were surreptitiously given two visas for Chile. But on arriving in Mexico City, it was discovered the visas were rank forgeries. Facing deportation, Marcel and Madeleine found themselves making application for political asylum with virtually every country in the western hemisphere. Weeks passed until Canada finally issued them temporary visas and they left for Montreal.\n\nMeanwhile, France had fallen and, in the process of subjugating the country, the Germans had found some publicity stills of Dalio. A series of posters were produced and were then displayed throughout the city with the caption 'a typical Jew' so that citizens could more easily report anyone suspected of unrepentant Jewishness. The madness continued. 'Entree des artistes', a popular film, was ordered re-edited so that Dalio's scenes could be deleted and re-shot with another, non-Jewish, actor.\n\nAfter a short time, friends in the film industry arranged for them to arrive in Hollywood. Nearly broke, Marcel was immediately put to work in a string of largely forgettable films. Madeleine, a budding actress in her own right, was ironically cast in 'Hold Back the Dawn', a vehicle for Charles Boyer with a plot driven by the efforts of an \xe9migr\xe9 (Boyer) trying desperately to cross into the United States from Mexico. But the real irony was waiting at Warner Brothers.\n\nIn early 1942, Jack Warner was driving production of a film based on a one act play, 'Everybody Comes to Rick's' but had no screenplay. What he had was a mishmash of treatments loosely based on the play and two previous movies. But he had a projected release date and a commitment to his distributors to have a movie for that time slot and little else. Warner Brothers started to wing it.\n\nShooting started without a screenplay and little plot. Principal players were cast and a director hired but casting calls for supporting roles and bit players continued and sometime in the early spring Marcel Dalio and Madeleine LeBeau were cast as, respectively, a croupier and a romantic entanglement for the male lead. Veteran screen-writers were hired to produce a running screenplay, sometimes delivering pages of dialogue one day, for scenes to be shot the following day. No one knew exactly where the plot would go or how the story would turn out. No one was sure of the ending. And, of course, they produced a classic, perhaps the finest American movie.\n\nThey produced a screenplay of multiple genres, rich with characterizations, perfectly in tune with the unfolding events in Europe and loaded with talent from top to bottom. Oh, and they changed the title to 'Casablanca'.\n\nIt is so well known, that many lines of long-memorized dialogue have passed into the slang idiom. 'We'll always have Paris', 'I was misinformed', 'Here's looking at you, kid', ' I am shocked! Shocked! To find that there's gambling going on in here!', 'Louis, I think this is the beginning of a beautiful friendship', 'Oh he's just like any other man, only more so', 'I don't mind a parasite. I object to a cut-rate one', 'Round up the usual suspects', and, of course, the oft quoted, apocryphal, 'Play it again, Sam'.\n\nMadeleine LeBeau plays Yvonne, the jilted lover of Humphrey Bogart, who is seen drowning her sorrows at the bar early in the film and who later, to get back at Rick and looking for solace takes up with a German officer finding only self-hatred. She is luminous.\n\nAnd when Claude Rains delivers the signature line, 'I'm shocked! Shocked! To find that there's gambling going on in here!' the croupier, Emil, played by Marcel Dalio, approaches from the roulette table and says simply, 'Your winnings, sir.' It is a delicious moment ripe with scripted irony, one among many in this film, but one made all the more so, knowing where Dalio came from and what he and his wife had endured to arrive at that line.\n\nI have often wondered exactly when they saw the final script or if they only realised the many parallels to their own lives when the film was released.\n\nAlas, they separated and divorced the next year, both going on to long successful careers. Dalio never remarried.\n\nLate in his career, when Mike Nichols was looking for a vaguely familiar face to deliver a long and worldly, near-monologue in Catch-22, he turned to Dalio. Faced with a hopelessly idealistic young American pilot, Dalio, as simply 'old man in whore house', in tight close-up, delivers a discourse on practical people faced with impractical circumstances, of the virtues of expedience in the face of amorality . Using his wonderful plastic features, now beginning to sag, in a voice full of melancholy, the old man reassures the young man that regardless of what 'grand themes' may be afoot in the world, in the end, little matters but survival.", u'-0.162053', u"Most teenagers don't watch classics I know. But after they've seen this one, there's no turning back! This is the classic to end all classics (That and Gone With The Wind which rocked! but the ending was a bit unusual.) I had been an Ingrid Bergman fan after watching Gaslight with my drama class. It was great because I love a good mystery type thing. \n\nCasablanca was a bit confusing at first, but I found out in the end that it has just the right blend of romance, drama, and comedy. Plus, my dad instilled in me a love for all things World War II related.\n\nI would recommend this movie for children 15 and older, not because there's anything bad, but simply because I don't think younger children would understand it. You guys my age, this is a great Sit-down-and-watch-with-your-girl-on-a-rainy-afternoon type movie, and parents already love it, so everyone's happy.\n\nI always say when I write these things that, even though I liked it, you might not. CHeck it out for yourself and form your own opinion.", u'0.455186', u'Generation after generation will continue to love this splendid film, just as many previous generations have enjoyed this movie in the past!! (The principle reason for me bastardizing one of this movie\'s famous quotes) "Casablanca" has, undeniably, withstood the test of time!! This film evokes a romantic humanism into the thick of World War II!!! Humphrey Bogart and Ingrid Bergman are magnificent as the tormented love interest duo who do not seem to be able to piece everything together, they just know they love each other, and more importantly, something clicks!!! Originally, Ronald Reagan and Ann Sheriden were cast for the roles of Rick and Ilsa, as it turns out, you cannot imagine any two other people besides Humphry Bogart and Ingrid Bergman for the roles!! These two performers exude more of a continental flair!! The American fascination for this flick is thoroughly justified!! Winning the academy award for best picture in 1943, "Casablanca" was just one of the many movies in the late 1930\'s and early 1940\'s which epitomized an era for excellent movies!! Based on the book "Everybody Comes To Ricks", Hal B. Wallis produces this film with a flawless orchestration!! The place, Casablanca, becomes a citadel of despondence and despair for so many people, yet for Rick and Ilsa, (Humphrey Bogart and Ingrid Bergman) the situation is tailor made for a passionate redemption!! Max Steiner encompasses a necessary nostalgia with the music in this film. "As Time Goes By" (made in 1931) became enormously popular with this movie!! The whole scene is set up whereby Paris becomes a venue for unprecedented and wondrous romanticism!! "Casablanca" is, without question, one of the greatest movies ever made!! You must remember this, a movie is just a movie!! Unless!! It is the movie of all time; "Casablanca"!! I will see "Casablanca" over and over and over again and never be tired of it!! EVERYBODY SHOULD SEE THIS MOVIE!! I guarantee you, you will not be disappointed!!! This film has 6 of the top 100 famous quotes in the history of all American film making!! Humphrey Bogart and Marlon Brando may lay claim to the most quotes from this list. Many colloquialisms from "Casablanca" have fallen within the realm of popular modern day jargon!! This website ranks "Casablanca" 11th best picture out of the top 250. AFI (American Film Institue) ranks "Casablanca" the second best American film ever made. I feel this is very impressive!! You will truly marvel at this film, in fact, if you do not think "Casablanca" is not one of the greatest films you have ever seen, I will be utterly amazed!!! AN ALL TIME MOVIE CLASSIC!!!!!!', u'0.630644'], u'tt0047396': [u"\nAfter viewing 'Rear Window' again, I've come to realize that Alfred Hitchcock was not only a great moviemaker but also a great moviewatcher. In the making of 'Rear Window,' he knew exactly what it is about movies that makes them so captivating. It is the illusion of voyeurism that holds our attention just as it held Hitchcock's. The ability to see without being seen has a spellbinding effect. Why else is it so uncommon to have characters in movies look directly into the camera? It just isn't as fun to watch someone when they know you're there. When we watch movies, we are participating in looking into another world and seeing the images of which we have no right to see and listening to the conversations that we should not hear. 'Rear Window' and Powell's 'Peeping Tom' are some of the best movies that aren't afraid to admit this human trait. We are all voyeurs.\n\nWhen watching 'Rear Window,' it is better to imagine Alfred Hitchcock sitting in that wheelchair rather than Jimmy Stewart. When the camera is using longshots to watch the neighborhood, it is really Hitchcock watching, not Stewart. Hitchcock's love of voyeurism is at the center of this movie, along with his fascination with crime and his adoration of the Madonna ideal.\n\nIn many of Hitchcock's movies, 'Rear Window,' 'Vertigo,' 'Psycho,' 'The Birds,' etc, the blonde actresses are objects. Notice how rarely they get close with the male leads. In 'Vertigo,' Stewart's character falls in love with the image of Madeleine; in 'Psycho,' we see the voyeur in Hitchcock peeking out of Norman Bates at Marion; and in 'Rear Window,' Jeff would rather stare out of his window than to hold the beautiful Lisa by his side. For Hitchcock, these women are ideals that should be admired rather than touched.\n\nHowever, the story of 'Rear Window' isn't about the image of women, as it is in 'Vertigo.' 'Rear Window' focuses more on seduction of crime, not in committing it but in the act of discovering it. At one point in the story, Jeff's friend convinces him that there was no murder, and Jeff is disappointed, not because someone wasn't dead but because he could no longer indulge into his fantasy that someone was. Think how popular crime shows are on television, and noir films at the movies. People do not want to commit crimes; they want to see other people commit them.\n\n'Rear Window' is one of the most retrospective movies I've ever seen. In a\nspan of two hours, it examines some of the most recurrent themes in film. When we watch 'Rear Window,' it is really us watching someone watch someone else. And all the while, Hitchcock is sitting on the balcony and seeing our reaction. It is an act of voyeurism layered on top of itself, and it allows us to examine our own behavior as we are spellbound in Hitchcock's world. The only thing that I feel is missing in the movie is a scene of Jeff using his binoculars and seeing himself in a mirror. Why did Hitchcock leave it out? Maybe because it would have been too obvious what he was doing. Or maybe he was afraid that the audience would see themselves in the reflection of the lens.", u'0.165228', u'Finally, I watched "Rear Window" by famous Alfred Hitchcock. First off, I saw this movie on the top 250, and it\'s #14 on top of that! I mean, it\'s gotta be great or a classic, right? Also, I\'m a fan of the Simpsons, and I got the 6th season where Bart breaks his leg and has to watch the kids outside and accuses Flanders of murdering his wife, Maude. I watched it with commentary and the writers said this was taken from the movie "Rear Window", I had to see this movie! I know it sounds silly that I was more inspired by a show, but it\'s a good reference if it\'s from The Simpsons.\n\n"Rear Window" is an excellent movie and a great classic that should never be forgotten! After 51 years, this is still a well talked about movie and I can see why. Jimmy Stewart, he\'s just so great as L.B., I loved his madness and his dark comical role. He doesn\'t even try, but you can\'t help but laugh at a lot of his lines, the way he looks, and the way he presents every scene. He didn\'t have a lot of movement, he is confined to a wheel chair, but he is so effective and perfect. No one could have replaced him as L.B., he\'s a terrific actor! Grace Kelly, what a beauty! Beauty and talent, what a great combination and she had it. Playing Liza, I loved her character so much. She started out as this extremely feminine lovely woman who is struggling with L.B., because he is having doubts about marrying her, and you can tell she loves him so much and is willing to do anything for him and to make their lives work, despite his adventurous side as a photographer and her being an indoor kitten. When L.B. talks of the murder to Liza, she is doubtful but never dismisses that it could be a possibility, and stays with him into the end. She finally goes into danger and grabs it by the you know what and wins L.B.\'s heart.\n\nI loved the ending, to me it was just one more good laugh with L.B. and Liza. I won\'t tell, you\'ll just have to trust me, it was a brilliant way to breath and smile again after all the suspense and drama. "Rear Window" is a true classic and I\'m extremely grateful to the reviewers of IMDb who saw this movie and gave it great reviews, and the writers of The Simpsons! If it were not for you guys, I nor other members of my generation would probably not view it! Let\'s keep this classic alive! \n\n10/10', u'0.510769', u'\nOne of Hitchcock\'s greatest masterpieces, "Rear Window" is a deep and entertaining classic with many strengths, and a little bit of everything.  A fine suspense story is combined with romantic tension in the main plot, and there are numerous sub-plots, some humorous and some moving, all with many psychological overtones.  The main characters are wonderfully portrayed and full of life.  The apparently simple setting in an apartment complex is developed into a world filled with intriguing and sometimes unsettling possibilities, and this apparently average neighborhood comes to life with a wealth of lavish visual detail and interesting minor characters.  It is the kind of film-making that (like many of Hitchcock\'s greatest movies) is very flattering to the viewer.  The director assumes that his audience will pay close enough attention to appreciate the many subtleties with which he has filled the movie.  It rewards both careful attention and repeated viewings, since there is much more here than merely a suspense plot, as good as that story is in itself.\n\nFor the first 30 minutes or so, we simply get to know the characters.  Jimmy Stewart gives one of his best performances as a photographer recuperating from an injury, forced to spend several weeks staring out his apartment window at the minor dramas in the lives of his neighbors.  Grace Kelly is ideal in the role of his perfect girlfriend, who can never find a way to break down Stewart\'s reserve.  The study of their relationship would have made a good movie by itself.  Almost every action and every word between them is filled with meaning, and what they see in the lives of others is an interesting reflection of the tensions and possibilities in their own present and future.  Thelma Ritter is wonderful as a colorful, no-nonsense nurse who constantly sheds some light - sometimes unwanted - on what is happening between them.  The action and suspense that occur later serves in large part as a catalyst that resolves some of the important issues between the two.\n\nAfter we get to know the characters and their world, things start to happen, as Stewart becomes engrossed in some of the things he has seen.  The ethical and moral concerns of meddling in others\' affairs become intertwined with more urgent questions about what may have happened in those other apartments, and from then on the tension builds steadily.  It leads up to a riveting climactic sequence filled with suspense, and made even more meaningful by our awareness of its deeper significance to the main characters.\n\nThere is much more that could be said, but you should see this for yourself.  It is a classic that will be enjoyed not only by thriller fans, but by anyone who appreciates carefully crafted movies with a lot of depth.\n', u'0.73162', u'Not only does REAR WINDOW (RW) have Alfred Hitchcock\'s trademark wit, suspense, and romance (with a touch of friction) in spades, but it\'s one of his most well-crafted, cleverly-staged movies; in fact, even though RW is based on a Cornell Woolrich story, I can\'t imagine this story being told as effectively in any medium other than cinema. However, the technical accomplishments (explained most entertainingly in the DVD\'s documentaries) would be nothing without the engaging characters. James Stewart\'s neighbors are interesting enough to warrant their own movies, and in addition to providing a wry microcosm of New York City life (the only dated thing about it is the lack of air conditioning), they all reflect possible outcomes for the somewhat stormy romance between laid-up shutterbug Stewart and the luminous Grace Kelly as his upscale fashion maven inamorata. As Brent Spiner said while hosting a showing of RW on TNT, the real perversion of the film is Stewart\'s reluctance to commit to the irresistible Kelly! In fact, one of the things I like about the movie is the way it shows these two very different people gradually learning to compromise and work together. The piquant final shot shows that a woman can have a happy relationship with a man without submerging her own personality -- refreshing for the 1950s! Great supporting cast, too, including Wendell Corey, Raymond Burr in one of his last bad-guy roles before PERRY MASON, and the scene-stealing Thelma Ritter. Incidentally, the restored special edition RW DVD was put together just in time to include Georgine Darcy ("Miss Torso"), then one of the last surviving cast members. Darcy died earlier this year; she will be missed.', u'0.329282', u"\nAlfred Hitchcock is considered by most to be the master of suspense.  I believe he was also a master of understanding human nature.  He intuitively understood that human beings are voyeurs by nature, not in the perverted sense, but in the curious sense.  We are a species that slows down to look at accident scenes and steals furtive glances at lovers in the park who are oblivious to everything but each other.  A major appeal of cinema and television is that they offer us an opportunity for guilt free voyeurism.  When we watch a film, aren't we in essence looking through a window and watching people who behave as if they don't realize we are there?\n\nHitchcock realized this and took voyeurism to the next level, allowing us to watch a voyeur as he watched others.  While `Rear Window' as a whole is probably not quite at a level with `Vertigo' (which was far more suspenseful and mysterious with a powerful musical score) as a cinematic accomplishment, it is more seductive because it strikes closer to our human obsessions.  Hitchcock's mastery is most evident in his subtle use of reaction scenes by the various characters.  We watch an event that Jeff (James Stewart) is watching and then Hitchcock immediately cuts to his reaction.  This is done repeatedly in various layers even with the other tenants as they interact with one another.  For instance, in the scene with Miss Lonelyheart (Judith Evelyn), we see her throw out the man who made a pass at her and then we see her reaction after she slams the door, followed by the reaction of Jeff and Lisa (Grace Kelly).  In another scene, Detective Doyle (Wendell Corey) sees Lisa's nightclothes and presumes she will be staying the night.  Hitchcock shows the suitcase, then Doyle's reaction, and then he goes to Jeff who points his finger at him and says `Be Careful, Tom'.  This elegant scene takes a few seconds and speaks volumes with little dialogue.  Such technique gets the viewer fully involved, because if we were there this is exactly what we would be doing, watching the unfolding events and then seeing how others around us responded.  In essence, it puts us in the room with them.\n\nHitchcock was a stickler for detail.  For instance, he aimed the open windows so they would show subtle reflections of places in the apartment we couldn't see directly.  However, there were certain details included or excluded that were inexplicable.  Would Thorwold really be scrubbing the walls with the blinds open?  Would Lisa be conspicuously waving at Jeff while Stella (Thelma Ritter) was digging up the garden?  Moreover, wouldn't Lisa have taken off her high heels before climbing a wall and then a fire escape?  This film had numerous small incongruities that are normally absent from Hitchcock films.  Though these are picayune criticisms, they are painfully obvious in the film of a director known to be a compulsive perfectionist.\n\nThe acting is superb in this film.  Jimmy Stewart is unabashedly obsessed as the lead character.  Photographers have an innate visual perceptiveness and the ability to tell a story with an image and Stewart adopts this mindset perfectly.  Grace Kelly has often been accused of being the `Ice Maiden' in her films, yet in this film she is assertive and even reckless.  Though cool at times, she is often playful and rambunctious.  I always enjoy Thelma Ritter's performances for their honesty and earthiness and this is another example of a character actor at her best.  Raymond Burr often doesn't get the recognition he deserves for this role, which is mostly shot at a distance with very few lines.  Yet, he imbues Thurwold with a looming nefariousness using predominantly physical acting.\n\nThis film was rated number 42 on AFI's top 100 of the century sandwiched between `Psycho' (#18) and `Vertigo' (#61).  I personally think more highly of `Vertigo' but it is a minor distinction, because I rated them both 10/10.  `Rear Window' is a classic, a masterpiece of filmmaking technique from a director who was a true pioneer of suspense.\n", u'0.268602', u"\nAh it's a movie that's in IMDB's Top 20, and it has good reason to be. For starter's let's look at the simple premise - James Stewart is L. B. Jeffries, a photographer who is currently recovering from an injury on assignment. With his broken leg he's stuck in his apartment, with nothing better to do than spy on his neighbours and be visited by his girlfriend, Lisa Carol Fremont (Grace Kelly), his officer friend Wendell, and his nurse, Stella. Jeffries observes the coming and goings of the various apartments he can observe (from his rear apartment window) and it is one of these - a Raymond Burr - who draws his attention because. could it be that the man has committed some heinous crime? Let's find out.\n\nOne of the beautiful things about the movie is its superb use of location. The whole movie, bar a couple of brief scenes, is set in the apartment. This would seem claustrophobic but Hitchcock never inhibits us like this - he lets us escape through Jeffries binoculars and camera lenses, and his roving camera swoops down to let us see what the characters see (but never, thankfully, anything more than that - this is how you do suspense!). The set design is wonderful - the apartment is just the right size and is nicely laid out. However the real praise is for all the other apartments visible to Jeffries - an actual habitable set with multiple stories where characters can be observed only as they pass by their own windows (yeah, they don't care much for curtains). There's a sense of individuality gone in to each home, despite the fact we can only see barely elements of each. This is helped by a nice, differing range of characters inhabiting each and going about their daily lives - there's a mini soap-opera contained in the movie, all observed at a distance. Excellent stuff.\n\nActing? It's great here. There's some nice depth to the characters here, with them feeling like actual real people rather than slick one-dimensional tags. Stewart is very proficient in this type of role - he was born to it - and Kelly proves she is more than just a pretty face, managing to effuse her character with both grace (*groan*) and steel. Even supporting characters like Stella are good (she has a wickedly black sense of thinking that's hilarious). What's so incredible is that the characters we observe from a distance in the other apartments (and with whom we never actually interact with) have as much depth as most main characters in movies nowadays. Excellent script and acting in this movie.\n\nI've already praised Hitchcock's set location and camera work, so I won't prattle on about him much more. He does a stellar job here and, in my opinion, this is the best piece of work he's done (that I've seen). It's virtually flawless and you're never let down (or bored). Well done. It's a\nshame he lost out on an Oscar (although he did have tough competition that year with `On the Waterfront').\n\n`Rear Window' is a great example of how you can successfully have sharp acting, script, and directing and not feel the need for a slew of swear words and gratuitous violence. Regarded as a classic, and deservedly so. 9.1/10", u'0.365336', u'"Rear Window" comes very close to be the perfect Hitchcock film that illustrates nearly all his great abilities...\n\nHitchcock demonstrates in "Rear Window" that he is a great voyeur, that he loves to spy on his characters making each viewer into a voyeur, forcing audience to see everything from his hero\'s point of view... James Stewart is hold up in his Manhattan two rooms apartment with a broken leg... He passes his time spying on his neighbors through back window in an orgy of voyeurism...\n\nSpeaking of technical challenge, "Rear Window" is Hitchcock prototype... Most of the film is shot from one confined set... It is also notably theatrical since it takes place in one room...\n\nHitchcock forces limitations on himself, as he did in "Lifeboat" when he shot entirely on a restricted set, in only one boat... And in "Rope" (his first Technicolor film) where the single setting for the production had only walls and furniture...\n\nHaving restricted his movements, Hitchcock is demanded to be ingenious in order to keep curiosity alive... He builds a realistic courtyard of apartments with inhabitants in it, and the restriction becomes a potency and the technique a fascinating example of what he chooses to call "pure cinema."\n\nHitchcock\'s camera tracks out through the windows... It never goes inside the apartments... We never see close-ups of the characters... We can only see what Stewart sees... We feel like we are watching people through a window instead of in a movie...\n\nHitchcock doesn\'t use any kind of music... We hear natural sounds, occasional live music played in the surrounding apartment...\n\n"Rear Window" describes Hitchcock at his best for the way it works on several levels, yet hides its own complexity... Stewart, tied in too by pressure from his high society girl who loves him and wants to marry him... Everything he sees out is related to this problem... He avoids to discuss marriage with her, though he himself does not seem to realize it...\n\nAll the while, the people in the 31 apartments that he can see live out their little lives\x85 The tormented middle-aged bachelor, composer/songwriter; the couple who beats the heat by sleeping on a fire escape; the newlyweds and lovers; the tragic "Miss Lonelyhearts" and her fantasies of entertaining gentlemen callers; the hearing-impaired sculptor working day and night; the vivacious and sexy blonde dancer "Miss Torso" who does suggestive routines in bikini tops and, most important, the hysterical "nagging wife" - lying in bed - and her grouchy fed-up husband, a jewelry salesman...\n\nOne \'great shot\' reveals just how involved Stewart has become in their lives when Miss Lovelyheart - in her romantic dinner for two - raises her glass in a toast to her imaginary lover and Stewart raises his glass as well...\n\nThe urban backyard setting is the night city terrain of "Rear Window," a night city shattered by the sharp sound of a loud female scream and the sound of breaking glass...\n\nHitchcok presents Stewart who sees (or think he sees) what he is powerless to stop... The insidious salesman strangely attracts Stewart\'s attention... His Passtime becomes an obsession after he suspects that he has murdered his ailing wife and specially when he notices that she is missing... His ravishing fianc\xe9e (Grace Kelly) and his nurse (Thelma Ritter) warn him that voyeurism is a crime and is dangerous... But Stewart persists, eventually he was turned on ... This explain perfectly his specific use of a huge zoom lens to do his peeping as he monitors the murderer\'s activities... The murderer and his wife became subject of Stewart\'s parody with the "too perfect, too talented, too sophisticated," Grace Kelly...\n\n"Rear Window" is visually very strong... Hitchcock designs the film in such a way so that his view is our view... He manipulates our emotions because he knows perfectly his work... He has the film synchronized in his mind... Shooting and editing are, for him, a simple mechanical phase... The creativity has all taken place before...\n\nThe first shot of "Rear Window" is a perfect example of this reality - as his many typical first shots - for the way it visually transmits the whole complex to the audience...\n\nHitchcock is a master at using his camera to create suspense... Like Stewart, we are restricted in movements, paralyzed inside the apartment, immobile, trapped in a room where we are anxious and uncertain... There is no way we can warn the outcome... This is what \'suspense\' is all about\x97not surprise... An effect of intense and prolonged expectancy, lacking all help in the state of knowing that we possess but the characters do not... And, of course, all this great suspense is created by only \'visual\' means...\n\nStewart gives the performance of his life behaving at ease... He was the perfect Hitchcock character: a voyeur by profession, an unpretentious photo journalist who becomes caught in a terrifying event...\n\nWhen you see the film, feel the menacing \'look\' of the murderer staring those evil eyes at you... And don\'t forget to catch Alfred Hitchcok in his customary cameo appearance, this time repairing a clock... Enjoy!', u'0.181658', u"Alfred Hitchcock's Rear Window, wittily written by John Michael Hayes, is one of his many films I think of as much of a technical exercise as anything else. It is in this sense like his silent The Lodger, the static, confined Lifeboat, and the cut-less, one set Rope. Considered in this light it is a cold masterpiece, playing more with the audience's thoughts and fears than with its softer, more personal emotions. As such, it is a very cerebral and satisfying piece of work. The plot is deceptively simple: a photographer (James Stewart) is stuck indoors with his leg in a cast during a hot New York summer. His socialite girl-friend (Grace Kelly) is eager to marry him but Stewart has his doubts, since he lives a wandering life and is from a different social class. He spends most of his time idling about and playing with his camera. In time he becomes a voyeur (which he probably already is, to a degree) and begins to observe his neighbors' private lives, as he views them through his lens in the courtyard. He develops attitudes toward each of them, ranging from mild amusement to empathy to sexual interest, depending on who he's looking at. Without realizing it he is really looking at different aspects of either himself or his relationship with Kelly. The courtyard is a kind of mirror of his soul. These people and their predicaments represent different sides of his (and to a lesser extent Miss Kelly's) personality, offering glimpses of potential past, present and future selves; and it is not always a flattering picture. The newlyweds are continually having sex; Miss Torso is a beautiful young woman who entertains many suitors; there is a childless, somewhat pathetic-seeming middle-aged couple who dote over a pet dog; Miss Lonelyhearts is a depressed, aging spinster with no apparent friends; and the young, bachelor song-writer, when he isn't trying to compose songs, is either throwing parties or fits. Then there are the Thorwalds, a squabbling couple across the way. Stewart is at first only slightly interested in them until Mrs. Thorwald disappears and her husband starts going out at night carrying paper parcels that look like they came from a butcher shop. Soon Stewart is, understandably, suspicious. He convinces Kelly that something is amiss, but has trouble with his detective friend. His nurse Stella agrees that something is wrong across the courtyard, and the threesome become amateur detectives. Rear Window is great fun. It's a thriller, a romance, a mystery, and at times a comedy of manners. The actors all give superb, unflashy performances. Hitchcock had been making movies for three decades by the time he undertook this one, and he knew exactly what he was doing; everything happens as it should, on time, with no fuss or bother. The courtyard set is magnificently designed and photographed; it looks both artificial and realistic, and seems almost to change at times, as circumstances dictate. This is, after Dial M For Murder, Hitchcock's first truly 'fifties' film, which is to say it is a far cry from the genteel romances and spy stuff he'd been doing before. There's less use of atmosphere here, as a new, more independent director was emerging, decidedly post-Selznick, often using color. Hitchcock is playing a sort game of cinematic chess, moving people and things around here and there, changing camera angles slyly, never showing his hand. The film lacks only warmth. All sorts of learned books and articles have been written about this picture, some of them quite silly; all at least partly right. This is at times a profound film, but it also aims to entertain, it has a light touch, and it can be scary, it's romantic about couples and cynical about people. There's a little bit of everything in it,--it's a work of art.", u'0.00607666', u'This is the quintessential Hitchcock flick, easy to understand, addictively interesting, featuring great stars (Grace Kelly and James Stewart), familiar bit players (Thelma Ritter in one of her best roles as Stewart\'s talkative nurse), and a kind of almost imperceptible satire on the human animal. In this case, Hitchcock has glorious fun displaying a whole range of human behaviors through the device of watching them through a Greenwich Village rear window before the age of air conditioners when everyone had to leave their windows open (and some even slept on the fire escape\x96I\'ve done that) to cope with the appalling heat and humidity during an eastern seaboard heatwave.\n\nJames Stewart stars as L.B. Jeffries, an adventurerous photographer who has a broken leg and is confined to his apartment in a cast while it heals. Bored beyond belief, he becomes a voyeur of his neighbors. Meanwhile there is his girlfriend, none other than Grace Kelly playing a "too perfect" socialite intent on winning his heart and soul. Trouble is Jeff worries that it won\'t work out, that they are essentially incompatible, she a socialite, who always goes first class, he a roughing it man of the world comfortable with second class accommodations. Naturally the audience (me!) finds it incredible that he isn\'t madly in love with her.\n\nRaymond Burr (long TV\'s Perry Mason) in gray hair and specks has an interesting role as Lars Thorwald, seen almost entirely from a distance across the courtyard doing very suspicious things with knives and suitcases and mysterious comings and goings in the middle of the night. Bored voyeurs wonder what is going on. There is some light romantic play between Stewart and Kelly, but it is decidedly secondary to the voyeuristic adventures seen through the rear window: the saga of Miss Lonelyhearts, the ardor of the newlyweds, the angst of the songwriter, the exhibitionism of the dancing beauty, the pampered dog in a basket, and Thorwald and his invalid and then missing wife. Hitchcock\'s America at midcentury. Each of the little stories within the story has a plot and a resolution: Miss Lonelyhearts finds her man. The songwriter finds somebody who appreciates his work. Dancing beauty\'s man (looking from a distance a little like Woody Allen in an army uniform) returns. The groom seeks a break from his exhaustive marital duties, etc. Hitchcock\'s sense of satire has the softest touch, which is why, I think, he is so beloved. In the final scene Grace Kelly, finding her man asleep, puts down the adventure book she is reading (for his benefit) and picks up Harper\'s Bazaar to check the fashions. One gets the sense of future marital bliss and especially, marital reality.\n\nThere is some tension and some mystery, but nothing too strenuous for little old ladies from Pasadena, and nothing to offend anybody and nothing too graphic. You can see this with the kids and your maiden aunt and all will find it interesting. See it for Thelma Ritter, the sadonic character actress of many films, most notably this and All About Eve (1950).\n\n(Note: Over 500 of my movie reviews are now available in my book "Cut to the Chaise Lounge or I Can\'t Believe I Swallowed the Remote!" Get it at Amazon!)', u'0.163966', u"\nMany reviewers and critics have commented on Alfred Hitchcock's theme of the voyeur in Rear Window (the mere thought of a voyeur in a suspense film conjures up images from other classic Hitchcock films), and I felt that voyeuristic bug as well.  But I realized something that I hadn't thought of as I watched it for the first time- this is a return for Hitchcock to his skills as a master of silent-film chills.  As L.B. Jeffries (Jimmy Stewart in one of his most infamous performances) is in his wheelchair viewing out one perspective to other inhabitants in the apartment, the audience views right along-side him.  So, for more or less 50 percent of the film, the only sounds we hear are the sounds of mere realism, as Hitch's camera keeps a close eye on things.  \n\nAs the thrills build in the second hour of the film there is considerably more dialog than the first hour.  This could, and occasionally does, present a challenge for the audience member that could either be accepted & payed off or resented- can one sit back and just watch things unfold as in a film from the 20's?  Personally, the experience of seeing these events unfold and increase was near electrifying.  Along with Stewart's performance, which ranges from amusing to terrified, compelling to frightened (i.e. Hitch's 'everyday man'), there's Grace Kelly as Lisa, who carries her own beauty & inner conflicts, and Raymond Burr as Thorvold, who could have things going a little better with his wife.  \n\nIf we empathize with Jeff, it's because we become as much apart of his mind-set/POV as he already is, and that's the ticket to the film's true success.  Not only is there a magnetic kind of skill to which Hitchcock (and cinematographer Robert Burks) presents us with the apartments' supporting and minor characters and how their fates are played out against the enclosed backdrop, but the psychology of Jeff becomes parallel, or against, to the audience's.  This is the story of one man's temptation and compulsion to be involved with those he can see (much like movie-goers have with any given film), and how perception of the realities around him become ours.  Rear Window may have become dated for some movie-goers, particularly since the theme has been played on by other movies and TV shows (like The Simpsons for example).  Yet there is a certain effectiveness to it all, even in the earlier scenes, that holds an edge over imitators.  A+", u'0.582753', u"\nIn '54, I was seven years old and this is one of the first 'grown up' movies I remember seeing. I have seen it at least ten times since and realize seeing something different each time.\n\nJames Stewart is a photographer in a wheelchair recovering from an accident. He passes the time by watching his neighbors out his apartment window. He thinks that he witnessed a murder and has trouble convincing his girlfriend, Grace Kelly, to help prove a crime was committed.\n\nThree scenes that always stuck with me:(1) Stewart fighting off his attacker with flashbulbs (2) the smoldering kiss (3) the glowing cigarette in the dark apartment.\n\nEvery bit a classic. I think this is THE BEST Hitchcock movie. No offense intended toward PSYCHO, but this movie has the more human aspects of fear and terror. This super cast includes Raymond Burr, Thelma Ritter and Wendell Corey.", u'-0.00343982', u'\nI  first saw Rear Window about 4 years ago in a video/film program that I was attending. At that time I was simply blown away by it.\n\nFor starters, I was simply impressed w/ the set. The fact that you can see out of Jeffries\' apartment window, across the courtyard and into the other tenant\'s apartments to see their goings on is incredible. The music used is a musician tenant  creating a piece. The fact that it ebbs and flows w/ the action, until the very end when you actualy hear the finished piece committed to vinyl is really cool.\n\nI liked the fact that you only see what Jeffries sees and therefore have to try and guess what actually happened.\n\nWhile the movie, in a way is actualy about nothing, yet it is about voyeurism and to a lesser degree about love between two apparently different people. However, that is a side line to the actual plot.\n\nfor Hitchock, this film uses suspense, rather than gross thriller, such as Psycho or the Birds did to draw you into the film. I\'ve seen it many times and always get something out of it every time. I own a non restored copy on tape and watch it at least twice a year-or more.\n\nIt\'s simply one of the best movies ever made that I\'ve seen and one of my all time favorites. A near perfect movie if I say so myself.\n\nHitchcock realy paid attention to detail in this movie. The fact that you see "miss Lonely Hearts" actions, Even Lars Thorwald\'s action is incredible. The attention to detail is simply incredible.\n', u'0.682087', u"Spoilers Ahead:\n\nHitch opens his masterpiece with his usual signature a seemingly normal human apartment complex with many different kinds of ways of being all smashed together apparently living together quite peaceably. The musician, Miss Torso, Miss lonely heart all communally existing in tenuous quiet though some early stress between thorwald and the sculptor shows even early warning signs that perhaps thorwald is a bit of a misfit. The byplay between Jefferies and Stella is not meaningless chatter. Stella argues that coupling should be largely unconscious while Jefferies argues for Hitch's old attacking point human rationality should guide people to form union. This is the view that Hitch always attacks in many of his works; like Kubrick he is not an adherent to the rationality of humans. The touch that marks great thrillers from lobotomized gore tests for those in a coma is present. Little oddities that begin very slowly and grow to mammoth heights. Thorwald is the anomaly something is wrong with Thorwald. It starts quite innocuously; he tells the sculptor lady to shut up or mind your own business. \n\nThis all happens behind the failing romance between Jefferies and Lisa. It is the foreground but recedes as more and more oddities by Thorwald switch it to scenery. Notice the grounds of the pending dissolution ontology or disparate ways of being; she is a high society fashion model, he is a serious photographer for magazines. Hitch always seems to be alluding here as in SHADOW OF A DOUBT that great tension between people like uncle charlie and traditional society are the source of disturbances. As Thorwald appears to be obviously cleaning up the apartment after killing his wife, hitch produces what appears to be a perfectly rational exposition from the detective dispelling all of the actors and viewers paranoia. Notice again, the idiot of the picture is the scientific rational detective while Jefferies and Lisa rely much more on emotional intuition. The detective in a very sexist manner stares a Lisa's undergarments with a sneer on his face for Jefferies that says what could not be uttered back then: you are not thinking with your brain letting some woman ensnare you within her feminine intuitive irrationality.\n\nThe look on each character's face Jefferies, Lisa and Stella when they are forced that within this idyllic 50's Americana scene lurks a murderer who is currently cleaning up after dismembering his sick wife is an exact parallel to SHADOW OF A DOUBT. Hitch enjoys giving us our happy little toys to play with then dropping a rattlesnake in the middle of them. In PSYCHO just as Marion is gloating to herself about how she made fools out of all the people at her real estate office at that precise moment Hitch has the rain begin which starts the concatenation of causes that ends with her dead stabbed to death in the shower. Hitch wants us to experience disillusionment as he shows us neither the world nor people are quite as we imagine them to be. Our plans and views of our control over it the detective with his scientific rationalism and Marion with her joy at her deceptive ability come crashing down. In Marion's case Hitch always sanctions evil within his films; she pays the price for her deeds. Rear Window's detective is more how the world does not obey the scientific paradigm and sadly people are barely rational. \n\nThe climax of having Jefferies point himself out by accidentally answering the phone is brilliant; The photographic effects still in their infancy then of Jefferies using flash bulbs to buy himself some time a great masterstroke from Hitch. He then speeds up the attack; making appear quite lifelike no kung fu was needed also happily we did not have five minutes of jumping or other gymnastics. A great film from Hitch; a very enjoyable experience.", u'-0.054612', u"\nSpoilers herein.\n\nI just don't like Hitchcock. I admit that he `delivered value' in his day, but as I review his films today, I find them trite, badly dated. The style of acting he used now looks `actorly.' His camera framing is well considered but unimaginative by today's standards. The stories are not engaging (to me).\n\nBut this film really is a classic. Not because of the acting or the dialog, but because it was so cleverly conceived. And because the execution is so purely cinematic.\n\nThe first problem a writer/director faces is what stance the camera takes. Is it a fairly static `audience' as if you were watching a play? Is it godlike in always seeing things from the best perspective, though sometimes humanly impossible? Is it a character? Or does it follow a character sometime showing their point of view, sometimes their reaction? Does it act?\n\nDo we admit the camera exists -- by introducing jiggle, or showing operator's functions like focusing, developing? Do we dissolve the camera's perspective by juggling time or perspectives? Do we try a `100 simultaneous cameras' approach?\n\nHitchcock usually uses the static theatrical approach -- way too much for modern tastes. He punctuates this by sometimes doing a character focused shot, and sometimes a spectacular-for-the-time godshot -- as in the `Psycho' shower scene.\n\nBut this film is more purely conceived for the camera. There are no godshots. Nearly all the camerawork is from Jeff's eye, or of Jeff's apartment, with a few notable exceptions. What is novel is why this works -- the set and entire story were composed backwards. That is, instead of having some slice of life that the camera discovers, this reality exists as if it were created by the camera before the action starts. Everything that is required to motivate the world is comprehensible from that apartment -- the entire physics of this world is based on its center.\n\nIn other words, Hitchcock's achievement here is not how he accommodates the camera to the world, but the world to the camera.\n\nPure genius.", u'0.248866', u'It doesn\'t have the psychological complexity or panoramic sweep of his later films, but 1954\'s "Rear Window" is arguably his most fun film to watch. An entire Greenwich Village apartment complex and courtyard was built inside a Paramount studio building to create Hitchcock\'s unforgiving microcosm of lonely souls that stretches the ethical envelope of voyeurism. James Stewart plays L.B. "Jeff" Jefferies, an adventure photographer, wheelchair-bound with a week left in his cast for a broken leg. He is itching for some excitement and not even the devoted attention of an impossibly beautiful Grace Kelly as Lisa, a Park Avenue fashion model is enough for him. Stuck in his apartment all day, he sees the comings and goings of his neighbors, all strangers to him, and pieces together their lives and gives them pseudonyms like "Miss Torso" and "Miss Lonelyhearts". But his attention focuses on a suspicious, white-haired man named Thorwald. Jeff becomes increasingly intrigued by his neighbor\'s odd behavior and the sudden disappearance of his nagging, bedridden wife. Jeff suspects a murder plot, which seems far-fetched at first, but becomes gradually more evident as his obsession infects Lisa, his masseuse Stella and his detective buddy Tom.\n\nHitchcock was indeed the master of suspense, but the movie is suffused with an unexpectedly light sense of humor that touches rather candidly on sex and relationships thanks to John Michael Hayes\' sharp script. Lisa\'s entanglement with Thorwald is played out well, especially as Jeff looks on helplessly from his apartment. Stewart is wonderfully sly throughout, giving hints of the inner torment he displays later in "Vertigo" but still likable even as he tries to reject his glamorous, sheltered girlfriend. Kelly seems merely decorative at first, but she sharpens as her character gains a fearless sense of intrigue that Jeff finds alluring. Thelma Ritter plays a smarter and warmer variation of her typical wisecracker as Stella, while Wendell Corey is his usual nondescript stalwart self as Tom. Raymond Burr, pre-Perry Mason, shows up as Thorwald and lends interesting ambiguity to his menacing character. Robert Burks\' probing camera-work makes the perfect complement to Hitchcock\'s trademark film-making style, and special mention needs to be given to Robert A. Harris\'s splendid 1998 work in restoring the film\'s original splendor, even the slow-motion first kiss between Stewart and Kelly. The DVD has a couple of nice extras, an hour-long documentary that focuses on the ethics behind the story and the restoration effort, and a brief interview with screenwriter Hayes. One of Hitchcock\'s best in an impressive canon of work.', u'0.262265'], u'tt0108052': [u"I know many of you, out there will disagree with me, when I say that Schindler's List is one of the greatest film that there has ever been. It does sound that I'm extremely overrating it, but I truly believe that Schindler's List is up there with The Godfather and Citizen Kane I mean everything about is so good, that its close to perfection.\n\nThe acting is brilliant, every actor does an amazing job. Liam Neeson as Schindler is incredible, no doubt about it. He should of won an Oscar for Best Actor. Ralph Fiennes is the one, who truly is the best actor in the film. He plays his antagonist role as Amon Goeth, so well that it is a travesty, he didn't win an Oscar for Best Supporting Actor.\n\nI'm happy though, that the Academy chose this film for Best Picture, it was one of the best decisions they ever made. Because if this film wasn't considered Best Picture by the Academy, I don't know which film would be, expect maybe for The Godfather.\n\nSteven Spielberg certainly deserved an Oscar for Best Director. It was a smart idea for Steven Spielberg to make this film in black-white because it made the movie more bleak, emotional, hopelessness. But you see small patches of color -- A candle and a child's coat bringing the evilness of the tragedy into a agonizing focus.\n\nThere's no doubt about it, this film will be a classic in decades, even hundreds of years to come in cinema. This film is without a doubt, the Best film that Spielberg has ever made. With many other Steven Spielberg's classics like Jurassic Park,Jaws,E.T, Raider of the Lost Ark, Saving Private Ryan, etc. Schindler's List will always be Steven Spielberg's most finest, important film. He blends his humanism to the tragic horror of the Holocaust to create an emotional masterpiece.\n\n10/10 Absolutely Recommended!", u'0.582021', u'\nMany movies come out each year and we applaud them for their screen play, orginality and whatever else we can say about a movie. But only once in a long while does one come out and you say all those nice things, but one you will also never forget. This movie is more than just something for us to watch for 3 hours and 17 minutes, it is something for us to never forget, to teach us a lesson and to remember those who died needlessly along with those who tried to help those same people survive. ', u'0.662852', u'\nSchindler\'s List is not only a pure masterpiece but, for me, it is one of the greatest films ever made in the world.\n\nThe film starts off to reveal a womanizing, Nazi business man who profited off of slave labor.  The Nazi business man is of course Oskar Schindler. Oskar is just like most men.  He has a love for good wine, beautiful women, and pursues happiness through the success of his business.  But on his journey to a successful business, millions of Jews were being killed during a time which most label as one of the darkest periods of human history. As Oskar made money, innocent people were being murdered.  That\'s when the self-centered, often money hungry Oskar steps in and gives up his goal of having a successful business to save the lives of over 1,000 Jews.\n\nThis film is about redemption and was beautifully photographed in black and white by Janusz Kaminski (cinematographer).  At the helm is no one other than Steven Spielberg, who brilliantly called non-pretentious shots and brought back to life a time and period most want to forget, but shouldn\'t. This film is a must see by me.  I give the film an "A+" (wishing I could give it a higher grade than that) and a 10 out of 10...\n', u'0.302395', u'\nThe first (and last) time I viewed this masterpiece in a theater, I could not help but notice the reaction of the audience upon their leaving. Some were crying or trying to hold back tears, some were stunned, some had completely blank faces, some showed signs of anger; but the overall atmosphere was one of utter silence. Never in the history of motion pictures has a film had such an emotional impact upon its constituents.\n', u'-0.000924796', u'\n     This is the best war film about the Holocaust I have ever seen. It depicts the horrors of the Holocaust and war, the tragedy of Jewish nation, and I know, this film could be directed by a Jew, who keeps these horrible times and crimes against humanity in his heart. The tagline says "Whoever saves one life, saves the world entire". And this film shows us that no human life can be replaced by another one, and that there is nothing more valuable than HUMAN LIFE. I have not seen a film of such a power in my life. Superbly directed by Steven Spielberg, magnificently photographed in black-and-white by Janusz Kaminski (one of the best directors of photography in modern Hollywood, so to say), perfect performances by Liam Neeson and Ben Kingsley, and, especially, John Williams\' beautiful, brilliant score, brings the whole horror and tragedy, cruelty of Nazism, Holocaust and War. This is Spielberg\'s Triumph. Congratulations!', u'0.480228', u"\nJust watched this for the second time - what a movie\n\nNo film has ever had the impact on me that this has had - even more so second time around.  Hard at times to watch and I had to switch it off for a\nwhile.\n\nLast scene is unforgettable.\n\nMust be close to best film ever made and we can't forget it.\n", u'0.0294892', u"\nSchindler's List is a long and tough movie to watch.  But it pays dividends.\n\nWe're all pretty familiar with the story - a German businessman enlists Jews to work in his factory.  At first, I believe, as an opportunist, for the Jews are cheap, readily available labour.  He does, however, become gradually aware that his factory means the difference between life and death.\n\nAnd so his 'list' is born.  A list of Jews that he requires to 'work' for him.  It is, in reality, a list of life and Schindler knows it.\n\nLiam Neeson fills Schindler's boots well.  You soon forget he is Neeson at all.  Ben Kingsley is, ofcourse, his ever-reliable brilliant self.  And Ralph Fiennes easily creates one of the screens most hateful villians (sadly, a villian who actually existed).\n\nThere are some tough scenes (most notably, the liquidation of the ghetto, Goeth's (Fiennes) brutality in the camp) and it's all filmed in beautiful black & white - except for the highlighted girl in the red dress, which has a brilliant symbolic meaning later in the film.\n\nA terrible chapter in humanity's history but one told so well by Spielberg and co.\n\nIt has a powerful and lasting effect - just as it should.\n", u'0.305785', u"Steven Spielberg makes one of (if not the one) his greatest movies of all time. Liam Neeson gives a great performance as Schindler and the whole film is just powerful, amazing and sad but it doesn't matter because the movie is so good. Ralph Fiennes makes an even better performance as Goeth, a man who made everyone stare into the screen with anger and sadness and that is just what a movie is supposed to do-make you feel sad, happy, angry or effect you in some way. I read that someone thought it was overrated and bad, but I think it's a classic and it'll never go away. So if you want to see one of the greatest historical films ever made, then go see Schindler's List.\n\nEDIT: I wrote this when I was 12 or 13, and I'm so sorry about my AWFUL English... Ah, well just have that in mind when you read this. =)", u'0.0784837', u"\nTo sum up Spielberg's masterwork in one word is a nearly impossible task, but I have come to the conclusion that Schindler's List is perfect. Liam Neeson as Oskar Schindler is truly great in recreating the role of a modern day Moses. Making this film all the more compelling is John Williams' perfectly composed original musical score. This film deserves all the awards bestowed upon it, especially best picture by the National Board of Review and the Academy and the Academy Award for best director Steven Spielberg. It deserves all these awards and more. Schindler's List is a film that everyone should see and appreciate to its fullest extent. Spielberg will remain an immortal filmmaker through the work he put into this film.\n", u'0.774482', u"When I first saw that Spielberg was behind the movie, I had my doubts since his earlier work doesn't really fall into this category, but I held faith and I have not been disappointed! From the beginning it is such a powerful and moving film and it brought tears to my eyes more then once. It is completely set in Black & White, except for the Red Coat Girl which is pure genius, since it really helps develop the time period it was portrayed in.\n\nThe Actors too were completely fantastic! Every single actor and extra seemed to be doing their very best and really lived their roles, especially Ralph Fiennes, who was brilliant as the twisted Nazi Amon Goeth. Not just anyone could make that character real and get away with it. All of the characters in the film have depth and substance and the best thing was that you actually see a few of the Jewish people throughout the entire film so we can sympathize with their tale more.\n\nIt's a film to watch if you enjoy depth and meaning. 9 Stars, Excellent Film!", u'0.527843', u'\n" I....pardon you."\n\nThese words spoken by Amon Goethe (Ralph Fiennes) during the film can be aptly used to signify the themes of this film: power and forgiveness.\n\nI am part of the post war generation who has been lucky enough not to experience any major war. And after watching this film, I have deep respect and feelings for those who suffered during these times, be it the Holocaust or the Nam war. This film was just waiting to be made and I\'m glad it was the right man who dared to take up the challenge. Any other person would not have done it justice.\n\nThe film focuses on how a German named Oskar Schindler saved the lives of thousands of Jews by employing them to work in his factory during WWII. However, I feel the film\'s primary aim is not to show us Schindler\'s kindness but the horrors of war. There are some of the most true and graphic scenes here ever captured on celluloid. People being shot for no particular reason, hiding in fear, stripped and gased, abused......so much so that viewers watching it for the 1st time will be deeply affected. We have never got to see this "flip side" of the war in many Hollywood productions which only focuses on action and their unrealistic "gung-ho" heroes. ( Another excellent film would be "Saving Pte Ryan" by Spielberg again ) War and its horrors are finally and faithfully recreated for the audience.\n\nLike the film Raging Bull, its shot beautifully in black and white to reflect the era and tone of the film. Liam Neeson and Ralph Fiennes are excellent, esp the latter for his frightening protrayal of Amon Goethe. The scene where they discuss about power is a classic and the subsequent one where Amon \'pardons\' a young jew remains as one of my many favs!\n\n\n', u'0.167247', u"The most amazing thing about this film is that it was not made to be an epic or an acclaimed film. Spielberg made it as a personal film for himself and other Jews affected by the Holocaust. There is nothing flashy about the film except for Neeson's bravura performance. Spielberg's usual style is invisible, and the cinematography and editing, although excellent, are not shown off to make a spectacle of the film or give it an epic feel. Yet it is still a compulsive, involving, and utterly heart-wrenchingly moving filming of a part of history that should not be forgotten. The screenplay is one of the best ever written: it captures the stories of so many Holocaust survivors but without distracting from the main story at hand. The black and white photography and editing is perfect, and John Williams provides a perfectly subtle but nice music score. The acting is simply brilliant, with Liam Neeson towering as Oskar Schindler, and Ralph Fiennes bringing out the Nazi character Amon Goeth into full flesh. And Ben Kingsley and Embeth Davidtz give off excellent performances too. The film also has a lot to say about absolute power corrupting and spiraling out of control, and such a message of the film can be applied to any time and crisis, not just the Holocaust. This is not just one of the the ten best films ever produced, but it shall remain so for years to come, because its messages in terms of power and racism are applicable in any age.", u'0.553609', u'The Holocaust is undoubtedly one of the most significant and horrifying events of the twentieth century. Between 1938 and 1945, the Jewish population was segregated and persecuted, culminating in the merciless slaughter of approximately six million Jews (this figure is quoted in the film, though most historical estimates vary between five and seven million). Amidst all this butchery, one man decided to make a difference, famously saving the lives of more than 1100 Jews- men, women and children who would otherwise have been killed.\n\nOskar Schindler (played brilliantly by Liam Neeson, "Batman Begins") was a Sudeten German industrialist, a wealthy womanizer who wasn\'t afraid to throw his money around. Always bearing his Nazi Party badge proudly, Schindler would often frequent nightclubs, extravagantly showering high-ranked Nazi officers and their girlfriends with champagne and caviar. With impeccable connections in the black-market, there was little that he couldn\'t get his hands on, and he was a good person to know. Buying friends was something that Schindler could do well, and he would often use these newfound alliances to aid his own business ventures. When thousands of the Polish Jew population was relegated to the Krak\xf3w Ghetto in 1941, Schindler saw an opportunity for further success, enlisting desperate Jewish investors and employing Jewish workers (who were substantially cheaper to employ) to open an enamelware factory. His connections in high places ensured lucrative army contracts, and Schindler need only have watched as his personal fortune grew, despite doing little to run the company beyond offering it "a certain panache."\n\nIt is clear from the beginning that Oskar Schindler does not harbour any racial prejudices. When Schindler requests the services of Itzhak Stern (a superb Ben Kingsley, "Gandhi"), a clever, humanitarian Jewish accountant, Stern declares that, "By law I have to tell you, sir, I\'m a Jew." "Well, I\'m a German, so there we are," replies Schindler indifferently, before getting straight to business. It is not race that he is concerned with, it is himself\x85 and, of course, his money. Stern does not enjoy running Schindler\'s business, and he initially acquires little satisfaction from it. When Schindler attempts to convey his genuine gratitude for his profitable services with a glass of whiskey, Stern absentmindedly refuses to drink it, and an embittered Schindler drinks it himself before ordering Stern to leave.\n\nWith the arrival of Amon Goeth (played as the epitome of evil by Ralph Fiennes, "Red Dragon"), a Hauptsturmf\xfchrer of the SS, the hopeless plight of the Jews grows darker. In a harrowing extended sequence, largely based on the testimonies of Holocaust survivors, the Jews are mercilessly "liquidated" from the Krakow Ghetto, many simply shot on the spot. "Today is history," proclaims Goeth. "Today will be remembered. Years from now the young will ask with wonder about this day. Today is history and you are part of it\x85. For six centuries there has been a Jewish Krakow. By this evening those six centuries will be a rumor. They never happened. Today is history."\n\nThis sequence also marks the celebrated appearance of the little girl in the red coat. An ingenious plot device, the character was based upon a real girl named Roma Ligocka who, unlike her film counterpart, survived the war, and wrote a memoir entitled "The Girl in the Red Coat: A Memoir". The embodiment of innocence, Schindler spots the small girl wandering amongst the black-and-white chaos of the Krakow Ghetto, and we follow her as she retreats into a building and takes shelter under a bed. When Schindler later notices her disheveled corpse carted past him to be incinerated, he is understandably horrified, unable to understand how the soldiers could possibly destroy something so innocent. This event memorably signifies the turning-point of Schindler\'s attitudes towards the carnage, fuelling his desire to save as many Jews as possible.\n\nLong known as a "blockbuster" filmmaker \x96 with such adventure classics as "Jaws," "E.T. The Extra Terrestrial" and "Raiders of the Lost Ark" to his name - "Schindler\'s List" was - and remains - Steven Spielberg\'s most mature directorial effort. Working with a screenplay that Steven Zaillian adapted from Thomas Keneally\'s Booker Prize-winning \'Schindler\'s Ark,\' Spielberg treats the subject matter with the respect it deserves. Wisely choosing to depict the events as realistically as possible, Spielberg allows the images to speak for themselves. Flawless acting, stunning cinematography and a haunting John Williams score excel this film above all others of the 1990s. This is the powerful story of the difference that just one man can make, and it is a story that deserves to be seen by all. We can only feel grateful that it was Steven Spielberg who chose to be at the helm.', u'0.129465', u'Spoilers Ahead:\n\nThis painful but ineffably powerful film is really one long existential awakening for Oskar Schindler. We see him, at the beginning, laying out his arsenal of control. Clothes, money, all his weapons to control the Nazis are to forward himself into wealth and women. He strategically uses the waiter and his gifts to ingratiate the Nazis for the factory he plans to open. He tries the same technique on Stern and it doesn\'t work quite so well. Oskar tries to hide from the horrors that surround him. He chastises Stern for the effusive thanks the one armed worker gives him, before he is later shot. The film is so long, I would like to point out some of the most powerful images. I love the Jungian Duality scene, the monster who just stepped on a man and shot him in the head, pauses to baby talk and play with a little Jewish boy. Here, in brilliant fashion, you see the two sided Janus faces of human nature. I love when Amon simply gets up, stretches, and begins randomly shooting Jews in the camp. What a brilliant depiction of how routinized the barbarism was; to Amon, it was no more immoral that flushing the toilet or walking about, he had killed so many.\n\nThe pettiness and envy, where the Jewish woman architect shows up his retarded fatheads, he needs to shoot her immediately,"Oh, an educated Jew, like Karl Marx himself, shoot her." I love when Oskar tries to save Jews by convincing Amon that pardoning is more powerful than killing." He tries it for a bit, but the core of his cruelty is not racial; he just is so jealous and hateful that his predilections overcome him." Watch him try it out, he just cannot help himself, he loves killing people. The little girl in the red coat walking among the carnage, like the eye of a hurricane, mayhem and murder surrounding her. Tell me, if that isn\'t the best depiction of the putative civilized world surrounded by eternal carnage: The Eye Of The Hurricane. As the movie progresses, Oskar sees more and more of what he has been hiding from himself. \n\nAt the end, when he tries to buy the Jews on the list from Amon, the latter cannot figure out the scam. There has to be one and it torments Amon. Oskar was trying so desperately to hide in his factory but his friendship with Amon, plus the horrors Stern relates to him, cause him to slowly realize what is going on. The scene with him on the hill, on his horse, watching the cannibal savagery perpetrated by these mass murdering maniacs unsettles his little factory prosperity fantasy. I love when Stephen juxtaposes the Jewish family vacating their house and Oskar coming into it right behind them. "It couldn\'t be worse," said by the Jewish family followed by "It couldn\'t be better," said right after by Oskar. The movie is a tale of the existential redemption of Oskar Schindler. It is one painful, excruciating movie to watch. It is required viewing for all humanistic Trekkies who think intergalactic machine sentience is coming to bow down before them: as we had to endure in the Motionless Picture. A Real Masterpiece Of Misanthropy.\n\n"Want A Picture Of Human History? An Iron Boot Stepping On A Human Face." George Orwell From 1984', u'-0.187433', u'It\'s September, 1939. \n\nOskar Schindler is a Nazi-Catholic industrialist from Czechoslovakia, a bon-vivant who realizes that a nice long war in Europe might be an excellent situation for making money... So in a great opening parallel montage, Spielberg depicts the personal journey of one man and the massive journey of one race...\n\nAs thousand of families are forced to abandon their careers, properties and homes to live in overcrowded ghettos, the scene switches to Schindler, where he pays his way to get a fine table at a fancy nightclub in Nazi-occupied city of Krakow, the surviving gem of Poland\'s medieval cities...\n\nDrinking alone, he scans the strange clientele and slowly sets about casting his nets on the SS German officers... He quickly plied them with food, caviar and French wine... And as a magician, overcoming every resistance, he transforms the separate tables of the cabaret into one joyful drunken party of wine, women, and song for the Nazi officials...\n\nThe two worlds come together when Schindler meets Itzhak Stern and offers him a deal... Since Jews cannot own businesses, they should work together... Stern\'s contacts can provide investors, and Stern\'s expertise can run the business, and Schindler will take care of the presentation...\n\nIn those same scenes, Amon Goeth is introduced...\n\nGoeth is a flabby psychopath who comes to embody the evils of Nazi racism... He is in charge of the camp where the workers are housed and must be bribed and pampered if Schindler is to stay in business... Goeth\'s excessive cruelty is also part of the reason that Schindler is transformed from an opportunistic \'victimizer\' to \'humanitarian.\' \n\nLiam Neeson portrays Oskar Schindler, the businessman with irresistible charm - the charm of the same magnitude that saved hundreds of innocent people and brightened Schindler\'s reputation among critical historians... As movie gradually progresses, Schindler\'s perspective changes much as when he himself states that "People die - it\'s a fact of life."\n\nNeeson\'s flexibility as an actor is impressive... His performance is built on a combination of self-confidence, indecision, and doubt... His character is always evolving, yet always convincing... His transformation from \'war profiteer\' to a "righteous" man is adequately slow and well developed... As the war draws to a close, Schindler decides unexpectedly to evaluate his life... He turns over his gains into a noble cause - and virtually takes his workers away from being swallowed up by the Holocaust... In one of the film\'s most touching scenes, Schindler goes to Auschwitz and fights for the freedom of the wives and children of his workers...\n\nBen Kingsley plays the role of Itzhak Stern, the timid gifted accountant, and the silent partner wary of his employer and the enemy... Stern (spared from the horrors of the holocaust) is also Schindler\'s good angel... He occasionally reminds the audacious man that he could get in a lot of trouble if his true motives are ever discovered... Kingley delivers history\'s judgment of Oskar Schindler in a touching moment: \'Whoever saves one life, saves the world entire.\'\n\nRalph Fiennes brilliantly portrays Amon Goethe, the complex study of a sadistic true monster... He is a heartless and cruel killer, with a complicated, twisted personality... Stripped to the waist and overlooking the prison yard, he leaves his mistress Ingrid (Beatrice Macola) in bed to shoot arbitrarily, with his scope rifle, slow-moving Jews from the veranda of his high villa...\n\nGoeth despises Jews, yet he inexplicably falls in love with a shy Jewish maid, Helen Hirsch (Embeth Davidtz). Rather than allowing himself to touch her, and nearly committing the capital crime of kissing her, he remembers that he is supposed to hate her, and beats her ruthlessly for seducing him...\n\nGoeth is a man to despise... But the full scope of his atrocities are not entirely shown... Spielberg shows carefully as much of the horror as the screen can bear...\n\nThe savage scenes are difficult to watch... Spielberg\'s camera pans to the pillar of dark smoke rising from the chimney stack into the frightening sky of Auschwitz, and to the lines of Jews unknowingly lead toward the gas chambers...\n\nSpielberg captures the terror of the Nazi reign in the terrifying dramatic moments when stunned women and children are mistakenly sent to Auschwitz... The disturbing images of arbitrary murder are harshly realistic...\n\n\'Schindler\'s List\' assaults the viewer with lasting images of Jewish prisoners announcing their names as they are registered, given work assignments, or separated into "essential" and "non-essential."\n\nSpielberg focuses on children and uses them both as victimizers and victims... In a powerful way to personalize the slaughter without a single word, Spielberg colors the coat of a little girl as she is invisibly making her way, aimless and alone, through the chaotic destruction of the Krakow ghetto... (It\'s almost the same shade as the jacket worn by the young protagonist of Spielberg\'s \'Empire of the Sun\', in a similar situation when he\'s alone in a mob and trying to find his way home).\n\n\'Schindler\'s List\' is a tribute to those who lost their lives in the Holocaust, a dramatic recreation of that dark, frightening period during World War II... The horror is alleviated, slightly, by Janusz Kaminski\'s stunning Black and White cinematography... The lack of color reminds us of German Expressionist films, and allows Spielberg to be explicit without becoming tastelessly graphic... John Williams\' tragic and somber, almost unnoticed score adds to the melancholy tone...\n\nSpielberg\'s great visual moments - when, in a scene, Schindler joins the Nazis on the platform as they fire the cold water at the cars on the desperate, suffocating people inside... \n\n\'Schindler\'s List\' is an outstanding movie... It has an important role in adding credibility to the Holocaust, and in Thomas Keneally\'s fact-based novel, Spielberg finds the right balance of redemption and sorrow.. He makes us watch and feel the extermination through the actions of Oskar Schindler...', u'-0.0441658'], u'tt0054215': [u'\nYes, everything you\'ve heard is true. The score is a part of pop culture. The domestic conflict is well-known. But nothing shocks like the experience itself.\n\nIf you have not seen this movie, do yourself a favor. Stop reading thse comments, get up, take a shower, then GO GET THIS MOVIE. Buy it, don\'t rent. You will not regret it.\n\n"Psycho" is easily the best horror-thriller of all time. Nothing even comes close...maybe "Les Diaboliques" (1955) but not really.\n\n"Psycho" has one of the best scripts you\'ll ever find in a movie. The movie\'s only shortcoming is that one of the characters seems to have little motivation in the first act of the movie but as the story progresses, you realize that Hitchcock (GENIUS! GENIUS! GENIUS!) in a stroke of genius has done this on purpose, because there is another character whose motivations are even more important. Vitally important. So important that you totally forget about anything else. I was lucky enough to have spent my life wisely avoiding any conversation regarding the plot of this movie until I was able to see it in full. Thank God I did! The movie has arguably the best mid-plot point and climactic twist in thriller history, and certainly the best-directed ending. The last few shots are chilling and leave a lingering horror in the viewer\'s mind.\n\nJust as good as the writing is Hitchcock\'s direction, which is so outstanding that it defies explanation. Suffice it to say that this movie is probably the best directorial effort by film history\'s best director. I was fortunate enough to see this movie at a big oldtime movie house during a Hitchcock revival. Janet Leigh, still radiant, spoke before the film and explained how Hitchcock\'s genius was in his ability to 1) frighten without gore and 2) leave his indelible mark on the movie without overshadowing his actors (like the great Jean Renoir could never do). "Psycho" is clearly its own phenomenon, despite all the big-name talent involved.\n\nHitchcock does not disappoint by leaving out his trademark dark humor. His brilliance is in making a climax that is at once both scary and hilarious. When I saw it in the theatre the audience was both gasping in disbelief while falling-on-the-floor laughing.\n\nOne more thing...\n\nTony Perkins. Janet Leigh got much-deserved accolades for this film, but it is Perkins who gives what remains the single best performance by an actor in a horror movie. He is so understated that his brillance passes you by. He becomes the character. The sheer brillance of the role is evidenced by the ineptitude of the actors in Gus Van Sant\'s 1998 (dear God make it stop!) shot-for-shot "remake." Though the movies are nearly identical, Hitchcock\'s is superior mostly because of the acting and the atmosphere (some of the creepiness is lost with color). This is made obvious by the initial conversation between Leigh\'s character and Perkins, a pivotal scene. The brilliance of Perkins in the original shines even brighter when compared with the ruination in the remake even though the words and the shots were exactly the same. The crucial chemistry in this scene lacking in the remake gives everything away and mars our understanding of upcoming events. The fact that Perkins could never escape this role - his star stopped rising star as it had done in the 50s - proves that he played the part perhaps too well.\n\nI keep using the word brilliant, but I cannot hide my enthusiasm for this movie. It is wholly unlike the overblown, overbudget, overlong fluff spewing all-too-often out of Hollywood today. "Psycho" is simple, well-crafted and just the right length.\n\nEleven-and-a-half out of ten stars.', u'0.361193', u'\nWhen you look up the phrase "Horror Film" in the dictionary .. a picture of Janet Leigh screaming in a shower should appear next to it. Undoubtedly, Psycho is the greatest horror film ever made, bar-none. The story is incredible. The acting is near perfection. The cinematography is godly. The soundtrack is perfect. It\'s hard to find anything wrong with Psycho. Perhaps the only imperfection I can find with Psycho is the inability to stand the test of time. One of the reasons the shower scene has become so notorious is that it\'s not only filmed to perfection, but because the elements of sexuality and murder are so surreal. In 1960, seeing a nude women being murdered in a shower was something that no-one had experienced yet, and was quite shocking. Nowadays, seeing Jason double-spearing two lovers having sex is nothing uncommon. I envy those who experienced Psycho in 1960 in the theaters .. those experienced the full terror of Psycho.\n\nAside from this though, the movie is flawless. I won\'t even go into to how incredible the cinematography is. One thing I think people seem to forget about the movie is the incredible soundtrack. Sound is such an important element in movies and Psycho is undaunted when it comes to sound. The only other horror movie that even comes close to using sound with such perfection is Halloween (1978).\n\nThe movie is perfectly casted as well. Janet Leigh as the beautiful Marion Crane, Vera Miles as the concerned sister, Lila Crane, and of course the unforgettable performance from Anthony Perkins as the eerie yet charismatic Norman Bates.\n\nI would recommend this movie to any horror movie film fanatic. I would especially recommend this movie to any horror movie fan not desensitized by Friday The 13th, Nightmare On Elm Street, or Scream .. if such a fan exists.\n', u'0.215212', u'What can you say about a film that\'s been talked about to death? Just this: If you\'ve never seen it, you owe it to yourself to do so, not because it\'s a way of paying homage to the one true master of modern film, but because it\'s so fun to watch.\n\nJanet Leigh plays a bored office drone who decides to steal some loot from her boss\'s obnoxious client and parlay it into a new life with her all-too-distant boyfriend. All is going more or less according to plan until she stops in at the wrong motel, where she befriends a friendly if somewhat nerdy desk clerk only to find it causes problems with that clerk\'s possessive mother, who as her boy explains, "is not herself today." I\'ll say she isn\'t, and so would Leigh\'s Marion Crane, who maybe should have put up that "Do-Not-Disturb" sign before taking a shower.\n\nYou can feel the decade literally shifting out of \'50s and into \'60s with this one. Even the opening shot, where the camera looks over a Western U.S. city in the middle of the afternoon and zooms in on what looks exactly like the Texas School Book Depository overlooking Dealey Plaza. Norman Rockwell touches abound, like the decor of the motel, but look at what\'s going on around it. People dress well, they still wear fedoras and jackets, but in their tense conversations and hooded gazes you can feel the culture just ticking away like a time bomb waiting to explode.\n\nMost especially, there\'s Anthony Perkins, who plays motel clerk Norman Bates in a very oddly naturalistic way, complete with facial tics and half-swallowed words, not the polished image one expected to see then. Just compare him with John Gavin, who plays Marion\'s boyfriend in the standard-actor-of-the-day way. Perkins manages to be so weirdly magnetizing, even in small moments like the way he stumbles on the word "falsity" or notes how creepy he finds dampness to be.\n\nHe shines in bigger scenes, too, like his tense chat with Martin Balsam\'s boorish but diligent private detective character, Arbogast, who along with Perkins and Leigh delivers a landmark performance. The way both actors play out the awkwardness in their conversation makes you literally sweat. Then again, you\'re always uneasy around Norman. You definitely feel wary of him right away, but you find yourself liking him, too, even when he\'s busy covering up "Mother\'s" misdeeds. Not since Bela Legosi played Dracula did you get a horror movie with such a compelling central figure.\n\nIf you are sampling the many other comments here, be sure to look up Merwyn Grote\'s. He makes an interesting, compelling case for how director Alfred Hitchcock used his television series as a template for "Psycho." Certainly "Psycho" looks more like early 1960s television than any of the more sumptuous fare Hitchcock had been bringing to screen at the time. Not only is it in black-and-white, not color, but the sets; a ramshackle motel, a mothbally old house, a couple of cheap looking bedrooms, a bathroom in a used-car dealership, are deliberately low class.\n\nIt\'s thrilling to see Hitchcock move so effectively outside his normal element, and move things along with such clinical detachment and low-key technical finesse. Thrilling, too, to realize this is one of his most accomplished products; made by a man who was experienced enough to know how the game was played, and daring enough still to break the rules; indeed, start a whole new ballgame.\n\nIs it the best Hitchcock movie? It\'s definitely one of his best, right up there with "The 39 Steps" and "Strangers On A Train" and "Sabotage" and "Shadow Of A Doubt." He only once again came close to making as good a film, with "The Birds," while Janet Leigh and Anthony Perkins never escaped the greatness they helped create here. Poor John Gavin had to quit the biz entirely, and became an ambassador.\n\nOften imitated, parodied, referenced, and analyzed to death, "Psycho" still isn\'t played out nearly 45 years after it came out. You owe it to yourself to pay a visit to the Bates Motel; Norman has a room ready.', u'0.166991', u"\nMost modern-day horror films make the killer to be an absolutely inhuman, grotesque, unimaginable monster in order to scare the audience out of its wits.  Most of the time, however, these stereotypes create a generic murderer a raving, ranting, clearly demented psychopath.  One of the few memorable cinematic killers that does not adhere to these restraints and cliches is, of course, Anthony Hopkins' Hannibal Lecter, whom manages to effectively cause the audience to recoil without such drek as the aforementioned devices.\n\nAnthony Perkins' skillfully crafts his performance as Norman Bates, avoiding a ranting, raving, drooling, murder-happy, manic characterization; instead his performance as Norman is subtle, creepy, cool, and unsettling.  He is brilliant; from his quiet conversations with Marion Crane amidst the stuffed birds, to his weasling wimpiness when confronted by Arbogast, his performance is so exact that it chills the viewer, all without the unnecessary disturbing images prevalent in more modern films (read The Cell, Henry: Portrait of A Serial Killer).\n\nPerkin's fine performance, a tight script, and Bernstein's classic score make Psycho a film that is now and will always be remembered as one of the pinnacles of the horror genre.", u'-0.0529277', u'\nSo much has been written about this film that all I can do is add my own voice of approval and say that I consider it to be a masterpiece, and add a few things often overlooked or not commented on that add so much to the movie\'s cumulative power. It\'s often the little things that make a film work. Here are a few examples:\n\na.) The absolute realism of the first twenty minutes of so, which are so true to life that they might have come from a documentary on how people lived in America forty years ago. There isn\'t a false note,--or a missed one--as each vocal inflection and raised eyebrow carries great meaning even if, on the surface, not much appears to be happening.\n\nb.) Marion and the motorcycle cop. The cop is dark and sinister in appearance, due mostly to the bright desert sun, and never takes off his sunglasses. His conduct is at all times professional; he never raises his voice, and comes across as calm and rather perceptive; and he seems truly concerned over Marion Crane\'s fate, though he is unaware of her actual predicament. Marion is, alas, a bad actress, and the cop sees through this, if not to the heart of the matter, yet we don\'t want him to follow her. Despite his appearance the cop is not the angel of death but rather Marion\'s last chance. Had she confessed to her crime she would have escaped the fate that awaited her; and if she had just been a little less clever, and driven more slowly, and the skies remained clear, he might have followed her to the motel and intervened on her behalf.\n\nc.) California Charlie. John Anderson is wonderful as the fast-talking, semi-streetwise small town used car salesman. At the end of almost every other line of dialogue he seems on the verge of discovering who Marion really is, then pulls back or comes to the wrong conclusion. He senses that she is being watched by the cop; but he also wants to make a sale. The scenes at the used car lot are both highly realistic,--and perfectly acted and timed--and also a little frightening, from the opening, "I\'m in no mood for trouble", to the final "hey!" just before Marion drives away. We know that something isn\'t right, but the problem isn\'t with the car lot; it\'s Marion\'s plight casts a dark shadow over all her scenes there, despite the brightest sunlight imaginable.\n\nd.) Chitchat with Norman. Once Marion and Norman settle down for a light meal in the parlor their conversation turns to general things, and Norman is a good observer, if a bit awkward socially. Without actually lying Marion gives herself away with a throwaway line ("Sometimes just once is enough", in a reference to private traps) and Norman seems to catch her drift, if not the actual meaning of what she\'s saying, and allows it to pass. We can see that he is moody when he angrily leans forward and delivers an angry, though controlled tirade against putting people in institutions. Every camera angle and line of dialogue in this scene has meaning and carries enormous weight, and yet the drama plays out in a light, relaxed mode, and the performers seems truly connected to one another at its conclusion, strangers no more. This is in my opinion the best written and most beautifully acted, edited and photographed scene I have ever seen in a movie. The handling of every nuance is prodigal and masterful, and the end result nothing less than staggering.\n\ne.) The sheriff\'s house. When Sam and Lila wake up the sheriff and his wife in the middle of the night we see a splendid example of people talking to one another without either party understanding what is in fact going on. The result is a mini-comedy of manners; but it is also good exposition, as we learn of Mrs. Bates\' death (and the dress she was buried in, "periwinkle blue"). John McInyre\'s sheriff dominates this scene (and no other), and expertly delivers its punchline, "Well if that\'s Mrs. Bates in the window, who\'s that buried up in Greenlawn Cemetary".\n\nf.) Arbogast and Norman. The private detective\'s interview with Norman is played low-key, and yet we sense the tension in Norman\'s voice and manner, and know that Arbogast does, too. Something is amiss. This is beyond the question of who killed Marion. The stakes feel very high in this sparring match, and though Norman wins on a technicality, we know that Arbogast is coming back for more.\n\ng.) The shrink\'s explanation. This part of the film has been criticized by many for being a sop thrown to the audience. I disagree. After all, the movie came out in 1960, and by the standards of the time some explanation seems in order, and Dr. Simon Oakland is as good a man for the job as I can imagine. His analysis of Norman\'s pathology is cogent and extremely well delivered. Yet throughout his speech, with all its Freudian brilliance, the doctor offered a take on the story that we in the audience, even if we can accept it, can never be satisfied with. He can explain the character of Norman Bates rationally, but he cannot make our response to his story and its effect on us feel ultimately safe, feel somehow in control and finalized. Yes, one can put people like Norman under the microscope, and even dissect what one sees, but this doesn\'t stop such events as unfolded in the movie any less likely to occur. Ask Milton Arbogast.\n\n\nIn conclusion I\'d like to say that great films are made up of outstanding little things, not just big moments or fancy effects. There is in fact nothing fancy about Psycho, which is on the surface is a somewhat plain-looking movie. Only when one looks beneath the surface does one see the teeming millions of small things,--gestures, glances, sudden changes in lighting, razor-sharp editing, and all above the refusal on the part of the director to let any one factor dominate--that we understand the meaning of the word genius, the meaning of the word creative. ', u'0.0281185', u"\nI saw this movie as a teenager when it was first released in the 1960's. The promotional hype for the film ensured you did not have a clue what it was about and people who had seen the movie were asked not to reveal the ending. You went to see it anticipating something scary and thats what you got. Even 30 years later I still remember sitting in a dark theatre with my heart pumping and everyone, and I mean everyone, screaming their lungs out.\n\nThe movie set a new and very high standard in horror movies which I don't believe has ever been equaled. The characters were great, the direction perfect and the music, which I thought was absolutely fantastic, made this a classic.\n\nI still get scared when I see it on TV. ", u'-0.0267394', u"\nWhen Psycho came out, the horror industry of movies was merely monsters, zombies, werewolves, and vampires. So when Psycho hit screens, the audience was finally introduced to psychological thrillers. It hit with such a huge bang that the audience was shocked...with fear and suspense. Psycho created what the thriller genre is today. It sliced through clique monster movies and changed it forever. Still today when you look at Norman Bates and his extremely freaky look when you see him watching the inspector's car sinking into the swamp sends chills down my spine. And when Marion Crane met her bloody demise in the middle of the movie, Hitchcock proved to everyone that this movie is different, different from every other movie you have ever seen. The cinematography in this movie is fabulous, the music is marvelously freaky, the acting is magnificent, the story is exceptional, and everything else about the movie is great. Too bad the sequels and the new remake was complete trash.", u'-0.234958', u'When I watched this for the first time in over 30 years, I was surprised how little action there was since I had remembered this as some intense horror movie. Of course, I was young and more impressionable so I guess I just remembered those few dramatic, sensational scenes such as Janet Leigh murdered in the shower and the quick other murder at the top of the stairs. Basically, that was about it, action-wise, BUT I have no complaints because the more I watch this film, the more I like it. It has become my favorite Alfred Hitchcock movie, along with Rear Window.\n\nI mention the lack of action, and blood, too, because younger people who might be watching this for the first time are not going to see the kind of horror film they\'re accustomed to seeing. A generation back, movie makers tended to build up characters and suspense, so there was a lot more storytelling and less action than you see today. Also, this movie doesn\'t have the shock value today for audiences, either, not after years of Freddie Krueger-type blood-and-guts seen in the past 30 years.\n\nBut, what you WILL see in this movie is (1) superb acting; (2) a fascinating lead character; (3) excellent photography, and (4) a bizarre story.\n\n"Norman Bates" is one of the most famous fictional names in film history, thanks to this film and the great work portraying him by Anthony Perkins. "Norman" is a nutcase, as it turns out and the more you know all about him, the more fun it is to study Perkins and his character "Norman" in subsequent viewings. He really has the guy down pat. However, it isn\'t just Perkins\' film; the supporting is just fine with Leigh, whose figure is still awesome no matter how many times you see it; Martin Balsam as the private detective; Vera Miles and John Gavin. Everyone contributes.\n\nWhat makes me really enjoy this movie is the cinematography. I bought this on VHS when it became available on widescreen. Later, of course, I got the DVD. Each time, I appreciate John Russell\'s camera-work and Hitchcock\'s direction more and more. I wonder if this isn\'t Hitchcock\'s best job of directing as his camera angles and lighting are outstanding. On the DVD, the blacks, whites and grays are just super and the famous house next to the Bates Motel never looked better. That house really looks eerie.\n\nThe sound effects in here don\'t hurt. When Balsam is attacked, the accompanying frightening music never fails to bring chills down my spine. The music literally "screams" at you.\n\nI went 35 years between showings but now have watched this five times in the past four years. I love it and look forward to seeing it again. Many people here think this is Hitchcock\'s greatest film. Add me to that list.', u'0.0941765', u"Robert Bloch wrote the original work, Joseph Stefano adapted it into a tight screenplay but it was Alfred Hitchcock with the extraordinary complicity of Bernard Herrmann who transformed this lurid tale into a classic, horror masterpiece. The score propels us into the moment before the moment arrives provoking the sort of anticipation that verges on the unbearable. The fact that the key scenes have become iconic film moments: copied, imitated, emulated and parodied, have not diminished its impact, not really. The anticipation, underlined by Herrmann's strings, creates a sort of craving for the moment to arrive. That doesn't happen very often. No amount of planning can produce it or re-produce it - otherwise how do you explain the Gus Van Sant version - so, the only possible explanation is an accident, a miraculous film accident and those do happen. Everything falls into place so perfectly that even the things that one may argue are below the smart standard of the film, are needed, the film without every frame is not quite the film. Try to turn away after the climax during Simon Oakland's long explanation. You can't. I couldn't. Partly because you know you'll soon be confronting those eyes, that fly, the car...", u'0.0309685', u'Alfred Hitchock is the master of suspense and Psycho is probably his most famous film. Because, let\'s face it, one way or another, you have seen or heard of this film. It\'s been made fun of, been remade(unfortunately), not to mention that this movie\'s word will be spred from generation to generation. I came across it very young, my parents used to tell me how scary it was and how I wouldn\'t want to take a shower after watching this film. I didn\'t believe them, but when I watched it, I for the first time pulled the blanket over my head, it was that frightening! The thing that is so amazing about Psycho is how much of an impact it made, and understandably why it did. It ranked in over 60 million dollars at the box office, now this was the time where tickets were like 50 cents at the theater, now if you compare that to today, that\'s Titanic like money! It broke many taboo\'s, like this was the first film to show a toilet being flushed, isn\'t that interesting? My high school teacher said that her and her mom saw Psycho when it was first released in theaters and she actually ran out of the theater terrified! Alfred did so well keeping us glued to our seats with all his great twists! This was before The Sixth Sense, I mean, the ending is just such a mind blower! But I won\'t give spoilers.\n\nJanet Leigh plays Marion Crane, a woman who is in love with a divorced man Sam Loomis. He says once he pays his ex wife off with the alimony, they\'ll get married. When Marion\'s boss asks her to put their most valued client\'s money, $40,000 to be exact, and bring it to the bank. She has other plans though, she takes the money for herself and flee\'s the city, but not before her boss sees her driving off. Shaky enough, huh? But she pulls over to get a nap in, and a police officer asks if she\'s OK, but she gets shaky and just wants to drive off. The policemen fallows her since she is so shaky and she ends up buying a different car. She gets caught in a giant rainstorm and pulls over to the Bates Motel.\n\nShe meets there, the owner, a pleasant and polite young man, Norman Bates. He lives in the house next to the motel with his mother. Marion checks in and Norman offers her dinner, they have a conversation mostly about his mom and Marion is concerned when she heard screams from the house that sounded like his mom. Norman gets on the defenses and asks Marion some questions as well, she says she is going to a "private island". Norman is very attracted to her, you can tell immediately, and she leaves knowing that she has to get out of the trap she set for herself back in Phoenix. As she\'s taking a shower before bed, a mysterious figure comes to the curtain and opens it stabbing Marion violently several times causing her to die. Norman cleans up the mess and gets rid of her body not knowing about her money and throwing that away too.\n\nMarion\'s boyfriend, Sam and her sister, Lola, hire a private detective to find her. The private detective comes across The Bates Motel and doesn\'t end up coming back after trying to "talk" to the mother. Lola and Sam are concerned and decide to investigate for themselves, but will they end up coming back to the city alive? Psycho is just one of those movies you have to see before you die. It\'s one of the most important films of our time and will never be forgotten. It\'s a true treasure with terrific actors and a terrifying plot that will give you nightmares for weeks! Please don\'t let that scare you, I\'m just having fun, but it is a freaky film! Watch it in the dark! It has a better effect, I think. Over 40 years and this film is still horrifying as if it were made today! \n\n10/10', u'-0.0412986', u'\nLet me start out by saying that I am a fan of Alfred Hitchcock.  This movie, in my opinion, is his best work ever.  But I think that Hitchcock owes a lot of his success to his long time partner Bernard Herman, who scored the music for many of his films including this one.  Anthony Perkins filled the shoes of Norman Bates perfectly.  He didn\'t overact, and he didn\'t underact. Janet Leigh wasn\'t the best person to portray Marion, but she played the part fairly adequetly.  However, I liked Vera Miles the best in this film. Hitchcock had her in mind for the role after she had to quit working on his last film "Vertigo".  She was probably the key role here, since she was the one who discovered Norman\'s terrifying secret.  Tony Award-winning actor Martin Basalm was terrific in his brief appearance as the private detective trying to track Marion down.  John Gavin was ok, but nothing to brag about. Hitchcock made a wise decision in filming the movie in black and white, and made history when he demanded that no one be let into the theater after the movie started in order not to cause confusion.  This is the most brilliant film I have ever seen, and I give it 5 stars (out of 5).', u'0.446496', u'No matter how many times one sits through this Hitchcock classic, Anthony Perkins always manages to surprise you. It is a sensational performance - for which he didn\'t even get an Oscar nomination - I have no way of knowing how much preparation he dedicated to the creation of Norman Bates, maybe no more than usual, but the details of his performance are astonishing. Never a false move and if you follow the film looking into his eyes, you\'ll be amazed as I was. The madness and the tenderness, the danger and the cravings. A mamma\'s boy with hellish implications and yet we see, we feel connected to the human being, we are not horrified by him but of his circumstances. In short, we kind of understand him. That alone puts him miles and miles away from other cinematic monsters. From Richard Attenborough as the real life Christie in "10 Rillington Place" to the hideous, unredeemable Christian Bale in "American Psycho". Here Hitchcock and Herrman create an universe that Anthony Perkins inhabits with the same kind of electricity, nerve and shyness that Norman Bates projects throughout the film. Janet Leigh falls for it if not him. She, like us, sees the boy trying to escape his dutiful son\'s trap. He is in my list of the 10 most riveting characters ever to be captured on film.', u'0.0469933', u'\nPerfect films are few and far between and the filmmakers usually have no inkling as to the top-notch quality of work they are doing.  Alfred Hitchcock thought it was a good idea to make a new kind of suspense picture back in 1959.  Something that would give the audience goose bumps was in order, but bigger bumps must have been the goal.  Hitch had to use his TV crew (from his network series "Alfred Hitchcock Presents..." because many film executives didn\'t like the material.  Little did they know that the big Brit was about to make a cinematic milestone and change the way films are structured and material is presented.  At the time, PSYCHO was a nasty-spirited movie that led some moviegoers to leave early or stop taking showers.  It has held up amazingly well and is far superior to its countless rip-offs.\n\nPSYCHO is perfect because: 1) It is in black and white, not blazing technicolor which would have stained the film for no purpose and made the shower murder less artistic. (Hitch may have went the route of director Michael Powell who became an outcast once his technicolor murder flick PEEPING TOM was seen.)\n\n2)The featured star disappears a third of the way through igniting a new method of scriptwriting and casting.  (Hitch made strict stipulations for theatre owners not to allow people into the movie once the picture started in order for this secret to stay secret.)\n\n3)Lesser known actors are used to provide a more authentic feel for the characters.  This is so true in the case of Anthony Perkins, not exactly a Cary Grant, who creates a stunningly chaotic portrayal of an abused son/mental madman. (Hitch shoots him from tilted angles and shadowy atmospheres to project Norman Bates\' unquestionably distorted state of mind, not to mention his evil grin.)\n\n4) The shower scene, of course.  Never before in any film of any kind known to man had people seen such frightening butchery and frank brutality. (Hitch storyboarded each of the 80+ cuts that take place within the 2 minute segment.)\n\n5) Norman Bates\' mother, who sits upstairs in the "old house on the hill" and just watches what transpires when she\'s not taking part in it.  (Hitch makes her a mystery until the very end when she is finally revealed to us and to Vera Miles in a masterfully shot turn of a chair.)\n\n6)The set-up and payoff which consists of 40,000 dollars, a device common in most thrillers but new to this kind of psychological terror.  (Hitch makes the viewer think the 40 grand will be the staple of importance and plot when it really disappears amidst the horror and has no significance at all.)\n\n7)Finally, composer Bernard Hermann\'s famed musical score is a pulsating, vibrant piece of gothic composition that matches the story and character actions perfectly.  (Hitch and Hermann worked on several films together, none better than this.)\n\nIs there any other question that PSYCHO is one of the top 7 or 8 films of all time?  I don\'t think so.  Just look how film history began a slow course towards more independence and honesty after PSYCHO scared everyone into believing this kind of film could be made.\n\nRATING: 10+\n', u'-0.0101529', u'"Psycho" is the most astounding, daring, and successful scary film ever made... Hitchcock uses pure cinema to arouse audience emotions...\n\nFor the first forty minutes he cautiously builds up sympathy and audience identification with a troubled fugitive, a young estate secretary Marion Crane (Janet Leigh) who wants to marry Sam Loomis (John Gavin) but neither can afford it... Entrusted, by a wealthy customer, with $40,000 to put in a safe deposit box in a bank, she succumbs to temptation and steals the money in order to start a new life with her lover... So the motive is love! \n\nWe begin to feel the tension when she\'s spotted \x96 leaving Phoenix, Arizona \x96 by her boss who thinks she remains in bed with a headache... Then, when she pulls off the highway to take a nap and is awaken by a suspicious patrolman \x96 in disturbing dark glasses \x96 who trails her... Hitchcock\'s trademark\x97 paranoia about the police is here at his best...\n\nFrightened and tired by a violent rainstorm, she stops at Bates Motel and has a small talk with a twitchy cordial motel keeper Norman Bates (Anthony Perkins-in an outstanding performance), an attractive shy young man who seems uneasy around her and can\'t even bring himself to pronounce the world bathroom...\n\nThe movie turns dark and claustrophobic when she overheard the voice of Norman\'s mother speaking sharply with her son, and after she learns Norman\'s strong devotion to his irritable mother...\n\nAlone in the room, she strips to shower\x85 Safe and relaxing, the hot air rises as the water cascades over her\x85 Suddenly she turns at a sound, her eyes dilate with horror and her repeated screams rend the air as a hand from nowhere holding a long knife plunges it repeatedly into her body\x85 Her blood, mingling with the water, flushes down the drain in one of the most terrifying images of modern cinema\x85 \n\nNo one who saw the film will forget the shock effect of that scene... Not only because of its terrifying realism, with the blood gushing and swirling on the shower floor; but also because Leigh was a sympathetic and star figure\x85 Although she had stolen, we felt involved with her (as we were involved with Marnie); we wanted her to get away; and here, with two-thirds of the film still to got we watched helplessly as the life and the beauty and the hopes were butchered out of her\x85\n\nThe movie is only off one third when Hitchcock\'s spiral close-up of her unmoving eyeball reveals the nightmare... But the movie does really begin after her murder because once she is killed, we never stop thinking about her...\n\nWith Marion Crane gone, our attention is shift to the sensitive Norman with a passion for birds and mother... They are very close and he guards her jealousy... \n\nAs three people began to investigate, our sympathies were subtly maneuvered to the good-looking young man who, it seemed, must try to protect a homicidal mother\x85 We see him distraught, cleaning up and disposing of Marion\'s car, with her body and cash, into a swamp... \n\nWe have no reason to think that he himself have done the dirty work... So could his crippled old mother be the vicious murderer? Or do we have some other reason to suspect that Norman\'s abusive mother does not exist? We heard the old woman talking constantly to him and we see Norman carrying her to the cellar... Or is it another Hitchcock\'s trick? But the knife comes out again striking and killing... The high angle shot shows perfectly her mad menacing rush from her bedroom... \n\nHitchcock\'s version is definitive, a terrifying insinuating thriller with only two sudden and vicious murders... A classic essential cinema with his rich, vivid and effective imagery in the use of light and shadow; his voyeurism when Perkins spies on Leigh in a black bra (The first time he shows a lady disrobed); his \'metaphysical vertigo\' in the overhead shot as Norman drags his mother down to the cellar...', u'-0.223111', u'\nHitchcock was very fortunate to have cast the young Anthony Perkins in the leading role.  At the time there were some other young aspiring actors who might have qualified for the part, namely:  Michael J. Pollard; Jack Nicholson; Bruce Dern, Dean Stockwell, Victor Buono and Dennis Hopper.  However, it\'s hard for me to imagine anyone other than Perkins playing Norman Bates with complete authenticity, it\'s seems the role was simply made for him and only him.  Could you possibly imagine anyone other than Nicholson in the role of Randall P. McMurphy in "One Flew Over The Cuckoo\'s Nest" or Dennis Hopper as Billy in "Easy Rider"?  Keep in mind the introverted, insecure Mama\'s Boy was not really PSYCHOpathic as Hannibal The Cannibal was in "Silence of the Lambs" - a cold-blooded killer with no conscience - but rather criminally insane, plagued by schizophrenic delusions and seriously in need of multiple reality-checks.  Anthony Hopkins did a wonderful job as the  vicious Hannibal, and also as Corky, the schizo-killer ventriloquist in "Magic".  I think he just might have pulled off a convincing Norman, but don\'t believe he was available back then.  Oh well, so much for speculation...Perkins did a\ngreat job.', u'0.342301'], u'tt0816692': [u'I have been a cinema lover for years, read a lot of reviews on IMDb and everywhere, and never found the right movie to write my first review. I always thought I would wait for THE movie.\n\nAnd this is IT!\n\nWhen I first heard that Nolan was preparing a sci-fi movie, I felt like a kid again, waiting for his Christmas gift under the tree. I knew it would become a classic. And I\'m sure it will.\n\nFirst of all, it is incredibly beautiful to watch. Honestly, it was so beautiful that I felt like I was sucked into the movie. The way Nolan decided to show some scenes really remind me of 2001 A Space Odyssey (actually many things will probably remind you of this movie). We can feel the talent of Christopher Nolan, just by looking at the way it is filmed. The techniques he used contribute to create that visual environment in a believable way.\n\nThe sound environment is just mesmerizing. It is a very important part of the movie, because some scenes take place in space, and Noland just found the right way to use sound. The soundtrack (made by the great Hans Zimmer) is breathtaking, epic, amazing, unreal. I could find a lot more adjectives to qualify it, but you have to hear it to understand how epic they are. \n\nThese two important parts (image and sound) create a stunning atmosphere. You will forget you are in a movie theater, and you will be lost in space, sucked into the adventures of this new Space Odyssey, begging for more. It is a truly unique experience. I can say that I have never felt something like that in a movie theater (at least not for the past ten years).\n\nThen, of course, the cast. First of all, Matthew McConaughey. I discovered this actor in Tropic Thunder, but he didn\'t really convince me, though he was quite funny. Then I saw Dallas Buyers Club. Since that movie, I love him. In this movie... Well, he is the movie. I exaggerate a bit, since there are other great actors (some even unexpected with a special guest) who play extremely well. But he is just what was needed to feel the human part of the story (which is very important in Interstellar). He is capable of making us feel so many different emotions all along the story, as a father, as a human. Anne Hathaway was very convincing, all together the actors managed to create some harmony, which makes the human interactions credible. Caine, Chastaing and Affleck are a perfect choice. And then there is... The special guest, I will call him "X". His role, which could be seen as a minor role, is actually much more important than that. He proves, once again, that he is a great actor. Watch and see.\n\nAnd finally, the scenario/story. I won\'t spoil anything here; I\'ll just try to convince you how great it is. Nolan is known to revolutionize everything when he tries a new genre in cinema. Well, once again he did it. With The Dark Knight he revolutionized the superhero genre. With Interstellar he\'s revolutionizing the sci-fi genre in cinema. From what I heard, he worked with a physicist (in gravitational physics and astrophysics) to help him with that movie. And we can feel and see it. During the fifties, Asimov laid the foundations of modern science fiction. Lucas and Kubrick did the same in cinema. Today, Nolan is laying the new foundations of the genre in cinema, proving that cinema is still at the beginning of what can be done (brace yourselves my friends, we have not seen anything yet). \n\nWhy? Well, simply because we only know a few things about space, some things can\'t be proved for the moment, so we can use theory, and make the best of it. That is exactly what Nolan did. He used theories that exist today, and made a movie about mankind, about pioneers, about humanity, about us.\n\nBecause, in spite of all the sci-fi aspect, it is a story about humanity. McConaughey, Hathaway, and mainly "X", will managed to convince you about that.\n\nMy rating for this movie can only be a 10, because in itself, it is a beginning for a new kind of cinema. It IS a classic. Those who say "we can\'t compare this movie to 2001 Space Odyssey, nor can we compare Nolan to Kubrick" are wrong. We can, and we should. Talented people don\'t live only in the past, some genius live today, among us. And Nolan is one of them. Many say that he is overrated. I truly don\'t think so. Only time will answer that.\n\nThis is the sci-fi movie of the decade, and probably the best movie Nolan ever made. Just go for it, without a second thought.', u'0.40762', u'The film begins by establishing at his own rhythm its ambitions: men overexploited land resources, which is why the only goal they have left is to survive. This life is not enough for Cooper, brilliantly played by McConaughey who gave body and soul to this character. But all of this wouldn\'t hold without the total control of Christopher Nolan, based on the languishing soundtrack by Hans Zimmer, the luminous and impenetrable photography of Hoyte Van Hoytema, and the sincerity of Nolan\'s directing. He manages to film the characters and to find the right cut at the right time, always in harmony with Hans Zimmer\'s soundtrack, to give the film an aspiring and inspiring dimension that went missing for many many years. Thus we are transported into the same cockpit that Cooper, we feel the same remorse that he can already feel, we feel the same gravity, and we feel the same fear of the unknown melted with the force of his will. All of this is brilliantly illustrated in a very simple directing choice, which from my point of view is the decisive impetus of the film: to directly jump from when Cooper leaves in his truck, leaving his family behind him, to Endurance taking off. This simple editing decision allows Nolan to give an original movement to his film, and the musical crescendo makes us physically feel the sentimental break between two parts of the film.\n\nYou don\'t necessarily have to understand it immediately : The film will raise questions in you, such as : what is it to be a human being, is there some physical limitations to our humanity, how far could we be willing to go to determine knowledge, is there other dimensions that we can not access to, and above all: what is the nature of this intact and immutable bond that unites us to others wherever we are in the universe ? Is this bond only intelligible, or is it also tangible ? All these questions resonate in harmony in Nolan\'s Interstellar. \n\nInterstellar is itself a crescendo, increasing sensitivity and creativity. I use the term deliberately because it goes crescendo with the soundtrack by Hans Zimmer, which is one of the most beautiful music ever scored for a sci-fi movie. We are witnessing a perfect musical arrangement, a total symbiosis, a bit like the music of Gravity which had understood very well how to match the image and the rhythm of a sequence to its own musicality. Zimmer\'s crescendos are giving a new powerful breath to every new scene, whether it is in visually powerful & intense moments or in more intimate moments; it intrudes into our momentary feelings and sensations, and manages to extend them, sometimes almost to choking, before resting on the balance of the film frame along with our mind spell-bounded. \n\nI have seen all the talent of the director that I knew he was outside the norm, but whom I did not know his capacity to reinvent itself. Because this is it: Interstellar is not an action movie, not really a blockbuster, and it goes not entirely but mostly again the expectations of common people. It\'s much more than that. This is much more than just a sci-fi movie. It is unlike any of his previous films. Some hoped to see Interstellar as Christopher Nolan\'s best film, and they were disappointed that this was not the case. And indeed, THIS IS NOT THE BEST FILM of Christopher Nolan. Because in a way, IT IS HIS FIRST FILM. I\'m not saying that Interstellar is not as good as his other films, it goes beyond all of them. But to me Interstellar is the first film of a new stage in Nolan\'s filmography ; it is a masterpiece as it the beginning of a work ahead. Interstellar is the proof that Nolan has finally managed, despite all the expectations that were placed on him after the success of The Dark Knight, to move away from his own reputation to create a personal work, original, humble, sincere and deeply, meticulously, measured.\n\nNow, in this third act of the film, it all comes to life with unparalleled strength. Nolan poses and answers questions that raise others. But he focuses his attention on the great mystery of love, that emotional bond that can unite men and sometimes separate them. But Nolan is the only one that can successfully speak of love from a being to another in a film that mainly takes place in a another galaxy. From my point of view, only Solaris by Steven Soderbergh (2002), unfortunately neglected by the audience, was able to accomplish that. Interstellar is based on a premise which is the following : from terrestrial dust to the depths of space and time, we can never be separated from who we are as individuals and as a species, as we always leave a part of ourselves "behind" us. In other words, I could say that this is a human story, and even if we go as far as we want to, if we travel through the universe believing that we can be detached of the one we are fond of, we will only get closer to them. Because the separation, and thus the distance and time, can only ultimately reinforce the relationship between the people who really love each other. Because it is going to the end of the world, when we reach the end of ourselves, that we reach the singularity of the "black hole beyond the horizon" * : it is our humanity. No, I wasn\'t been able to find any bad flaws in the film. Not one, and I\'m still looking. After all, Interstellar is like gravity, "all it takes is a little push ! "\n\n*you\'ll have to see the movie to figure that one out.\n\nF\xe9lix Tardieu, November 1st, 2014', u'0.310887', u"(This is both a review of the film, and an assertion of Christopher Nolan's filmmaking style)\n\nThere have been many reviewers and critics alike that have high praise for the film (the visual effects, the acting, the music), but say how it's not Christopher Nolan's best directed film. This is where i personally would have to disagree. Before i get into it, though, i'll talk about Interstellar a bit.\n\nInterstellar is truly a sci-fi epic like no other. To compare said film to '2001: A Space Odyssey' isn't just a disservice, but unnecessary. The films are almost nothing alike, simply sharing small plot elements. Also, Stanley Kubrick's vision of Arthur C. Clarke's sci-fi epic wasn't to ponder the philosophical questions that accompanied the story, but to make art, and art is was, and is. With Interstellar, Mr. Nolan set out to make his most personal and emotional film to date about love and time (time being a recurring theme throughout all of Nolan's films). But it's so much more than that too. There are no words to express the epic journey Nolan takes us on in the film, but needless to say, it's tear-jerking and emotional throughout. The acting is top-notch, especially McConaughey, who gives (I would say) his most emotional performance yet. But the actor who stole the show in a few scenes (one in particular, when they're on an alien planet) was David Gyasi as Romilly, one of the astronauts aboard the Endurance, their spacecraft. The musical score from Hans Zimmer is, without a doubt, his best and most influential work to date, helping drive the film's bold and breath-taking vision (the church organ helped significantly). The visual effects are easily the best to date as well, and of the year. To see a black hole created through visual effects in such a way, with pages theoretical equations provided by Kip Thorne (theoretical physicist, of whom's work inspired the film's genesis); what you see in the film is the most realistic depiction of a black hole, and even offered new insight to accretion discs surrounding the anomalies. But even everything else, from the alien planets to the Endurance, the visuals always look real. Then, there's the writing. I would definitely have to say this has some of the best dialogue i've ever heard in a sci-fi movie, and the script continually pours or oozes emotion, keeping the audience tethered to the film.\n\nNow, about Mr. Nolan. Don't just look at Nolan, but look at his films. Some say Inception would be his masterpiece, while others would say it's The Dark Knight, or Memento. But honestly, every single film Christopher Nolan has directed is a masterpiece not of its genre, but of Nolan. Following is his quiet masterpiece, not the film that put Mr. Nolan on the map as a phenomenal director, but one people visited or revisited after becoming accustomed to Nolan, after seeing Memento, what could be called his breakout masterpiece. Then, right after, he directed the remake of the Norwegian thriller, Insomnia. This, too, could be considered a masterpiece, even if a remake. Then, we were given his take on the Batman universe, starting with Batman Begins, the origin masterpiece. Then, there's The Prestige, adapted from the novel of the same name, which can be called his dark masterpiece. The Dark Knight, his bold masterpiece; Inception, his complex masterpiece, and The Dark Knight Rises, his flawed masterpiece. Now, we have Interstellar, his emotional or personal masterpiece.\n\nThis is just my looking at Nolan and his films, but whatever your thoughts are, you can't deny Interstellar is one hell of a journey. He certainly is one of the best filmmakers of our time, and of all time. I can't wait to see what he does next, but i'm not sure it will be as emotionally powerful as Interstellar.", u'0.444245', u"I was extremely lucky to get the chance to see this film upon its first day release, before entering the cinema, my expectations were already high, after all, this was a film from the cinematic genius who brought us the likes of 'Inception' and 'The Dark Knight', to summarise the following review in a single sentence: I left the cinema in extreme awe from the visual masterpiece I had just viewed. A film that explores the psychological and emotional state of a man whose life revolves around his family, 'Interstellar' is a thrilling and thought-provoking film that boasts an intellectual story masterfully written by the Nolan brothers. Whilst there seems to have been influence from films like '2001: A Space Odyssey' and 'Apollo 13', 'Interstellar' is unique in its own way. Whilst the subject may be hard to comprehend at times, it can't be denied how visually monumental and thoughtful Christopher Nolan's epic science fiction masterpiece is, and can easily be named the best film of this year and possibly one of the greatest science fiction films to have ever graced the screen. A sheer brilliant feat of cinema.", u'0.863166', u'\'Interstellar\' was incredible. The visuals, the score, the acting, were all amazing. The plot is definitely one of the most original I\'ve seen in a while. Most of the critic reviews have said that some bits are a little too unbelievable, but I have to disagree. Yes, there were some parts that were definitely in the "fi" part of sci-fi. But the thing is, \'Interstellar\' deals with concepts that we know very little about. We have no idea what the 4th or 5th dimension is like, or what it would be like to go through a wormhole or a black hole. I don\'t think it\'s fair to call something unbelievable, when we have absolutely no idea what WOULD be believable in those circumstances. Either way, excellent writing from the Nolan brothers. The visuals were outstanding, and will no doubt be nominated for an Oscar. The performances were excellent, though nothing Oscar worthy, as is the case with most of Nolan\'s films (\'The Dark Knight\' being the obvious exception). Hans Zimmer\'s score was amazing and blended perfectly with the film. All in all, \'Interstellar\' is an excellent movie, which I personally think is Nolan\'s most beautiful film to date.', u'0.396328', u'Love is the one thing that transcends time and space... \n\nNew creation of Christopher Nolan\'s genius, whose name is now known to everyone. His films are waiting with a special look, because it offers something that every day, unfortunately, less and less can be found in the world of mass cinema - an interesting spectacle, filled with meaning, ideas and emotions. At this time, Christopher decided to send us not to the world of dreams, and even not on the dark streets of Gotham City. No, now he send us to the journey to, and perhaps beyond the boundaries of the possible and impossible, through the curvature of space and time, in other worlds. And you won\'t forget this trip, this can be assured. \n\nI was madly waiting for Interstellar\'s release. And then, finally, I was able to see this Beauty - at the premiere in my coutry on October, 29. It was incredibly exciting. It was a delight. It was unforgettable. It was gorgeous. Nolan once again amazes the viewer\'s imagination by his painting. Journey to the brink of infinity, the line where humanity has never set, acts as either the first-born purpose and a background of emotional history about the father and the daughter. A loving father who mankind need to help, but that he should leave his children, and a loving daughter who doesn\'t want to let her dad in the infinity darkness. \n\nStarting from the very first frame and ending with the closing credits, a new picture of Nolan will absorb you completely, forcing stare at the screen during the whole action, because it\'s all so exciting and interesting that escape becomes physically impossible. No, this three hours won\'t fly quickly for you. You\'ll feel every emotion, every event, every character. You will not look how the main characters travel through the universe, because the movie experience in this film is so excellent that you will be on board of "Endurance" starship and travel between the worlds with the main characters by yourself.\n\nThe emotional core of this story is the relationship of Matthew McConaughey\'s character and his daughter - Mackenzie Foy\' and Jessica Chastain\' character. And the acting work of these three artists in "Interstellar" impress the most. McConaughey was acting really great, and this is one of the most emotional, if not the most emotional role of his life. All the drama and tragedy of the relationship of father and daughter in this film will not leave anyone indifferent. Anne Hathaway, Wes Bentley, Michael Caine, Casey Affleck, Ellen Burstyn and other actors also coped with their roles and presented the film\'s supporting characters very realistic. I would particularly like to note a small but important in this story role of Matt Damon, a character who has received quite memorable. If we talk about the characters, it should be noted also two robots that accompanied our heroes in this difficult journey. One of them adds a touch of humor in the film, which mitigates constantly depressing, dramatic, and sometimes really dark atmosphere.\n\nThe script of the film is very well combined the history of space exploration and the relationship between Cooper and Murph. The story is complex and complicated, is based on real scientific theories by Kip Thorne, and indeed contains a reference to the "Space Odyssey" and other sci-fi pictures. This story about true love, about loyalty, forgiveness, fraud, hard decisions, and much more. And it is designed so that leaves a lot of room for the imagination of the viewer. It\'s also possible to notice some structure allusion to another Nolan\'s work - Inception. The story and visuals are combined just perfectly in Interstellar.\n\nHans Zimmer\'s score, written by him on the basis of only one letter from Nolan, hold the key: "Once we become parents, we can\'t help but look at ourselves through the eyes of our children", deserves a special praise. On this basis, Hans managed to write just incredible soundtrack that perfectly harmonizes with the history and the visual side of the picture. And this work of the composer is really different from the previous ones. It is executed in a different style from another subject in its base. Very impressive work, which will be pleasantly listened again and separate from the film itself. \n\nVisual range of the picture is incredibly beautiful and circuses. The "Endurance" itself, new worlds, insanely beautiful and mysterious space, wormholes, black holes, and travel through them, folds of time and space are arranged so that is simply breathtaking. I would like to thank all those who contributed to the creation of a visual of this film. It must be seen. That mastery with which this is done, not just words. In the visual pattern also has some references to the Kubrick\'s "Odyssey", and they are pleasing to the eye.\n\nMany thanks to Christopher Nolan for having given us such an incredible movie, which once again proved to us that the cinema is Nolan\'s life. \n\n"Interstellar" is a film that wins the hearts of the audience not only with its sci-fi splendor, but also an emotional story that lies at its very heart. This film is not only about the discoveries, space exploration and the final frontier of mankind, but also about the relationship of father and daughter, who were in a difficult situation in life when one has to leave the other in the name of a goal that can not be underestimated. So, with what Nolan\'s genius unfolds before us this action is beyond praise. Combining the story, filled with not only real science fiction, but the true human values \u200b\u200band emotions, outstanding and very emotional performances, breathtaking visuals, epic and dramatic soundtrack, Christopher Nolan breathed the life into this film by his directing to create something truly masterpiece again. \n\n"Do Not Go Gentle Into That Good Night... Rage, Rage Against The Dying Of The Light."', u'0.449292', u'The universe is full of fascinating facts. It\'s mind-bending to contemplate, for example, the awesome size of our galaxy. Light travels 186,000 miles per second and yet it takes 100,000 years for a single beam of light to cross the entire Milky Way Galaxy. And our galaxy, to quote Carl Sagan, is only one among billions and billions. The vastness of space truly is stunning.\n\nBut thanks to a "worm hole" the folks in Interstellar leave the Milky Way in a cosmic snap of the fingers. And yet, having just achieved this most amazing of all feats, our heroes are pretty much bored to tears. Instead, everybody is more concerned with some father/daughter relationship that wasn\'t developed in the first place.\n\nLook, if you\'re going to make a movie that purports to explore the fascinating mysteries of the universe, then do it! Have some wonderment in the story. Dazzle me not only with visuals, but with amazement at the astonishing scope of our universe. And why not produce a script that obeys the laws of astrophysics, or at least some theories thereof?\n\nThis movie takes something that would dwarf the Apollo lunar missions and turns it into some ridiculous "Plan A/Plan B" tediousness. I suggest instead watching "Through the Wormhole" with Morgan Freeman or re- watching "2001: A Space Odyssey." Heck, even "Contact" with Jodie Foster is far more entertaining and imaginative than Interstellar. \n\nAnd yet. . .9.2 stars!\n\nI\'m not saying 10-star reviews on this site are phony; after all, major film critics also are raving about Interstellar. Unfortunately, I find most professional film critics about as credible as the physics in this movie.\n\nFrankly, Interstellar is a boring movie! And if that puts me in the vast minority of reviewers, fine, I can live with that. Because I have minimum standards when I pay $11 for admission and $8.50 for large popcorn.\n\nStay home and read a good book instead, or just gaze out at the night sky and reflect on our amazing universe.', u'0.185205', u"This was one turkey of a SCI FI. This is my report.\r \r\nNear the beginning of the movie a family gets a flat tire in the \r dust-bowl corn fields of any mid-western alternate reality. The dad is \r played by Mud and in his alternate world he hangs a 90 and does like \r SEVENTY through the corn without the slightest bump, all the while \r deftly hacking his laptop to commandeer a nearby drone. \r \r\nAfter stealing the drone, Mud decides that he must leave his kids to \r prove to their uppity teacher that NASA really did go to the Moon. He \r is chosen by Alfred to blast off with Catwoman in a reasonably 20th \r century 3-stage rocket that will eventually dock with an incredibly \r advanced 22nd century space station/rocket-ship. After leaving Earth, \r they need no longer adhere to primitive Earth technology. Now they can \r do anything that already ever happened on Star Trek, including \r Cryo-Sleep.\r \r\nWhen they wake up feeling refreshed they head for a cool wormhole that \r Stanley and Alfred told them about. They are hoping to find a new \r planet for all the okies to go to, at least that's Plan A. There is a \r Plan B but it's sub PC and is not going to work for Mud who is all \r about hurrying on up back to Earth so he can save everyone.\r \r\nGotta say more here about Mud's robot chum as he is remarkable with a \r fingerprint smeared body consisting of multiple swinging HVAC ducts \r that can navigate through zero gravity, run across boulder fields, and \r even walk on water, not to mention rescue damsels while carrying on \r charming banter with a voice socially engineered to be annoying. \r \r\nAfter they go through the wormhole they go to a waterworld where the \r laws of physics need not apply. Each hour they spend is equal to 17 \r years on Earth. Where's Einstein when you need him? The whole planet is \r covered with 3 feet of water which is fortunate since Catwoman can't \r swim.\r \r\nBack on Earth, the dispossessed are aging rapidly with their old-school \r monster trucks and other quaint artifacts of 20th century dust-bowl \r Arkansas. Mud's kids get growed up and environmentally challenged, but \r it's really about how Mud abandoned them. \r \r\nEventually Mud and Catwoman go to a really crappy planet that seems \r even worse than dust-bowl earth, yet they feel hopeful that they might \r move their famblys there, perhaps down under the frozen ammonia \r glaciers. They find a sinister guy who looks like Matt Damon's dad who \r gets all evil and blows stuff up. Mud decides that he's gonna take the \r tin man and fly into the near-bye black hole that is just 14 billion \r light years away. \r \r\nMudbot knows in his crazy-brilliant, hillbilly-sage way, that if he \r just makes a B-line through the B-hole he is going to pop the cherry. \r With Hans Zimmer in the house Mud trips his way through the \r five-dimensional space. After an abbreviated acid trip (Thanks Kubrick, \r thanks Trumbull) Mud skips the room with the old man and starts \r floating around in an empty library. He peers through the stacks at his \r past-life capers while pondering the tangled twists which makes him \r feel real sad and then he feels real mad and yells at his little \r daughter who can't even hear him. If only he could communicate using \r just his sheer acting....\r \r\nMeanwhile, Mud's grown-up daughter on Earth also feels sad and mad and \r she tells her brother to Argo F himself for not joining her in her \r cave. She doesn't like the air quality either so she torches her bro's \r corn crop. Harsh. Then she starts moping around in the old family \r library, the very same one that Mud is trapped behind the stacks in, \r except Muds library is made by humans from the future. At least that's \r what the robot said. Suddenly while pondering a wristwatch big daughter \r has an epiphany and realizes that all you really need is\x85 \x85. wait for \r it\x85. Gravity!\r \r\nLots of good opportunities to cry here, what with Mud screaming at the \r little and big version of his daughter and having epiphanies right and \r left. Something (no idea what) clicks and Mud tells the robot to get \r binary and convert the 'quantum data' into Morse code so that he can \r power-emote it to the wristwatch that daughter is trippin on. Wait, did \r she just hallucinate? or did the little minute hand start jiggling \r around? It did do a jiggly wiggly and the jiggles are obviously coded \r gravity-signal wiggles coming through the black-hole bookshelf world \r from her crazy hick-savant dad.\r \r\nWell that about wraps it up. Needless to say,... big daughter \r trans-codes the Quantum Jiggles into FORTRAN code and saves the world \r or at least makes it a lot less dusty and so that people get to go to \r Hawaii again. \r \r\nYears later the big daughter becomes really ancient daughter and \r cryo-naps in the hope of seeing Mud again. Darned if some of the \r freshly quantum jiggled peoples don't figure out how to make space \r rockets again and they even find Mud just in time so that he can come \r back and be ignored by everybody he saved. Apparently the robot ran off \r with catwoman so ancient daughter wakes up and figures it is just so \r much easier to go to Saturn with her tube and her hospital Bed. A bunch \r of other family members go with her just for convenience sake and they \r all gather around her bed. When Mud comes in they decide to walk out en \r masse without even glancing at Mud even though he is their great \r gran-pappy and saved the world and discovered quantum gravity love.\r \r\nMore sweet, sweet tears as dad and daughter commiserate. After an \r appropriate interval daughter wisely tells daddy to go and enjoy his \r youth, steal a spaceship, and try and win catwoman back from the \r swinging robot.", u'-0.289824', u"It is beyond me how people can claim the movie to be 'brainy', 'intelligent', 'well written'... With all the things I read about the movie prior to seeing it makes it the biggest disappointment I've experienced from cinema in years. I give 1 star to bring balance to the current rating, in reality this movie is of course not that bad.\n\nThe whole idea behind the plot is that McConaughey ended up in this blackhole where 5 dimensions were compressed into 3 dimensions and stuff, and where he was able to manipulate gravity by sending his daughter the message which was imperative for saving humanity. So what in fact happened is through this ridiculously improbable chain of events McConaughey ended up inside this blackhole. All this was apparently the result of a bigger plan all along. Was there really no easier way for (future humans/aliens) to transmit this data, and if they built this time-space warping machine inside the blackhole - means they had access to the data all along? And also means they chose McConaughey daughter on purpose? So I don't understand, what was this purpose? Could they not have connected their portal to professor's office a long time ago, or go for one of the ten billion more rational alternatives?\n\nOn a side note: is it not funny how McConaughey ignored the message NOT TO GO from the same 'ghost' yet followed the rest of the directions? While in the end of the movie he idiotically repeats his feeble attempt. Had he added 'it's you dad' or any other sensible hint he would have saved his daughter years of suffering (and maybe a lifetime for himself when he realises this). And I don't even want to get into how ridiculous it is that he transmitted data by moving the hands on the watch, which was unaffected after being picked up, meaning it was hardly gravitational manipulation was it? What was the point of trying to be scientific and trying to explain it in this way then. If he could do that, he ought to have found a better solution that did not require his daughter 25 years to figure out.\n\nAnd anyway, they saved humanity by building this massive station named after his daughter (by that time they knew what he went through and they still named it after her?). Why couldn't they have done the same thing on Earth? Just build the same goddamn station on Earth without needing to harvest their gravitational energy bullsh*t, bam, humanity saved in the same way.\n\nGrand ideas don't make great movies if you can't deliver them properly... It is atrocity to compare this to Kubrick's masterpiece...", u'-0.306742', u"Just watched Interstellar in imax 70mm. Science Fiction fans can read on, everyone else can skip. Movie is a visual masterpiece. Like his earlier movies, Christopher Nolan once again proved, how big a movie can be! There were some shots,which made audience go crazy..Some scenes were as epic as 2001: A Space Odyssey. Do not go into the theatre expecting an action packed cerebral thriller. This one is not for action fans. At times, movie go highly sentimental( Matthew McConaughey does what he is best in and supposed to). I recommend this movie to all the Sci-Fi fans out there, make sure you go in group of sci-fi nuts!! Do not go with the hype..Go, sit back and enjoy. Just like Inception, this movie will be known as great after few months(I know people who said Inception was a crap when it released, and after few months rating it 10/10 in IMDb :D). I don't wanna spoil anything(If you want PM me). Also, make sure you go to the best theatre close to you. (If you loved Donnie Darko, 2001: A Space Odyssey, this is the one for you, Get ready to get mind blown!!) Interstellar Movie is EPIC in all sense!!", u'0.207834', u"So last night I got the chance to see the early screening of Christopher Nolan's Interstellar. The film I've been waiting so much from the early days of the shooting. How did it fare? Here's my take:\n\nTo avoid any tl;dr risk, let me get this straight from the very beginning, Interstellar is one goddamnedly good film, it gets you to the edge of your seat, it soars, it warps, it rips your brain senseless. It's that good.\n\nInterstellar is a story about the earth dying, with its soil no longer able to sustain crops other than corn, and of course, it will lead to the extinction of humanity. Our hero is an ex-NASA test pilot named Cooper (Matthew McConaughey), a typical ordinary-guy-in-an-extraordinary- situation everyman who's also a dedicated family man, especially toward his daughter Murphy (named after the Murphy's Law). In an all-too-Armageddon style our hero gets invited by the (publicly) defunct NASA to become humanity's last hope in finding a new home, for they have found a wormhole near Saturn (2001, anyone?) which will warp the astronauts to another galaxy in quest of a habitable planet. Solid and compact premise, although it's been used before.\n\nFor seasoned filmgoers, there are many similar elements (although it's understandable) with Stanley Kubrick's 2001: A Space Odyssey (1968) and Robert Zemeckis' Contact (1997). In a sense that this is not a bang-bang-shoot-shoot-blow-em-up sci-fi, but more of a slow-burning, metaphysical sci-fi which gets you to think about your place in the universe and your exact place in time.\n\nSimilarity with 2001 and Contact is never a bad thing, but it becomes a wee bit too predictable, although Nolan is a smart enough director in providing the final (a very sentimental one, I should say) twist in the story. The visuals in this film is majestic, everything is shot to a meticulously calculated level, Nolan-style. The space scenes are serenely suspenseful just like Cuaron's Gravity, but unlike the documentary feel of Gravity, there's a real gusto and pace to these scenes. You should also be prepared for the (for some, maybe) unexpected third act, it is Nolan's most sentimental and humane moment to date. And this is why Interstellar is more than just a science-fiction, it is a human drama intertwined in space and time loop.\n\nOne thing that Nolan gets a bit wrong is the narrative. Nolan was never a 'warm' director, his films are filled with brilliant ideas and flair but it feels cold, it maybe suits Memento and The Dark Knight but in Interstellar he seems to have been lost in determining which of the interpersonal drama or the sci-fi that will be Interstellar's forte. The result is a rather incongruous script, intermittently cutting off the excitement of the previous scene and so on. But it is a forgivable sin, for the good is a lot more than the bad in this monumental film. At the end of the day, all I can say is that Interstellar is a grand film. It is monolithic, thoughtful, sentimental, sophisticated, visceral but also with its flaws. I wouldn't say it's Nolan's best work to date, but I daresay that this is one of the best science fiction ever released.\n\nAfter watching Interstellar, do yourself a favor and get lost in space and time and go back in time to see Contact (1997) and 2001: A Space Odyssey (1968) to further wonder and wander into the realms of the unknown.\n\nBecause sometimes it is the unknown that fascinates us, frightens us and brings out the best in us.", u'0.345237', u'I am a Nolan fan but, and perhaps that\'s why, I see Interstellar as a failed magic act. The multi-layered surprise and amazement that we have come to expect of Nolan\'s films did not deliver. I believe this particular film, like Prometheus, failed due to the maker\'s inherent desire to create an epic - it took on too much, tried too hard and did it all wrong. \n\nI\'m willing to suspend disbelief for the sake of artistic creativity, assume space suits and modern telecommunication systems pass unscathed through black holes (and really, who knows?) but there are things that cannot be excused with the budget and resources at the disposal of this genius film-making team (such as bad script and poor plot planning). \n\nIDEA / PLOT The overarching idea is good, if not new. I found it hard to feel amazed by the (too many) plot twists. Ultimately the combination of all of them was tepid. We were expecting Murphy to be older than Cooper midway onwards. Murphy\'s brilliant solution leading to mankind\'s escape from earth failed to awe. Firstly - a massive stretch on the Morse code / quantum data, secondly - the two laugh-out-loud "eureka" moments - and thirdly, the "aha" factor on seeing the new, curved reality space station was completely missing that feeling - "aha, so that was it, that\'s what it was all about". More failures - Matt Damon segue and the very overdone "ghost" revelation.\n\nSYMBOLISM / KEY TWIST The portrayal of the time dimension within a three dimensional world in the form of the undulating bookshelf wall was beautifully rendered. However everything else about that scene felt wrong - the space-suited Cooper - would he have stayed in exactly that form inside a singularity even if future advanced beings - them / us - have helpfully carved him a neat 3-D nook in a 5-D world? This needed exploration and some complexity. The continuation of his radio communication equipment felt way too convenient, the whole frantic scene "explained" again by the unexplained rush that\'s a hallmark of this film.\n\nSo, although the symbolic setup was good, I had to work hard to suspend disbelief - to get Cooper to the back of the bedroom wall and have him throw out clues using gravity and love as forces transcending dimensions - why back of the wall? Why not front? Why did the space-time continuum stop him there (that you can\'t go back in the time dimension, does not explain how he could gravitationally interfere with that particular room - in the past - and why he couldn\'t, I don\'t know, leave a Morse code message to himself well before all of this happened? Also, why his daughter? We get no clue in the first part of the film why this duo in particular is chosen, the only hint to Murhpy\'s future proclivity for the sciences coming from a penchant for decoding Morse and Michael Caine\'s all- forgiving view of her as a"firebrand" or something such.)\n\nPACING / DIALOG Plot pacing was terrible (variously too slow and too fast). Dialog was terrible. It would have benefited from further revision and thought around how to present this particular story to the layman. I found myself wondering how an actor of Matt Damon\'s caliber did not just wave a huge red flag when he had to say why Prof Brand knew the mission would fail -"because he could not reconcile quantum physics with the theory of relativity" (not a direct quote). Even if he isn\'t a physicist. The only lines I can still recall liking in the film are by Dylan Thomas (also overused).\n\nPRESENTATION I write this with only an armchair enthusiasm for physics, familiarity limited to the most dumbed-down works of Stephen Hawking. I found most of the science concepts used very trite - wormholes, black holes, relativity, time dilation - trite because of their portrayal as convenient plot tools. Having agreed in an extreme and completely unexplained hurry to leave his family behind perhaps forever, we then find out that Cooper needs to be told these concepts one at a time using, at varying moments, a folded paper pierced by a pen, oyster/pearl metaphors, and a suddenly-presented love interest for Anne Hathaway (that plot point on love being an unexplained force was particularly deeply unconvincing). I understand some of the angles needed to be explained to most people, but Nolan has done hard things more elegantly in the past. That is where one expected Nolan to deliver. \n\nAs things were it made you wonder the entire time why this crew was the best of humanity. Murphy\'s law, indeed.\n\nACTING Matthew McConaughey\'s drawl was sporadic and seemed unnecessary. His character did not convince me either that he was the guy who is most capable of being spontaneously recruited for an urgent NASA mission (and what if he had refused?), nor that he was the guy who loved his daughter in a unique way that transcended dimensions (or more so than anyone else), nor even as a suitable candidate to return from this odyssey with all its shenanigans through black holes, gyrating space stations and a cracked space helmet (!) We never know his history well enough. Anne Hathaway and the rest of the crew were no more impressive. Michael Caine was convincing, but ultimately confusing, as his confession left more questions asked than answered. \n\nTARS stole the show, and should have had more lines.\n\nEFFECTS / SCORE The effects were not comparable to Gravity. I wondered why their spacecraft was not equipped with the basic equipment to check metrics / giant waves / frozen clouds / landing conditions when any commercial satellite today will do that for you and tell you where you are to a foot\'s accuracy. But, details.\n\nThe score was beautiful, and one of Zimmer\'s best. What a waste.', u'-0.173259', u"It is incomprehensible to me that I watched the same movie that the majority of reviewers of this movie on IMDb seemed to. Perhaps I was unknowingly sucked into a blackhole, wormhole, or plot hole that most of the other reviewers of this movie managed to avoid. All I know is that my hard-earned money was sucked into this monstrosity along with me and for that I am truly regretful. Like a few other commenters, I had absolutely no feelings or connection with any of the characters, even hoping at times that they would all fail in their meaningless endeavors. A ridiculous premise with outlandish and unscientific bases, very little of this movie makes any sense at all. It amazes me that Nolan was able to draw the acting talent to this waste of time, as their considerable skills are completely wasted on this drivel.\n\nI should note that on several occasions, I actually couldn't help but laugh out loud at the absurdity, and that fact was truly telling for me.\n\nMr. Nolan, et al - you owe me two hours and forty-nine minutes of my life back!", u'-0.492839', u'I got something out of this movie. I really did. It was 35 degrees Celsius outside the cinema and all I needed was a three hour nap in cool air-conditioning. Lucky me! The latest Nolan film, just there for the taking.\n\nIt started off as I hoped it would, all dusty on the porch of some ranch in the middle of the U.S. otherwise known as nowhere, the end of the world syrupy American-style, little kid tugging at the heart strings - my eyelids already beginning to droop even before Coop and his daughter Murph wind up at some place that some old cockney and his very Jewish daughter inhabit (guess it only happens in movies with a blind casting director), but that was fine, I was almost in REM sleep - not having been able to process a word of dialogue from McConaughey in over 20 minutes. Pure bliss.\n\nAnd it got even better from an insomniac\'s point of view. Thanks to an absurd plot and woefully unimaginative CGI effects, my chin was almost on my chest when they landed on the first planet the other side of... well, let\'s just call it credulity. I don\'t sleep this well at home! Wait! We\'re going through another Kubrick-style time dimension - didn\'t we just spend half an hour on this planet re-using some special effects, this time made to look like giant waves, left over from Inception? I think so, but time warps so nicely when you\'re practically snoring.\n\nI think we lost an astronaut somewhere. Maybe that\'s the game. Who\'s next? I hope it\'s the astrophysicist who explains wormholes with a moebius strip he forgets to twist. Either that or it was origami for dummies. Maybe that *was* the guy we just lost - hard to tell, they all act the same. Flat as the dialogue. Thanks guys. Anyway, we can only pray it will be Hathaway soon. She\'s starting to keep me awake. How can a head bob about so much in weightlessness? But I\'m being unfair; I think I remember her trying to act some of this script. Brave move from an Oscar winner. I\'m starting to want my money back.\n\nAnyway, I\'m roused a bit now and thus a bit grumpy. We\'re in another galaxy\'s version of Antarctica minus the faintest signs of life - this despite (because of?) the unzipping of a new bad actor. Fortunately, this actor goes even beyond his usual leaden deadness and I\'m soon starting to lose consciousness again and time travel merrily back to the land of nod. I think there was a plot twist involved because this astronaut is trying to do a Dave and HAL routine. He must think he\'s in a good movie. Poor sod.\n\nDid I mention there must have been yards of Inception on the cutting-room floor last time because I\'m watching more and more outtakes? Gotta save a few million here and there. \n\nI had a dream. I dreamed that Nolan would come up with a slew of insanely bizarre plot twists right at the end that would explain the entire reason for watching this flick. But they carried me out on a stretcher before I found out if it was true. Apparently, I was having a nightmare screaming "Morse Code! No! No! No! Not Morse Code! That\'s Spielberg!" at the top of my lungs and disturbing the other patrons\' naps. I was obviously paying too much attention even comatose.', u'-0.19092', u'I will keep this short for the sake of not spoiling anything.\n\nRight off i should say I love Nolan. I adore most of his movies, and Interstellar is no exception. It is a marvelous piece of work whose visuals will be hard to forget. His shots of space and the way he played with colors is rather masterful. Maybe i expected it to be greater than what i saw, but even though i was moved by the movie i did not quite feel like he created something great with \'Interstellar.\' This could be attributed maybe to his overuse of sentimentalism in the father-daughter relationship he creates. Nolan really tries to make you cry with this one. I have never seen him use such powerful emotions in his movies; however that is not necessarily a good thing for this movie, given that he uses his time trying to develop a family relationship at the expense of flow and congruency. Again, the Visuals are completely off the charts. The visual imagery is truly beautiful and something that Nolan has always excelled at. Given that the most visually stunning movie in recent years, Gravity, recently came out, Interstellar does not lag behind and shows you a spectacle of Visual effects.He will most likely win Visual effects at the Oscars. The Hans\'s score is marvelous and will most likely earn an Oscar nomination. Matthew Mcconaughey\'s acting is good, but nothing stellar, especially coming off the best acting role of his career. He plays the character like it should be played, but Nolan\'s characters never being truly drawn out or rounded does not help him any.The same can be said for the rest of the cast. The little girl was marvelous though. I do not want to reveal any piece of the story whatsoever, but i have to say, it is one of the most original scripts i\'ve ever seen. \n\nUltimately this movie is entertaining. There is no way Nolan can miss that. Another great thing that Nolan excels at is INSPIRING. By the time the credits rolled and people walked out, I sat there still in awe at the strong sense of human will the movie conveys. Personally, I don\'t think this is Nolan\'s best. I believe Memento stands as his masterpiece. But with Nolan, everyone has their own favorite movie. Maybe for some, Interstellar will be their favorite movie, for it is really Nolan\'s most ambitious and visually-striking work. \n\nBy the way, Anyone else who even tries to compare Interstellar to "2001: A Space Odyssey" is out of their mind. Kubrick\'s mission was to create art. Nolan in "Interstellar" sets to awe and inspire its audiences. It is truly a great piece of work.', u'0.429144'], u'tt0109830': [u'I believe everyone has a right to their opinion about films or other topics. However from a lot of the comments I have read about this film, I do not think many got the gist of the message from the author and the film maker. This film is a great modern fable, a fable in the dictionary is defined as a brief fictitious story that teaches a moral. There are many morals defined in this film but foremost is integrity and a simple goodness.\n\nI have a half brother who grew up in the Southern U.S. and on one occasion we were discussing this film and he said he felt it portrayed Southerners as dimwitted. I disagreed with him and informed him that the author himself was a native Southerner. The setting is central to this story in that it lets the tale unfold tying in factual events with the fable before us.\n\nThe film is wonderfully directed by Robert Zemeckis, the film is his opus and is acted by a great cast on all levels. From the children who were Forrest Gump and Gump Jr. by Haley Joel Osment. Say what you want but I feel Tom Hanks deserved the Oscar award. Gary Sinise is synonymous with Lt.Dan whenever you hear those words. Sally Fields is the loving dutiful mother in her challenging situation. Mykelti Williamson as Bubba gives you a real sense in the story that Gump had a genuine friend, he moves you with his character. Words don\'t grasp the full performance of Robin Wright Penn as Jenny. Jennys\' tenderness and pain are palpable as exhibited by Wright.\n\nI feel that much of Gumps\' appeal is his downright sense of doing the right thing regardless of the people and situations around him and we see that in this film. That being the case maybe we all wish we could be just a little more like that, trying to maintain innate goodness and not the trade-offs we often make as we go down lifes highways.\n\nThe movie has it all too,drama,comedy and it challenges societal norms as well. Then there are the almost endless quotes from the movie that have slipped into everyday speech. They are too numerous to say at this point.One of the toppers for me in the movie is when Forrest is in a quandary about life and wondering as Lt.Dan said we all have a destiny and his Mom says it is where we are all just floating around like a feather in the wind. Forrest\'s character terms it very well with this quote,"I think it is a little bit of both." From my experiences in life it does appear to be that way. So if you have not seen the movie,see it soon you are in for a real treat. If you did not like it, give it a try again and hopefully you will see it for the great story it is!', u'0.296505', u'Quite simply, the greatest film ever made.\n\nHumour, sadness, action, drama and a Vietnam film all rolled into one.\n\nI\'m not a stone cold, heartless villain, but it takes a lot to make me cry when I watch a movie. Bambi\'s mother, I couldn\'t care less. Jimmy Stewart in, "Oh, what a wonderful life," - yeah right! The Lion King, when Mufasa bites the big one - on the verge.\n\nBut seriously - I bawled my big brown eyes out, on several occasions in this film. A real tear-jerker, and a wonderful character, played to perfection by Tom Hanks. Every bit as worthy for the Oscar as Rooney was to win the Premiership in 2007.\n\nI cannot say it enough: This is THE film of all time. Watch it, and you\'ll see.', u'0.275515', u"When I first saw this movie I didn't appreciate it like I do now. I think it may have been because I was so young when I first saw it. Just recently I saw the movie again. What an amazing story and moving meaning. That movie teaches you so much about life and the meaning of it. That life isn't as bad as most people make it seem. That an innocent man can impact so many lives with his innocence. The meaning of the movie to me is that everyone needs to have a better outlook on life. That we need to appreciate more of the little things and not let the big things hold us back. That truly although life may throw us trials and tribulations like a box of chocolates but that we have to just bite into it and get through it even if we don't like it. That we all need to hold true to our values and not sink into a place that feels like there's no hope... I just love this movie. And anyone who hasn't seen it or who thinks that don't like it I seriously suggest seeing it or seeing it again. It truly is amazing...", u'0.0576436', u'What I find completely ridiculous is why this movie, in my opinion one of the best ever, has such a low rating, so I\'ve tried to figure out what some found against it.I noticed that the haters of this movie who make it have a lower rating than it actually deserves mainly argue that it promotes the government\'s politics of submission: the idea that "if you\'re an idiot but you do what you\'re told then you will be rewarded, but, if you experience life then you\'re going to die a miserable death." I\'m not an American myself so i don\'t have any intention to defend the government or anyone else, but I think that the political events witnessed by the character in the movie make many miss the whole substance of the film. I think these bits of history only add to the magic of the film, making Forrest part of a fantastic world that seems so incredibly real though. \n\nHow can somebody say that Forrest is just an idiot, an ordinary person who does everything that he is told to do? It appears to me that in fact,in his innocence, Forrest does what he feels he has to do,no matter the situations and the people around him, lead only by an inner sense of right. So what actually seems to be special about Forrest is that, regardless of his intelligence, he has the capacity to discover simple truth and life values that all the others around him miss: he tries to save Bubba endangering his own life, he gives Bubba\'s family money and mainly displays simple goodness in everything he does. \n\nSo if you haven\'t yet seen the movie or you were disappointed by it, try watching it without analyzing things that much and just open your heart towards that world. The brilliant humour, the hilarious yet touching acting, the special effects and the uplifting message are totally rewarding.', u'-0.157627', u"This is a powerful yet charming movie; fun for its special effects and profound in how it keeps you thinking long after it's over. Like others, I've seen this movie more than once. One comment I've never heard is that Forrest's simplicity is almost zen-like. I should read the novel to get the author's intention (I remember some people preferring the book and complaining that no one at the Academy Awards gave him any credit.) But rather than an implication that you should do what you're supposed to do and believe in God and you'll win in the end, I see it as zen-like, i.e., living in the moment and not having expectations or particular cravings (other than his loving Jenny.) So he ends up just stumbling into all the major historical events of the time. Granted, he achieves this only because he doesn't have the brains to think otherwise and actually have expectations, but so many of our problems are because we do have higher intellect and desires, which ironically makes us unhappy because we know what we are missing. We love our cats and dogs for the same simplicity and always being in the moment. There's a line in the movie wondering if everything is predestined or happens randomly or it's a combination of both. It is something to mull over for a long time.", u'0.213326', u"\nI have seen this movie easily a half a dozen times, and I find that the beauty of the film is how Forrest Gump not only shares his innocence and purity with others, including the audience, he also manages to retain that innocence and purity through some very difficult times. As a Viet Nam veteran, and a college graduate of the late Sixties, I could of course personally relate to the various periods that Forrest Gump endures. I would only mention that the skillful and seamless blending of music, action, and period costume was enthralling. And yet it was so perfectly understated that Forrest Gump's travels through thirty five years of the stormiest and most meaningful years of American history only became clearly defined for the viewer. Even more so than the well known chocolates quote as a metaphor for life, I felt that the remark that stupid is what you do is probably more workable for most of us.\n", u'0.481112', u'"I\'ve made about 20 films and 5 of them are pretty good"-Tom Hanks.\n\n"Forrest Gump" is one of the best movies of all time, guaranteed. I really just love this movie and it has such a special place in my heart. The performances are just so unforgettable and never get out of your head. The characters, I mean the actors turned into them and that\'s what got to me. The lines are so memorable, touching, and sometimes hilarious.\n\nWe have Forrest Gump(Tom Hanks), not the sharpest tool in the box, his I.Q. is right below the average scores. But his mama(Sally Field) believes that her boy has the same opportunities as anyone else and lets Forrest know that there\'s nothing that could hold him back. As a boy he is put into braces for his legs since he has a crooked back and really doesn\'t have too many friends. When he gets on a school bus for his first day of school, NO ONE will let him sit next to them. This scene is so heart breaking until you hear a little angel\'s voice "You can sit here if you want". Jenny, Forrest\'s best friend and crush, she looks so incredibly innocent and you love her because her and Forrest are like pea\'s and carrots. But we find out that there is an extremely unfortunate side to her life, she has a father that\'s "always kissing and touching her and her sisters". Forrest just assumes that it\'s a father\'s love since he doesn\'t have a dad that could show him that it\'s wrong.\n\nForrest and Jenny together walk every day from school and when these kids start throwing rocks at Forrest calling him stupid, Jenny just tells Forrest "Run, Forrest! Run!". He miraculously breaks the braces off his legs and run like the wind blows. Forrest meets many celebrities from his life that just happened to be there: Elvis Presley visited his house before hitting it big, President Kennedy honored him with a all American football award, President Johnson who honored him with a medal of honor for his actions in Vietnam, President Nixon(in which Forrest happens to discover a problem in the Water Gate Hotel because some people seem to be flashing lights around), and John Lennon through a talk show to talk about his medal of honor.\n\nForrest meets some interesting people along the way too that are even better than these celebrities combined; Bubba his Vietnam war friend who dreams of owning a shrimp boat one day and was born with big gums. He is just so wonderful and charming and won\'t stop talking about shrimp. Luteniet Dan, a leader of Forrest\'s army in Vietnam who gets saved by Forrest during a huge attack and looses his legs as a result. Luteniet Dan was by far my favorite character, he has so much pride and wants to die in Vietnam due to his family history tradition of dying in every single American war. He and Forrest make quite a pair. And of course there\'s Jenny, a very tragic figure, she gets more mean as she grows up because she knows that Forrest loves her, in some ways you can\'t blame her really. She was obviously abused and I think she felt that Forrest was too good for her or that he couldn\'t really give her the love she wanted. Robin Wright, what a beautiful and wonderful actress.\n\nThis movie is incredible and should be seen by everyone. I am not kidding, "Forrest Gump" is a remarkable movie and inspires everyone. It\'s not just about someone stupid who happens to be in great places and historic events just because of being in the right place at the right time. This story is beautiful and will inspire everyone to go the distance and see the world like Forrest did and will never give up on their dreams.\n\n10/10', u'0.303896', u'Starring: Tom Hanks, Robin Wright, Gary Sinise, Sally Field This was flat out one of the best movies of 1994. It won best picture for a reason, along with a few other Academy Awards. I think one of the tag lines for the movie was, "The world will never be the same once you\'ve seen it through the eyes of Forrest Gump." How true. The movie is basically one simple man\'s journey through life. And what a journey.\n\nThe movie opens with Forrest (Hanks) sitting at a bus stop, waiting to go see Jenny (Wright) after being apart from her for years. Who is Jenny, you ask? We\'ll get to that in a minute. Forrest strikes up a conversation or two with the people that come and wait for the bus with him. Or, more accurately, he keeps talking regardless of whether anybody is listening or not. The movie plays out as a flashback, with Forrest taking us through all the major events of his life and narrating them.\n\nThe flashback starts when Forrest is a little boy, about six years old or so, just at about the age where he should be starting school. We get to take a look at Forrest\'s childhood as he gets leg braces to straighten out his back, as his momma (Field) fights (and does a few other things) to get him into public school, and as he meets for the first time the love of his life. Jenny. He meets her on the way to school, sitting next to her on the bus, and they strike up a friendship immediately.\n\nEventually we progress to the point where Forrest and Jenny are in high school, and we travel along with Forrest as he makes it onto the football team and gets to go to college. Forrest and Jenny never date, but he\'s always there to protect her. Anytime he thinks she\'s in trouble, he rushes to the rescue, ready to beat the ever-loving snot out of anyone who even looks at his Jenny wrong. I think one of my favorite scenes in the movie is when someone is dumb enough to slap Jenny. The film goes slow motion, Forrest\'s eyes go wide, and he starts charging at this guy like a runaway locomotive, and has the striking force of one too. Watching him beat the crap out of that guy is hilarious.\n\nAs Forrest grows up and goes through school, college, the army, a Vietnam tour, becomes a ping pong celebrity, a shrimp boat captain, and eventually one of the richest men out there, he also gets to take a few stops in history as the filmmaker gives us his own spin of how he thinks history would have happened if Forrest Gump were there. He gets to meet the President three times, he\'s the man who exposes the Watergate scandal, he\'s at the school doors when Governor George Wallace tries to get some Negroes into a white school, and so on and so forth. It\'s really funny the way they manipulate historical footage to insert Forrest into the events of the past.\n\nThis is truly a great movie. You\'d be a fool to miss it.\n\nBottom Line: 4 out of 4 (own this movie)', u'0.109145', u'FORREST GUMP (1994) **** Tom Hanks, Sally Field, Robin Wright, Gary Sinise, Mykelti Williamson. Brilliantly directed and inspiring comic drama about the truly extraordinary life and times of mentally challenged Forrest Gump (Hanks in the best role of his career won his second Best Actor Oscar in back-to-back winning roles), a simple, honest, and decent man whose childlike innocence is his lucky charm through his altering experiences that span the past two decades flawlessly. Mind-boggling Oscar-winning computerized effects by Industrial Light & Magic has Gump meeting the famous and infamous. Hanks is a wonder (dare you not to get a lump in your throat when it finally registers that he has a child {yes, that\'s Haley Joel Osment}- watch his face!) and gets fine support especially Wright as the love of his life and Sinise as his best friend (Best Supporting Actor nominee) superior adaptation of Winston Groom\'s novel by Eric Roth (also an Academy Award recepient) that truly captures lightning in a bottle. Oscars also went to director Robert Zemeckis and for Best Picture. *** One of my all-time favorite flicks. I still cry, particularly Forrest telling Jenny why he loves her so much ("You\'re my girl!") and at the gravesite when the birds fly overhead.', u'0.596998', u"This awesome movie is about an innocent man who represents how the world should be: he's loyal, humble, honest, he would never cheat or lie. He does everything with good heart and reaches success at the most important tasks of life.\n\nOnly in America he could live such an interesting life: meet Elvis Presley, President Kennedy, John Lennon... He goes to Vietnam's war and he does everything following his heart. He becomes an American hero. \n\nGary Sinise is a great American actor in his best performance too. He served in Vietnam with Forrest and was also a hero, protecting his men and fighting for his country.\n\nAll in all this is a must-see movie for everyone, specially for non-Americans, so we can enjoy American culture and icons, as well as learn some American history, which is very useful.", u'0.698904', u'I\'ve seen most of the top-voted 30 or 40 movies here at IMDb, and Forrest Gump probably wins my vote for the single best movie ever made.\n\nThis is not a conclusion I came to the first time I saw this film, or the second. The more you understand about this movie, the more you like it. And in terms of understanding it, my wife and I both were still gaining new understanding the 5th or 6th time we watched it. (For example: Why does Jenny behave exactly as she does throughout the movie? It\'ll take a lot of thinking to =fully= understand her.)\n\nJust the fact that we\'ve seen it at least half a dozen times says a lot. There are few movies that I ever even give a second viewing. \n\nLike many of the truly good movies, there are people out there who see it once and consider it to be a waste of time. Such people are usually just looking for the most "action," gore and sex they can find, and haven\'t a clue about films that actually involve thought, ideas, and life.\n\nDid I mention the script is absolutely brilliant? There are a lot of =truly= funny moments. And the music rocks. But those are only specific aspects of a movie that has just about everything else right about it as well.\n\nSee it, enjoy it, think about it, see it again. Think about it some more. Forrest Gump is one of the greatest movies -- if not THE greatest -- ever made.', u'0.392639', u'He may have been good in Philadelphia but be is excellent in Forrest Gump.Tom Hanks delivers another great performance in his career by portraying the lovable,king yet not so intelligent character Forrest Gump.It is also Tom Hanks\' second straight win for the Best Actor Oscar which he becomes the second man to do said accomplishment after Spencer Tracy.Whilst not as dramatic as Philadelphia,Tom Hanks\' performance is just as great in this movie and this movie could possibly be the film of Tom Hanks\' career as he used to be a comedy guy who turned to drama in a way which would paved for future stars such as Jim Carrey(The Truman Show),Reese Witherspoon(Walk the Line) and Will Ferrell(Stranger Than Fiction) to name a few.Also staring in this great movie classic are Robin Wright-Penn who plays Jenny,Gary Sinise who was nominated for an Academy Award for his portrayal of Lieutenant Dan Taylor,Mykelti Williamson as Forrest\'s best friend and shrimper Benjamin Buford"Bubba" Blue and Sally Field as Mrs.Gump.This film was nominated for a total of thirteen Academy Awards but won six of them which include Best Film Editing,Best Visual Effects,Best Adapted Screenplay,Best Picture,Best Director-Robert Zemeckis and Best Actor-Tom Hanks.This is one masterpiece of a movie that will not be forgotten about in a long time.Bravo!', u'0.859028', u"\nWinston Groom's Forrest Gump was a novel that was complicated, but (Oscar winning) director Robert Zemeckis brings events together with visual effects that boggle even George Lucas. \n\nAnd leading the film in this odyssey of American life is Tom Hanks playing Gump (he won his second Oscar for his portrayal) in a film that shows one man who goes through many events in history to find the one he loves.  Well done, well acted, and well directed to pythagorean procision.  A++", u'0.629635', u'I saw this movie in the theaters back in 1994. When it was released on VHS I obtained that version. I\'ve watched the movie about once every two years since then. This is an amazing movie in any number of ways. One big way it amazes me, is the way which it, as a simple and guileless little story, like a feather wafting in the breeze, nevertheless evokes raw rank hatred and eyeball-bulging, forehead vein-popping, spittle-spewing vitriol from liberals and so-called "intellectuals" who are absolutely certain that, like a guided missile, it is seeking them out, intentionally, personally, to insult them with rightwing thoughts and ideas, and by a nitwit character no less. Hahahaha. As if.\n\nSo let\'s first thing pop that little pea right out of the shooter. Let\'s dispense with the bilge of this movie being some kind of sub rosa rightwing plot. Puh-leeeze. This is a mainstream Hollywood production. Robert Zemeckis, Tom Hanks, Sally Field, and Robin Wright Penn are all known Hollywood lefties, liberal devotees who would take the pipe long before allowing themselves to be associated with or be used by anything akin a rightwing movie, let alone be openly and voluntarily involved in making one. Bottom line, this is not a political movie. This is not a movie which is making any kind of political or social statements in any respect. People who think it is doing any of that are just working way too hard over-thinking it all. Period. It\'s odd because it\'s really not all that complicated of a thing to understand. Which leads directly to another amazing thing about this movie: it is amazing the way the simple little message the movie is actually sending just sails right over so many people\'s heads. Amazingly they just don\'t get it, and based on the comments here they still aren\'t getting it 14 years later and counting. So if you fall into that category let me help you out.\n\nWhat is the message of Forrest Gump? Stripped to its purest essence, this movie is about loyalty and devotion, particularly to the ones in our lives we love and care about. These are the human values being reinforced. Loyalty. Devotion. Forrest Gump embodies loyalty and devotion. To his mama. To his good best buddy Bubba. To the love of his life, Jenny. To his leader, Lt. Dan. And in the end to Forrest Jr. One by one and all together Forrest sticks by and takes care of his family, friends, and loved ones. This is the thread running through the entire story. This is what carries Forrest to all of the remarkable places he goes along the way.\n\nThe use of a mentally challenged man as the leading man is a conceit, used to illustrate the point that loyalty and devotion are the most important things in life, trumping everything else. It drives home the point that nothing else really matters anywhere near as much. Indeed, it drives it home with blunt force. Maybe it drives it home too hard for such a simple little point. Maybe this is where the movie\'s detractors get themselves side-tracked. \n\nThere are a number of other amazing and remarkable things about this movie. The performances. The special effects. The almost poetic simplicity of the story and the way it is told. See it for all this and more, but please, don\'t over-think it.', u'0.167404', u'\n\nForrest Gump is a classic example of the sanctimonious garbage that people are willing to swallow simply because Tom Hanks is involved.  If the film had a more a satiric perspective maybe I could appreciate it.\n\nIt begins appallingly and maniputively with a stereotypically Southern Sally Field and her idiot son \'FAUST\' battling through tough times and meeting a whole lot of important people that real people like us will never ever meet. Elvis is one that is easily recalled. Through the remainder of the film we are supposed to endure one implausibility after another: Forrest meets the president, Forrest becomes a\nping pong champion, Forrest becomes a Vietnam vet and Forrest discovers a cure for cancer! (well maybe that scene doesnt happen but i wouldnt be surprised if it was cut just prior to release). While people were going ga-ga at the way Forrest floats through life like a\nfeather (a pathetic symbol that is ridiculously used in the film), i was seriously being sick.\n\nThe central performance of Hanks is one that is truly embarrassing he is stiff, lifeless and codescending.  It seems as though Hanks\' was studying children to breath life into Forrest, if this is so maybe he should put himself on their level rather than looking down at them as dribbling, pre pubescent morons. The remainder of the cast similarly sleepwalk through the one dimensional roles they are presented with,  only Gary Sinise deserves to garner any praise here.  The lines that spew forth from the characters\' mouths were initially praised as incisive observations about our lives - WHAT!!!   They are dopey, uninventive and quite frankly wrong.  "life is like a box of chocolates- you never know what youre gonna get" - yes you do they are pictured on the back of the box.\n\nI would rather have a vital organ removed than recommend this dross to anyone over the age of five!', u'-0.501342'], u'tt0468569': [u"We've been subjected to enormous amounts of hype and marketing for the Dark Knight. We've seen Joker scavenger hunts and one of the largest viral campaigns in advertising history and it culminates with the actual release of the movie.\n\nEverything that's been said is pretty much spot on. This is the first time I can remember where a summer blockbuster film far surpasses the hype.\n\nFor as much action as there is in this movie, it's the acting that makes it a great piece of work. Between all the punches, explosions and stunt-work is some great dialog work. All the actors have their moments.\n\nBale's Batman is the definitive Batman because we see everything in this character finally on film. Martial arts skills, cunning, great tactical thinking, forensic application, technological genius to advance or improve Luscious Fox's inventions/technological breakthroughs, intimidating personality, and even a little swashbuckling. \n\nAs for Heath, yes he gets credit for his performance as the Joker. But you have to also recognize Jonathan and Chris Nolan for the writing and treatment of the character. It's not just the fact that Ledger makes the Joker so menacing, but the Nolans have given the character this great manifesto that drives its actions. The Joker's stance on chaos, order, anarchy, the morality of the average modern human being make the character so interesting psychologically. The Nolans drafted a complex character and only a perfect performance could've pulled something like this off. That's how difficult of a role this was, and that's why Ledger's performance is so great.\n\nThis isn't an action movie. It's a film that explores literary themes of the hero and villain, as well as order and anarchy. Yes, listen to the dialog because it's all in there.", u'0.337759', u'Christopher Nolan\'s second bundle of joy "The Dark Knight" EXCEEDED all \r of my expectations!!! With the success of 2005\'s reboot of the Batman \r franchise, they took what was already established and expanded it, \r amped it up, and gave a deeper, darker and brooding story that is more \r gripping and the suspense is likely to catch you of guard several times \r throughout. Christian Bale delves more deeper into Batman, sworn to \r fight evil and injustice, though also quite reluctant and uncertain if \r his crusade can ever end and cleanse his inner turmoil from his \r fractured soul due to the murder of his beloved parents. But with the \r help of his trusted butler/ally Alfred (played superbly by Michael \r Cane) grounds him, gives him moral support, and keeps him in check. But \r the real star of the show is Heath Ledger as Batman\'s most deadly \r enemy, The Joker. I can HONESTLY tell you that: as good as Jack \r Nicholson was in Batman\'89 he is CHILD\'S PLAY compared to this Joker. \r He is sadistic, psychotic, and downright SCARIER and PSYCHOLOGICALLY \r disturbing than the previous incarnation of The Clown Prince of Crime \r and Ledger gives it his all to do him justice. Along with the original \r cast comes some fresh faces such as Aaron Eckhart, Maggie Gyllenhaal \r and more. I must say though I liked Katie Holmes, Gyllenhaal gives a \r much better performance and is a far cry from the "damsel-in-distress" \r stereotype (though there\'s a little of it, THANKFULLY) that\'s common in \r films. Bale and Gyllenhall have MUCH better chemistry this time around \r more so than Holmes. Even better, the fight sequences are vastly \r improved and feature more brutal and bone crushing combat than "Begins" \r in addition to new technology at Batman\'s disposal.\r \r\nAlso worth mentioning is screenwriter Jonathan Nolan, who gives the \r film an added frosting to an already delicious cake.\r \r\nSimply put, The Dark Knight is totally more bad ass than "Begins." The \r action is great, and the plot is more deeper and engrossing. I applaud \r Christopher Nolan, Christian Bale, and especially Heath Ledger (who \r sadly passed away earlier this year) and all those aboard for believing \r in Mr. Nolan\'s talents for this second installment. Although some may \r feel a bit of melancholy over Ledger\'s death, but as a final note I \r will say this sincerely from my heart: Remember Heath Ledger and honor \r him in your minds and hearts not only for his performances, but as a \r human being and father to his daughter Matilda \r Ledger. May we issue him best wishes for his family and friends and his \r daughter for years to come. Remember . . . Honor him not only for this \r role and past roles, but as an incredible individual and talented \r actor.\r \r\nRest in peace. Heath Ledger: 4/4/1979-1/22/2008.', u'0.320743', u'I had the honor of watching TDK during a screening and was completely blown away! This isn\'t just the best Batman movie ever made, this is one of the best movie ever made. Everything in this film is excellent, not one piece of annoyance.\n\nBale marvels as Bruce Wayne/Batman, Ledger has made The Joker in to an iconic movie villain. His performance belongs there at the top with Hopkins Lecter. The Joker has finally been portrait properly on film, he has earned his place between the big boys in movie villandom. This is the true Joker every Batman fan knows, loves and fears. Ledger deserves any and every movie award known to man for this brilliant display.\n\nNolan has made his "I will always be remembered" movie, this is the crownjewel in his portfolio. Perfect directing, perfect story, perfect balance between action and drama, everything is perfect. \n\nEven if you hate Batman, you will love this film. If you don\'t, then something beez wrongz with youz!', u'0.754777', u'I used to leave a theatre after seeing a highly anticipated movie, specifically a sequel, and be so revved up about what I saw that I would declare that movie to be the best of a series. After each of the prequel "Star Wars" films, I rated that one the best, as good as any of the originals...for a time, until my opinion balanced out and I had a more well-rounded take. For that reason, I steer away from that mindset, and did for "Dark Knight".\n\nThough my opinion is solidifying already after having seen a Warner Bros. screening last night, "Dark Knight" ably stands on its own with or without "Batman Begins". At a two and a half hour runtime, it\'s definitely an epic of a movie, but one that never runs out of gas. A delightful addition to this experience was a healthy amount of IMAX footage, which significantly adds to the feel of being on a personal, and gruesome, tour of Gotham City.\n\nChristian Bale plays such a well rounded Batman and Bruce Wayne, qualities that none of those who have donned the cowl before him have pulled off. I still have to remember that Bale is British since he speaks with such a spot on American accent. Bale has a particular slurring lisp that serves him quite well, charmingly for Bruce Wayne and threateningly for Batman.\n\nCountering him is the late Heath Ledger, who plays such a scary and creepy Joker that I found it impossible to NOT have chills half the time I saw him on screen. What really separates this brand of Joker from Jack Nicholson\'s portrayal is true unpredictability. It\'s obvious that, to be a good guy and think like the Joker, it really takes a toll, and it sure isn\'t easy. How exactly does one take him down when he\'s woven his harebrained plot around multiple hostages, explosives, or disappearing parlor tricks?\n\nInitially, I was uneasy about how the character of Harvey Dent would be handled. In my mind, there was really only one faithful portrayal of him, and that could be found in the "Batman" animated series of the early 90s. As well as Tommy Lee Jones COULD have handled him in "Batman Forever", he certainly did not, though it still was a highlight of that movie. Aaron Eckhart ably assumes the mantle here, delivering a performance out of this world, easily on par with the Batman animated series.\n\nBe it known, this caped avenger stands for the good of Gotham City that the police force and its counterparts can\'t represent, the good that has no jurisdiction, no procedures...and no rules, save for one. I can only hope that we\'ve seen just the prelude to the Dark Knight\'s upcoming legendary battles with the worst of Gotham City\'s dark underside.\n\n"The Dark Knight" gets a solid 10 of 10 stars.', u'0.115446', u"I must say I was excited for this movie since the instant BATMAN BEGINS appeared on screen at the end of the first film. It was always going to be good, and sadly, it was always going to be over-hyped by the advertising warhorses.\n\nIt is rare though, that a movie can surpass all the hype and pass all expectations on the film. Nolan (The Prestige, Begins) delivers on more than the Joker we remember from the 'Old Days' of Burton and Nicholson. Instead we're given a psychopathic sadist who pleasures from sheer anarchy.\n\nAll the hailing of Ledger's performance are grounded. Watching it will make you feel a different chill down your spine than you'd remember from any other film. It's impossible, quite literally to relate to The Joker. He gets inside your head with his stories of how he got his scars, makes you laugh at his sick jokes, then makes you instantly wonder why you're laughing.\n\nIf Ledger wasn't enough to horrify you - wait for Harvey Dent. Brilliantly portrayed by Aaron Eckhart as Gotham's 'fallen White Knight' and Batman's direct counterpart. His transformation will put Tommy Lee Jones' portrayal look like children's breakfast cartoons. Gyllenhaal had perfect chemistry with both Bale and Eckhart, Michael Caine and Morgan Freeman both work well as Batman's 'conscience' and of course, Gary Oldman as Lieutenant Gordon were all solid.\n\nThere are some major differences between The Dark Knight and Begins. Firstly, the music is extremely disconcerted compared with the 'majestic but unfinished' tones of Begins - but it suits the film's tone: Anarchy in every sense. There was a more solid singular villain (compared with the many in Begins) - but there was also a lot more henchmen in TDK. The martial art direction was faster and more efficient - as mentioned in the film, learning through experience.\n\nI was disappointed at the role of Scarecrow in this film, it just felt like a loose thread and wasn't quite closed up or explained, and the ending, while it wasn't what I expected (others have said that it was predictable, but for me it wasn't) was solid and suited the film well.\n\nAll in all, this is a film that is quite close, if it isn't already, a masterpiece. Nolan has a great thing going and unlike previous 'Superhero' adaptations (Spiderman and Fantastic Four for example), there isn't campiness creeping in. In face, if Batman Begins was 10/10, The Dark Knight deserves a 12. Quite simply, the best possible sequel that could've been given.\n\nIf you watch this (which I implore that you do), you certainly won't regret it. One of the best movies of 2008 (I'll wait till Quantum of Solace comes out before I pass judgement) - but certainly a film worth getting excited for. If you don't like it, then that's also fine - but keep in mind that you probably thought Meet The Spartans was a good movie, so the rest of us won't take it to heart.\n\nStunning in every aspect, and exceeds all hype and expectation... Can't wait to watch it again, or for the Blu-Ray!", u'0.307739', u"I thought Batman Begins was a very well conceived and put together \r movie. We finally get Batman as a fully rendered character. We gain new \r insight into his motivations and the variables he must contend with in \r his role as protector of Gotham. We get to see Gary Oldman as an \r honest-to-goodness good guy. And we get to see Liam Neeson conducting \r perhaps his strangest facial hair experiment yet.\r \r\nBut after seeing The Dark Knight, Batman Begins will forevermore be \r viewed (by me at least) as a handy little prologue to a FRICKIN' \r MASTERPIECE of a superhero film.\r \r\nTo say it's the deepest mainstream comic adaptation ever produced would \r be akin to calling the Nolan/Ledger Joker 'a bit eccentric'.\r \r\nWhile watching it, I found myself thinking it was very long, which is \r usually a sign that it's TOO long, and therefore boring. But that's not \r actually the case here. The script is bulging with ideas, philosophical \r musings, THEMES, which Christopher Nolan is not content to gloss over \r in favour of cool set-pieces (as many comic adaptations are), but wants \r to explore, wants to allow the characters to explore, at a logical \r pace. So, what I guess I'm saying is, considering what it sets out to \r do, the movie is long ENOUGH, while still constantly holding the \r viewer's interest.\r \r\nAnd that's not to say the thematic exploration comes at the EXPENSE of \r big action, either. On the contrary, there is some truly awesome stuff \r going on here. The chase with the truck, for example, is fantastic, and \r there's some great hand-to-hand stuff too.\r \r\nBut what engages us most is the characters, and, while the script is \r brilliant (the dialogue is sharp, and quite funny for the first \r two-thirds, before the drama really kicks in), this mainly comes down \r to the cast.\r \r\nChristian Bale. Taller than Michael Keaton was. More menacing than Val \r Kilmer was. Less like Adam West than George Clooney was. Solid and \r committed as always. He gives the character LIFE, and actually makes us \r feel for him. The word 'tortured' keeps coming to mind...and I suppose \r it's pretty appropriate.\r \r\nHeath Ledger. Y'know, I'd heard talk of an Oscar nomination, and \r thought it sounded a bit dubious. A Batman villain? Winning an Oscar? \r Is that what it's come to? Then I thought, is it because he didn't get \r one for Brokeback? Or more dubious still...is it because he...died? \r But...well...how can I put it...? \r \r\nIt seems a bit blasphemous to compare Jack Nicholson to Cesar Romero, \r but after seeing Heath at work...Jack (who once seemed so awesome) just \r looks...well...lame.\r \r\nIf you've seen it, you hopefully get what I mean. If you haven't...you \r need to. You will discover the true definition of commitment.\r \r\nMaggie Gyllenhaal. I didn't have any problem with Katie in the first \r one (at the time), but I doubt she could have pulled off the more \r emotional stuff Rachel goes through here. Seeing recasting was \r necessary (does Tom have a problem with his wife being involved with \r Batman? Too many bad memories perhaps? Why am I even talking about such \r garbage here?) they could have done a butt-load worse than Maggie. She \r rocks.\r \r\nAs does Aaron Eckhart. But I'm not giving ANYTHING away. Suffice it to \r say my mind was blown...AGAIN. Makes Tommy Lee Jones look like...you \r get the idea.\r \r\nMichael Caine. Still one of my favourite actors. Alfred is the shiz.\r \r\nMorgan Freeman. Morgan Freeman. AOK.\r \r\nGary Oldman. As in BB, no mania. No psychosis. No nervous tics. \r Absolute subtlety. Manages to hold his own alongside Christian, Heath \r and Aaron without resorting to parlour tricks. Sign of spectacular \r talent. Go Gaz.\r \r\nEric Roberts! William Fichtner! Michael Jai White! Tiny Lister!\r \r\nThe whole thing is just a big bag of thoughtful, well-executed \r entertainment. It's equal parts cerebral and visceral. Ideas and \r action.\r \r\nI've liked every Batman movie so far (okay, besides Batman & Robin), \r but this one makes them all look pretty bloody ordinary.", u'0.0969388', u'Batman has always been my favourite superhero ever since the first time I heard about him because he his human with no powers, also he is much more questionable than any other superhero. The story of the film is about Batman, Lieutenant James Gordon, and new district attorney Harvey Dent beginning to succeed in rounding up the criminals that plague Gotham City. They are unexpectedly challenged when a mysterious criminal mastermind known as the Joker appears in Gotham. Batman\'s struggle against the Joker becomes deeply personal, forcing him to "confront everything he believes" and to improve his technology (which introduces the recreation of the Batcycle, known as the Batpod and the Batsuit was redesigned) to stop the madman\'s campaign of destruction. During the course of the film, a love triangle develops between Bruce Wayne, Dent and Rachel Dawes.\n\nThere are now six Batman films and I must say that The Dark Knight is the best out of all of them. The title is good because that is what Batman actually is. It has been 3 years for the adventure to continue from Batman Begins but that entire wait was worth it. Gotham city is very Gothic looking and is very haunting and visionary. The whole movie is charged with pulse-pounding suspense, ingenious special effects and riveting performances from a first-rate cast especially from Heath Ledger who gave an Oscar nomination performance for best supporting-actor. It is a shame that he can\'t see his terrific work on-screen. The cinematography is excellent which is made so dark & sinister that really did suit the mood for the film. Usually sequels don\'t turn out to be better than the original but The Dark Knight is one of those rare sequels that surpasses the original like The Godfather 2. I also really liked the poster where the building is on fire in a Bat symbol & Batman is standing in front of it. Christopher Nolan is a brilliant director and his film Memento is one of my most favourite films. He hasn\'t made 10 movies yet and 3 of them are already on the IMDb top 250. Overall The Dark Knight is the kind of movie that will make the audience cheer in the end instead of throwing fruit & vegetables on the screen.', u'0.123281', u"(Synopsis) Bruce Wayne/Batman (Christian Bale) continues to eliminate crime in Gotham City with the help of Lt. Jim Gordon (Gary Oldman) and the new District Attorney, Harvey Dent (Aaron Eckhart). The Dark Knight wants to finally get rid of organized crime for good and be free of their corruption. Batman soon finds that a new psychopathic mastermind known as the Joker (Heath Ledger) has taken over organized crime. The Joker's plan is to terrify the citizens and throw the city into chaos, and kill Batman. Batman takes the fight with the Joker personal, which makes him confront his own beliefs. The Joker is the most dangerous criminal that Batman has encountered, and he will need all his strength and vigilance to defeat him.\n\n(My Comment) This film just blew me away. Christian Bale is a natural as Bruce Wayne/Batman, and Michael Caine fits the part of Alfred, the trusted butler. Heath Ledger's performance as the sadistic Joker was absolutely disturbing and scary yet simply amazing. I would not want to meet the Joker in a dark alley, and whatever you do, don't ask him how he got his smile, especially, when he has a knife in his hand. Ledger's performance has turned the Joker into a new iconic movie villain image. Between all the punches, mayhem, and explosions, there is some good sinister dialog. The movie not only has a lot of action, it also tells the story of the internal struggle that Bruce Wayne is having with being the Batman hero. Bruce Wayne wants to be himself and maintain the difference between himself and Batman. Bruce must decide to follow the code or do what has to be done without affecting his own morals. The movie explores the literary themes of Hero verses Villain, as well as Order verses Anarchy, and the Joker explains to Batman that to have one you must have the other, and because of that, they will always be connected. The movie is long, but it went by so fast. You will love the last 45 minutes, because of the non-stop action with Batman in his new sonic suit and his BatPod. With all the explosions, body count, and the dark mood of the movie, I don't think parents should take young children. (Warner Bros. Pictures, Run Time 2:32, Rated PG-13)(10/10)", u'0.106573', u'I got to see The Dark Knight on Wednesday night, the reason though why I\'m writing this movie comment this late is because I didn\'t wanna just jump and say this movie was awesome, I wanted to think it through, still today, I can\'t stop thinking about this movie! The Dark Knight lives up to it\'s hype and goes beyond it, this is the Batman movie that goes where no other Batman movie has gone before. It gave us a real sold story, we are finally told why the villains are the way they are, how all the injustice in the world can get underneath Batman\'s skin, how you have to believe that people still have faith in good on Earth. Heath Ledger, I absolutely loved Jack Nicolson\'s performance in the 1989 film, when I first read that Heath was signed onto The Dark Knight, I was like "What are they, kidding?", once you see The Dark Knight... Heath was incredible! I\'m not going to compare Jack and Heath\'s performance, because they were two different versions of the Joker, but Heath\'s Joker was definitely the more scary and intense of the two nominations. You didn\'t know what he was going to do next, he was so crazy, he was also so charismatic to the point where you could relate to his character, and the worst part is not only that he\'s crazy, he\'s driving Gotham crazy and treating everyone like little puppets on strings that he can control, and guess what, he is doing it so well with a smile on his face. \n\nThis was so much more than a Batman film, this was so much more than a comic book film, The Dark Knight truly delivers with drama, action, romance, horror, dark humor, the study of a psychopathic killer, a detective story. The force behind this epic movie is Christopher Nolan, who\'s previous film, Batman Begins, didn\'t really thrill me, but his incredible film making is truly shown in The Dark Knight, the shots that he got of Gotham City were absolutely fantastic and made you feel part of the city, part of the Batman story. One of the things that I absolutely loved about The Dark Knight is that normally with a comic book movie, you know it\'s not real, people don\'t dress up in costumes, and save the day, villains don\'t name themselves crazy names and dress in make up or crazy costumes, but The Dark Knight actually makes it seem incredibly real, like it could happen.\n\nBruce Wayne is still learning how to be in his double life of Batman and himself, he has lost Rachel to the new district attorney, Harvey Dent, he\'s inspiring others who are dressing up as Batman and are trying to take on the villains of the city themselves. But things are much worse when the Joker waltzes into town, and he\'s going to bring Hell upon Gotham City. Constantly playing with Gotham\'s mind and trying to get Batman to reveal himself, Batman has never dealt with such a psychopathic genius before. The Joker has named himself as the "Classy Villain that Gotham needs", he also has brought a new thought into Batman\'s head of them actually being more alike than different, that Batman completes him, the Joker would be nothing without him. But Batman is relying on Harvey Dent, who is Gotham\'s "White Knight" trying to put all of Gotham\'s scum in jail. But when the Joker plays Batman and Commissioner Gordon, Harvey and Rachel find themselves in very horrific position and Harvey must discover if he will die a hero or live long enough to become a villain.\n\nAll the performances are dead on in this movie, now everyone\'s going crazy over Heath Ledger\'s performance, but one performance I would also love to credit is Aaron Eckhart who plays Harvey Dent/Two Face, his performance was just as great as Heath\'s and made Two Face a human villain. You could understand his hatred and vengeance on what happened to him and why he became Two Face. I know that everyone is saying this but I truly mean when I say this is one of the best movies I have seen in a very long time. We had some great movies these past few years, but I think The Dark Knight is seriously something special, but I don\'t wanna build it up too much since some people go to the theater expecting my words to be the same as your own. In my opinion though this is not a great movie, I can\'t come up with a word describe how incredibly powerful this movie was, to be honest I would go above a 10 rating if I could; this is the Batman film that we have been waiting for. I\'ve seen it twice in one weekend, I\'m going to see it three times this upcoming week, I don\'t mind one bit. I can\'t wait for the sequel and I would just like to say RIP to Heath, wish he could have seen his breath taking performance as The Joker.\n\n10/10', u'0.108277', u'I think the big question...or the question everyone actually cares about is this: Is Christopher Nolan\'s follow up to the critically acclaimed 2005 film "Batman Begins," The Dark Knight, as good as everyone is saying? Quite simply, yes, yes it is. There is no doubt about it, one of the most anticipated movies of the 21st century duly deserves every amount of praise lavished onto it. This is no ordinary superhero movie, this is a character and dialogue driven piece, not as action orientated as you might expect.\n\nI will not go into plot details, because there is a lot of it. However, a basic one sentence summary is: Batman now has to face his most cunning and psychotic enemy, someone with no real motives...The Joker. Now that that is out of the way, I will start off with the actors (and boy, is there a lot to talk about). Christian Bale has done a tremendous job as our beloved Caped Crusader, with him already blowing everyone else out of water with "Batman Begins." Bruce Wayne has a flawed personality that hangs on the balance between righteousness and criminal. His perception of justice causes an emotional and personal shift, whether he is a wealthy businessman who fights crime in a gadget-riddled suit or just a normal man who is sick of all the scum in Gotham City and decides to give the law-breakers a dose of their own medicine. Because of this, and Bale\'s tremendous acting, Bruce Wayne is justified, and we emphasise with Bale\'s flawed hero more than any of the other actors. If there ever was an excellent Batman, this is it. The theme of right and wrong is played well with his character here.\n\nOf course, I am sure you all want know if Heath Ledger was that good. And I can safely say that he most definitely was. Ledger\'s Joker is not only the best, but is now the greatest superhero film villain ever. His performance is truly terrifying, chilling, brilliant; any synonyms of the previous adjectives. Every scene he is in is stolen. The Joker truly is Batman\'s worst villain; cunning and psychotic, nothing quite matches his laugh and sinister makeup. If Ledger nabs the Oscar for Best Actor, I honestly will not be surprised. It is a true tragedy to see such a talented actor fall at such a young age...\n\nAll the other actors cannot be forgotten, though. Aaron Eckhart has definitely proved himself previously ("Thankyou for Smoking") as someone to watch out for. Here, as Harvey Dent (and later Two Face) he is very powerful. All he wants is justice; to bring down every single criminal. Eckhart is the definitive Two Face. Maggie Gyllenhaal as Wayne and Dent\'s love interest, Rachel Dawes is much better than Katie Holmes. Gyllenhaal\'s performance has substance, I really cared for her and her future and she was terrific in every scene. Michael Caine can do no wrong, and as Alfred Pennyworth he provides some comical and emotional scenes. Morgan Freeman as Lucius Fox, although a limited role, does inject some sly humour and much needed morals into the story. Finally, Gary Oldman\'s Lt. James Gordon is riveting. He at least needs a Best Supporting Actor nomination for his performance as another crime-fighting hero who faces some challenging situations.\n\nWally Pfister\'s cinematography is simply stunning. Gotham has never looked so good, so big and deep. His wide shots purvey a dirty aura and contribute to the feel of the film. Without it, it may not have been the same. Another Oscar worthy portion, THE MUSIC! With Hans Zimmer AND James Newton Howard at the helm, how could it go wrong? The score sets the mood in every scene, giving an epic and thrilling tone. During the action sequences it really ups the adrenaline. And on the topic of action, The Dark Knight succeeds in having the best fight sequences and car chases in a comic book adaptation yet. With no obvious or over-use of CGI, the explosions and accidents are the real deal. Thrilling, edge of your seat and violent, this is brutally awesome stuff.\n\nNevertheless, none of this would be possible without Christopher Nolan, the man behind it all. Pairing up with the writer (and brother) Jonathon Nolan, the darkest Batman movie yet is the best, and the best so far this year. This does not feel like a comic book film, the dialogue and situations feel so realistic. And, it IS the script that drives this film. The dialogue is very, very well written and is the centre of the conflict and the movie.\n\nIt may be bold to say this, but this is the best superhero film of all time. There are others that are magnificent ("Superman" and "X-Men" are two examples) but this is the most complex, the most dark and the most spectacular and epic of them all. See it for Bale, for Ledger, for the music, the action and for Nolan\'s flawless direction.\n\n5/5 and the best film of 2008 so far!!', u'0.277459', u'I have just come out of the "Dark Curtain" Screening for The Dark Knight in Adelaide, and I\'m blown away.\n\nNolan\'s directing is sublime, the pacing of the movie was so well kept, managing to keep the audience enthralled in an almost 3 hour movie. There were several shots in the film that had me saying "Now how in the hell did they do that?!", Brilliant scores by James Newton Howard and Hans Zimmer. Every actor shines, no one person steals the film. I don\'t want to say much about it, because whatever is said cannot do it justice, there is enough hype surrounding it\'s release, but it\'s there for a reason. Top Notch film. Bravo to Nolan and his crew for giving a movie that Batman truly deserves.\n\n9/10.', u'0.45763', u'I couldn\'t believe "The Dark knight" could live up to the hype. That\'s perhaps the biggest surprise. The secret, I believe, is a stunning, mature, intelligent script. That makes it the best superhero movie ever made. As if that wasn\'t enough, Heath Ledger. He, the newest of the tragic modern icons present us with a preview of something we\'ll never see. A fearless, extraordinary actor capable to fill up with humanity even the most grotesque of villains. His performance is a master class. Fortunately, Christian Bale\'s Batman is almost a supporting character. Bale is good but there is something around his mouth that stops him from being great. "The Dark Knight" is visually stunning, powerful and moving. What else could anyone want.', u'0.428189', u'Dark, yes, complex, ambitious. Christopher Nolan and his co-writer Jonathan Nolan deserve a standing ovation. I don\'t usually go for loud movies filled with mindless gore and violence. "The Dark Knight" is certainly loud and violent but it\'s not mindless. It has depth and soul. Even the Joker, in an extraordinary creation by Heath Ledger, is deeply human. The natural petulance of Christian Bale makes his ego and alter ego the most fascinating and complex of all film superheroes. Part of the genius of this movie is that Batman himself, in screen time, is not really the lead. My attention was captivated by Heath Ledger and he determines and inspires the breathtaking atmosphere that envelopes Gotham as well as us. The aplomb of Christopher Nolan as a director is mind blowing and his secret, I believe, is his obvious respect for his audience. What he\'s done is to elevate a popular genre into Shakesperean proportions. Bravo!', u'0.410125', u'** PLOT SPOILERS EVERYWHERE ** \n\nChristopher Nolan\'s "The Dark Knight" is one of the better films in the history of its genre, however, it does not qualify as a masterpiece. In fact, it\'s quite far from such a distinction. It falls short of unquestionable excellence because of a ridiculously high number of plot holes, most of which regard The Joker and his criminal exploits.\n\nIt is a given that Heath Ledger\'s portrayal of The Joker leaves us with a character who is thoughtful, unpredictable, ruthless, unrelenting, and arguably insane. That is to say, some inconsistencies in the villain should be accepted, if not embraced. But others, to be frank, are unacceptable because of their stupidity. For example: In the film\'s opening sequence, a clever bank heist spearheaded by The Joker, the crazed clown kills off his partners as the caper progresses. At the time, it made sense. Pretty simple, the more colleagues he kills off, the more money that leaves for him. But later on in the film, The Joker burns his half of the criminal underworld\'s combined fortune. He makes it overtly clear that he is not motivated by money. Not in the least bit.\n\nSo why was the money a factor in the opening scene? It shouldn\'t have been. Uneven scripting there.\n\nBut that\'s nitpicking in comparison to the film\'s greater faults. The ultimate reason why "The Dark Knight" falls short of the masterpiece label is because there is absolutely no way, under any circumstances, at any time, on any planet or in any solar system, that The Joker could execute so many complex plans in such a short period of time.\n\nOK, here is where people start saying: "But it\'s a movie! It doesn\'t have to be possible." I know, thanks. I agree, it doesn\'t have to be possible. But, and this is a huge BUT, a film as ambitious and lengthy as "The Dark Knight" wants to be taken seriously. Not only does it want to be taken seriously, I think director Christopher Nolan wants Oscar consideration for the work he has put in here, and cast members have been saying regularly that they don\'t want this to be considered as a mere "superhero movie," or "action movie." Well if you want to elevate to the level of serious drama, then you have to explain a few things to me.\n\n(1) How does The Joker continue to find willing participants in his escapades when all of his previous crew members end up dead or in jail? The guys he\'s finding to work for him have to be true idiots. Totally brainless. And that doesn\'t work because The Joker\'s plans are meticulous and require precise timing and execution. If these goons are dumb enough to work for him, they aren\'t smart enough to be effective as help. It\'s a perpetual contradiction throughout the film, particularly the second act.\n\n(2) Sure The Joker is swift and tricky, but c\'mon, he doesn\'t exactly look like a normal citizen. If city-wide security has been heightened to a level never before seen, how the hell is this maniac with a painted face and wacky hair not being spotted? Does he have an invisible transportation machine or something? He doesn\'t have supernatural powers, so he shouldn\'t have a supernatural aura.\n\n(3) When did he have the time to wire the hospital with bombs? Even if one of his goons did it, how did no one in the hospital notice suspicious activity? What about the assassination attempt on the Mayor? The other cops on the firing line didn\'t notice the most infamous villain in the city standing right next to them? Why? Because he crouched over a little and tried not to make eye contact with them? Please. I could go on for days, too many plot liberties were taken.\n\nI\'d actually like to discuss the performances a bit. I think the separation between the strongest part and the rest of the cast is the largest ever with an ensemble of this size and magnitude. Meaning, Heath Ledger\'s performance was far and away the best in this film, better to the point where it bothered me that no one else was in his realm. The scenes where Ledger was off screen lacked the magnetism and intrigue of the ones in which he appeared. Although appeared is probably not the best word, more like dominated. \n\nChristian Bale was OK as Batman, but he\'s almost too stoic for a character with such strong morals and opinions. He\'s also a little bit stiff when he\'s in playboy mode as Bruce Wayne. I think his performance in "The Prestige" was more emotional, effective, and polished.\n\nAaron Eckhart was all right as Harvey Dent/Two-Face, but the problem was that the vast majority of the time I was seeing Eckhart on screen, not Dent. The same Eckhart we saw in "Thank You For Smoking." Also, a man with a finely tuned social philosophy, like Dent, would not totally flip his ideology after the loss of a close loved one. Hopefully the angle is that the toxin causing the disfigurement messed more with his brain than we were led on to believe.\n\nMichael Caine and Morgan Freeman were believable as always, but of course they are underused as Alfred and Lucius Fox. Gary Oldman probably contributed the second strongest performance in the film as Commissioner Gordon, and Maggie Gyllenhaal (as Rachel Dawes) was a step up from Katie Holmes as far as execution and timing -- but that\'s not saying much. \n\nI really could go on for days about the unacceptable plot liberties, but I\'ll spare you. All in all, I liked the film because it had some thought-provoking sequences involving moral dilemmas and intriguing societal questions, and in having such "The Dark Knight" succeeded in escaping the "superhero movie" label. But it\'s not a masterpiece.\n\nPlain and simply, it has too many holes.', u'-0.164601', u"I saw the dark knight about three years ago when I was in the 8th grade. And I was blown away at how beautifully done it was, the camera work, the acting, the story, it all took me by surprise. It is to this day one of the best movies I have ever seen or will see. No other movie can impact you in such an intense way than The Dark Knight. It is a movie worth seeing due to the fact that the workers put so much time and effort into this one film and they did not want to waste money putting up garbage. So Christopher Nolan, thank you for not wasting our time, instead earning our time with this film. To this day I still am anxious to see the movie at home. I recommend it to anyone who likes action movies in general. To anyone who doesn't, don't waste your time write bad reviews about this film.", u'0.177894'], u'tt0317248': [u'Cidade de Deus seems to have a lot of praise on the IMDb boards, and with good reason too. It simply is, in my opinion, one of the best contemporary films ever made.\n\nBased on true events and characters who live in the overlooked and poverty stricken slums in the shadows of Rio de Janiero, where life expectancy doesn\'t reach the 30\'s and drug dealers are kings.\n\nThe tale of the City of God, and its myriad of characters is told by Rocket, a young man who struggles to make something of his life, other than to wind up another victim of drugs or gang wars.\n\nNot only are the characters in City of God absolutely fascinating, and also very endearing, but also convincingly acted by groups of young and unknown actors. The stoies are well-told, and at times, funny, and at others, brutally shocking.\n\nThe cinematic style of the film gives a nod to Tarantino, with some clever time-jumping, freeze-framing, and texts indicating another chapter of the film. In every sense, a bit of a Brazillian "Pulp Fiction" or "Goodfellas", but with its own unique flavour to it.\n\nThe City of God is a marvel, and a highly recommended film to watch, but not recommended for the over-sensitive or easily distressed.', u'0.298771', u"The film revolves around the, 'City of God,' a favela (or ghetto) in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil, a horrifying area where drug dealers run the community, and where children killing children is not an uncommon occurrence. \n\nThe story begins with the early stages of the City of God (in the 1960's) showing where many of the problems stem from- the extreme poverty, overcrowding etc. Here, in the early stages of the favela, we meet our main characters, along with the supporting cast. The story revolves mainly around two characters living in the favela, Rocket and Lil Ze, and how they take two different paths through life. Rocket's dream is to become a photographer and to escape the City of God while Lil Ze becomes a powerful gang leader and drug dealer.\n\nThe film offers an unflinching look at gang life in the City of God, as it follows the favela through three decades; the 60's, 70's and 80's, and shows how violence just spirals into more violence with the disturbingly high amounts of violence in the favela, most involving teenagers and children. \n\nThe direction, cinematography, and editing are all Oscar-worthy. The cinematography is some of the best I have ever seen- with a very visceral, jerky feel, very reminiscent of Saving Private Ryan. The editing is very frantic, which makes you feel like you are on the streets of the City of God, and the direction is flawless, seamlessly blending the many elements of the story.\n\nThe film was definitely one of the best films I have ever seen. The story, the direction, the cinematography, the editing and the acting all add up to make a excellent movie that I would recommend to all. \n\n10/10, A+\n\nWould also recommend: Bus 174 and Carandiru", u'0.513112', u"\nI knew nothing of this film before I saw it by chance in a rare Pub open screening, but boy was I glad I got the chance to take a look. I was riveted all night - I completely ignored my friends! I thought it was an awesome re-enactment of a true story - powerful, moving, raw, real - and even funny in parts. I walked away afterwards, beaming. It's rare a great film like this is made, especially these days. I gave it ten out of ten. Please see it if you can.", u'0.471203', u'If you\'re unlucky to be born into a socially, economically and racially isolated community that has poverty, crime, drugs and violence as its everyday realities, the odds are stacked incredibly high against you. It literally takes so much effort, strength, struggle and plain ol\' good fortune to simply avoid becoming a gangster, let alone do anything more with life. Most who find themselves in the situation described above never even enter this fight and out of those that do - only the rare ones succeed.\n\n"City of God" depicts this conundrum masterfully. \n\nIn a Rio slum called Cidade de Deus we meet character after character that has the right idea, knowledge and courage to get out but somehow always ends up being pulled right back into this vicious circle. Becoming a hoodlum in Cidade de Deus isn\'t just a fringe career option for disenchanted rebels and social outcasts - it\'s the main industry.\n\nThe images of gun toting pre-teen killers are very disturbing and Meirelles uses them relentlessly to underscore just how hopeless and frighteningly predetermined life is for these kids. Many of them can\'t read or write but already know how to use a gun and kill without remorse. In a particularly harrowing scene, local drug lord Ze Pequeno or Lil\' Ze (Leandro Firmino da Hora) exacts revenge on a disobedient gang of 9 and 10 year olds by incapacitating two of them and forcing one of his own kid soldiers, as initiation of sorts, to choose which one of the two he wants to kill. Faced with death, one of the kids starts crying crocodile tears; suddenly all the bravado is gone and he is shown for what he truly is - a desperately misdirected infant.\n\n\'If only these people had more options....\' is the sentiment reinforced with every gruesome event. \n\nOf course, this lifestyle comes a little more naturally to some than to others. Ze Pequeno, for example, from an early age when he was known as Dadinho / Lil\' Dice shows a considerable lack of aversion to blood and death. In another aptly choreographed scene so that we don\'t know what exactly happened until much later, he more than \'holds his own\' alongside much older gangsters during a motel stickup. \n\nAlso on hand is a colourful palette of characters. From our narrator Buscape / Rocket (Alexandre Rodrigues) whose ticket out of the slum is his love of photography over to people like laidback Bene / Benny (Philippe Haagensen), followed by Ze\'s fierce rival Cenoura / Carrot (Matheus Nachtergaele) or good guy turned bad (although it\'s not so simple) Mane Galinha / Knockout Ned (Seu Jorge) we see a multidimensional, pulsating, alive community that seems in need of a strong, sustained outside push to finally stop chasing its own tail and get out of this destructive cycle.', u'-0.276671', u"\nThe film, directed by Fernando Meirelles, tells the story of life in the slums of Rio de Janeiro, in an area known as the Cidade De Deus, the City of God.  The story is told from the narration of the young photographer, Rocket.  The different scenarios of life that make up the wider-story are presented in Pulp Fiction style chapters, complete with on-screen titles for each different story component.  The story covers all the facets of the life, charting the growth of several key members of the gangs from childhood through to young adulthood, with their transformation from young hoodlums to local drugs barons.  The final parts of the story focus on the battle within the Cidade De Deus between two different groups, when business and personal matters lead to an unavoidable confrontation.  And what a confrontation it is, although details will not be given away here.  The result is a powerful telling of life based around real-life events.\n\nMartin Scorsese seems to have a heavy influence on the direction of this picture, with many moments looking familiar to fans of the legendary American filmmaker.  Close ups, sweeping scene shots, freeze-and-zoom shots, and a frenzied handheld approach are all trademarks that will be recognisably traceable to Scorsese, having been used throughout his career. Many shots remind the viewer of Scorsese's narrative dialogue-camera relationship in Goodfellas, in which the camera was used to brilliant effect to highlight the main points in the script.  This technique is used heavily in the first twenty minutes of Cidade De Deus, with the freeze frame trick being used to introduce the story's main characters alongside the dialogue of narrator, Rocket.\n\nThroughout the film one cannot help but watch a scene and think, 'I've seen that in Raging Bull, Goodfellas, or Casino', and this may make some look less favourably on the film's direction.  However, it is not fair to consider this 'a Brazilian Goodfellas', as one critic has observed.  The story has parallels - the underlying ideas of gangsters, drugs and violence -, the direction is similar, and the story is told with narration, much like Ray Liotta's role in Scorsese's epic.  But to regard this film in terms of what styles it repeats or nods it's hat to, is to be very ignorant. Fernando Meirelles,  has done a wonderfully hypnotic job of blending the old styles, and bringing them up to date with flashy and sometimes dangerously kinetic direction and editing.  Look only to the leaving-party scene in which strobe lighting is used to extraordinary effect, almost suffocating the story below a bombardment on the visual senses.  Think of a crossover between the visual energy of the Matrix and the violence of the club scene in Bad Boys.\n\nCidade De Deus is much more than a directorial assault on the senses.  As Raul Walsh said if you don't have a story you have nothing, and many flashy Hollywood films have fallen short in using 'ultra-modern' direction to disguise the fact that no substantial story exists underneath.  Cidade De Deus is most brilliant in that it combines directorial and editorial brilliance with a story that is almost second to none in recent times. Only the true greats manage to cater to these two needs of cinema, and this is one that does.  The direction is amazing, but not to disguise the story flaws, and the story is brilliant, but does not overwhelm directorial originality.  But simply, Cidade De Deus is a perfect film for avid fans of cinematography, and those just in search of two hours of a bloody good story.\n\nI cannot decide yet if I would consider this better than Amores Perros, but it is certainly not inferior.  The at-the-same-time stylish and brutal visuals of Amores Perros are replaced by a grittier, more hands on approach to the subject.  Whilst in Amores Perros the characters took precedent, in Cidade De Deus the location is as big a character as those who live there. As a result we get a much greater feeling of the environment in which the characters exist, and so it is perhaps easier to empathise, and/or sympathise with them.  As the official press synopsis says, Cidade De Deus is a character, but is a place not a person.  Amores Perros triumphs in creating relationships between the audience and the characters, as it concentrates for a long time on relatively few people, each of whom we grow to know and ultimately care about, which is important for the emotional impact of the film.  Cidade De Deus deals with dozens, even hundreds, of characters, and so it is only a minority that we become attached to.  This means that while the film leaves a lasting impact we are not left with the same inquisitiveness about the future for the characters that we meet in Amores Perros.  Both films leave open ends, but Cidade De Deus feels closed. Whether you consider this a good or bad thing is a matter for personal choice.\n\nCidade De Deus is essential viewing, and is cinema at its most brilliant. It will of course feel the wrath of critics who will dwell on the almost unimaginably high body count, but there are always those who will reject violence in the movies.  In fact the violence in Cidade De Deus, even the apocalyptic ending, is not as raw and bloody as many will expect.  Blood spilling is a rare sight, and the violence rests mostly, but not always, on choreography rather than in your face bloodshed.  The result is violence, but it is often so artistic that it looks beautiful rather than deterring. Like Scorsese's Taxi Driver the violence is abhorrent, but admirable from a\ncinematic perspective.\n\nIn short, this is a superb achievement, and is easily one of the best films of the year, and of the decade so far.  Like it's predecessors, this is the latest film to come out of South America that indicates the emergence of major new talent in filmmaking.  Hollywood beware.\n\n", u'0.134035', u'I have seen this movie only recently (2005) and it\'s easily one of the better foreign films I have seen. Actually, it\'s probably just about one of the best films I had ever seen.\n\nThe characters really make this movie come alive with each of their compelling personalities shining though in the backdrop of oppressive conditions and constant violence. One thing which clearly comes to mind is "Lil\' Dice\'s" ear to ear smile - so vivid and yet so ironic since he personifies pure evil.\n\nThe City of God is a world you don\'t want to visit, it won\'t be featured on a post card, and it\'s said to be the city ignored by god himself. This movie makes you feel uncomfortable, puts you on the edge of your seat -- you are right into the middle of the City and you too are caught up in it\'s violent temptation. More importantly, it\'s about the triumph of the human spirit against all odds.\n\nThis movie in effect is fast paced and hard to follow (with the added stress of subtitles over Portuguese), but it\'s worth it; and in fact really adds to the impetuous and impulsive undertones of the movie. In addition, the quintessential Brazilian music blending into the film like a well made Caprahina makes it feel authentic like the Italian music in the God Father.\n\nYou see the flaws of these men played out in an almost fatalistic nature -- hated, greed, futility; and in it all we see ourselves, our own flaws, and our own condition.', u'0.663125', u'I am a big fan of foreign film, because its great to see directors with different points of view than the average American director. City of God is the epitome of a great foreign film. It shows the classic struggle between right and wrong, in a brand new way. The raw directing style, coupled with a great soundtrack makes for a movie which many different kinds of people can enjoy. Weather your a Harvard intellectual or the local idiot, you can enjoy this. The vicious cycle of the gangster lifestyle is portrayed with haunting accuracy. It even forces the audience to sympathize with some of the nastiest thugs in the world. All in all, City of God is one the greatest movies of my time and each time i watch it i enjoy it more than the last.', u'0.335791', u"I have made an effort to watch all the movies in IMDb's top 100 rated list. As of now, I'm looking for a place where the DVD for Sunset Blvd. is (currently at #30). But this movie is one of the movies I've seen that's on the list. And I find it an amazing film (currently #5 on my top 10 list). What I enjoy about this film is the visual look of the film, but also the way the director puts you in the story. At the end of the film you have become friends with just about everyone in the film, even though some of the characters are very despicable people. The violence hits you in the chest like a load of bricks sometimes, especially when you recognize that many of the kids involved in the violence are right around 10 or 11, but you also realize that this reflects the culture of the slum these kids live in.\n\nGangster films always seem to make for good dramas (e.g. the Godfather, Goodfellas), where the culture of evil almost always triumphs as the dominant character. This film is no different, but it shows the life of children in places where bribery and corruption reigns supreme. It also shows the bravery of many of these people when even the government won't stick up for them.\n\nIf you're thinking of starting to watch some foreign language films, this is a good place to start. It is a classic IMO among films made in languages besides English. I did find that the subtitles in this film were done rather poorly (they displayed on my DVD player at the wrong times and it took a few plays to figure out who was saying what.) But I think the film itself is a truly great film.", u'0.571606', u"Do not be fooled by the coy charm of the promotional poster. The image of the girl shyly leaning over to kiss the cheek of a bare-backed boy on golden sands drenched in sunlight represents an ideal that many residents of the City of God strive for, but few achieve. \n\nThe rewards are all too tangible: The football, the music, the heady culture of samba and carnival joie de vivre is never far away, but escaping from the slums of Rio is a little more complicated than sloping off to the beach for the afternoon. The City of God is a raging maelstrom of violence, drugs and gang warfare, and its inhabitants are indoctrinated in the way of the gun from an early age.\n\nFernando Meirelles' film (based on a true story) is a breathtakingly convincing interpretation of life in the notorious Rio favela. Using hundreds of real-life slum children to supplement a superb central cast and shooting entirely around the dusty streets and abject poverty of the neighbourhood, Meirelles charts the history of the area through the narration of Rocket, a peaceable soul with journalistic aspirations who is entirely at odds with the mayhem around him.\n\nRocket explains how the slum was used as a dumping ground for all Rio's undesirables in the 1960s. Despite a population of criminals and ne'er-do-wells, the early part of the film is an homage to plucky underdog cheeriness and community spirit. Rocket's brother is a member of the 'Tender Trio', a dashing group of bandits who go about brandishing pistols and holding up gas trucks like latter day highwaymen. \n\nDespite an elegant notoriety, the Trio's crimes tend to yield less than impressive fiscal reward, so they plan a heist on a motel-cum-knocking shop in an attempt to up the ante. It goes badly wrong. The gang's lily-livered tendencies mean they make a sharp exit at the first sniff of trouble but, unbeknownst to them, their lookout, unhappy with his passive role in proceedings (as bored nine-year-old little brothers are wont to be), strolls into the motel and fires at will, chortling psychotically as each hooker and john crumples to the floor.\n\nThe kid in question is L'il Dice, a chubby Arnold-out-of-Diff'rent-Strokes lookalike with an insatiable lust for mayhem. The motel incident marks a shift in emphasis for the City of God and the following years see the slum descend into chaos as L'il Dice (later renamed L'il Ze) builds a narcotics empire by ruthlessly eliminating the competition. \n\nThe streets become a recruiting ground for drug dealers and gang lieutenants. Small children (or 'runts' as they are affectionately known) come to see guns and criminal activity as the only viable rungs up the status ladder. 'I smoke, I snort, I've killed and robbed - I'm a man,' one prepubescent boy states defiantly.\n\nThe film culminates in all-out war between L'il Ze's bunch of hoodlums and an idealistic group of insubordinates who throng behind the handsome Knockout Ned after he stands up to Ze's cruel regime. Meirelles is careful not to lionise Ned. Turning him into a hero figure would, I suppose, have romanticised a bitter and essentially futile conflict. Rocket, caught in the middle of the hostility highlights the ultimate irony: 'By the end, after years of fighting, nobody could remember how it all started,' he says. The war becomes the way of life in the favela. Being affiliated to one of the gangs gives the street kids credibility and, more importantly, access to weapons. Before long, guns are being handed out like lollipops, and the runts are running about excitedly firing their new 'toys' indiscriminately. It is the ultimate in power without responsibility.\n\nIn their breathless exaltations, many reviewers have dubbed City of God 'Brazil's answer to Goodfellas'. It is a comparison that may be sound in terms of structure \x96 Meirelles has certainly mastered Scorsese's canny editing and daring method of chronicling events over long periods of time \x96 but overall this is a different beast. It is more of a Lord of the Flies with AK-47s. The most alarming aspect of all is the shocking lack of parental presence.\n\nThis is essential in conveying the choices these street children have (or rather don't have). L'il Ze and his barbaric ilk become all these poor, impressionable little tykes have to aspire to. In short: they don't stand a chance \x96 a fact sharply illustrated in one particularly distressing and almost unwatchable initiation scene where a young gang recruit is required to murder a cornered infant in order to appease his older colleagues.\n\nBut Meireilles does not let this base, visceral tone swamp his movie. In Rocket he has an inspirational protagonist \x96 the perfect foil to the madness and despair. His coming of age scenes where he bashfully attempts to flirt with girls and lose his virginity; and the sequence where he and his mate resort to petty crime only to bottle out when their intended victims turn out to be 'way too cool' to rob are the glue that holds the drama together. Without the light relief this would be intense and depressing fare.\n\nAs it is, City of God is a triumph of story-telling: Magnificent, gut-wrenching and utterly compelling, it is cinema of the very highest order.\n\nDo not miss it.\n\n10/10", u'-0.309197', u'\'What are you doing, you\'re just a kid?\' "I steal, I kill, I carry a gun, how can I be just a kid? I am a man."\n\nMany who visit Brazil the first time, tend to view Brazilians as lacking serious ambition. They seem to party the night away, and appear to seldom work. The old joke about Brazilians is that they have breakfast at 2:00 in the afternoon.\n\nBut such a narrow view does not take into account the fact that while we in America work to live, sweating away for pennies which the government steals at every turn, they in Brazil Live to Live. It is a different kind of living, a life that sambas with the vibrance of the swaying palm and the bounding drum. A life that understands that we are only on this earth for a cup of cafezinho, and we should have fun while we can before the end comes, but quick.\n\nBut as the City of God also shows us, Brazilian life is often nasty, brutish and short. A certain degree of anarchy overshadows all the denizens of the film. But Director Fernando Meirelles takes a situation lacking definite boundaries and clear authority, and creates a framework, a structure, that of Gang Rule. The gang-members are not seasoned, old-time criminals like Fredo Corleone or even Tony Montana. Instead, they are a bunch of sweet-faced kids. No one is older than 25, partly because of choice, but mainly because no one lives past this age.\n\nOn the surface, in this context, City of God is a coming of age story of two young people, a sort of Brazilian "Angels With Dirty Faces.\' One character escapes from the City of God, while the other succumbs to it.\n\nBut when one scratches beneath, one finds the film a comment on the morally bankrupt City of God in Rio De Janeiro, and a mirror on Brazil itself. Far away from the party hopping, Travel and Leisure postcard perfect white beaches, is another world, one of marauding bands of displaced children.\n\nThe most surprising thing about City of God is its references to American films. Most Brazilian films, as the films of all countries do, owe allegiance to their own particular cultural situation. Brazil owes a cultural debt to Europe (Portugal, Germany, Italy) and Africa. However, the United States has a far more distant cultural relationship to Brazil. That is where City of God triumphs to me an American film goer. It uses the chapter format made famous in Pulp Fiction and more recently, Kill Bill. It uses the familial structure present in Goodfellas. It uses the \'white-suit cool\' present in Miami Vice and the Bacardi and cola ads from the preview before this very movie.\n\nThe fact that City of God can be subtitled Grand Theft Auto: Sao Paolo, is not a surprise nor a mistake. The film is built like a video game in its use of random acts of violence. But the fluid perfect camera work and editing give way to a film with enormous contradictions. Contradictions as large and as vast as the noble country itself.\n\nStylistically, the camera work does not conform to its premise as a gangster film. A gangster film never looked this good. It is as if the camera is released in the wide open beaches, and kicked around like one of Ronaldinho\'s headers. It starts on the sand and moves steadily across. It picks up on the story but then heads into the sun. It then leaves us, the film-viewer, with the most indelible image in years as we see Sonia Braga (A world icon and sex symbol of Brazil)\'s niece, sitting on the sun-drenched coast putting her arm around another young boy. The innocence conveyed in this scene is something to behold. It literally takes your breath away.\n\nYou see the slamming of different, competing themes. You see the subtlety and tranquility of the beach, smashed into scenes of battered youths dying on city streets. You see a wealth of hypnotic ambiguous images pulled together, much like the very Culture of Brazil itself.', u'-0.024328', u'Wow, this is one of those different movies - meaning not run-of-mill by any means - and one of those which isn\'t pleasant to watch but one you might find yourself mesmerized by it.\n\nThis also is one of those "based on a true story" films which makes it even more shocking, if its mostly true. The story is of the many young (pre and early-teen) criminals inhabiting an area just outside the big city of Rio de Janeiro in Brazil. It has the feel of a documentary with real-life street kids but is upgraded considerably by fantastic camera-work, some very innovative cinematography. In other words: stylish.\n\nMake no mistake: without that stylish look, the film might be too much of a downer. The street kids are interesting but really brutal, so be prepared. I mean, how often do you see 12-year-old killers portrayed on film? The violence, language and drug use are rough in here and what a sad comment on this social problem in Brazil, a country with a huge problem with these street gangs. Overall, a very tough but fascinating film.', u'0.0922993', u"The first moment of the film shows us a swaggering gangster preparing food somewhere in the Favella of Rio de Janeiro. A knife scrapes across a whetstone, a chicken is plucked, fabulously atmospheric music plays in the background and a second chicken makes a break for his life! A chase ensues, the poor chicken being pursued by a whole gang of hoods, armed to the teeth, and the frenzy stops with our hero (Rocket) being caught between heavily armed Policemen, the chicken and the hoods. Violence seems inevitable, and things look bad for Rocket...\n\nFrom this point of suspense we re-wind to the sixties. We are introduced to the City Of God itself...the omnipresent character in the movie. The carefully laid out buildings are reminiscent of a battery farm, and we soon find that criminality is evidently 'designed in'. The local youths (including Rocket's brother) are involved in petty crime, and the crime is of little interest or consequence to anyone. In fact we are quickly shown that crime is the only real option to get out of the Favella. Football is the other, but the ball is shot by one of the criminals, highlighting how difficult that route is.\n\nAgainst this background, Li'l Dice organises an armed raid on a brothel (he must be about 7 or 8). In a fit of pique caused by his being left outside the Motel, he goes into the building after the criminals have left, and shoots everyone dead. He is on his way (via shooting Rocket's brother) to becoming Li'l Ze, the boss of the gangs of the Favella. At the same time Rocket realises that he cannot be a gangster (he's scared of being shot) and talks of becoming a photographer.\n\nBut Rocket cannot escape. He tries to work, but earns nothing, and loses his job. He tries crime, but is no good at it. The City drags him back all the time. He does better than others however. Benny (Li'l Ze's partner) is shot at the point when he is preparing to leave, Knockout Ned is dragged into the violence of a turf war, and so on. The slaughter continues with no intervention from the corrupt police, continually destroying the lives of the residents of the City, continually drawing more and more residents into the battle.\n\nEventually Rocket's life in the Favella itself becomes the key to the exit door. He can take pictures where no other photographer would ever dare to go, and it is this that takes us back to the police, the chicken and the gang! The ensuing, climactic battle sees revenge being taken, the gang leaders arrested, the police corruption, and Li'l Ze being killed. Li'l Ze is killed by the young kids, much as he has killed Rocket's brother, and the cycle of drugs, territory and violence starts again, imprisoning the next generation.\n\nThe film is brilliantly shot, linking subject matter and events into an excellent whole, and is complimented by fantastic sound effects creating a really credible (and Brazilian) view of the slums in which the action is set. The shocking reality of the children running the criminal gangs is well handled (Rocket and Li'l Ze's virginity lies in stark contrast to the experiences no adult would expect to ever see) and underscores what is both a touching, and terribly shocking film.", u'-0.331611', u'\n"After the first death, there is no other" - Dylan Thomas\n\nIn Brazil there are 120 million people. 50% of them are under 21. 28 million of them live below the lowest standards set by the International Children\'s Rights Agency of the United Nations. Last year 7,000 boys from 12- to 22-years old died in shootings. This is the background for the disturbing Brazilian film, City of God, directed by Fernando Meirelles and K\xe1tia Lund. City of God is a "favela" (government housing project) on the outskirts of Rio de Janeiro where the Brazilian government dumped undesirables and homeless in the 1960s. The film is based on real events described in a novel by Paulo Lins, who lived in the project for thirty years and spent ten years researching the events. It is an unsparing portrait of a sociopathic generation, where manhood is determined by who can kill the most. When a child is ridiculed for being too young to join one of the gangs, he replies, "I smoke, I snort. I\'ve killed and robbed. I\'m a man."\n\n\nThe film traces the favela\'s history over the span of three decades, showing how its children first became petty thieves, then drug dealers, and finally cold-blooded murderers. To make the film, 2,000 children who lived in the City of God were auditioned and 200 were chosen to go to acting workshops where they improvised the scenes. It is narrated by Rocket (Alexandre Rodrigues), who survived the gang warfare and has since become a photographer for a local newspaper. The picture opens with the sharpening of knives and an adrenalized chase scene involving gangsters, guns, a runaway chicken and Rocket coming face to face with the feared gang leader L\'il Z\xe9 (Leandro Firmino da Hora). It then flashes back to the more sedate 1960s, where three friends, Goose, Shaggy, and Clipper, known as the "Tender Trio," engage in small time robberies and use their guns only to threaten. The remainder of the film is divided into chapters, each depicting different characters and time periods, each extending the violence until it reaches manic proportions.\n\nOne of the most disturbing scenes involves the holdup of a brothel and the murder of its patrons. A nine-year old named Li\'l Dice (Douglas Silva) is told to wait outside while the Tender Trio robs the customers. He is told to shoot a window if the police come; instead, however, he goes on a killing spree with a big smile on his face, massacring the patrons in the middle of their lovemaking. The second chapter contains the most gut-wrenching scene of all, when L\'il Z\xe9, pursues a gang of "runts" who are disobeying his rules, cornering two of the small boys in an alley. He gives a gun to a member of his gang known as Steak-and-Fries (Darlan Cunha), telling him to prove his manhood by killing one of the smaller boys. The two boys start crying, allowing us to witness the real fear beneath the bravado. Yet the madness and violence keeps building from there.\n\nCity of God is essentially a horror story that hits you with a punch to the solar plexus. It is very powerful, but also desensitizing in its high-tech stylization and dizzying special effects. It becomes so fixated at simulating a cocaine high by jumping from one character to another with breakneck speed that, unlike the 1981 Brazilian film Pixoteby Hector Babenco, it often fails to allow full comprehension of the human aspect involved. Yet the film deserves praise for its honesty in tackling an issue most of us would rather avoid. In the process, it has uncovered the natural raw energy of children, with no place to use it except in self-destruction. It leaves me to wonder how this energy could be harnessed against a system that encourages and perpetuates this cycle of violence.\n\n', u'-0.349115', u'The story begins in the present days, in a barbecue party in the slum of \'Cidade de Deus\', with some bandits chasing a chicken. Then, a teenager called Buscap\xe9 (Alexandre Rodrigues) tells the story of the Cidade de Deus and the main characters of the movie (Z\xe9 Pequeno, Ben\xe9, Cenoura etc.), since they were kids. \n\nThis movie takes place in Cidade de Deus, a set of buildings originally built in the 60\'s for poor persons originated from a big flooding in Rio and from some slums. In the 60\'s, this area was isolated, without any infrastructure. Nowadays, with the construction boom, it is located close to Barra da Tijuca and Jacarepagu\xe1, very valuables zones. Rio de Janeiro City is surrounded by slums, where the situation presented in the film is the reality of thousands and thousands of honest poor persons. \n\nThis movie is remarkable: the screenplay, the direction, the performance of the cast, everything works perfectly. The frantic camera looks like a documentary. Today the DVD was released in Brazil, I bought it and I have just watched it with my family. \n\nI really can imagine the reaction of foreigners watching this sad side of Rio de Janeiro. It is strange, because a person who does not live in Rio probably may think that this movie exaggerates in some aspects. However, this is our reality. Lost bullets, robberies, violence is part of our day-by-day life. By the other hand, the same person may think that life in Rio \'stinks\', and again it is not true. My city, like a golden coin, has two sides: heads and tails. If you can afford, you have wonderful places to live. But unfortunately, a great part of the population lives in slums, like the ones showed in this movie. The lack of perspective in life of the children, unemployment, ridiculous salaries, lack of education, lack of the faith, all of these factors contributes for the formation of the next generation of drug dealers and bandits. The traffic offers positions to the kids, like showed in this movie. And in the end, even when the \'grown-ups\' are arrested or murdered, there is a bunch of children to occupy the spot. A sad social problem, but true. My vote is ten.\n\nTitle (Brazil): "Cidade de Deus" ("City of God")', u'-0.330783', u'This film has been executed with considerable skill - 10/10 for visual and storytelling style. It is brilliant, expert and flawless in its execution.\n\nMuch of the style is stolen from Scorcese movies, as unashamedly as the characters in the film steal money. I don\'t mind that, as there\'s plenty of original invention - I particularly liked a scene in the a room where the time fades from one part of the story to the next, with the room\'s decor changing, but the camera angle was fixed. Although, I\'m sure someone will tell me that wasn\'t original either. The use of freeze-frame with subtitle is tired now, as it\'s been done by so many Scorcese wanna-bes in the last 15 years.\n\nSo this was all very impressive - except I didn\'t care about any of the characters. I don\'t know how accurately this is based on the "true story", but if the real characters can dispatch each other as carelessly as their fictional versions, and think of nothing but screwing, stealing or killing, I think they must be rather boring company.\n\nMuch of the action focuses on a man called Li\'l Ze who, we are shown, kills people and enjoys it, from a very early age. Why he enjoys it is a question not entertained here, and so he comes across as a rather bland killing machine; at one point, shooting a comrade on the spot for talking to him in an annoying way. I wasn\'t sure if this was supposed to be a comedy moment - it certainly came across as one.\n\nThe one character who isn\'t obsessed with killing and stealing is the narrator, Busca-P\xe9, who\'s ambition is to become a photographer. But he\'s not really involved in the story, except to be in the right place at the right time to be able to recount it for our benefit. We never see Busca-P\xe9 have much of an effect on events, or express much of an opinion, or even express much emotionally during the constant slaughter. He seems more concerned about losing his virginity than anything else.\n\nThe way women are portrayed in this film is questionable. They are either objects of sex, having sex, talking about sex, being raped, or being beaten by their men. At no point do we hear what the women of the City of God express their thoughts or feelings on this hellish world in which they exist.\n\nIn fact, nearly all, if not all, of the characters in this movie appear entirely soulless. Are we supposed to sympathise with Li\'l Ze\'s best friend because he doesn\'t kill people as wantonly as the rest? Am I supposed to feel empathy for this man because he occasionally persuades Li\'l Ze to spare someone\'s life (meanwhile, coming across as a fairly easy-going chap - something of an achievement, considering the countless killings he\'s been involved in)?\n\nNo matter how skillfully this film was made, how well acted, how perfectly constructed, as the body-counted mounted, like the characters in the movie, I didn\'t really care.', u'-0.298044'], u'tt0027977': [u"Part satire, part slapstick comedy, part melodrama; the great pioneer of film, Charles Chaplin, has created his own monument with this film. At the same time, 'Modern Times' was Chaplin's last goodbye to the era of silent film - which, remarkably, had already ended almost a decade earlier.\n\nAfter nearly 80 years, this screen marvel still makes me laugh, cry - and think about the ongoing automatization of practically every trivial little thing in our lives. Modern times, indeed. \n\nTo me, this film is as entertaining and funny today as I imagine it was then, and it's certainly as relevant as it was then. \n\nThe tramp still rules. My vote: 9 out of 10.\n\nFavorite films: http://www.IMDb.com/list/mkjOKvqlSBs/\n\nLesser-known Masterpieces: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls070242495/\n\nFavorite Low-Budget and B-Movies: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls054808375/\n\nFavorite TV-Shows reviewed: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls075552387/", u'0.287127', u'\nCharlie Chaplin\'s Modern Times (1936) is the final film to feature the great actor/director/writer\'s most easily recognizable incarnation: The Tramp. Here is a character that is so ingrained in the collective conscious of modern film audiences that many recognize him despite the fact that they have not seen a single Chaplin film. Indeed, several iconographic studies have labeled The Tramp (with his worn hat, distinctive mustache, dusty suit, cane, and trademark waddle) as the single most identifiable fictional image in history.\n\nStill, the film that perhaps most influenced the creation and thematic realization of Modern Times was not even a silent one. The Jazz Singer, which debuted in 1927, five years before Modern Times began production, is perhaps the most important watershed film in the industry\'s century-old history. In the film, comic great Al Jolson stands up in front of the audience and...sings. And as Millard Mitchell said in Singin\' in the Rain, the public was suddenly in a frenzy for "Talking pictures! Talking pictures!" Sadly, with the advent of synchronized sound and dialogue, the world of silent filmmaking began to slip into obscurity with audiences and studios now viewing it as obsolete and undesirable. Nevertheless, Chaplin continued his passion for the subtle craft by creating City Lights (1931), which many critics and academics consider one of the greatest films ever made, but by the time Modern Times was released, Chaplin was one of the last directors left clinging to a dying art.\n\nModern Times is not an entirely silent film, (there are dialogue snippets and sound effects), but if you look closely, every character with dialogue (excluding Chaplin himself) is being mocked. Even when The Tramp opens his mouth (the only time he ever did so in a film), the words are nonsensical, defying the burgeoning convention that dialogue is mandatory for substance, entertainment, and quality.\n\nDespite the film\'s status as one of the greatest comedies of all-time, it is hard to ignore the political component. In his movies, Chaplin often exhibited a great mistrust for authority and progress, as often embodied through the social elite, the police, and wealthy entrepreneurs. The irony of the film\'s title, then, is two-fold. It connects with Chaplin\'s own bitter feelings regarding his moribund art form, but also refers to the plight of the working classes during the Great Depression (long working hours with little job security and meager salary, while the upper classes remain wealthy and bide their idle time) The world was changing fast, and Chaplin foresaw that many of these changes were far from beneficial.\n\nAs we watch The Tramp struggle through the modern, mechanized world, we laugh at his antics and the absurdity of their results, but we can also feel pain and pity. He is clearly a man who does not belong. Indeed, The Tramp can almost be thought of as a misfit who has passed through a membrane from some alternate reality and unwittingly fallen into our familiar world (notice that he does not have a name or identification of any kind, and as far as we know, he has no friends, family, funds, or history).\n\nHe takes on assembly lines, feeding machines, department stores, policemen and various other mass-oriented aspects of the industrialized world (all which demand and exhibit sameness and conformity), but The Tramp (and his symbolic extension, the individual) never seem to fit.\n\nThis is, consequently, why Modern Times is also one of the most poignant love stories ever put on film. The only character who is on the same level as The Tramp is a young, homeless woman who is referred to as "The Gamin" and is played by Chaplin\'s then-wife, Paulette Goddard. These two are brought together by the fact they have almost nothing except the will to live and continue forward, despite adversity. Both are nameless, neither has a home, and they each have no money or material possessions.\n\nIt is here that Chaplin makes his most poignant and saddening statement about modern living. The Tramp and The Gamin are the only characters who exhibit individuality and idealism, yet they are also the ones lowest on the social and economic food chain. The conclusion of the film, which most likely reflects upon Chaplin\'s own emotions, is tinged with sadness, but also a lingering hopefulness that resonates as loudly and clearly today as it did more than sixty years ago.\n\nThen there is, of course, the comedy, which is the stuff of legendary status. Some of the most memorable comic images in film history are found in Modern Times. These include The Tramp\'s bout with an assembly line (and his resulting twitches), his unfortunate encounter with "nose-powder", the moment when he quite literally becomes a cog in the wheels of industry, and his epic struggle to bring roast duck to an angry customer.\n\nIn my opinion, however, the two standout moments are the scene in a department store involving a blindfold and some rollerskates (the most exquisite moment of comedy in the film) and the sequence where The Tramp is submitted to the mad whim of an out-of-control feeding machine (the most uproarious moment in the film).\n\nThese are just a handful of moments that make Modern Times the enduring masterpiece that it is. On a personal level, the aspect of the film that resonates strongest with me is its appeal to the idealistic misfit in all of us. In our hearts, many of us long for the simplicity and exuberance with which The Tramp and The Gamin live life (with attention to the bare essentials and an absence of need for materialism and modern trappings).\n\nAs Chaplin so skillfully shows, however, our modern times make this lifestyle a faded dream, lost among the sheep-like herds of men and women scurrying through a modern metropolis that only Fritz Lang could make seem darker and more devoid of true humanity. Still, the final image of Modern Times refuses to let the film end on an exclusively tragic note and demonstrates that the individual is still alive and may yet find his way in an ever-changing world.', u'0.268128', u'\n"Modern Times" is in my top 5 films, and #2 in my list of favorite comedies. Charles Chaplin is arguably the most talented human being, nevermind film maker, that ever lived. I first saw this treasure about 8 years ago, and I watched it again recently to make sure that it really WAS funny, and that I had not given it too much praise because it was simply a Chaplin film. "Modern Times" passed my test with flying colors. I laughed hysterically from start to finish. Each and every scene is innovative, well thought out, and executed with the genius that only Chaplin possessed. Among my favorite scenes are the "automatic worker-feeding machine"; the jail scene in the cafeteria when The Tramp accidentally sprinkles cocaine on his food, thinking it is salt; and the roller skating scene in the department store. No special effects or computer animation, just pure, simple, genius.\n\nThe storyline in "Modern Times" is purposefully naive, a trick Chaplin used time and again to bring a profound humanitarian quality to his films. Watching this film is comparable to watching a Warner Bros. cartoon, which coming from me is a sincere compliment. The level of physical comedy in "Modern Times" is on par with the masterful short films of Chuck Jones, Friz Freleng, and others.\n\nFinally, as was the case with most of his later films, "Modern Times" is a serious social commentary. Its message is as relevant today as it was more than sixty years ago when it was released. In fact, it is arguably even more relevant today, and unless the world changes drastically in the future it will continue to be. "Modern Times" is essentially the story of a simple but extremely kind man caught in the traps of industrialized society. The opening scene, which compares a crowd of workers boarding the subway to a flock of sheep, is Chaplin\'s warning against standardization, mechanization, and other facets of life which rob men and women of their individuality. Chaplin always tried to speak for the downtrodden, because despite his enormous success and wealth, he never forgot where he came from. In the end, "Modern Times" is a reminder that no matter how bad things are, you can still smile. Charles Chaplin has made more people smile than almost any other, and his legacy of love and laughter lives on in his films. Its up to us to keep his legacy alive.', u'0.623182', u"\nIt is a testament to Chaplin's filmmaking skills that he is able to impose such significant meaning on what really boils down to little more than a series of comedy skits strung together on an apparently flimsy clothesline of a plot. Indeed, the cinematic value of Modern Times is unquestionable, but it is ironically noteworthy that such a simple and even blocky plot is made into such a memorable film experience and delivers such a strong, time-transcending message about poverty stricken populations.\n\n\nIt is no secret that Charlie Chaplin was more or less dragged into the sound era against his will. In the early part of the 20th century, he had built a tremendous career as a silent film actor, and had created a character, the Tramp, that was purely a silent film character who could not be transported into the sound era. Charlie had built his career and his popularity with the Tramp, and the coming of sound to the cinema meant the end of that character (as illustrated by Robert Downey Jr.'s Charlie Chaplin in the 1992 film Chaplin, `The Tram CAN'T talk. The minute he talks, he's dead.'). Chaplin delivers to the world a cynical satire about modern technology as well as his own ode to the silent film with Modern Times.\n\nCharlie plays the part of a man who works a dehumanizing position in a factory in which he is little more than a component of a machine, and he is controlled like a pawn by the menacing boss, who we see mostly as a looming face on a tremendous television screen. Clearly, the most memorable scenes in the film involve something to do with the factory, such as Charlie's brief trip into the innards of the machine, as well as his warm-hearted efforts to feed lunch to a man who has inadvertently become lodged in a machine, with only his head free. However, there is a very noteworthy but fairly subtle subplot that quietly reveals Chaplin's fondness for the silent film.\n\nThe first and most obvious thing is that for the most part, this is a silent film. There are intertitles, there is precious little dialogue, and the film's main character doesn't utter a sound until near the end of the film. But there are also a lot of other things that more subtly hint that silent films are better than sound films. For one thing, the only intelligible words spoken in the film are done so through some sort of barrier. There is the factory boss speaking demandingly through the television screen, and the feeding machine company speaking through the radio as they try to sell the feeding machine to the factory boss. This becomes the most obvious by the fact that anyone speaking on screen - such as the factory boss as he tells the men that the feeding machine is not practical - only does so in intertitles. We know that dialogue can be put in the film, but Chaplin chooses only to do this in a detached and mechanized way.\n\nThere is also a very strong example of Chaplin's endless sympathy for poor people at several points in this film. The most significant example of this is his interactions with the Gamin, played by Paulette Goddard, as well as his nearly constant contempt toward the police. After the scene where he gorges himself at a small diner (note that the window said `Cafeteria: Tables For Ladies'), he casually calls an officer into the diner and tells him to pay the tab, unable to pay it himself. As he is handcuffed to the officer, he gets a cigar from a nearby vendor and hands some large candy bars to a couple of small children nearby, who look to be the type of children who are never sure where their next meal is going to come from.\n\n\nCharlie plays a hard working, lower class man in Modern Times, and no matter how badly he just wants to get some good work and earn a living so that he can buy a house for himself and Paulette, things constantly seem to go wrong for him. It seems that this bad luck is used to suggest that poor people are not poor as a result of their own shortcomings, but because they just can't seem to work their way up to a better life, no matter how hard they try. This social commentary is intertwined with such skillful intricacy with the story about Chaplin's love of silent film that there is really no switching back and forth between the two. Modern Times strikes me as especially memorable because it is a very simple story that is punctuated by a series of comedy skits, yet it also delivers several different messages that are important to society as well as to the filmmaker himself. In this way, the movie almost seems to deliver these strong messages without the audience even being aware that they are being presented with these issues. It is a great way to mix entertainment with important societal topics, and Charlie's decision to finally have the Tramp utter vocalized speech is done so in an endlessly watch-able song and dance scene, adding to the immeasurable number of film skits for which Charlie Chaplin will be remembered and loved.", u'0.0252797', u'\nThis movie is a must see for anyone who loves comedies.  Charlie Chaplin is at his all-time best as the Tramp, and he has wonderful chemistry with Paulette Goddard\'s Gamin.  Together, they provide an hour and a half of non-stop laughs.  My favorite parts are when he is fed by a "modern" machine that goes awry, and then when Charlie goes crazy in the factory.  The situations and expressions are hilarious!  Please see this movie soon...you definitely will not regret it.', u'0.815957', u'\nHilarious, touching, anarchic, revolutionary, realist, surreal, of its time, timeless - Modern Times is a multifaceted work of genius. When it\'s over and you recall the number of sight gags and magic sequences Chaplin has packed into 85 minutes, it is incredible - the conveyer belt and nut turning; Chaplin caught in the cogwheels; the feeding machine; the Red Flag march; the "nose powder"; the roller skating ballet; the waiter with tray caught up in the dance (my favourite); the gibberish song - and many more. Then there is his mixing of silent and sound techniques, making the best of both worlds, not falling between stools as some directors might have done.\n\nOf course, there is also a political and social dimension; many of the scenes refer to the impact of technical advances, of bureaucracy, and of the then current depression, on the ordinary "little man". And it is the little man, the individual caught up in society\'s complex machinery, whom Chaplin championed. He may have sympathised with left-wing political parties and unions in so far as they supported ordinary working people, but Chaplin\'s essential beliefs are enshrined in the final "words" and shot, with him telling Paulette Godard, that she should keep smiling, they will get along, as they walk, a couple of individuals, into an uncertain future. Beyond politics, the individual has to rely on his or her own resources and spirit to survive. \n\n', u'0.408536', u'It is difficult to review Chaplin\'s movies objectively because many of us have seen them, or at least have heard about them, since we were young. They have become part of our emotional and/or cultural background.\n\nChaplin is arguably the only complete director: in most of his pictures, he also produces, acts, writes the script, composes the music, does his own stunts and edits. His talent and reputation generated numerous commercial successes, even when he continued directing silent movies after their time. "Talkies" were the only films produced after 1927, the few silent attempts afterwards were failures; yet Chaplin was an exception: "City Lights" in 1931 and "Modern Times" in 1936 were sensations worldwide (the latter includes a few sounds but they are marginal). This is remarkable since nine years is an eternity in cinema timeframe. Only in 1940 did Chaplin direct a talkie.\n\n*** WARNING: CONTAINS SPOILERS ***\n\nIs the movie a comedy? Partly: tragi-comedy is Chaplin\'s trademark. In my opinion, there are three levels of humour.\n\n1. Pure amusement, sometimes as in slapstick: the tramp eats all he can to be sent to jail and even buys more when he is with the policeman; he is drugged in jail; the tramp and the gamin imagine their life in an idyllic house; the tramp roller-skates close to an edge in the department store (fabulous stunt); he makes a lousy waiter but a great actor at the end. Again, I am not certain how much of the fun is derived from childhood memories and/or the fact we feel younger as we watch the film. To enjoy it fully, we must lay aside some of our adult critical sense, notably towards old-fashioned cinema.\n\n2. No humour, just drama: the gamin\'s father dies; her sisters are taken away; the tramp crashes his way through the crowd to get a job (an efficient illustration of ruthless competition). \n\n3. Amusement with a dramatic twist: these are the most frequent scenes, and probably the best. We grin even as we laugh. The movie opens on sheep moving grouped (of which a black one: an allusion to the tramp?), that fade out to workers coming out of the subway. This must have been a shock for the audience during the Great Depression. Another example is one of Chaplin\'s most famous scenes ever: the tramp tries the eating machine. It is at the same time hilarious (Chaplin really gives all of himself here) and pathetic: a metaphor on ill-conceived progress, oppression of man by machine and conditions of workers obliged to comply with strange requests.\n\nOther scenes include: the entire first part in the factory, including when the tramp is stuck in the machine (inside shot, that became iconic), which also happens to a colleague later on (outside shot); the tramp launches by mistake an unfinished ship into the sea, with footage of an actual ship that was probably sunk because of the Depression; the tramp and the gamin make most of their shabby hut.\n\nThe movie efficiently alternates these three levels of humour, as well as its rhythm. It famously starts as a whirlwind with dynamic tempo and music. And it ends like a roller-coaster: funny musical (the tramp sings), emotional (he is hired), dramatic (the police arrest the gamin), thriller (they run away as climatic music plays), melancholic (they are on the road, free but uncertain). The last image is rightfully double-edged: the tramp and the gamin walk away, but mountains ahead block their road. She looks like an elegant lady, he looks a bit like a clown with his funny walk and big shoes. We don\'t know where they are going, nor do they.\n\nHence Chaplin\'s ambition was far more than to just divert. Themes depicted eighty years ago are still modern:\n\n- Crisis, redundancies, strikes, inequalities, social unrest\n\n- Working conditions in factories, even though exaggerated by humour and symbols: productivity, control, burn-out\n\n- Technology that dehumanises: chain-working, the eating machine, video surveillance (a science-fiction element at the time). Remarkably, the only sounds of the film are coming from devices, not humans: screen, phonograph, radio\n\n- Success with talent, work and some luck\n\n- The law. The topic is prominent (the police are omnipresent) and ambiguous. Can one steal food to survive? Chaplin seems to excuse this behaviour. The tramp is on both sides of the law: he steals food but helps the police arrest villains in jail. And the police\'s role is complex; notably, they shoot an unarmed man, followed by the ironic card: "The law takes charge of the orphans"\n\n- Violence and drugs in prison\n\nThe universal dimension of the movie shows by the fact the main characters have no name: the tramp, the gamin. Chaplin will be blamed for its social topics during the McCarthy era, among other grievances, and he will be forced to exile. Considering it now, this seems ridiculous since the message of the film is not communist: the tramp and the gamin want everything but change society; they search for a job, a home and respect. Note also Lincoln\'s portrait in the tramp\'s cell: he is a patriot.\n\nThe movie does not take sides. Workers can be friendly or violent. Policemen can be friendly (e.g. in jail) or violent (one purposelessly pushes the tramp outside the factory). Prison inmates can be honest (the tramp) or villains. Women can be attractive (the gamin) or not (all others, actually). This double-sidedness also divides individuals. Big Bill was bullying the tramp in the factory, but later sympathises with him. The gamin steals and then becomes settled. The tramp will do anything to protect the ones he loves (the gamin, children), but can abuse almost anybody else to achieve it: a recurrent feature in Chaplin\'s pictures.\n\nThe underlying message seems to be: people are not good or bad, it mainly depends on their conditions. Yet another modern theme.', u'0.0238265', u'Favorite Chaplin film. Packed with social commentary that is still relevant today. Chaplin does a superb job of representing the average worker of the time and the mental impact that the daily motions of what we consider normal in society. Such as the opening of the movie in which a scene of a morning rush of people going to work fades into a herd of sheep. Chaplin hilarious slapstick comedy is also present in this film while still keeping serious undertones. The best example of this is the eating machine. This particular scene was a perfect representation of the problems in our society (a machine meant to further regiment the day of a worker only to break in the process) while also causing a laugh out loud reaction. My favorite part of this film is definitely the ending in which Chaplin sings a song and dances. What makes this scene so great is not only the fact that it was the first time Chaplin/The Tramp ever spoke but that it was also a stance against "talkies". Although Chaplin sings the lyrics are complete gibberish but the audience understands regardless. All in all I believe Modern Times is Chaplin\'s greatest film, this was the first Chaplin film I had ever seen and since then have watched all of them and found a great respect for Chaplin and silent movies overall.', u'0.572675', u"The Tramp (Charlie Chaplin) is just a cog in the modern machinery. He is unable to keep with the production line tightening bolts. The owner picks him out for testing the automatic feeding machine. By late afternoon, he gets lost in the machinery. He can't stop tightening causing great damage and they send him to a mental hospital. He gets out but he doesn't have a job anymore. A red flag falls off the back of a truck. He picks it and a massive march starts behind him without he knowing it. The police grabs him thinking that he's the leader. In prison, he helps thwart an escape attempt and is released. A Gamin (Paulette Goddard) is stealing food for the children. Her unemployed father is shot dead leaving her little sisters sent off to the orphanage. She steals a loaf of bread and runs into the Tramp. He tries to take the blame but she's caught anyways. He prefers life inside and deliberately gets caught stealing. They get thrown into the same wagon and escape getting thrown out together.\n\nThis has the iconic factory scene with the Tramp in the machinery happening early on. The story is slightly random as the pair has one misadventure after another as they struggle to have the American dream. The Tramp is making a statement of sorts as he gets swept up from one thing to the next. He's the cog that never really fits in the machinery. This is a sound movie with sound being used for specific and interesting ways. The Tramp is actually singing but it's a lot of non-sense. This definitely has a social commentary but it's still funny message movie.", u'-0.244809', u'\nLong after most people thought the silent movie had been buried forever, Chaplin brought his "Little Fellow" out of mothballs for one more magnificent motion picture. The Tramp is trapped in a factory, performing mind-numbing repetitive tasks, and finally he goes hilariously berserk. I started laughing the instant I saw the lady in the dress with the buttons. Like "City Lights," this film is a collection of charming vignettes, this time revolving around The Tramp\'s desire to settle down with gamin Paulette Goddard. From the Tramp\'s encounter with an assembly-line "feeding machine" to his unsuccessful stints as night watchman and waiter, this movie is packed full of delights. Chaplin never speaks, but he does sing a little. This work of genius can make you smile though your heart is breaking. ', u'0.132735', u'\nChaplin\'s "Modern Times" has influenced the 20th century as much as any other film could have. His portrayal of man vs. machine, individual vs. group, love vs. industry...is the framework of classic modern American "anti-progressive" thinking. Gilliam\'s "Brazil" is the late century equivalent. But Chaplin hit it right first, insuring generations would have the chance to relate to the challenges of their own modern times.', u'0.811122', u'In the 1930s, technology was increasing faster than people could\'ve imagined 30 years ago, and factories were simply becoming normal at this point. The world was moving faster than ever before, and I\'m sure the workers at the factories couldn\'t help but feel like they were being used as just another cog in the machine. "Productivity" became more important than the workers well being and big company bosses - as well as the machines themselves - seemed to be controlling the workers. The machines seemed to be taking jobs from the actual human beings and this feeling is perfectly conveyed in Charlie Chaplin\'s great "Modern Times".\n\nI don\'t need to go into an in depth analysis to point out the parts of the film that convey these points but the most impressive aspect of this film is how genuinely funny it manages to be while making this point. From the lunch machine and the Tramp\'s mental breakdown to the entire jail scene, this is by far the funniest Chaplin movie I\'ve seen yet, and one of the funniest silent films I\'ve seen.\n\nSpeaking of the lunch machine, the film\'s main point is perhaps portrayed with more clarity and hilarity in this scene than any other scene in the film, and that point is this: Humans aren\'t machines, and machines aren\'t perfect, and neither of those should be treated as such.\n\nAs well as that bit of commentary it has a sweet story involving a young homeless girl and the Tramp and an optimistic ending in which they literally walk off into the sunset. It may sound trite, but in this story there\'s no telling if they\'ll be OK, the important thing is that they believe they will and they shouldn\'t stop trying, and that seems to be the most important thing to Charlie Chaplin, who seems to convey this message in one way or another in every film he makes.', u'0.715969', u"Splendid.. The second's of Chaplin's best. A Modern Times, where it's beauty will be remembered in our next generation. No matter any new movies appear later, Modern Times have It's self-perpetuating charisma to stand still as a beautifully-written classic. All the universality exist in this black and white moving picture. You can watch it anytime, anywhere, and with anybody without any age range.\n\nFrom incredible lead performance, where it's script was unspoken. With a mind-blowing writing about politic, hard-work, and sacrifice, no other comedies could stand any chance to compete to Modern Times. They will be discretely forgotten rather than Modern Times which always haunt the audience's mind for a longgg time.. With a remarkable cinematic ending, no one dare to disgust. Worshiping Chaplin as a beyond is very very easy.. Because all of His creation is just... All Masterpieces..", u'0.474353', u"Just like City Lights, Modern Times utilises Charlie Chaplin's comedic skill. Being a silent film, all of the humour comes from physical comedy and slapstick which is where Chaplin shines. The technical skill that went into getting certain shots and sequences was just incredible, especially the sequence where Chaplin is sucked into the factory machine and has to navigate his way around all of the different cogs.\n\nThis notwithstanding the film isn't perfect. Like City Lights, Modern Times didn't hold my interest throughout. I did get a little bored at times.\n\nRead my full review here:http://goo.gl/DfLxUR", u'0.0230633', u'The opening credits show that Charlie Chaplin was more than just a funny little actor. He wrote and directed this film. He composed the musical score. He even holds the copyright.\n\nBrilliant satirical look at industrialized society.\n\nCurrently, this film ranks #6 on Rotten Tomatoes\' "Top 100 Movies of All Time". I\'ve watched every film from #1 to #6. The Wizard of Oz, especially the colorized version, deserves its #1 position. However, I don\'t understand why "Modern Times" isn\'t #2. Although I dutifully finished "The Third Man", "Citizen Kane", "All About Eve", and "The Cabinet of Dr. Caligari", the experiences pained me, and I looked forward to "The End". Not with "Modern Times"--what a pleasure to behold!\n\nInteresting notes\n\n* Charlie Chaplin gets high on cocaine during the film\n\n* The film includes both audio dialog and intertitles\n\n* The ending is inconclusive at best, maybe even pessimistic', u'0.159069'], u'tt0082971': [u'It is a hot sunny day in South America. We see a bunch of men, shot mostly from the back. They are walking deep into the forest. We see a tall dark figure. He is wearing an old leather jacket, he has the 5 o\'clock shadow looking like it\'s closer to midnight, he wears a fedora and he carries a bull-whip ( yes a bull-whip ). Finally, two of the men enter a cave and we hear about some guy named Forstall, who was good, very, very good, but he never came out of the place alive. But they enter anyway. They are confronted with tarantulas, spears that are triggered by blocking out the light, a pit that they must swing over and then more tiny poisonous darts that come out of the wall. All this to protect an ancient gold statue. They recover it. One guy dies and the other barely makes it out of the room before it all falls on him. Then he has to get out of the cave and a giant boulder chases him. Finally he makes it out of the cave only to be surrounded by Hovitos and his arch enemy named Belloq. He takes the gold statue that this guy worked so hard for and then the guy runs and makes it to the plane where he is in the passenger seat and there is big snake in the plane. He hates snakes. This mans name? Indiana Jones!\n\nWhhhoooooo!! I\'m left breathless just describing that opening. But is there a better beginning of a movie ever? Absolutely not. Does the beginning have anything to do with the rest of the film. No. It is all decoration for what the movie is going to put you through in the 90 minutes to come.\n\nIndiana Jones is the best character to ever hit the screens. And he better be. He is created by George, Steven and played by Harrison Ford. That may seem normal now that we have lived with him for 20 years, but can you imagine what that must have been like back in 1981. That would be like Tom Hanks or Will Smith joining forces with James Cameron and Steven Spielberg for a completely original idea in today\'s terms.\n\nRaiders took a simple idea and maybe an idea that the guys had from watching Saturday afternoon movies and made it larger than life. This film never stops for you to take your breath. It is filled with rich characters from Indy himself to Marion to Belloq and even to Marcus Brody. Each has their own personality that shines through in certain scenes. Some of my faves were when we first meet Marion having a shot contest in her bar in Nepal. Then there is her scene with Belloq and they get drunk together and she tries to leave using only a butter knife. And of course who can forget Indy\'s battle with the swordsman and his unrivaled determination to get the ark. " Indy, there is not time. If you still want the truck it is being loaded on a truck for Cairo. " ( a battered and bloody Indy ) " Truck? What truck?" ( and then later ) "Get some transport back to England, boat, plane, anything. Meet me at Omar\'s. I\'m going after that truck. "\n\nSola ) " How? " ( Indy ) I don\'t know I\'m making this up as I go."\n\nRaiders has more energy than three action films. And that is what makes it the classic that it is. If you like movies, then Raiders is a movie that will not let you down. It is pure entertainment and that is indisputable. It finds the youngster in all of us and bombards us with this silly, whip-cracking, average, incredibly determined archaeologist and only asks us to have fun. And that we do. And to me, the only reason that Chariots of Fire won best picture that year is because it is a serious film. Raiders was heads and shoulders above Chariots and it should have cleaned up at the Oscars in 81. But more politics with the academy.\n\nRaiders of the Lost Ark is the epitome of entertainment. What more can be said about it. If you haven\'t seen this movie in a while or if you haven\'t seen it at all ( gasp ) then do yourself a favour and rent it tonight. It is awesome.\n\nTRUST ME', u'0.0950111', u'\nIf you\'ve seen this movie and heard the score, then my one line summary won\'t read like a mating call for sheep, but rather the absolutely exhilarating "Raider\'s March" which stirs my blood and makes me think of an unforgettable hero, Indiana Jones. If not, see it now.\n\nI love going to movies. I always have. I remember when this film came out. My friends had seen it before I had. They boasted it was great, the best film ever. Some even said it was better than Star Wars (utter blasphemy to a devout 10 year old Jedi-wannabe). I thought no way is this film better than Star Wars, but I was still curious and began the begging of my father to take me.\n\nWhen I was young, almost all of the films that I had seen, I saw with my Dad. He would take me and my mother would stay at home with my siblings. We saw a number of films that failed to generate a reaction with him as they did with me, but this one was different. This one, my Dad might\'ve enjoyed just as much.\n\nWho can forget the scene where Indy faces bandits in the marketplace, fighting swords with his wits and fists, only to be finally challenged by a dark robed adversary brandishing a heavy, dismembering type of sabre as he swings the impressive blade about his head menacingly?\n\nIndiana looks his opponent up and down briefly and draws his pistol casually and shoots the villain dead as if his patience had been tested a moment longer than he could tolerate.\n\nMy father, and the entire audience for that matter, laughed and cheered at this incredible scene. And it was the first time I\'d actually been aware of his enjoyment of the film. Usually I\'m so transfixed that I wouldn\'t notice if my legs were on fire. He enjoyed it so much, that he still tends to bring up that scene, even today.\n\nMy father and I shared a great moment in movie history, and I will never forget it for as long as I live. I will always be grateful for the time we spent together and the films that I otherwise would have been unable to see without him taking me.\n\nJust a side note about the scene I\'ve described above. It wasn\'t meant to go that  way at all. As Steven Spielberg explained in a television interview, the scene was meant to have an elaborate fight sequence, but Harrison Ford was suffering from diarrhea and couldn\'t go through with the elaborate set-up required. Someone said, "the only way we can finish this scene today is if he shoots him". Steven said, "Wait a minute, we might have something there."\n\nAs for where it ranks with Star Wars, it\'s hard for me to say, so I won\'t. Star Wars was the first film I ever saw, and there\'s a story in that as well. Thanks again, Dad.\n\n', u'0.0403358', u"Nowadays we keep forgetting how beautiful blockbusters can be. Too much CGI makes everything possible and therefore very often also arbitrary. In Raiders you actually seem to feel the physical pain some of the actors/stuntmen had to go through to provide 2 hours of pure entertainment.\n\nOf course the story isn't waterproof, the Nazi weren't that present in Egypt in 1936 and how did Indy survive that ride on the submarine again? But lots of good and variable action scenes are accompanied by a story that develops fast and excitingly and is always close to being implausible but luckily never is. \n\nSpielberg, Lucas and most of all Harrison Ford created a hero that is nowadays iconic. With their attempt to make an homage to adventure comics of the 1930's they created their own legend. \n\nIt's funny, exiting, thrilling and romantic. What more can you ask for?", u'0.273678', u"I remember seeing this movie when I was young, and it may well have been in the cinema with my Father, I can't quite remember (if he does, then please post the answer), anyway I do remember seeing it and being thoroughly entertained and that feeling of excitement and total fun staying with me to this very day as that is the feeling that the movie conjures up whenever I think of it.\n\nI think a part of that is down to the fact it's a complete retake on the old serial movies combined with obvious comic book style, and that is just perfect for kids and appeals to them no end, or rather it did then! So it was with excitement that I opened my presents on my birthday and found the boxset for the Indiana Jones Trilogy, and with even more excitement when I finally watched the first in the trilogy, Raiders of the lost Ark.\n\nIt was just as I remembered, fun, excitement, wise cracks, a tiny splattering of romance but with a manliness that kids would allow, and lots of stunts and action. It's a superb movie and captures that style of serials, adventure stories and comic books perfectly, how I know that for sure is only through repeats since I wasn't alive during those times.\n\nThe set pieces are fantastic, and although some of the wilder end sequences are slightly dated now, it hasn't lost the excitement factor. It's a perfectly crafted movie as well, moving from location to location without any distraction or superfluous scenes, it just feels like it's all there for a reason and that it belongs there.\n\nHarrison Ford is excellent in the role, and I'm inclined to think he was more Indy than he was Solo, but that's a personal opinion. He has many more facial movements and voice inclinations in this early movie than he does nowadays, now he belongs to the moody, quiet school of acting, then he was dynamic, adventurous, strong and as wisecracking as the best of them.\n\nThere are some excellent movie making moments in this with George Lucas and Steven Spielberg showing talent galore just oozing out of every pore (where did all that go for Star Wars I to III Mr Lucas?), and they end up making an excellently entertaining movie.\n\nSome could argue that there could be a bit more depth or seriousness to the story, but come on, it's a ripping adventure yarn, you don't need depth. Saving the Ark from the Nazi's, surely that's enough! An excellent movie and great fun too, without a doubt one of my favourite of all time.", u'0.655002', u"I've seen Raiders of the Lost Ark numerous times on TV, DVD and big screen. My local theatre had a special showing last night and the 400-seat screen completely sold out (as Indy films always do). Luckily for me and my pal, we got the last 2 tickets available! I can't think of many films that still sell-out 25 years after their original release. There's just something about Indy movies(iconic hero, affection, epic spectacle) that brings you back again and again.\n\nThe only trouble with that is there are zillions of reviews, critiques and dissections of this movie already out there, so what I have to offer will probably not be anything new. I will however not go the way of the clich\xe9 and mention 1930's serials, Tom Selleck or the sword/gun fight.\n\nI will, however, ask you one question. Did you know that some of the more iconic, memorable sequences from Raiders owe quite a lot to Duck Tales? What? Surely it's the other way around? Well, no. The globe-trotting adventures of Scrooge McDuck, Huey, Duey, Luey and Donald in Carl Bank's Disney comic-books from the 50s came first. If you can find some of these then you'll surely notice the similarities.\n\nThe hunt for the Ark of the Covenant is more than just an excuse for action. So many movies these days seem to come up with action first and string them together with some lame plot. Movies like this are quickly forgotten and one of the reasons Raiders holds up so well is because it works the Covenant story so well into the plot.\n\nThe action comes in a succession of set-pieces. I do enjoy films that have to increasingly better themselves in every scene. Raiders introduced this as a standard that the sequels had to live up to. My fave scene has to be the massive truck chase through Egypt, which is made up of many of its own smaller sequences. One little idiosyncrasy I like about Indy is that even though he's a College Professor and Doctor, he has no beef killing people. So very far from the ubiquitous PC heroes of todays movies.\n\nYou might think that it's rather geeky to hype up the editing and sound design, but they do stand out from recent action movies. The gunfire and punching seem to have a sort of 'Indy' signature sound to them, that I've not heard in any other films. And obviously, John William's classic score is one of those themes that just everybody in the world knows (though I prefer his score to Temple of Doom), truly one of the best movie themes ever. Better than Star Wars! \n\nI'm not sure if Spielberg planned on Raiders starting the Indy franchise but there's already enough in here to establish a whole universe of potential stories and character arcs. There's talk of a fourth movie at the moment, but I personally don't think it will happen and I don't want it to. It's perfect existing as a trilogy and a sequel that comes traipsing in 18 years after the last is just not going to feel right. Even if you are hungry for more Indy then there are loads of books and video games out there and then there's the Young Indiana Jones TV show (where are the DVDs?), which are official Indy canon and even starred Ford once (they bounced around in time).\n\nI am giving Raiders 9/10 because I just have a soft spot for Temple of Doom (which is obviously a 10/10 movie). Even 25 years after it first came out it still has the power to captivate the audience and provoke sheer excitement every time. And in 25 years it will still be far superior to almost everything.\n\nNow there's something you cannot say about The Fast and the Furious! Sigh, where did all the special movies go?", u'0.0804363', u'\nThere are few movies I can watch over and over again, but this is one of them.  This movie has it all: action, romance, comedy, and suspense.  Harrison Ford is at his best as Dr. Jones, one of the most exciting archeologist ever.  From the start to the end you are hooked to this movie.  I love the opening when he as to dodge traps as he tries to get this treasure, I love it when he is running through the streets trying to save the girl, I just love every bit of it.  Spielburg said he wanted a b-type movie like he remembered from his youth, but this far surpasses any b movie and any a movie as far as I am concerned.  ', u'0.776315', u"There are only so many films in history that I can watch again and again, gaining new appreciation for, one of them is this film. I went from the movies to VHS, and finally to DVD. The availability and quality of this film keep raising the bar of what I can get from it.\n\nI read someone posted that this is the king of B movies or something of that sort, while I honestly think in some scenes like when Indy is running from the Hovitos and he rises over the hill, the film had a really strange documentary feeling, like if a comic actually came to life and like in the Twilight Zone, you were stuck in it. It is great to see this film, now that I edit and produce small independent films, and have worked in post production in Los Angeles. I honestly think almost every scene in this film is better than what's coming out today in sci-fi/adventure. I might pull back that comment in regards to some nice visuals in Riddick, and maybe the new Star Wars: Revenge of the Sith, but I'm not certain.\n\nThe amount of time and effort put into the comedy, adventure, and depth of each character dazzles me because I really can't tell it was filmed the same year Fame was. It really has a unique look to it. The key lighting in the piece is amazing, almost everything looks like it was perfectly worked out.\n\nMy only complaint is the attempt to visualize the opening of the Ark, as most of the other scenes don't deal with the supernatural except maybe a burning crate with a nazi symbol on it. George should redo that last scene in my opinion, and tighten it up, because I really think it wasn't coming together, however when I was a child it was so amazing and scary realistic. It's all perspective, but my point it that now in this modern filming era, the acting and film production is holding tight to this day.\n\nI forward you to just enjoy this film and look for things like formulas on chalkboards, skeletons in classrooms, proper patches on Nazi gear, gun accuracy. Research the film's era and background, and it only gets better. That's the ability that Spielberg and Lucas have, attention to detail and clever twists on most of their bodies of work.\n\nWatch this film again, it's worth it, I promise you.", u'0.471301', u'Ford stars as Indiana Jones, an archaeologist adventurer, who spends his time traveling all over the world through jungles, deserts, oceans, and caverns in search for hidden treasures\x97like the priceless long-lost Ark of the Covenant (the Hebrew sacred artifact that held the supposed Ten Commandments). Unfortunately, a group of treasure-hungry Nazis wants it too, having heard that any army who wins it would receive supernatural powers\x85 \n\nWith his trademark hat, whip, leather jacket, and pistol for backup, our stubborn, intelligent, determined and loyal hero escapes innumerable dangers, evades multiple obstacles including fearsome thugs in a busy Cairo bazaar, and hangs underneath a fast-moving truck in an exciting chase through a road\x85 These are only some of the film\'s incredible set pieces\x85 Steven Spielberg likable hero is not invincible, though, facing impossible odds, capable of getting beaten, struck violently, heart broken, and falling asleep after the first kiss\x85 \n\nThe villains\x97especially Indy\'s suave and cultured French rival wearing a Panama hat and white suits, Rene Belloq (Paul Freeman)\x97are not really that much different from him, except in their motivation\x85 The shrill heroine, Marion (Karen Allen)\x97is not the girl always in discomfort either, but a resourceful, dynamic and formidable woman who doesn\'t require the hero at all\x85 \n\n"Raiders of the Lost Arc" is a perfect package of unforgettable scenes, countless action, humor, astonishing technical effects, thrilling sequences, and terrific performances\x85 It was followed by three fun sequels\x85', u'0.987151', u"The Indiana Jones series was the best series ever made, in my opinion. It was extremely fun and enjoyable to watch and it can be watched repeatedly, with no lesser joy. Harrison Ford as Indy is extremely charismatic, like Han Solo, but the character of Indiana for me has an essence that creates a more likable character (modesty, I think) and by doing that, it creates a better trilogy for me, indeed surpassing the Original Star Wars Tilogy (don't get me wrong I love Star Wars as well).\n\nRaiders is such a great film, containing some great action scenes (the Truck scene) and creating Indiana Jones, which is the best adventure hero ever made, partly I think due to Harrison Ford (I don't think these movies would have been as good with Tom Selleck).", u'0.613998', u'Rating: **** out of ****\n\nThere is no doubt in my mind that Indiana Jones is the best movie series in the history of cinema. And the one start it all was Raiders of the Lost Ark, a fast-paced adventure packed with one death-defying cliff-hanger situation after another. To this day, Raiders remains one of the best action movies, holding up better than most of today\'s rapid-cut, MTV-style "thrill rides." Raiders relied on no CGI, no flashy editing, just pure, exhilarating film-making and storytelling, a combo of its kind that has only been surpassed by its second sequel, Indiana Jones and the Last Crusade.\n\nHarrison Ford stars as Jones, an archaeologist who dresses in a brown coat and fedora, armed with a revolver and lion-taming whip. A delightful opening involving elaborate booby traps informs us he\'s used to these adventures (especially his even closer brushes with death in Temple of Doom, which was a prequel). When he returns to the states from his latest "excavation," he\'s informed by the military that the Nazis are after the ark of the covenant, an artifact that could possess the power to make the Nazis an invincible army. So Jones sets out to retrieve the ark first, in what will prove to be one of his greatest adventures.\n\nThere\'s probably little doubt that Raiders is the fan/critical favorite of the trilogy, but there are a few things that I actually have to gripe about, blasphemous as it may be. For one, even though the story is excellent, it\'s not without its holes. Most perplexing is in the film\'s opening scenes, when we wonder why Jones bothered to bring along potentially traitorous porters when it\'s such a short distance from the river to the cave temple. Also (spoilers), one needs only to see the film once to realize that if Indy had never tried to intercept the Ark, the Nazis would a) have never found it or b) still would have suffered the same horrible fate regardless.\n\nThe action sequences are superb, though an early bar shootout isn\'t quite as adrenaline-pumping as it could be and looks quite bland compared to the film\'s other action scenes. Thankfully, the following street chase is playful and exciting and keeps the joyous momentum flowing. Overall, I\'d still argue that both Temple of Doom and The Last Crusade boast more inventive action but there\'s no questioning that the action scenes in Raiders are fantastic and likely superior to any film you may have seen the last few years.\n\nAs bitchy as I may sound, I\'m not trying to harp on Raiders, at least not too much. The movie does feature the famous (and deservedly so) truck chase, one of the most unbelievably thrilling and exhilarating action setpieces I\'ve ever seen (and given an extra boost by John Williams\' beautifully rousing score). To this day, even with the recent chase scenes in The Matrix Reloaded and Terminator 3, this sequence has yet to be surpassed.\n\nOther standout sequences include a sarcophagus almost entirely decorated with snakes, imposing statues, and well-preserved mummies, and Jones\' mano-a-mano battle with a seemingly impervious Nazi mechanic. The finale takes the film dangerously close to the horror genre, climaxing things with a truly memorable (and quite frightening) light show for the ages. Every Indiana Jones film has a scene that scarred me as a kid and I think every one who\'s seen Raiders knows what I\'m referring to (as well as its sequels)\n\nI\'ve said it before, Harrison Ford is wonderful as Jones, embodying a hero that\'s cool beyond words, yet still entirely human and believable. The supporting cast isn\'t as up to par: Paul Freeman makes for a decent but not particularly menacing villain as Belloq and Karen Allen is somewhat annoying as Indy\'s love interest, but there are an equal share in gems, particularly Denholm Elliot as Marcus Brody and John Rhys-Davies as Sallah (The Last Crusade wisely gave these actors/characters more screen time).\n\nRaiders of the Lost Ark was revolutionary cinema, paving way for summer blockbusters that would attempt for the same winning mix of thrills and humor. Only its sequels matched and/or surpassed it, but some have actually come close (The Mummy). If you haven\'t seen Raiders yet, put it on the top of your list.', u'0.32844', u'Most people give this movie a 10 out of 10 because they don\'t consider the movie but rather how happy they were to discover it as a child but now, in 2005, it has become obviously outdated, the script is quite bad and the acting is even worse. Harrisson Ford obviously should have worked his acting better, which he happily did since that movie. I am sorry I cannot just keep on lying about this movie: this is for your kids but in now way should it be put among masterpieces. IMDb is a web site about movies, not about cult and self-proclaimed nerds or geeks. You have to determine how good is a movie according to artistical criteria, neither to your gregarious instinct nor to your "attitude".', u'-0.37817', u"There are so many ways in which this film is perfect, most notably is the brilliant re-packaging of old-school action and war films; away from the James-Bond style of the late 60s; away from the Cold-War suspense and intrigue. One of the most endearing features of the picture is that the movie opens with the main character,Indiana Jones' at the close of his current adventure. The technique generates an immediate sense of personal history and intimacy with the main character, and in effect, serves the audience dessert twice.The atmosphere of equal parts impending danger and chronic screw ups is set right from the start, with a lit-fuse pace throughout the movie. Every scene is tight. The sound, the lighting, the dialog,the music, the performances. Every character actor is well-chosen. So many ingredients to enjoy: adventure, humor, mysterious locations, romance, explosions. Only a Nazi could not enjoy this film!", u'0.367243', u"I remember seeing this movie when I was a kid. We had gotten the VHS set and I had no idea what the movies were. When watching it, I had to get used to the fact that this character wasn't Han Solo, because that's all I knew about Harrison Ford's acting career. The film had so many twists and turns, great music, storytelling, characters, stunts, special effects, dialogue, and cinematography. You never knew what was going to happen next, and sometimes Indiana Jones seemed invincible and able to outsmart anyone. Those kind of characters are always great for action movies like this. I didn't really like Temple of Doom, and The Last Crusade was okay. The fourth movie is the worst one and also a bad film on it's own. This movie is my favorite Indiana Jones movie and one of my favorite movies in general.", u'-0.139679', u"I'll admit from the start of this review that I am bias. Raiders Of The Lost Ark is in my top 10 movies of all time. The opening is in my Top 5 movie openings of all time (only Jaws, Saving Private Ryan and Cliffhanger are above it) and the score is one of my favourite soundtracks. I love it. \n\nRaiders Of The Lost Ark was the first installment in the Indiana Jones film franchise to be released, though it is the second in internal chronological order. The story is filled with the standard elements, (good v's evil, old lovers reunite etc) but the movie is anything but standard.\n\nIt pits Indiana Jones (Harrison Ford) against a group of Nazis who are searching for the Ark of the Covenant, which Adolf Hitler believes will make his army invincible. \n\nI can't praise the cast enough of this movie enough here, Harrison Ford is perfectly cast as Indiana Jones. Karen Allen, Paul Freeman as Indy's nemesis, John Rhys-Davies and Denholm Elliott all deserve special credit. \n\nThe action set pieces are superb, the humour hits the mark and the score is another valuable asset to the movie. \n\nRaiders Of The Lost Ark is a highly professional piece of work, swift and suspenseful, with a good sense of pace and atmosphere it makes for perfect entertainment. To put it bluntly, it is quite simply one of the best movies ever made. \n\nRaiders Of The Lost Ark was the highest grossing movie of 1981, considering 'Superman 2' and the insanely popular Burt Reynolds led 'Cannonball Run' was released that year it's an even greater achievement. \n\nPerfect entertainment", u'0.298324', u'Original, exciting, and lots of fun. Spielberg directed it and Kasdan and Lucas wrote it. Without it, we wouldn\'t have had "Romancing the Stone", "The Jewel of the Nile," "The Mummy: Tomb of the Dragon Empire", and many others too numerous to list. They were all more or less rip offs of this one. Of course the original was highly successful. I dragged my lugubrious ex to the theater and even SHE enjoyed it. For a while there was an attempt to merchandise Indiana Jones\' leather jackets, fedoras, and bull whips but they didn\'t get far.\n\nThe fact that this was such a commercial blockbuster raised the inevitable question, which may be roughly phrased as, "What do I do NOW, Ma?" What you do is produce sequels: "Indiana Jones and the Temple of Doom," "Indiana Jones and the Amazon Women of the Moon," and so on. Each imitation, each sequel, was less innovative and more desperate and sloppy, but that\'s in the nature of decadence.\n\nHarrison Ford, whose career this put the stamp of approval on, is an archaeologist who is recruited to find the Ark of the Covenant hidden somewhere in the Middle East. It\'s 1936 and the Nazis are after it and who knows what havoc they might wreak with its powers? Jones drags along Karen Allen, a former lover and assistant, to provide a pulchritudinous sidekick with whom he can exchange insults. Anything resembling sex is out of the question, though, just as it would never have been considered in one of the 1930s Saturday afternoon theater serials on which this kind of story is based.\n\nHere\'s the schematic diagram of the plot: Introduction, suspense, action, suspense, action, suspense . . . n. Then the climax -- a really BIG action scene.\n\nBut the thing that made it successful and keeps it so enjoyable after thirty years is that the action wasn\'t of the usual sort. Oh, sure, Jones and his girl friend are threatened with immanent death lots of times -- involved in comic fist fights, shot at with poisoned arrows. That\'s de rigeur. But how often does a hero find himself dashing through an underground tunnel downhill pursued by a three-ton rolling marble? Another element that contributed to its appeal was its reconstruction of the period, 1936. The exotic settings of 1936 aren\'t just rebuilt. They\'re lovingly reproduced. The ordinary set dressings are there to suggest the exotic -- always look for beaded curtains -- but the men don\'t waltz around in immaculate double-breasted white suits and pith helmets. The settings are overblown, to be sure. I strongly doubt that in all of Nepal there was a saloon with the size and atmosphere of Karen Allen\'s. I\'m not at all sure there were ANY saloons in Nepal in 1936. But they\'re meant to suggest authenticity, not embody it, and they succeed in an creative way.\n\nFinally, the characters are kind of enjoyable in themselves, from the often frightened and only barely willing Indiana Jones himself, through the cartoon Nazis with the monocles and Swastika armbands. Oh, boy, watch the ark of the covenant MELT them down to nothing while they are frozen in place and screaming! The force unleashed.', u'0.0186227'], u'tt1375666': [u"I'd like to keep my review rather to the point.\n\nPros: 1. its theme - dream is a fascinating topic to say the least. There are a lot of unknowns in dreamworld. \n\n2. its plot - there are several sweet twists and unpredictable turns. \n\n3. its edgy drive - although you know what's coming next, still you feel jumpy about it when it does.\n\n4. its rapid storyline - the story moves fast from one scene to another, making the viewers feel like on a roller coaster ride. At times, it's hard to keep up, even after watching it several times. \n\n5. its sophistication - there is a lot of information to remember and digest. This is the very thing the modern moviegoers are after, I believe. \n\n6. its realism - okay, pun intended. The movie explains (or at least tries to) the ins and outs of what dream is about and how it functions, some of which are very familiar with and dear to us.\n\nCons: 1. its poor character development - although the acting was convincing enough there was not enough of character development. I wonder how many people really felt connected to the main character(s) after watching the movie. Yes, the movie talks about emotional struggles but it was more of an action film than anything else, if you ask me. \n\n2. too many distractions - I found that the movie had more characters than necessary. They may play certain roles in the plot but they seemed more of distractions than anything else. I wish the movie was more focused. \n\n3. a bit preachy - I noticed that the characters would explain things about dreamworld and then the exact things happen later in the movie. I'm afraid, Inception overused this trick. \n\nIn conclusion, its theme is fascinating but its delivery is not without room for improvement. \n\nI highly recommend you to go and read Somewhere carnal over 40 winks, if you dig this kind of flicks. \n\nCheers!", u'0.066802', u'What is the most resilient parasite? An Idea! Yes, Nolan has created something with his unbelievably, incredibly and god- gifted mind which will blow the minds of the audience away. The world premiere of the movie, directed by Hollywood\'s most inventive dreamers, was shown in London and has already got top notch reviews worldwide and has scored maximum points! Now the question arises what the movie has that it deserve all this?\n\nDom Cobb(Di Caprio) is an extractor who is paid to invade the dreams of various business tycoons and steal their top secret ideas. Cobb robs forcefully the psyche with practiced skill, though he\'s increasingly haunted by the memory of his late wife, Mal (Marion Cotillard), who has a nasty habit of showing up in his subconscious and wreaking havoc on his missions. Cobb had been involved so much in his heist work that he had lost his love!\n\nBut then, as fate had decided, a wealthy business man Saito( Ken Watanabe) hands over the responsibility of dissolving the empire of his business rival Robert Fischer Jr.(Cillian Murphy). But this time his job was not to steal the idea but to plant a new one: \'Inception\'\n\nThen what happens is the classic heist movie tradition. To carry out the the task, Cobb\'s \'brainiac\' specialists team up again with him, Arthur (Joseph Gordon-Levitt), his longtime organizer; Tom Hardy (Eames), a "forger" who can shapeshift at will; and Yusuf (Dileep Rao), a powerful sedative supplier. \n\nThere is only one word to describe the cinematography, the set designs and the special effects, and that is Exceptional! You don\'t just watch the scenes happening, you feel them. The movie is a real thrill ride. The action scenes are well picturised and the music by Hans Zimmer is electronically haunting. Never, in the runtime of the movie, you will get a chance to move your eyes from the screen to any other object.\n\nLeonardo, who is still popularly known for Jack Dawson played by him in Titanic, should be relieved as his role as Dom Cobb will be remembered forever. His performance may or may not fetch him an Oscar but it will be his finest performance till date. The supporting cast too did an extraordinary work. Christopher Nolan, ah! what a man he is. His work is nothing less than a masterpiece and he deserves all the awards in the \'Best Director\' category. If "Inception" is a metaphysical puzzle, it\'s also a metaphorical one: It\'s hard not to draw connections between Cobb\'s dream-weaving and Nolan\'s film making, intended to seduce us, mess with our heads and leave an ever-lasting impression.\n\nTo conclude, I would just say before your life ends, do yourself a favor by experiencing this exceptionally lucid classic created by Nolan! \n\nMy Rating: 10/10\n\nThanks & Regards', u'0.386272', u"Usually I try to be careful with over hyping a film, or setting the expectations too high, as film geeks all are guilty for, however for Christopher Nolan's Inception, this really is not possible.\n\nThis is possibly one of the only perfect films I have ever seen. It is absolutely confident in every way, something which is extremely refreshing, even more so than Avatar. Christopher Nolan gets some slack for making great to look at but ultimately heartless affairs, which I for one do not agree with, however I do not think anyone can argue that here. The emotional aspect of this film not only ties it all together but is really the centre of this film, it is the focus. \n\nI do not want to over simplify the film, by simply calling it Kubrick doing Bond, or Gondry on a huge budget, because I am sure it will be called that but it is far more than that, it is something I do not think Kubrick could have ever made. It is pure Nolan, and pure greatness.\n\nI hate writing something which is pure fan-boy gushing, but its really difficult here. I did not find a thing I did not like about it, I am sure if maybe I saw it a second time, maybe I would find something about it I didn't like, but not the first time. The way it is cut, means that there is always action on screen, if not, then the visuals are interesting enough to keep your eyes glued.\n\nThe final hour of the film, is possibly one of the most complicated action sequences put on film. You have to constantly be paying attention to remember all of the layers of what is happening. Without spoiling anything, all I have to say is that is what this film is about, that is what makes this film so great, layers. Once you have seen this you will now what I am talking about.\n\nAll of the actors are fantastic too, Di Caprio is the stand out here. Yes, this is probably due to the fact he is the star and given all of the emotional weight, but he handles it perfectly, similarly to his performance in Shutter Island. Ellen Page, whom I usually hate, gives a great performance here. Tom Hardy gives a break out performance here, he is quite the bad ass.\n\nI hope audiences are ready for a film like this, a pure auteur driven film which does not sacrifice a single frame for the studio. I would hope this film will change Hollywood, as it is 100 percent the directors vision yet it is definitely a marketable film, much like District 9, yet I do not think it will. \n\nI cannot recommend this film anymore than I have, I just have to say everyone and anyone should see it. Sorry about all the gushing, it is just so hard not too.\n\nIf you liked this review check out my new film blog: http://thedeletedscene.wordpress.com", u'0.243031', u'Films about dreams and the subconscious are usually not very straightforward and almost always weird. "Inception" is no exception to that rule, but like its cinematic predecessors who have explored the contrast between and the questions of what is real and what is illusion (i.e. "The Matrix" (1999), "The Cell" (2000), "Abre Los Ojos" (1997) & its American remake "Vanilla Sky" (2001)), you really can\'t look away, nor should you.\n\n"Inception" is an excellent and breathtaking movie that may be one of the only films released so far during the Summer of 2010 that lives up to its hype. It is a nearly perfect and highly original film that holds your attention until the credits roll. The less you know about this movie going in, the more you will be entranced by seeing it.\n\nLeonardo DiCaprio plays Dom Cobb, a world class criminal who, with the help of a team of sleep experts, works his way into people\'s subconscious and steals what people value most: ideas directly from their minds. In his last assignment to possibly clear his name, he is assigned not to steal an idea from someone, but to plant one inside that person\'s mind. The difficulty comes when certain people are trained to block their ideas from being taken.\n\nThat plot summary only covers the basics of this pretty complicated story, but to describe every plot detail would take away the magic of this film you must see yourself to believe. DiCaprio is good in his role, but unlike many other films he has starred in, this is perhaps his only role where his character alone does not carry the weight of the movie on his shoulders or share it equally with one other co-star. Instead, this great ensemble cast teams together to make this movie work, just as their characters collaborate to pull off such a unique heist. Joseph Gordon-Levitt, Ellen Page, and Tom Hardy are especially good in their roles.\n\nThe special effects in this film were also very good, which is amazing considering their simplicity compared to the "Matrix" movies. There are slow-motion shots, but no impossible kung fu fighting sequences. It\'s especially interesting when the film gets into the architecture of certain dreams, and impossible sequences are filmed in a way I\'ve never seen other than in drawings.\n\nHowever, the special effects would mean nothing if the story wasn\'t good. For this reason, even something as simple as a spinning top holds your attention in a way you would never think it would when seeing it in this film. The credit here can be given to writer and director Christopher Nolan, who has not made a bad film yet. There are many twists and turns in this film, but Nolan never loses his focus in the process of telling the story. If Nolan does not get nominated for Best Director and/or Best Original Screenplay next Oscar season, there is something terribly wrong with the Academy.\n\nThat being said, there was still a lot about this film I still don\'t get, and may require multiple viewings to better understand. However, some of the best films I\'ve seen are confusing at first. "2001: A Space Odyssey" (1968) is a film I\'ve seen a couple of times, and still don\'t understand completely. It still has a major following, though, as I\'m positive this movie will. It\'s an incredibly entertaining movie, but it also makes you think and continues to do so after you leave the theater.', u'0.171657', u"I saw Memento very recently, something that turned out to be a great miss.I saw it again, just to make a couple of thins straight-and i'll definitely do the same with Inception.\n\nChristopher Nolan keeps improving himself, with even more complex and multilayer script like this.And i thought Memento was hard to reach by most of the viewers, but no.Inception will keep you mesmerized and captivated by the genius, that's hidden behind it.And not just directors and screenwriters (or with other words-Nolan), but with acting and sound-and effects and editing as well.\n\nWhen you have a cast like this-i mean Leonardo DiCaprio, Joseph Gordon-Lewitt, Michael Caine, or Marion Cotillard (a personal favourite), the movie just keeps going flawlessly.Most of the crew is the same the Nolan brothers worked with on TDK and earlier in Batman Begins.So the Oscar noms in those categories are a certainty for me.\n\nThe only thing one could have against the movie, is the headache one could have.See, most of my friends go to the movies for brainless action, they enjoyed Iron Man 2 and The A-Team, but this movie-you have to see it at least twice, to understand it.The levels and the layers on which thing are happening are so many, that one surely'll miss something vital.This is a reason for not fitting to the mass audience, but i hope that won't happen, because Nolan is one of my favourite directors/writers, and he showed, that the brainless action flicks aren't all of it.There are still movies like Inception out there and still people like the Nolans to make those movies, so it's not all lost.And i hope this movie could show the audience that the story is still important for the experience one could receive, not the endless, constant explosions.Because this is really a one of a lifetime event.\n\nSaying that, i must say, that in a world full of remakes, reboots, sequels, prequels and God knows what, this is a unique chance to see something different and unmatched so far-a strong movie, that, surely will be Nolan's latest masterpiece! My Grade won't change-it's the same for all Nolan movies-sheer 10!", u'0.798654', u'Dom Cobb leads a highly skilled team, specializing in stealing secrets from people\'s minds by entering their dreams. When they are hired by a mysterious businessman, Cobb finally has a shot at redemption, but not before achieving the near impossible. Rather than stealing an idea, they must do the complete opposite: Inception. Planting the seed of an idea.\n\nInception has a multi-layered plot, quite literally in fact. It focuses on the emotional journey of its lead character, Cobb, but at the same time thrusts the audience into multiple levels of action packed story- telling, very distinct from one another, but all finely connected. It has been described by critics as "a film that rewards intellect", and I can assure you that it is exactly that. Director Christopher Nolan challenges the audience to keep up, and rewards those who can with a breathtaking spectacle, one that has the capability to leave you awestruck. The best part about it is that while you may feel you need to watch it again to be able to fully absorb the experience, chances are, you will probably want to.\n\nChristopher Nolan brings his unique vision to the screen with the help of a star-studded cast, including the likes of Leonardo Dicaprio (The Departed), Joseph Gordon-Levitt (500 Days Of Summer), Ellen Page (Juno), Marion Cotillard (Public Enemies), Cillian Murphy (Batman Begins), and Michael Caine (The Dark Knight), as well some amazing photography by long time collaborator Wally Pfister. The thrilling music in the film is provided by none other than Hans Zimmer, who was also set the mood for Nolan\'s previous film, The Dark Knight.\n\nWhile it may seem simple at its outset, Inception is an extremely complex film, delving deep into the subconscious of the human mind. Technical brilliance and visual splendor have rarely blended together as beautifully. The emotional depth and explosive action complement each other perfectly, delivering a film that is at the same time both heart- wrenching and heart-pounding. It\'s a film that manages to engross you with its complexities, yet comes together seamlessly, and will have you at the edge of your seat, quite literally from start to finish.\n\nInception is magnificent.', u'0.675403', u'What is going on with the IMDb user reviews lately? It\'s like the masses can no longer be trusted. In the last month, the users have decreed "Airbender" the worst abomination ever, when in fact it\'s just an average movie. User reviews raved over "Despicable Me", when it was about as entertaining as a "Dexter\'s Lab" rerun. And now? "Inception" is the 3rd best movie ever made? Are you kidding me? This was a very creative and interesting flick that went waaaayyy overboard. The problem with this genre (you know the genre -- was it a dream? or a dream about a dream? or a parallel universe where people dream they\'re dreaming about parallel universes while pretending to dream) is sooner or later you stop caring about the actual action because it\'s a dream. So the 20 minutes spent watching gunfights and car crashes in the pouring rain, and the 30 minutes spent watching these guys shoot up a ski fortress, and another 30 minutes watching what\'s-his-name float around a hotel just didn\'t do it for me. Not a terrible movie, but 3rd greatest movie ever? You must be dreaming.', u'0.137149', u'I\'m nearly at a loss for words. Just when you thought Christopher Nolan couldn\'t follow up to "The Dark Knight", he does it again, delivering another masterpiece, one with so much power and rich themes that has been lost from the box office for several years. Questioning illusions vs reality usually makes the film weird, but Nolan grips your attention like an iron claw that you just can\'t help watching and wondering what will happen next. That is a real powerful skill a director has. No wonder Warner Bros. put their trust in him, he is THAT good of a director, and over-hyping a Christopher Nolan film, no matter what the film is about, is always an understatement instead of an overestimate like MANY films before.\n\nNot since the eras of Stanley Kubrick, Andrei Tarkovsky and Alfred Hitchcock has there been a more brilliant director than Christopher Nolan. He is, undoubtedly, one of THE most brilliant and gifted Hollywood filmmakers in history. Filmmakers like him come but just once in a lifetime. He has the ability to seduce our eyes, ears and most importantly, mind, and then delivers what he intends to deliver in full blast. Rarely have blockbusters have the gall to deliver such amounts imagination and intelligence at the same time. And yes, it is similar to the excellent anime film "Paprika" in the whole "invading dreams" plot, but the similarities end there as Nolan brings the film to a whole different level.\n\nVisuals and intelligence rarely come together in movies at the same time, it\'s either all-visuals-no-smarts ("G.I. Joe", "Transformers") or the exact opposite ("Doubt", "Invictus"). In this film the excellently directed action sequences combined with immensely groundbreaking and jaw-dropping visual effects are combined smoothly with a heavy dose of intelligence and believability.\n\nAlthough having an ensemble cast and financed by a Hollywood giant studio (Warner Bros), this film is a very personal film for Nolan, he wrote the film as well as directing it, and as you watch the film you get many glimpses of Nolan\'s perplexing, increasingly imaginative thoughts and dreams in the dialog that he writes and the plot that he sets up. Ideas have never felt more interesting and put to good use than in this film. This film is NOT for the popcorn muncher, rather it is a film for thinkers. Honestly I can\'t explain the plot for fear of spoiling the movie for you readers. Even the slightest hint will ruin the experience. The viewer will walk out of the cinema feeling dazed, confused and ultimately breathless. It\'s like a puzzle, both physically and mentally, and you have to pay attention throughout the film for the clues. However Nolan controls the spectacle of the film and is careful not to let it overwhelm the film\'s humanity, and this is where "Inception" shines. It is a very deep film that will have one thinking and asking questions for years to come. That\'s right, years.\n\nOnce the film ends, you\'ll want to watch it again, for there\'s something new every time. This is a film that requires multiple viewing for someone to truly comprehend the film\'s ambiguous themes, and will be discussed by many in the future. This is an original film, no adaptation, no sequel/prequel, no remake/reboot, which is extremely refreshing having gone nearly three years of mostly unremarkable visual effects roadshows ("Avatar" be damned).\n\nOf course, a film is not complete without the actors. Leo DiCaprio delivers an Oscar worthy performance, similar but better than his previous effort "Shutter Island". He shows glimpses of a flawed, grim, fragile man, who has knowledge about everything else but yet can\'t seem to come in grips with himself and his demons. Joseph Gordon-Levitt, Ellen Page, Tom Hardy, Ken Watanabe, Dileep Rao, Cillian Murphy, Tom Berenger, Michael Caine, Marion Cottilard, Pete Postlethwaite, Lukas Haas... Nolan really brings out the best in this unusual yet extremely talented group of supporting actors who make their roles their own.\n\nNolan is of course, a master behind the camera, a real virtuoso when it comes to film. His direction is taut, focused, gripping, and extraordinarily fascinating. The detailed and complex original script is no surprise from Nolan, considering the fact that he turned Batman the superhero into pop-culture art two years ago ("The Dark Knight"). The action sequences are unique, exciting and fresh, something absent from the cinema which has since been interested at things popping towards the screen and stuff blowing up every two milliseconds. The visual effects are awesome and imaginative, and best of all they do not bring down the movie\'s quality one bit, rather it makes the movie more fascinating to watch. The cinematography is absolutely, beautifully shot, so we can see the action and emotion in all their glory. Production design is top notch, with terrific design of sets and locations. Hans Zimmer\'s complementing music score is simply outstanding, and knowing the man, that\'s really all I have to say. Together all of these elements combine to deliver a mesmerizing movie experience like no other this year.\n\nChristopher Nolan has once again outdone himself. He truly is a gifted filmmaker, arguably the most imaginative in Hollywood today. And "Inception" can proudly stand alongside "Blade Runner" and "2001: A Space Odyssey" as science-fiction masterpieces that push the boundaries for movie making and become a different experience altogether.\n\nThere are two types of films: the crowd-pleasing blockbuster and the intelligent indie/art film. Nolan has combined two of these tropes together into one exceptionally brilliant package, pulling off that rare, now nearly-extinct Movie Magic that has since been wiped off the planet by sequelitis and reboots. Movie of Summer 2010? Movie of 2010? Heck this is possibly the first masterpiece of the decade! Nolan is a genius and I applaud him for treating his audiences as intelligent people.\n\nMissing this film and not getting the film\'s point is a crime.\n\nOverall value: 9/10 (Excellent)', u'0.48441', u"Inception is truly one of a kind. A concept which has long gestated in Christopher Nolan's mind, his eye for drama mixed with his large scale sensibilities ring true in Blockbuster season making Inception a true original in the sea of reboots, remakes and sequels.\n\nTo try and explain Inceptions many plot twists and incredibly intelligent arcs, would be a foolish task. As Nolan himself has been reluctant to. The best way to approach the film would be with an open mind, if you are prepared to be taken on a ride of a lifetime, then trust that you 100% will. If Avatar was a seminal film in technology (although coming out as a rather poor film, in my opinion), then Inception is seminal in it's storytelling. With a 148 minute running time, you would expect a lot to take place, but what you wouldn't expect is the pace of it all. I did not think at one time in the film about how long was left. I was simply blown away by the depth in every single part of the film. If my enthusiasm for the storytelling aspect of the film has left you worried about the spectacle, then don't worry. They are, as hinted in the trailer, incredible, looking real and unbelievable simultaneously. The most pleasing thing about the action set pieces, is that they are genuinely used to illustrate the story, rather than to blow stuff up a la Michael Bay.\n\nWith this complex movie in it's high concept, a stellar cast is needed. And Nolan as always, delivers with just that. This is vintage DiCaprio, perhaps only equalled in The Aviator, which is even more impressive as his role as Cobb in Inception is not a showy one, needing DiCaprio to be the constant at the centre of the film. And he pulls off Cobb's emotional contradictions sublimely. The rest of the cast members all shine in parts of the films, Cillian Murphy shows off his usually non-existent tender side, Gordon-Levitt bottles his usual charm for his confidently reserved turn as the reliable Arthur, Watanabe is devilish as the seemingly ambiguous Saito, Page shows why she's the next big female star and Tom Hardy revels in being the comic relief of the film compared to his recent turns as decidedly psychopathic characters.\n\nOverall, Nolan has indeed surpassed himself. He has created a world as expansive as his Gotham, a plot dwarfing the intricacies of Memento and one which blows The Prestige's cinematic reveal out of the water. This is truly unmissable cinema. Revel in it, we've still got to wait a whole two years before Batman 3.", u'0.47423', u'What do we ask for in a summer blockbuster? What is it that incites hysteria this time every year for whatever dross the studios churn out? Epic hugeness? Blowing stuff up? Romance? Action? Heroes? What are we looking for in a blockbuster? I think it all boils down to thrills! Audiences want the thrill of a car chase, the thrill of romance, the thrill of the spectacular! If that is the case, then Inception just might be the greatest summer blockbuster of all time as it also contains something we often don\'t look for...brains! "What is the most resilient parasite? An idea" says Leonardo Di Caprio\'s character Cobb. Well, Inception is all about ideas. It\'s all right there in the title. The film central idea revolves around "Extractors", who are paid to extract secrets from people\'s subconscious minds by sneaking into their dreams, usually for the purpose of corporate espionage. However, when one client asks them to plant an idea in the mind of their corporate rival, "Inception" is born. The less said about this film the better. It is full of ideas and invention and for each set piece I divulge, a piece of the film\'s genius is weakened. This is a film that cleverly and intricately brings the audience through several planes of existence simultaneously but never allows the viewer to feel lost. Such is the power of Christopher Nolan\'s script which, I imagine, is likely to get overlooked due to the sheer visual magnificence of his direction. But everything that makes this film so great is in the script...in the ideas! Everything else is just spectacle. This film bears an uncanny resemblance, thematically, with DiCaprio\'s other instant classic this year, Shutter Island. Both films investigate in depth the tricks a traumatised mind can play on the individual. Both films are luscious to watch and both films keep the audience firmly outside the realm of reality. However, Inception is an even more layered film than Shutter Island and I believe the sci-fi genre setting will prove to be less alienating for audiences than the prison noir of Scorsese\'s film. There is not a single dull moment in Nolan\'s film. There is style, charm and intelligence in every frame of the film. Every performance is pitch-perfect with some strong support by Ellen Page and Joseph Gordon-Levitt particularly who have grown up right before our eyes into undeniable movie stars. Leonardo DiCaprio gives a typically flawless performance as the muddled, grieving man who we never quite trust to be living in the real world. The best part of Inception is the large amount of effects which were done in camera. While the film does make use of CGI, there are some pretty mind-blowing practical effects which are as simple as the camera telling beautiful lies; a rare treat these days. This is a blockbuster that ticks all the boxes; smart, sexy (femme fatale, sexy brainy girl, very beautiful men in very beautiful suits) and magical. Inception is the kind of film that reminds me why cinema will never die. Because anyone who thinks it\'s OK to watch this film on a laptop or iPad is a fool! This is pure cinema, and proud of it. Not to be missed on the big screen!', u'0.32515', u"I had the privilege of seeing this movie before it came out, and, like most of DiCaprio's films, it blew me away.\n\nInception is a well-made movie, filmed in about 6 locations all over the world. The directing was outstanding, there were only about two moments, maybe three seconds in total, where i noticed that visual effects were being used (of course defying gravity is pretty difficult). \n\nThe plot was very pleasingly intricate, with a twist-and-turn, keep-you-on-the-edge-of-your-seat type feel. I noticed that this film had similarities with DiCaprios thriller Shutter Island (which i also enjoyed very much)seeing as it left you wondering what was real and what was not. It's great to see a movie with a thick and emotional plot and not just grenade-throwing action heroes who achieve greatness in the end.\n\nInception also has a very well-composed score, which to me was the finishing touch to a perfect movie. If you're thinking about seeing Inception, definitely go! Even though i was fortunate enough to see a free show, it is worth every penny you pay. \n\nTruly unique, like nothing i've ever seen before. Christopher Nolan certainly covered new ground with this film and wasn't afraid to leave us hanging with a spectacular ending.", u'0.695361', u'I cannot ignore facts. I cannot ignore mistakes and plot holes, bad writing, or bad marketing. I cannot ignore hype, especially when it\'s already on the IMDb top 250, it received praise from critics, cashed in a lot of money, and people call it stunning and unforgettable. The simple truth is that Inception does not live up to the hype. Let me start with the trailer. All the coolest things (the folding city, the collapsing cliffs, the train in the street) are totally unessential to the plot. None of that takes more than a few seconds. So why did they put them on all the posters as well? Nevermind. I\'ll move on to the real problems of the movie.\n\nSo I heard all these people saying how complex the movie is. How I\'ll need to watch it twice. How the shocking ending will blow my mind. I knew exactly what that "shocking ending" would be half way through the film. The very last paragraph of this review deals with the ending. It\'s not exactly a spoiler but you can skip it if you don\'t want to know anything.\n\nCobb (DiCaprio) takes on a mission to implant a thought into Fischer\'s (Murphy) mind. As a reward, his contractor Saito (Watanabe) will clean his record with the LAPD. Cobb is wanted for the murder of his wife and consequently he can\'t return to USA and see his children. Throughout the movie, this is Cobb\'s main inner conflict, that before he fled the country, he didn\'t get a chance to see the kids\' faces and he wants to see them again. Michael Cain has a very small role as their grandpa and DiCaprio\'s father-in-law. Why doesn\'t Cain take the kids someplace so they could be with their father? People move all the time. Or why doesn\'t he send Cobb some home movies if he wants to see their faces so much? They could even have video calls and all that stuff. It\'s a long distance relationship but it\'s something. Well, apparently no one thought of that, and so the main character\'s main motivation for his actions makes no sense. \n\nAs for acting, DiCaprio was good. But if you\'ve seen Shutter Island, You\'ve seen a third of Inception. Dead wife, small kids, a sense of loss, a pretty wooden house in a field, all those flashbacks Teddy had in Shutter Island\x85 it\'s all in Inception. Minus the funny Boston accent.\n\nThe mission these mind thieves embark on is to plant an idea into a rich guy\'s mind. This is called inception. Hence the title, I guess. Everyone says it\'s impossible to do, so you know they are going to succeed in the end. Inception is essentially a heist movie, but instead of getting into a vault, Cobb\'s team has to get inside someone\'s mind \x96 which happens to look like a vault. The supposed complexity of the movie boils down to the idea of a dream within a dream. Basically, imagine that once you are plugged inside the matrix, you plug yourself into yet another, deeper, matrix. There, I just explained the super complex plot of the movie. But in case that wasn\'t enough, there is Ellen page\'s character, Ariadne. She is the obligatory new member of the team that is introduced to represent the audience and their questions. I\'m fine with that. Every movie has one of those uninitiated people. The thing is, she understands everything too quickly and becomes suddenly becomes the most competent character. Pretty convenient, if you ask me.\n\nLet me finally get to the mission. It\'s the worst part of the movie. Watanabe wants Murphy, who just inherited a huge corporation, to dissolve it, because it was going to become a huge monopoly. So Watanabe hires DiCaprio to plant the idea of splitting the company in Murphy\'s mind. And so they do that. For two and a half hours. But I don\'t care if he splits the big company or not. Why should I care if Murphy has a bigger company than Watanabe? The stakes of the movie aren\'t high, they are nonexistent. I am not given any reason to care about whether or not they succeed. I\'m only given more and more action set pieces to look forward to, and a lot of cool slow motion and zero gravity fights reminiscent of The Matrix, but I\'m not given any reason to care for what is happening. I liked Watanabe\'s character only because I like Ken Watanbe. As for Saito himself, I don\'t give a damn if his competitor destroys his company or not. They don\'t tell us what consequences it would have, they don\'t show us what happens with the company, they don\'t do anything with this initial idea. Which is strange, because the movie is all about ideas being important. \n\nOkay, so I didn\'t like the plot and the acting was nothing new. What about the rest? Hans Zimmer\'s unremarkable score works well with the scenes but it would be super boring to hear on its own. The visual effects are good but since all the coolest city-folding scenes were so short, there wasn\'t really that much to do. The zero gravity stuff was done well, I\'ll give them that. Cinematography was good, bordering on too much shaky camera.\n\nHere\'s the paragraph about the ending:\n\nThe big ending is that you are supposed to be unsure what was a dream and what was reality. If it was real, then it\'s stupid because DiCaprio had dozens of ways to be with his kids without making things so incredibly complicated. The movie is supposed to make you think, but if you think about it the whole plot falls apart. If it was a dream, then it\'s a stupid cop out on Nolan\'s part. An excuse for all the things that didn\'t make sense. It was all a dream, so screw you, audience.', u'-0.362378', u"Its all a dream. How do you know its a dream? Because it got a 9.4 rating. I'm waiting for a train. Its bringing a real rating of a 4. But the train doesn't come. This is not my dream. Omg. I'm going to wake up, and the real rating will be a 4, like reality. Reality as it should be, if movies were properly rated. But there's an explosion. The movie is still rated a 9.4. If I jump, maybe out of a window and die in my dream, which is someone else's dream, I might wake up to get the real rating of this movie, a 4. The van falls, I'm drowning. Finally after a long long long time, I wake up. Thank god it was all a dream. I check the rating at IMDb. OMG NO! I must still be in someone else's dream.\n\nAs the big blockbuster movies become more awful, their rating consistently get higher. Any time I see a high rated (7+) new movie on a major rating website I become suspicious now. Too many times I've wasted money on crap movies because the rating said it was good. I guess they decided to push it to the limits of a 10 this time to really fool people like me that are becoming wary.\n\nThe movie deserves about a 4 out of 10. The 4 is given for the nice colors and pretty good graphics. However, the plot is weak, the characters are weak, its not thought provoking or intellectual. There's no brilliant script or any new directional style here. And it feels longer than a run on sentence.\n\nLong. Boring. Jumbled. Good concept and stars wasted on this movie. See it if you have to, but don't spend money on it. Every time we spend money to see bad movies it sends a message that we are willing to accept less, and pay more. Your money is your real vote. Only vote for what is good.", u'-0.284066', u'I have to say to make such an impressive trailer and such an uninteresting film, takes some doing.\n\nHere you have most of the elements that would make a very good film. You have great special effects, a sci-fi conundrum, beautiful visuals and good sound. Yet the most important part of the film is missing. There is no plot, character or soul to this film. It\'s like having a beautiful building on the outside with no paint or decoration on the inside.\n\nIt\'s an empty shell of a film. There is no tension; you couldn\'t care less about any of the characters, why were they even motivated to do what they did. Helping a corporation get "one over" on another corporation is hardly saving the human race.\n\nWhen you operate in a dream environment, where you can\'t die or be injured really it means there is nothing to worry about, who cares what happens. All the explosions and actions sequences are just meaningless. By the way, why does Hollywood still keep filming action scene\'s an inch away from every characters nose? It\'s impossible to see what\'s going on, so many films are ruined by this. Watch and learn from the Matrix, take the camera backwards a couple of feet and we can actually work out what\'s going on.\n\nSo 2 and half hours of looking at my watch waiting for the very predictable ending, is a million miles from being a good film. How anyone in their right mind can give this 10/10, it\'s boring and pointless. A film has stir the soul, has to grab you, you need to feel for the characters. Can anyone, honestly say, they cared about anyone on show here.\n\nBy the way, here\'s an idea, why don\'t you bring the children (who haven\'t aged a minutes since you last saw them) to you, if you can\'t go to the US.\n\nI know the end scene was trying to be ambiguous, but the fact his father, who lives in Paris, is bizarrely there in the US to meet him (how did he know) and the children look identical to every dream sequence they appeared in, means there wasn\'t much doubt.\n\nIn the end there is nothing at stake for anyone, so a pointless movie. I suspect Nolan will continue to get praise, but I can\'t really say I\'ve got excited about any of his movies. They all leave me cold. They are not terrible, just there\'s nothing really there, no substance.', u'-0.345292', u'Unless you call this movie a masterpiece. Then you are.\n\nDamn 1,000 word limit. Gotta make this quick.\n\nSpoilers.\n\nThe film is 2.5 hours long, yet feels like 5.2, and there are a few reasons for this. One of which is the fact that a preponderance of the first act is amateurish, conflict-free exposition, which does not bode well for repeat viewings.\n\nThe "learning about the dream world" scene is atrocious. No conflict. Both Leo and Page\'s characters already knew what was being explained. The similar "learning about the matrix" scene in The Matrix did it right by having one character not know anything. Plus, there was conflict. Neo gets his ass kicked and fails to make the building jump. Much more entertaining.\n\nThere\'s another problem with the whole section of bending the landscape where Leo explains the negative aspects of altering the dream world. The closest we get to seeing the dream world altered was Leo becoming Mr. Charlie, yet the most that happens then is a bunch of extras turn and look at Leo. That\'s it. The idea was not exploited. You literally have to go out of your way to miss that opportunity. Hell, that Mr. Charles scene is shorter than the scene that explains why altering the dream world is bad! \n\nLet\'s not forget this whole idea of one corporation one-upping another has absolutely no personal ramifications for anyone on screen or in the audience. It would have greatly amped up the internal conflict if Leo had to struggle with the notion that helping the guy who could help him would endanger someone else close to him, or us, or someone else. ANYTHING could have worked better than an energy contract that means less to me than my neighbor\'s bath mat. Come on. \n\nThe totems were handled very poorly. All we need to know is their purpose. We don\'t need to know anything else, yet the film keeps piling on needless information.\n\nIf this is a heist film, where is the threat of being caught? \n\nA van falls for an endless amount of time. Joseph Gordon-Levitt floats bodies down a hallway for half an hour, real-time. The guy from Bronson does his thing, whatever the hell that was. These are not complex tasks or events, but rather straight-forward in nature. Dragging them out for a solid chunk of the film is what creates the glacial pace and makes a long film seem even longer.\n\nInception has no real villain. You can make a case for Cotillard, but she is an internal enemy. She never takes a "physical" presence and never threatens anyone except Leo. Everyone else is dealing with faceless assassins. That makes it feel distant from the rest of the action. It doesn\'t even have anything to do, emotionally, with Leo\'s goal of getting home to see his kids. None of this is tied together. Leo didn\'t even know what the hell was going on with Cillian and never even knew of the outcome until after the fact. He\'s separated from the physical manifestation of his goal for a majority of the film. I ended up not caring if the plan succeeded. If it was all somehow tied together, the audience would be able to experience that great emotional catharsis that everyone was talking about...but that didn\'t happen.\n\nIn fact, Leo is so separated from the actual plot that you can literally put Levitt in his place and not even need the hero in the dream world at all! Hell, you can even put Page there, since all she does after designing the boring and lifeless dream worlds is hang out with the guys and tell Leo he\'s crazy. I really wish she had something else to do besides play the part of the fifth wheel.\n\nLeo\'s lack of involvement in the main action of the story creates a \'so what?\' moment when the problem is solved for him, and I can think of absolutely no reason why the hero should not be the one to conquer the main conflict. Brody kills the shark in Jaws. He doesn\'t send Hooper and Quint out to do his dirty work while he stays behind to deal with his fear of water. It\'s integrated. The hero is forced into dealing with the physical, and in turn, but learn to conquer his internal fears before he can conquer his external opponent. This is Screen writing 101, Lesson 1, and Nolan got that wrong. That\'s why I don\'t believe the reports that he spent 10 years writing the script since it only took me 148 minutes to figure out exactly what was wrong with it.\n\nNot to mention the conceit that to enter someone else\'s dream and control it means that you would have to control your own subconscious, which they state elsewhere is impossible. Way to go, genius.\n\nPretty much everything this film does wrong, The Matrix does right. Watch that instead.\n\nPS: The \'taking a scene from the middle and putting it at the beginning\' gag reached its peak effectiveness in 2002 and has absolutely no place in modern films. It\'s getting as bad as that tired old \'It\'s all a dream\' scenario. Oh, wait...', u'-0.368518'], u'tt0078788': [u"My favourite movie of all time. This was a flawed piece of work by Coppola and seeing the documentary 'Heart of Darkness' made it even more compelling. Coppola at this point was king of Hollywood after making 'the Godfather' and 'GodfatherII' and had developed the ego necessary to even dare try to make a movie like 'Apocalypse Now'. Through sheer arrogance he went to the Phillipines with a partial script and thought he would know what he would do when he got there. Just as Captain Willard thought he would know what to do once he got to Col. Kurtz's compound. And just like Willard, he DIDN'T know what he was going to do once he got there. This is such a masterpiece of American cinema, beautifully photographed and the river is such a perfect metaphor and backdrop for the story. What I like most about 'Apocalypse Now' is that it offers no answers or conclusions. Consequently, because of this open-endedness, it infuriates some viewers who like their movies to be much more obvious. \n\nThis movie defies categorization. Some call it a war movie which it isn't at all, really it is more of a personal study of man. The best pic about Vietnam is 'Platoon' in my opinion and if a viewer is seeking a retelling of the Vietnam War go there first for answers. \n\nCoppola should be commended for his take on the bureaucracy of war which he conveys quite effectively with the meeting with Gen.Corman and Lucas (Harrison Ford) and the Playmate review. The sheer audacity of Kilgore makes him an unforgettable character and the dawn attack will always be a Hollywood classic.\n\nIt is an almost psychedelic cruise to a very surreal ending which makes it a movie not accessible to everyone. Very challenging to watch but rewarding as well. I could offer my explanations on each scene but that would be totally pointless. This movie is intended for interpretation and contemplation as opposed to immediate gratification.\n\nA little footnote, definitely if your a first-time viewer of Apocalypse Now, watch the original version first, the 'Redux' version is, I think, more intended for the hardcore fan and is more of a curiosity than a 'new and improved' version of the movie", u'0.113966', u'I first saw APOCALYPSE NOW in 1985 when it was broadcast on British television for the first time . I was shell shocked after seeing this masterpiece and despite some close competition from the likes of FELLOWSHIP OF THE RING this movie still remains my all time favourite nearly 20 years after I first saw it \n\nThis leads to the problem of how I can even begin to comment on the movie . I could praise the technical aspects especially the sound , editing and cinematography but everyone else seems to have praised ( Rightly too ) these achievements to high heaven while the performances in general and Robert Duvall in particular have also been noted , and everyone else has mentioned the stark imagery of the Dou Long bridge and the montage of the boat traveling upriver after passing through the border \n\nHow about the script ? Francis Ford Coppola is best known as a director but he\'s everyway a genius as a screenwriter as he was as a director , I said " was " in the past tense because making this movie seems to have burned out every creative brain cell in his head , but his sacrifice was worth it . In John Milius original solo draft we have a script that\'s just as insane and disturbing as the one on screen , but Coppola\'s involvement in the screenplay has injected a narrative that exactly mirrors that of war . Check how the screenplay starts off all jingoistic and macho with a star turn by Bill Kilgore who wouldn\'t have looked out of place in THE GREEN BERETS but the more the story progresses the more shocking and insane everything becomes , so much so that by the time reaches Kurtz outpost the audience are watching another film in much the same way as the characters have sailed into another dimension . When Coppola states " This movie isn\'t about Vietnam - It is Vietnam " he\'s right . What started off as a patriotic war to defeat communist aggression in the mid 1960s had by the film\'s setting ( The Manson trial suggests it\'s 1970 ) had changed America\'s view of both the world and itself and of the world\'s view of America \n\nIt\'s the insane beauty of APOCALYPSE NOW that makes it a masterwork of cinema and says more in its running time about the brutality of conflict and the hypocrisy of politicians ( What did you do in the Vietnam War Mr President ? ) than Michael Moore could hope to say in a lifetime . I\'ve not seen the REDUX version but watching the original print I didn\'t feel there was anything missing from the story which like all truly great films is very basic . In fact the premise can lend itself to many other genres like a western where an army officer has to track down and kill a renegade colonel who\'s leading an injun war party , or a sci-fi movie where a UN assassin is to eliminate a fellow UN soldier who\'s leading a resistance movement on Mars , though this is probably down to Joseph Conrad\'s original source novel\n\nMy all time favourite movie and it\'s very fitting that I chose this movie to be my one thousandth review at the IMDb', u'0.190118', u'\nAs I peruse through the hundreds of comments that loyal readers of the IMDB have posted on this film, I find it very interesting how few ,"middle of the road" comments there are. Everyone either loves it, or they hate it. Having seen Apocalypse Now approximately 30 times, and having recently dissected it on DVD (how did we ever live without those magical digital machines?????), I can say without hesitation that I am one of those who have a very special place in my heart for this film. "Why would you like a film that\'s so confusing?" ask many of my associates. The answer is this: Forget the war, forget the brutality....This is a classic story of society protecting itself from those that refuse to fall in line with the status quo. Brando represents the individual that has his own way of getting the job done. They (Big Brother) sent him out to do the job, he does it too well, without adhering to the accepted "standards" of death and destruction (Am I the only one who\'s troubled by the fact that we have \'standards\' for death and destruction????), so they send the "Conformity Police" out to eliminate the individual. Hmmmmmm....Draw any parallels between this and things you see every day? With the deepest respect to Mr. Coppola, whom I believe is one of the best directors of all time, I think he transcended his original intent of the movie, and probably didn\'t even realize it until after the movie was released. The subtle sub-text that permeates the entire movie has way too much to it to have been planned and portrayed; instead, it seems to have \'grown\' itself, like some wild flower in the middle of a vegetable garden. Again I must reiterate: I think FF Coppola did a bang-up job on this entire production, as did the cast and crew, but the sum of the movie exceeds the individual efforts ten-fold. So if you haven\'t seen the movie, rent it, watch it, then watch it again, and maybe a few more times, and look for all the generic parallels to everyday life. Only then make a judgment on the quality of the film. Those of you that have seen it, watch it again with the mindset previously described. I think you may just have a whole new appreciation for the film. Or maybe not! No matter whether you love it or hate it, be sure and give credit to Coppola for his masterful story-telling style!', u'0.135564', u'\nI\'m starting to get weary when I hear the term "director\'s cut". Some are good like Ridley Scott\'s "Blade Runner" but William Friedkin totally screwed up the end of "The Exorcist" in his restored version, but this is even worse. "Apocalypse Now" was very well made and it seems that Coppola who was in his creative prime when he made the film (having completed "Godfather I &\nII" and "The Conversation" and then never coming even close to anything compelling after that) simply decided to desicrate this film. He should have realized that he was a much better director when he made "Apocalypse Now? then he is at present, and that he cut out the scenes in question for good reason.\n\n-I like the extra footage of Col Kilgore, but having Willard steal his surfboard and then laugh with glee like a frat boy was totally not in his character and it was best left on the cutting room floor.\n\n\n-The playboy bunnies extra scene is beyond ridiculous. It wasn\'t even inserted into the movie correctly. One minute it\'s a sunny day Willard is reading Col. Kurt\'s letter to his son and looking at a photo of Kurtz, and then suddenly it\'s raining and they come across the army camp. Willard offers two drums of deisel fuel in exchange for sex for the boys on the boat. Again..totally out of character for Willard, and completely unbelievable as a whole. Theres a five minute awkward scene with the men and the bunnies and then FLASH their back on the boat again, it\'s not raining anymore and Willard is staring at the same photo of Kurtz again, terrible editing!! Afterwhich is the scene where they come across the Vietnamese supply boat and kill the passengers.  The impact of this scene is taken away as the motivations of the crew are not as understandable anymore. Also when Willard kills the injured Vietnamese woman because he\'s in a hurry to get moving, makes no sense now. He wasn\'t in too big a hurry in the previous scene having made the deal for the men to have sex with the bunnies????\n\n-The French Plantation sequence is too looooonngg. Willard (at their dinner table) asks why the family is still in Vietnam, to which he gets a TWENTY MINUTE answer by everyone at the table as they yell back and forth at each other. He then SUDDENLY ends up with this French woman while the soundtrack spews very sappy music. I was wondering what happend to the movie during this entire sequence....the river....the war....colonel Kurtz???? After watching this awful sequence I said to myself "the horror, the horror".\n\n-The extra scene with Brando reading Time Magazine is also pointless. Also seeing the Kurtz character in broad daylight, instead of the shadowing figure that we were limited to in the original version takes away his foreboding.\n\nAll these scenes add nothing to the film except extreme length. I tend to like long movies but not when they are injected with pointless scenes, the movies previous 2 1/2 hour length was perfect for it. I will keep my old original DVD of "Apocalypse Now". I hope some day they release a two disc set of this film. It will have the original version in the 2:35 to 1 aspect ratio. And another disc with trailers, "Hearts of Darkness a filmaker\'s Apocalypse", and they can even throw in the extra "Redux" scenes in a deleted scenes option just for laughs.\n\nSTICK WITH THE ORIGINAL!!! As far as "Apocalypse Now Redux" goes, for me, this version does not exist...nor will it ever exist.', u'-0.422769', u'Francis Ford Coppola\'s "Apocalypse Now" is not a Vietnam War film. Do not confuse it with one. It is set to the back drop of the war, but it is a metaphorical exposition on the deteriorating effects that war has on the human psyche. It is also one of the most audacious films ever made, produced, or even conceived (second to the Lord of the Rings trilogy. To call it a masterpiece would be an understatement of proportions as ambitious as the film\'s production levels.\n\nOpening with no credits and following a memorable first scene playing to the tune of the Doors "The End" as Martin Sheen\'s Captain Benjamin L. Willard hallucinates to images of helicopters and napalm, the plot is essentially laid out in the first 15 minutes. Willard\'s mission is to "terminate... with extreme prejudice" Colonel Kurtz (Marlon Brando) who has invariably gone AWOL in the far reaches of the Cambodian jungle and, as told by his general, is "out there operating without any decent restraint, totally beyond the pale of any acceptable human conduct. And he is still in the field commanding troops." Kurtz is a delusional Colonel now being worshipped by a large group of followers who have dubbed him a god. For Willard, this covert operation seems somewhat more manageable than actual combat, yet, the journey he is about to take will be a personal quest that will challenge the limits of his human behavior.\n\nTeaming up with a small crew, they embark down the vast reaches of the river in a rickety boat. Along the way, Willard educates himself on all things Kurtz. During Sheen\'s raspy voice over, he details his thoughts on the abundance of material he reads. Kurtz was a highly decorated and respected Green Beret. He was a normal man with a family, until a part of him succumbed to the horrors of human brutality and he led himself down the path that Willard is being led. The descent into the jungle is marked by a mesmerizing aura that echoes the battles being fought not to far away. Eventually the power of the experience weights on the group as drugs and a sort of solitary confinement attacks their senses. But Willard seems unfazed and desensitized in his quest to find Kurtz. As he reads about this mythic figure, he is drawn to the man\'s power and why he has become what he has become. We know that Willard\'s slow decay will parallel that of Kurtz\'s.\n\nMarlon Brando has been revered for decades. His presence: unmatchable. His genius: undeniable. But for those unacquainted with his acting prowess and unaccustomed to his physical nuance, Brando can be perceived, in the eyes of an uncompromising film-goer, as a hack. He is most certainly not. Brando was difficult to work with, hard to interpret and impossible to understand, but his talent for unintelligible rants and unparalleled monologues is irrefutable. The man obviously knew what he was doing even if we didn\'t. His Colonel Kurtz is a being of limitless delusions and continual profundity.\n\nIf the film is any indication of the journeys into hell than Francis Ford Coppola\'s actual experience with making this masterpiece is a true life account of one man\'s fanatical struggle to produce a movie. It is reported that during the film\'s 200 plus day principle photography schedule, Coppola contemplated suicide. The film was not only an undeniable struggle to make; it is a grueling film to watch. Coppola\'s sweat and blood seep through the pores of the steamy locals and his dedication filters through the orifices of Martin Sheen\'s haunted soldier Willard.\n\nI can not help but feel a warm sense of nostalgia for this type of film. At the dawn of all that was original and unprecedented, films that challenged as well as stimulated were commonplace. Audacity aside, Apocalypse Now is pure film-making. My respect and admiration for Mr. Coppola is of the highest order. But I shudder at the return to what has become the norm for today\'s standards for film: a lack of innovation. It is not simply the unoriginality of the world of cinema today; it is the fact that nobody seems to care to tell a story anymore or to tell one with heart. But we still have the great ones like Coppola\'s masterpiece, a film which bathed in its ability to give us something deeper than that which we could comprehend.\n\nThat depth in Apocalypse Now is the step into madness. The killing can disturb. The loss of innocence can unhinge. But it is the damage from within; the countless barrages of images that distress, unnerve and detach us from our everyday world and the memories that plague our deepest thoughts that eventually segregates us from humanity and propels us into the realm of the instinctual, the savage and the animalistic. If the thought of killing does not provide sustenance, the act of killing provides man with its fundamental catharsis.', u'-0.0609262', u'\ni have lost count as to how many times i have watched this movie. i\'ve never grown tired of it since this is a movie that can be enjoyed and interpreted on so many levels. they just don\'t make movies like this anymore.\n\nafter recently finally watching the riveting documentary on the making of this film (Hearts of Darkness:a filmmakers journey into madness), i\'m even more amazed that this film even got finished, yet alone turn out so great.\n\nthe fact that they actually filmed this movie in the jungles of the Phillipines is the film\'s greatest asset. you actually FEEL like your in Vietnam.\n\nall of the actors are fantastic with my favorites still being Robert Duvall ("I love the smell of napalm in the morning!!") martin sheen, and the great Marlon Brando.\n\na lot of people complain that the film gets too murky, weird and cerebral near the end. well, remeber what Coppolla said about this movie, "This film is not about vietnam, it IS vietnam!" what he means is that this film is about MADNESS and not the war.\n\nthis movie is based on the short story "Heart of darkness" by Joseph Conrad and is set against the vietnam war instead of the civil war as in the book. i think that was a brilliant combination in my opinion.\n\nthis is perfect, challenging  film that is dark, violent, humorous at times and well done in every single possible way.\n\na true classic\n\nrating:10', u'0.95326', u"During the final throes of the Vitnam war, our central character, Capt. Willard (Martin Sheen) is dispatched by the CIA on an illegal one-man mission to assassinate a renegade US Marine commander, Colonel Kurtz (Marlon Brando), who has allegedly gone 'completely insane', but who is successfully waging a private cross-border war from his base in Cambodia, a neutral and therefore off-limits country.\n\nThe entire narrated story of what Willard sees and does as he is ferried up the Da Nang river by an undisciplined and terrorised navy patrol boat crew to murder Kurtz is a grand metaphor for the excesses, decadence and ultimately the weakness of the Anglo-Saxon psyche: If we don't understand something, and we are unable to control it, exterminate it. Kurtz had eventually come to know this.\n\nUnless you pay complete attention to every emotional gesture, to every word of the dialogue between the protagonists, especially in the scene where the two of them are alone in Kurtz's darkened lair, you will miss one of the central themes of this incredible movie. Kurtz's subtle deal with his executioner, his unilateral 'surrender' in return for Willard agreeing (did he nod?) to tell Kurtz's 'son' (another metaphor for us, the next generation, the ones watching the movie) the truth about all the horrors that they had both seen in Vietnam, is mind-expanding stuff.The bonding between the two men whilst Kurtz cross-examines Willard,--interlaced with some of his own horror stories, is incredible, nay, genius, film. The closing (intercut)scene of the ritual slaughter of a sacrificial bull is the single most powerful of symbols. Coppolla has made, intentionally or not, the ultimate anti-war statement, one that should resonate through the ages.", u'-0.0951337', u"\n'Apocalypse Now Redux', Francis Ford Coppola's war opus is probably the most beautiful war film I have ever seen. Capt. Benjamin Willard (Martin Sheen) is a Vietnam soldier who is tapped to head a very dangerous and highly classified mission into Cambodia to 'terminate the position' of Col. Kurtz (Marlon Brando), a highly ranked and highly regarded army man who seemingly has gone completely insane and defected from the army, setting up his own little society and helped by a cultish following of soldiers. Escorting him up the river to Cambodia is a handful of navy men, and along the way, they encounter several interesting people (most notably is Robert Duvall's Kilgore, a badass lieutenant colonel with a few screws loose) and some horrifying situations. \n\n'Apocalypse' is less historical war film than a philosophical and psychological study. It is more 'Full Metal Jacket' than 'Platoon'. The running time of 'Apocalypse' is over three hours, but the film is so wonderfully paced and compelling that when the end of the film arrived, I was actually surprised at the amount of time that had passed. The beautiful cinematography is surely what stood out the most for me, however. After seeing this film, I am convinced that Coppola is one of the masters of light and photography in film history. The 'Godfather' films were all tinged with an almost sepia tone, and shadows created the feeling of a Baroque composition. With 'Apocalypse', there is an incredible usage of natural light, and the shadows, particularly in the scenes involving Brando and Sheen, almost become a living character, they are so pervasive and effective. Another gorgeous scene was when Cpt. Willard and Jay Hicks (Frederic Forrest) were in the jungle looking for mangoes, and come across a tiger. The sheer enormity of the surrounding foliage (leaves as big as a house) made the characters almost Lilliputian, but the colorization of the scene was incredible. While everything else was almost a muted grey, the leaves were an incredibly vibrant green, an effect that was particularly striking. Another really minor positive moment in the film was the great scene when the helicopters carrying Duvall and company attack the small village while playing Wagner. This could have just been an ultra-dramatic underlying soundtrack to the scene, but instead Coppola turns the song into an actual part of the scene, with Duvall mentioning that he likes to play it while they are approaching to 'scare the hell out of them'. \n\nThe performances in 'Apocalypse' are first class. Much has been made of the amount of money Brando earned for the film, and the amount of trouble he caused. Regardless of this, he turned out a powerful performance for a relatively short amount of screen time. Sheen is completely outstanding - this is the first time I have seen him really unleash in a film \x96 and Duvall is a lot of fun to watch as the loony Kilgore. 'Apocalypse Now' is a film that is so pervasive in pop culture by now (most know several choice lines from the film, 'I love the smell of napalm in the morning' et al) but I knew little enough about it that there were plenty of surprises left to experience. I have not seen the original cut of 'Apocalypse Now' so I cannot compare it to this newer cut, but this is a film that should most certainly be experienced. 8/10\n\n--Shelly\n", u'0.494383', u"\nFrancis Ford Coppola's Apocalypse Now is a pure example of method filmmaking. It is the true craftmanship of an essential filmmaker. The art direction, editing and sound effects are partially a small fragment which makes this film classical and memorable. What drives the integrity and semblance of the film is the storyline, acting and inner message. The inner message evidently enough is that war is hell, or in other words, hell is war. Not many directors have the ambition or the true courage to establish such a well-defined piece of art. European filmmakers wouldn't have the slightest problem of directing the film or throw in their personal feelings about the war. What is most interesting is that an American filmmaker spoke his style and the style of the film's collaborators through the continuance of the film.\n\n The plot is fairly simple and brief, adapted by Joseph Conrad's Heart Of Darkness. Martin Sheen plays the role of Captain Willard, a war-torn character who does not see any hope in life or humanity anymore. He has a mission and it is to capture a presumed Colonel Kurtz (Marlon Brando) who has fabricated an army of existensial soldiers on the outskirts of the Cambodian jungle. Throughout the film we encounter astonishing sequences. The most unforgettable is the dawn helicopter attacks. Robert Duvall's character Colonel Kilgore is a steady and firm example of the basic American army brain: to search and destroy and then destroy some more if it includes yourself. The children walk about the playground, oblivious to any danger. The helicopters come into view from the dawning sea; millions of sprinkle reflect from the water, we hear the helicopter's engines roar from the horizon and soon enough we are stuck in a messy attack. Throughout the sequence we hear Wagner's 'Ride Of The Valkyries'. It is method filmmaking. The starting sequence is as fascinating as the rest of the movie; a beautiful scene of palm trees blowing in the ragged wind and seconds away from being inflamed with a carpet bombing. Let's not forget the scene where the soldiers of the boat in which Sheen travels in, stop an innocent upcoming boat, suspecting them to be VietCongs and carrying artilleries. Then they spark off a heavy scene of shooting in which all of the passengers of the boat are pulverised to pieces with their crops and food savaged in the atrocity.\n\n This film has its famous moment, some better to be kept quiet about until they come through the screen. It doesn't require any intellectual understanding, although the film is intellectually remarkable. The American soldiers in the Vietnam War jumped into the land of a fresh governmental country, aiming to protect themselves and in the end only received death and chaos for their troops and for the majority of the country they were fighting against. It was a war gone mad, like all other wars, without purpose or dignity. It was a pure act of humanity: to destroy and restore their own greedy needs. This is a film in which there is no saviour, where it is hardly possible to find hope in the gloomiest corners and where all surroundings are plagued with the infatuations of greed, anger, foolishness and egoism. As Coppola once said about the film: 'This film isn't about Vietnam. This film IS Vietnam'. He was right to the date. During the current situations of the world, where they are trying to protect their own skin, the world should try to analyse this film as much as possible and wonder about what it is trying to represent. It is a film which does not ask for applause or damnation. It asks for realism.\n\nEnjoy.\n\n", u'0.00281545', u"\nSo just how insane is 'Apocalypse Now'?  Well, let's say that it is the kind of film that makes you want to bang your head against the wall.  The beginning has no credits or titles; nothing.  The whole film seems like it's taking place on a different world, and as the story moves on, sanity itself is shed.  There was a French plantation scene that got cut out, and an alternate ending that would have had a massive battle scene outside Kurtz's compound.\n\n'Apocalypse Now' is not a realistic film in the sense that the presentation of the Vietnam War is far from correct: helicopters going in BEFORE the napalm strikes, a USO show in the jungle at night, and the final bridge all lit-up like a Christmas tree.  (for more realistic 'Nam War movies, try 'The Deer Hunter' or 'Platoon')\n\nBut what 'Apocalypse Now' lacks in historical accuracy, it makes up in artistic and dramatic scripting.  Some of the best photography and lighting ever can be found here.\n\nThe film also raises some severe philosophical issues, and gives us entirely new ones.  When the movie begins, the war is raging around us.  It is chaotic and nerve-racking, yet still rational.  When we finally get to Kurtz's base, the action has died down, but rational thinking has long since been vanquished to the point of total lunacy.  This shows us the truth about men of war in times of war and peace.  The voyage down the river has a sense of time travel (a sense that would have been much more apparent had the French Plantation scene remained.)  And when you get to the end, keep in mind the old phrase: The King is dead...  Long live the king.\n\nIs Kurtz insane?  Or are we not yet ready to understand him?  These questions and more are up to you as 'Apocalypse Now has no easy answers. ", u'-0.081046', u'This movie changed the art of film making, telling a complex story in a powerful new way. The film mixes brutal realism with fantasy, intercutting a modern war with strange scenes full of technicolour smoke. The film uses music not as a score laid in later, but as a practical part of the scene playing from speakers, radios etc. Coppola uses a classic piece of literature as inspiration, taking scenes and characters, and putting them into entirely different surroundings. That is a tricky and brave thing to do. Then he takes a superstar, Brando, pays him a fortune, and films him so that you can barely see his face. The pure guts that such a move requires is astounding, and it works beautifully. This movie belongs in the top ten.', u'0.794086', u"\nSomewhere on IMDb there is a discussion about the greatest director of all times (Spielberg, Copolla and others are named there). The greatest argument was around Spielberg and whether he is or isn't a great director. The problem with Spielberg is that while he is a master technician, most of his films lack depth.Saving Ryan is really outstanding from a technical point of view, but its message is dull and while its very entertaining, it doesn't make you think about anything. AN is the best movie I ever saw because it combines great shooting with a deep philosophical perspective on so many things, starting from war in general, the clash of civilizations, the condition of soldier in wartimes (is a soldier a hero or an assassin? Brando says he is neither, the french lady says he is both ...) and many others. The problem with some people is that they try to argue about whether these points are true or false. But a great movie, and a great piece of art in general is supposed to spark arguments, not to solve them ... Maybe Coppola is right, or maybe he isn't, nobody holds the truth anyway. You can watch this movie for its outer beauty, amazing scenes, great acting and memorable quotes and you will be entirely satisfied. But what really make this movie a masterpiece is its inner quality. You can't help but make a comparison with the recent Fahrenheit documentary.Both Copolla and Moore tackle similar issues, but while Copolla presents matters from an outside , objective point of view, Moore takes a very partisan position that really compromises the whole point of a documentary ... It is really a shame that a film like Fahrenheit 9/11 won a prestigious award like Cannes. But anyway, if you want to start to understand a little of the Vietnam war, the Iraq war, the second World War and any war in general, you should definitely see this movie, and not the other one ...\n", u'0.215035', u'After the success of the first two \'Godfather\' films in 1972 and 1974 respectively, Francis Ford Coppola embarked on an ambitious attempt to bring home the reality of the war in Vietnam, which had concluded with the fall of Saigon to the Vietcong in 1975\x85 The plot was loosely based on the book \'Heart of Darkness,\' a story by Joseph Conrad about Kurtz, a trading company agent in the African jungle who has acquired mysterious powers over the natives\x85Coppola retains much of this, including such details as the severed heads outside Kurtz\'s headquarters and his final words, "The horror\x85 the horror\x85" \n\nIn the film, Sheen plays an army captain given the mission to penetrate into Cambodia, and eliminate, with "extreme prejudice," a decorated officer who has become an embarrassment to the authorities\x85 On his journey up the river to the renegade\'s camp he experiences the demoralization of the US forces, high on dope or drunk with power\x85 \n\nAlthough, as a result of cuts forced on Coppola, the film was accused of incoherence when first released, it was by the most serious attempt to get to grips with the experience of Vietnam and a victorious reinvention of the war film genre\x85 In 1980 the film won an Oscar for Best Cinematography and Best Sound\x85 \n\n"Apocalypse Now" was re-released in 2001 with fifty minutes restored\x85 As a result, the motion picture can now be seen as the epic masterpiece it is\x85', u'0.909949', u"From all of the Vietnam war movies this is probably the most frightening and disturbing and that is really saying a lot with so many spectacular ones that have come out. It has this freakish feel to it. Everything is so chaotic in the movie it scares you. It is not like it shows a lot of different things compared to the other Vietnam war movies. What does push to such a high level is the: \n\nThe directing was spectacular here. Francis Ford Coppola shows of his talent in his last epic movie. Unlike other directors he makes you feel as if you are in the war. Most others just display and show you the horrors of war. Coppola though makes you feel confused, shocked and scared. These feelings of war are usually told to us from a movie or story. This is something that I have only experienced very few times while watching a film. The writing was of course amazing too. It brought you write into the middle of the movie. It never made me bored and this movie is three hours. The cinematography goes hand in hand with the directing which very much added to the freakish experience of watching this film showing all the chaos around you even when everything seems calm.\n\nThe acting was bone-chilling. Just look at Marlon Brando also giving his last great performance playing a deluded, out of whack colonel. When ever I think of a crazy gone made soldier I think Marlon Brando in Apocalpyse Now. With Brando n this film you don't want to look into his eyes. Like the movie he was freakish. To me this performance is as memorable as the one he gave in The Godfather. Martin Sheen gave a very deep performance and probably the best one of his career making you see everything through his eyes all the craziness he is experiencing and yet wanting him to get to his goal. It is just a wonder why these two did not get Oscar nominations. Robert Duvall was able to show part of that craziness with his ludicrous battle strategies, among those playing music to tell the enemy he is coming. Also Duvall's character asking one of the soldiers to surf in the middle of a battle was just shocking but believable. Other great supporting performances were given by a young Laurence Fishburne, Sam Bottoms and Frederic Forest who all summed up the attitudes of many of the soldiers at that time without becoming a clich\xe9. Also for once cameos were put into good use having Dennis Hopper and Harrison Ford who I both love.\n\nI would definitely recommend people to watch this movie. It has a message and everyone involved in the making of it is at their best. There is nothing more I could ask of this movie with its great acting, directing, writing, cinematography and great ending. Watch and you will see why it lives up to its title Apocalpyse Now.", u'0.0448691', u'Well, I\'ve watched this movie for over 25 years now and it\'s still almost as interesting as when I first saw it. It is definitely one of the most unique films ever made.\n\nI still think Martin Sheen got "dissed" big-time in the billing, too. He dominates the film yet gets lesser billing than Marlon Brando, who only appears in the last 30 minutes of this 2 hours, 17 minutes film (theatrical version). How unfair is that?\n\nSheen is fantastic in here, especially his narration, which runs throughout. It\'s one of the best narrations, if not THE best, I have ever heard in a movie. His voice is just haunting as he relates his thoughts on this incredible, nightmare-like adventure. I never fail to appreciate his work in this movie.\n\nThe other thing that strikes me about the film over the years are the number of memorable scenes, ones I have never forgotten, such as......\n\nSheen losing it in his hotel room in the movie\'s first scene; Robert Duvall and the totally out-of-place surfing scenes and then the ensuing attack with Wagner\'s dramatic classical music blaring out of the helicopters; The Playboy bunny entertaining the troops; Frederic Forrest being freaked out seeing a tiger close up in the jungle; the weird scenes on the long riverboat ride; the appearance of hippie journalist Dennis Hopper greeting the crew in Cambodia and then Brando\'s bizarre character. It goes on and on with strange scenes.\n\nThat\'s not to say I enjoyed everything. No, there are a few very unpleasant scenes, such as the one in which an ox is sliced in half (can\'t watch that anymore), an innocent family is slaughtered on a small boat by Sheen\'s young stoned-out crew, and the crew is a little too goofy at times. Then, there is the huge amount of profanity, led by way too many f-words.\n\nSo, there is a lot of good and a lot of bad things in this movie for almost anyone who watches this One thing for sure: it is a film you WILL remember!', u'0.0194463'], u'tt0080684': [u"\nThe Empire Strikes Back is the best film in the original Star Wars trilogy. It has all the great qualities that the original Star Wars has: great effects (at the time of its release), appealing characters, and lots of spellbinding action.  It also has eliminated some of the problems that plagued the first: the storyline is tighter, and goes much deeper into character development.  The performances are terrific, especially by Harrison Ford as Han Solo, and Billy Dee Williams as Lando Calrissian. George Lucas has also remembered to include a spellbinding battle sequence with the snowspeeder sequence near the beginning of the film.  The conclusion, with a lightsaber duel between Darth Vader and Luke Skywalker, is truly one of the most suspenseful and dramatic scenes in the entire series.  This is a truly wondrous film, and serves as a constant reminder that just because a movie is expensive and a blockbuster doesn't mean that it has to be shallow and two dimensional.  This film will undoubtedly entertain viewers of all ages from start to finish. ", u'0.659516', u"\n`It avoids having the standard shoot-'em-up ending,' says a friend of mine, `by not having an ending.'  I suppose this is what most people think, but all the same the film manages to form a satisfying whole; or at least, a whole that satisfies me.  I'm therefore inclined to think it DOES have an ending.  Obviously, I can't discuss this without giving things away to those few who don't know what happens.  If you're one of those few, then believe me: your ignorance is precious enough to be worth guarding until you see the film.  Stop reading now.\n\nAfter the surprise attack on the rebel base, Luke Skywalker splits with Han, Leia, et al.  Han's party gets away first (is it just me, or is the shot of Luke watching the Falcon flying off while he stands stranded on the ground, a poignant one?), but thereafter they face one narrow escape after another, while Luke slinks off quietly and safely to train with Yoda.\n\nThe training scenes are many and Yoda talks a great deal of rubbish.  But somehow it doesn't matter.  The film is ambivalent in its attitude towards Yoda, anyway.  Our sympathy clearly lies with the entirely non-spiritual concerns of Han, Leia and the adolescent Luke.  The main story concerns the understanding that builds between Han and Leia.  In the end they are honest with one another; and if Han's being frozen and shipped back to Tatooine is the price to pay for this, well, it's the price to pay.  It was very important NOT to end with the dashing rescue that opens `Return of the Jedi', which would be dramatically beside the point.  Instead we end with the promise that the rescue will some day occur.  That's enough.\n\nAs for Luke: he abandons Yoda to rescue Han and Leia, and achieves NOTHING WHATEVER.  This was my favourite touch.  All five Jedis - Luke, Obi-Wan, Yoda, Vader, and the Emperor - find that their conflicting instincts are all entirely wrong.  The film is really about the temporary triumph of human impulses over the mystical Force.  Luke's human idealism is vindicated, but his supernatural powers, just this once, are not.\n\nWhen George Lucas gave his Star Wars trilogy a fresh coat of varnish in 1997 he felt he had to justify the expense by making needless changes.  You'll notice he made precious few changes to episode V.  There just wasn't room. He added a few extra shots of the ice monster, which of course weakened that one scene; but even with those changes in place the Special Edition is virtually identical to the original edition.  Since Lucas was so keen on making changes wherever he could this is obviously a tribute to the tightness of the story and the direction.  It's also a tribute to the perfection of the original special effects, more innovative than the effects in the first Star Wars movie and better than the effects in any subsequent one.", u'-0.0177209', u"\nThe Rebellion has struck an important blow to the power of the Empire by destroying it's Death Star, however the power of the Dark Side of the Force remains strong and continues to hunt the rebellion.  While the Rebellion base on Hoth is under treat, Luke has gone to a distant swamp planet to receive further Jedi training from Master Yoda.  However the power of the dark side should not be underestimated and many dark truths are revealed as the threat of the Empire looms large.\n\nFollowing Star Wars was never going to be easy but this is actually better.  Empire retains the same characters and the same sense of fun that the first had \x96 the battle on Hoth is just one of THE moments of the series.  However what gets added to that is a much darker strand.  The Empire is not beaten by the destruction of one ship \x96 it's power is barely dented in fact.  This sees some startling revelations (I won't spoil it in case you've been living under a rock!) but also sees significant blows to the rebellion.  In fact the ending of this film could not be more different from the end of Star Wars.\n\nLike the recent episode two this follows two strands \x96 the more pedestrian scenes with Luke and Yoda and the more action based scenes with Han and company.  The scenes with Yoda add depth to the film and hint at the truth.  Meanwhile the other half is a lot more action orientated and has comedy and good new characters such as Bobba Fett.  The two work well together and come together well for a great finale.  The addition of a dark strand to the film makes it all the better as it can be enjoyed as a story and not just a fun sci-fi film with good effects.\n\nThe characters are better here than the first.  The strong characters from the first (Han, C3P0 et al) are all still good here.  However we also get a much more interesting version of Luke as he continues his journey into becoming a full Jedi.  Yoda is a good addition (despite sounding like Fozzie Bear!) and Darth Vader becomes a lot more than just a good villain \x96 we learn his past, a revelation then, but a thing of common knowledge now.\n\nOverall this is as good as Star Wars at it's heart, but the darker nature of the film makes it much better.  Where the first one was a victorious uprising this is, as the title suggests, the time in history where the Empire strikes back against the uprising.  All the music, characters and things that make Star Wars Star Wars are here and it's simply one of the best of the series to date.", u'0.258597', u"\nMy five children were all pre-teens when 'The Empire Strikes Back' came to the theater. While there had been other Sci-Fi movies with a theme of conflict in outer space, the 'Star Wars' trilogy filled our imaginations like no other movies before them. The fantastic, strange worlds were presented almost like we were there too. Aliens sitting around a tavern, enjoying drinks and speaking in all sorts of languages. Nothing before had approached the sheer size of the space ships depicted here, huge cities traveling all over the galaxy. And how about the jump to hyper speed, then disappearing from the screen as the speed exceeds light speed! And the light sabres of the Jedi Knights. The Jedi Knights, a striking parallel to the Japanese Samurai.\n\nIt is fruitless trying to argue 'which is best' in a trilogy, because the first one, in this case 'Star Wars', starts it all and has to be the 'father'. However, an argument can be made that 'The Empire Strikes Back' (now on DVD called Episode V) is overall a better-made movie which has more excitement, and grabs your imagination,than the other two original installments (now called parts IV and VI). The DVDs finally came out last month, and they are near perfect, as we should expect from Lucas Films and THX. The bit rate is high, and the picture is nothing short of superb. As is the Dolby EX surround track. \n\nMy wife and I watched all three of the movies on DVD this week -- Star Wars, Empire Strikes Back, and Return of the Jedi -- compliments of our local public library. It was an appropriate reminder how good these movies are, and still ahead of their time. Nothing else has been made to compare to them.\n", u'0.218223', u"\nIn a film like The Empire Strikes Back, especially a few years on the heels of such a mind-bogglingly great film like the original Star Wars, there is something that comes immediately to mind that would at first seem to count against the film, but instead only winds up increasing the respect that it commands. In the 1977 Star Wars, there is a clear reliance on simplicity in some parts. Obviously, it is much more than a simply made science fiction film, but like I said in my review of it, there was a lot of highly effective reliance on things that were not put on screen, such as Obi Wan's description of The Force to Luke. In The Empire Strike Back, the first thing that we are treated to is the traditional scrolling text along a background of stars, depicting what has happened between the last film and this one, and reminding us of the things that were mentioned in the last film but never explained.\n\nAt first, this would almost seem to be a way to save money to get more information across to the audience without having to actually put it on screen, but this is really an ingenious way of furthering the story. The very fact that we are so willing to read all this information and forgive our inability to actually see it is a testament to the quality of the series, even at this early stage in its presentation, and we know the story so well from the first film that we are glad to see such a large change in what's happening in the films, not for a second lamenting the fact that we have obviously missed so much action. And besides that, if and when George Lucas runs out of new prequels to release, and maybe if he someday begins to run low on how many hundreds of millions of dollars he has, he could go right back and make these in-between scenes into full length films. What would he call these, if he did that? Introquels? Who cares! The names themselves would be interesting enough, and if you go back and read the stuff that introduces this film, it's obvious that there's an entire film there just waiting to be made. I guess the question of actors would be a formidable one, though.\n\nThe Empire Strikes Back is the film where we are first introduced to the great Jedi master Yoda (`Away put your weapon!'), as well as some of the most thrilling battle sequences of the entire Star Wars series, and that includes the prequels. The battle scene where the rebels fight the Imperial Walkers on the ice planet is an incredibly well-made battle scene, not only in the way that it was put together so convincingly using models, but that the machines themselves are so creatively made. Indeed, the Imperial Walkers are some of the most recognizable machines from the entire Star Wars saga, right up there with the Millennium Falcon and the Death Star.\n\n\nI have just watched this film again, having already seen Episode I and Episode II, and not having seen any of the original Star Wars films for maybe 10 years (except for the original 1977 Star Wars, which I saw and reviewed a few days ago - and these aren't even the Special Edition versions!). When I first saw Yoda when watching The Empire Strikes Back again, I was really struck by how different he looked from in the newer movies. Obviously, he's completely computer generated in the new films, but here in Episode V he looks like a muppet! Even so, I would like to express my opinion that Yoda is more realistic and more interesting here as a puppet than in the newer films as a computer generated image. At least here in the older films you know that he's actually THERE, and that he's not just added into the film later.\n\nOh yeah, speaking of Yoda, can I just complain for a minute? What the hell was up with the Jedi training? Yes, I realize that I'm just a lowly IMDb reviewer, while The Empire Strikes Back is a part of the greatest science fiction series of all time, but would it have killed George Lucas to write in a little more creative training for Luke? The thing that struck me first about the Star Wars films when I first started watching them was how incredibly imaginative they were, but then Luke started his training. You know, when I was in high school I played football. I was a wide receiver/tight end and I hardly ever got to play because I was too tall and too skinny, but part of my workout was to carry the linemen up and down the stairs to the weight room. Some of these guys weighed 100 pounds more than me, and I still almost never saw the field, and here's Luke Skywalker. He carries Yoda around this boggy swamp and he gets to be a Jedi! What the hell!\n\nThere is also the addition of a surprisingly fitting love story. First of all, anyone who has ever read my review of a Jerry Bruckheimer movie will know that I am not the biggest fan of cramming a love story into a movie where it doesn't belong. I can't seem to write anything about Bruckheimer movies without complaining about the idiot love story, and now it's even worse because here's this movie that was made so long before, from which Bruckheimer could obviously have at least learned a LITTLE bit about how to do it right. Han Solo and Princess Leia maintain the personalities that they developed in the first Star Wars film and there is now a sort of love/hate relationship between the two of them, where neither one of them wants to admit their feelings for the other. This romantic subplot is characterized perfectly in the scene just before Solo is carbon frozen, when Leia risks approaching a cheesy romantic moment by saying `I love you' just before Han is lowered into the freezing chamber, and he saves the moment by responding, `I know.' Han Solo. Smart-ass to the last drop.\n\nBefore I end I would like to point out that the goofs that can be found on the IMDb for this film are some of the most blatant that I've ever seen in a\nfilm. The scene where you can see someone giving a woman at the tactical maps a cue to deliver her lines is amazingly obvious, and some of the other ones, such as the stage hand swinging the light saber prop briefly into view as he switches it for an `off' prop with Luke just after he knocks Darth Vader over backwards, are just as much fun to look for. I have one question about the goofs, though. There's one where Luke looks off into the fog just after R2-D2 is eaten by the sea monster, and you can CLEARLY see a person running to the right a little ways off in the fog. Is that meant to be Luke? It seems that it's supposed to be him running in his search for R2, because you can even hear the FOOTSTEPS of the person running. I can't even IMAGINE how they could have missed THAT!!\n\nIt is, however, a testament to the quality of a film when such tremendous oversights in editing do nothing to take away from the overall quality of the film. The Empire Strikes Back remains an extremely powerful and well-made installment in the Star Wars series, not taking even a single step backwards in the sheer breathtaking adventure of the original film. It's not often that a film as good as Star Wars can be released and then followed up with a sequel that is just as great, as is clearly the case here. Star Wars was a gigantic film upon its release, and with The Empire Strikes Back, Lucas has begun the formation of one of the greatest film series' in cinematic history.", u'-0.0647186', u"An excellent sequel to Star Wars, this is easily the darkest and most serious out of all the Star Wars films, at least until Revenge of the Sith comes out. This movie benefits from the introduction of Yoda, a diminutive yet wise Jedi master who helps Luke prepare for his showdown with Darth Vader. It also introduces Lando Calrissian, Han's old gambling and smuggling buddy played very well by Billy Dee Williams. Empire is more character driven than the original and relies more on comic relief to help lighten the mood, but it doesn't go overboard with the humor. The story is more refined and the acting is better as well. Despite all of this I can't really say that I enjoyed Empire more than the original. The original Star Wars has a certain charm to it that none of the sequels (or prequels) have captured. I'd say that it is at least on par with the original though and is a fitting follow up in what is probably the greatest series of movies in the history of cinema.", u'0.357431', u'\nThe sequel to Star Wars is argueably the best of all the Star Wars films.This is much darker than the 1st one.Look for the Super Star Destroyer,it is a awesome ship.Boba Fett makes his fist appearence here.The chase scene the M.Falcon is being chased down by the Star Destroyers and Tie Fighters is really a cool scene.I f you like the 1st Star Wars then you will love this one!\n\nNote: The special edition has added scenes,special effects,sounds,and creatures. To ME the highlight of this special edition is seeing the Wampa monster!', u'0.857236', u'I cannot believe some people out there didn\'t like this film, yet claim to have enjoyed Episode One. No comparison whatsoever. "The Empire Strike Back" is George Lucas\' best contribution to human history, and it will be remembered long after most other science fiction films have gone the way of the Do-Do Bird. The optical effects still stand the test of time, and the acting is superb. Harrison Ford, Mark Hamil and Carrie Fisher are all better than they we in the original Star Wars, having fully developed and grown into their characters, and the story just keeps going and going, from asteroid fields to swamp planets to cities in the sky, everything in this film works. So ignore anyone who claims to dislike it, and see it for yourself if you haven\'t already done so. 20 out of 10!!\n\nOh, and Han Solo shot first! =)', u'0.0745848', u'SPOILERS Three years after "Star Wars", creator George Lucas released the second part of his trilogy. Giving scripting credits to Leigh Brackett and Lawrence Kasden, as well as directing to Irvin Kershner, Lucas made his smartest ever decision and as a result was able to release the finest film of the trilogy by a mile. Considerably darker and more mature than it\'s predecessor, "The Empire Strikes Back" is a masterpiece of modern film. It is an intense, powerful, entertaining film with the ultimate cinema twist and with a script worthy of it\'s potential.\n\nAfter the events of the first film, Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill) and Han Solo (Harrison Ford) are now members of the rebel alliance. Hidden on a frozen planet, the rebels hide from the domineering glow of the Empire. All is not well however as the evil Darth Vader (voiced by James Earl Jones) is on his way to find them.\n\nEasily the best of the trilogy, "The Empire Strikes Back" has so much going for it. A wonderful plot, an equally good script with some brilliant lines (even actor Harrison Ford joining in with a line or two of his own) and special effects to match, this film is a glowing example of why people love the trilogy so much.\n\nSince George Lucas passed on the major responsibilities for this film, we are given a more professional, well made film for our attention and Lucas\'s vision is better off for it. With it\'s recent remastering, it is also the only film in the trilogy to not be damaged by Lucas\' tampering. Extra images are added, graphics are honed, but nothing major is changed. As a result the film appears to us to be no different from it\'s original self.\n\nDarker and more mature as well, this sequel is better than the original "Star Wars" because it isn\'t so black and white. Presenting the evil Darth Vader as a more balanced individual, we don\'t quite have the confused Vader of the final chapter, but we are beginning to get signs that he isn\'t quite as we expected.\n\nThis second part also gives us the finest performance ever by one of the universes most important characters. Still a rubber puppet with bendy ears, Jedi Master Yoda is introduced in this film as a creature of wit and intelligence. Voiced by Frank Oz, Yoda is brilliant because of his lines. Legendarily possessing of an obsession for splitting sentences up and rehashing them together, Yoda very often speaks normally throughout this film. Occasionally demonstrating his penchant for bad English, he does make a few minor errors, but ultimately it is up to the later scripts of George Lucas to corrupt Yoda\'s style and turn this wonderful character into an annoying figure of fun.\n\nThere\'s no real way to fault "The Empire Strikes Back". The finest part of the original trilogy, this film is amazing because it is professionally done. Nobody would ever deny that George Lucas did something wonderful when he thought up "Star Wars", but unfortunately for a lot of the films, Lucas always insisted on too much control. A dire writer of scripts, Lucas can destroy his films by making them infuriating to watch. In this part though, Lucas didn\'t get involved and as a result, "The Empire Strikes Back" is a masterpiece in it\'s own right.', u'0.202984', u'\nWhile the Titanic made all the rich people (with the exception of Molly Brown and Rose) automatically uncaring, snobby, and thoughtless just because they were rich and needed a couple of villains for the story, The Empire Strikes Back did not portray "the villain" in a completely evil light. Sympathy is induced when we see the back of Darth Vader\'s scarred and pasty head.  When he tells Luke of their blood relationship, some feeling is allowed to creep in, telling us that he is not just some maniacal killing machine, but a human, fallen from grace, yet able to retain some sense of love, however twisted it may be.', u'-0.424331', u'\n(Note: This review contains some spoilers.)\n\nMovie novelty quickly wears thin, which is why so many sequels pale in comparison to their originals. "Star Wars: Episode V: The Empire Strikes Back" is the best of the original "Star Wars" trilogy, darker and deeper and even more powerful than the first film. Granted, the original pioneered an endless saga of imitators and somewhat imaginative knock-offs, and is still one of the greatest films ever made, but "The Empire Strikes Back" is a tiny inch ahead in the race.\n\nIt is the dark middle chapter in an almost perfect trilogy, crammed full with imagination and special effects. It is simply one of the most visionary movies of all time, which is rare for a sequel -- any sequel -- especially in the case of a sci-fi film. Just take a look at "Predator 2" for an example of an idea running out of steam, or a director who cannot cope with his script.\n\nThe film generally picks up where the last left off: Luke (Mark Hamill) saved the day by blowing up the Death Star, the heroes were awarded with medals by the princess (Carrie Fisher), and peace was temporarily restored. But Darth Vader (voice of James Earl Jones) is still alive, and the Emperor\'s fury grows stronger as Luke begins his Jedi training under the help of Yoda. Meanwhile, Han Solo (Harrison Ford) and Leia flee to Cloud City to escape an attack from the empire, where they are taken under the wing of Lando Calrissian (Billy Dee Williams), an old pal of Han\'s who is secretly working for Vader, somewhat against his own will.\n\nThe movie is strong in its morals and Biblical metaphors, just as the original. Luke is the savior, Calrissian could be considered the equivalent of Judas, Han Solo is one of Luke\'s good disciples and Vader represents pure evil. And of course, there\'s the truly iconic line, "I am your father," that is relevant to the devil, who -- according to the scriptures -- was an angel before being cast into the bowels of hell and becoming Lucifer.\n\n\nLucas admittedly used these various metaphors to strike a nerve in the subconscious of his viewers. Like all good fables, of fantasy or reality, "Star Wars" is a trilogy that relates to just about everyone, in one form or another, and is -- at its roots -- a story we are all very familiar with. It is the ever-familiar notion of good-vs. -evil at its core that helps propel these movies into the hearts of many. Yes, "Star Wars" is the quintessential nerd\'s film, engulfed in an entirely different dimension, but the film\'s bad rap for this is undeserved -- it\'s still a wonderful story, and you don\'t have to be a die-hard fan to appreciate its fine points (and it has many).\n\nOne of the most popular legends (and misconceptions) regarding the "Star Wars" phenomenon is that George Lucas helmed the entire Star Wars trilogy, when in fact he only directed the first and wrote the screenplay for all three combined. "The Empire Strikes Back" is directed by Irvin Kirshner, who also delivered us the disappointing "RoboCop 2." How could one sequel be so great, and the other so bad? Simple: Kirshner\'s darkness in "The Empire Strikes Back" had a point, and a high value. In "RoboCop 2," it was just excessive and silly, not to mention totally unnecessary. What Paul Verhoeven was able to do with the original "RoboCop" was something not many films can accomplish, and Kirshner tried to add on to this with a darker narrative, which only ended in a frustratingly empty motion picture.\n\n"The Empire Strikes Back" has a point amidst the action, and is the most important of all three "Star Wars" movies. It has the famous introduction of the creature Yoda, who sits tucked away in his hut on a swamp planet, at first startling Luke with his strange features, and then with his subtle wisdom. It is Yoda who trains Luke in the ways of the Jedi, and eventually leads him towards his destination: The showdown with Vader, when the infamous secret is finally revealed.\n\nThe movie is expertly crafted, both in terms of a a narrative and literal context. From beginning to end it is darker, fiercer and more powerful than the original film, which is not an easy feat. All trilogies have their dark areas, and this is usually the middle chapter ("Back to the Future Part II" is a good example), yet in "The Empire Strikes Back" the darkness seems very appropriate given the material. It is a film that dwells long and hard on betrayal, murder, revenge, and unrecoverable mistakes. By the end of the movie, we know what Luke is feeling: There is still much to be done, despite an overwhelming emotional downpour of attachment and confusion. For us, as an audience, we know everything must come to an end within the next installment. For Luke, it could be an eternity of struggle. But we all know there will be an end to the epic saga, and we have always known this, ever since we first caught a glimpse of a younger, more innocent Luke working for his uncle on that deserted planet, so many years ago, when he could only dream of having adventures in other galaxies far, far away...\n\n5/5 stars.\n\n- John Ulmer', u'-0.00062651', u"I literally watched this movie about twenty times when I first got it, VHS , a box-set of the original three. But this one is best! It was the most exciting, it kept you on the edge of your seat and your mind the whole way through. Although, I have to say, Lucas has become very lazy in the Star Wars saga since the Phantom Menace, which was quite poor. This is vintage Lucas and this your vintage space movie. Star Wars (any of the original 3 and Episode 3) is a must see! It includes many household names. Some, though, hate Star Wars with a vengeance. Those people lack in creativity and are subject to boring, lack-luster films. All I can say is have fun because I know you won't for missing out on this 5-star, one of a kind classic. Must see, it's too great for a 10 out of 10 rating. It was way ahead of its time. It's a film of the ages and has caliber modern films dream to re-create!", u'0.345306', u"''Star Wars: Episode V - The Empire Strikes Back '' is my favorite one from all the star war series.\n\nThings are getting more and more complicated for the Rebels.Spite of the fact that the Death Star was destroyed, the Imperial troops had success expelling the Rebels from their secret base, and now they are being hunted in all galaxy. The new secret base is localized in Hoth, a very cold world even for the native animals. Darth Vader wants to find Luke at any cost, and now he sent many remote probes to find him in all space. Luke is attacked by a big animal and almost dies, by stays lost in the ice. He sees the ghost of Obi Wan Kenobi talking with him, and he says that Luke needs to go to a system called Dangoba, where Yoda will teach and explain to him all the steps to become a Jedi. Han Solo goes after Luke and they both are saved by their rebel team.\n\nThe system Hoth is discovered by the Empire(since it should not have any human form living in there) and consequently the Rebel Base. Darth Vader decides to attack the Rebels by the surface,and the Rebels really stay in disadvantage. Han,Leia,C3pO and Chewbacca escapes from Hoth,but after many attacks from the Imperial troops and even asteroids fields, they arrive in the Cloud city that Lando,an old friend of Han,rules.\n\nLuke goes with R2 to Dangoba,and there he finds Yoda. The problem is, Yoda does not want to teach him how to become a Jedi,since he finds Luke extremely impatient, old to be trained and also with many anger inside of him,like his father Anakin. Obi Wan tries to change Yoda's mind, but only when Luke promises to really gives his best that Yoda accepts the challenge.\n\nThe Emperor talks to Vader about a disturbance in the force that comes from Luke Skywalker. He finally says that Luke is son of Anakin and that Luke should never be trained as a Jedi,because of the risk in destroying the siths,that are very high. But Vader has other plans: He always imagined that his offspring died when Padme died, and now he thinks about making Luke a sith,to they both rule the galaxy together and also kill the Emperor.\n\nIn the city of the clouds, Lando betrays Han and gives them all to Vader.It's all a trap to take Luke that Vader did, and while he tortures Han, Lukes see the vision of his friends suffering,and gave up his training. Yoda alerts him that the risk of turning to the dark side is high, and that he should not stop his training, but Luke is so worried with his friends that he cannot think about anything else. Vader call the award hunters and Boba Fett(the clone of Jango Fett,remember?)is the one who takes Han Solo to Jabba,to win a big prize.\n\nWe are now in a risky situation, where Lukes needs to confront his dad without be tainted to the dark side, and someone needs to help Han,Chewbacca,Leia and C3po.\n\nPs: *In this movie we can see the first demonstrations that Leia and Han likes each other,and when Leia wants to let Han with jealous and kisses Luke is kind of a funny moment. Another nice moment with Leia, is when we see the connection between her and Luke, when he has his hand cut and is in a dangerous situation after fighting with Vader.\n\n*I really like the big Imperial robots called 'walkers': I think they are one of the most impressive artilleries the Empire has.", u'-0.379462', u"Congratulations have to go to line producer Gary Kurtz and director Irvin Kershner in pushing the production to out-perform A New Hope, even though the consequence was a film that came in massively over budget, and almost cost Lucas his hard fought independence from the Hollywood system.\n\nThe plot moves quickly, from an interesting script by Leigh Bracket and Larry Kasdan, focusing on exploring two key relationships. The first is the relationship between Han Solo and Leia Organa, which is touched upon in a New Hope, but is fleshed out more in this film. The other is the more central relationship between Darth Vader and Luke Skywalker. This relationship is also linked in to the main supporting character in this film, Yoda, who is fantastically well realised by the film crew and performed brilliantly by Frank Oz. There are other characters, but whereas C3P0 and R2D2 were a central part of the story in the previous film, they are more on the sidelines.\n\nWhat makes this film so great though is the involving and effective way the relationships operate within the broader story. The banter between Harrison Ford and Carrie Fisher is highly effective and amusing, operating through the classical love-hate relationship. One senses that Kershner, as a director of character driven films, worked very effectively with the actors and gave them the space to develop their characters which meant plenty of choices for the director in terms of their performances. The same goes for Mark Hamill's interaction with Yoda(Frank Oz). This is totally convincing and builds up the confrontation with Darth Vader very well. It was time well spent in getting these performances right. Kershner is very good at keeping the performance naturalistic, but reduces the level of broadness in the characters, making them more complex and interesting. Darth Vader benefits from this with scenes in the film that add to the mystique of the character. The confrontation with Luke Skywalker is riveting and dramatic and elevates the film above the level of its predecessor. \n\nTechnically the film is even more impressive than its predecessor. Credit has to go the Oscar nominated Art Direction team. John Barry, who had worked on the previous film, passed away during the production, but Norman Reynolds led the team superbly, with the excellent creations of Dagobah and Hoth, albeit Bespin in the original does feel a bit like a set, and the digital embellishments in the special edition were helpful in creating a bigger feel to those scenes. However, I was disappointed in the reworked scene with Palpatine in the special edition - while putting the excellent Ian McDiarmid was supporting continuity, to show him face on was, in my view an error and the reworked scene would have played much better with his face shrouded, or at the least partially obscured. The whole point of the scene was that the dialogue as strong enough without the need to ram an unsubtle visual at the audience. \n\nEditing is excellent, led by Star Wars veteran Paul Hirsch, but it is known that both George Lucas, and his then wife Marcia were also heavily involved in putting the film together. Peter Suschitzky's photography is more conventional and low key in approach than A New Hope, but is particularly effective on the Dagobah scenes in Elstree Studios, and the location scenes in Norway. \n\nILM's visual effects were outstanding, and rightly won an Academy Award. The crew consisted of the following: Oscar winning A New Hope veteran Richard Edlund, working with British effects supervisor Brian Johnson (who had just won an Oscar for Alien), effects photographer Dennis Muren (who would become an award winning and digital effects pioneer for ILM for ET, Return of the Jedi, Indiana Jones and the Temple of Doom, Innerspace, The Abyss, T2 and Jurassic Park) and compositor Bruce Nicholson, who would go on to win an Oscar for his work on Raiders of the Lost Ark, and work on a wide variety of films in Hollywood. George Lucas took a strong interest and influence in the special effects and also has to take credit for some of the excellent sequences in the film, which also work because they help drive the story along. \n\nAgain, like a New Hope, sound work was first rate and Oscar winning. In most cases the sound has to be recorded in a studio and added many months after filming has been completed. Sound re-recordist Bill Varney would win another Oscar for Raiders of the Lost Ark. Steve Maslow and Gregg Landaker also worked as sound-recordists and are both prolific contributors to many high profile movies. They would also win Oscars for their work on Raiders and then some fourteen years later win again for their work on the Keanu Reeves hit movie Speed. Peter Sutton won for his on\x96set work and has a large body of work in film since this movie. Also credit has to go the Ben Burtt's sound design work, which creates a fabulous sound-scape for the film.\n\nHowever, despite the above outstanding technical contributions, which serve to enhance and exciting and interesting story, it is composer John Williams who, yet again, takes this film to another level with another astounding musical score. Working with the director and producers, Williams develops and expands original themes. He creates a new and unforgettable theme for Darth Vader, with strong militaristic overtones, and clever themes for Leia and Han, and for Yoda. He weaves the score into the film expertly, giving moments of tension, excitement, thoughtfulness, mystery and tragedy with aplomb. The score feels more operatic than a New Hope, and helps cement this as one of the best adventure/fantasy films ever made. \n\nCongratulations to Mr Lucas for delivering a remarkable sequel, but also to Gary Kurtz and Irvin Kershner for having the courage to push everyone out of their comfort zones so as to reach this level of excellence.", u'0.45086', u'I am A Star Wars fan, always have been. The difference was the direction in this film there were standards set. The Imperial Theme is one of the most well known themes and has been repeatedly parodied although it has kept respectable as time wears on. Darth Vader is given more than barking orders in "A new Hope" Boba Fett the most feared and universally loved Bounty Hunter even though he had only one line in the first three series makes his debut but actions speak louder than words. David Prowses body Language as the dark lord mixed with James Earl Jones voice is iconic. The budding romance between Han and Leia was a surprise when I first saw this. I thought for sure Luke would get it on with her, but Lucas had other plans which I was really happy about.\n\nThe suspense is really built and when I was seven years old watching this film I hung on every word. I still do. The real difference is the direction and the attention to detail. The asteroid scene was new. John Williams thematics set the cornerstone of the film and a relentless chase through the stars for Luke Skywalker by a driven Dark lord is answered at the climax. The screenplay is more mature than the original and any of the others following. It is what is left unsaid that carries this film and makes it highly re-watchable.\n\nI\'m going to give this film a nine it still excites me and is the real beginning of the story and for all it\'s worth I appreciate the prelude to it as well. This film delivers the emotional punch that has captured fans for decades and cemented a niche in the industry. Enjoy', u'0.514285'], u'tt0076759': [u'What made this the hugely successful triumph it was? Was it casting, music, imagination, ingenuity, or luck?\n\nI remember opening day at the theaters. I was old enough to remember every scene, every character, every nuance of this film; having committed it to memory forever, as if I would never again be able to see this beloved, instantly loved masterpiece.\n\nI also remember that the HIT factor of this movie was so unexpected that you had to wait literal MONTHS to get the action figures promised on the cereal boxes. The pieces were still in the manufacturing process and we had to settle for coupons promising our toys in a few months. I wound up seeing this in the theaters a grand total of 36 times; much to my mother\'s dismay. She loved the movie as I did, but felt I was obsessed. Today, thirty years later, sitting here writing this review, I realize how right she was. I\'m still obsessed with this movie, and with the subsequent movies which followed. I wait in great anticipation for Episode 3. I\'m a fan, and I don\'t care what other people say about Episodes 1 & 2. I don\'t even mind the "prequel" factor, as the situation at the time, dictated to Lucas which movies he would do first.\n\nSee, I remember the studios saying to him that he had to choose from the three central climactic books, and trash the rest, or just trash the whole idea. He didn\'t exactly "sell out," he did what he had to do to get his movie...his vision...out there for us to see and experience. I admired his decision then, and I admire it now. Episodes 1-3 are being filmed now, because Lucas had the clout, the money, and the patience to give us his vision...his complete vision and not just the three center books of a 9-book series. I realize that now, there are dozens of books, but at the time, there were nine. And while most of us were happy with Episodes 4-6 and would not have missed 1-3 and 7-9, I personally am so very glad he has taken it upon himself to give us his full vision. I have enjoyed each and every installment with the same sense of awe and joy as I did this one.\n\nThe casting was the first triumph for this cinematic milestone. Ford is a charismatic and magnetic personality and portrayed Han with a professionalism that you\'d expect from more seasoned actors. Sir Alec Guiness is an absolute joy as Obi Wan. His casting was precise and excellent in that part. Carrie Fisher portrayed Leia in a way that, up until then, had never been experienced. Most "princess" types before her were whining, whimpering, little snots who were incapable of anything beyond tripping and twisting their ankle in times of peril, while Fisher portrayed her character as a bold, brazen, yet sophisticated and educated woman who was aware of her surroundings and capable of defending herself and her realm with the utmost authority.\n\nAnd Mark Hamil. He was perfectly cast as the whining little boy who wanted more, but was afraid to reach for it. He grows up quite well on film in these three installments, and endears himself to the audience so much the more for it. But a cast member who is almost always left out of these reviews is Peter Mayhew. Chewbacca. His character, as a supporting character to Han\'s, was exemplary. It\'s not easy portraying a walking carpet, yet holding the attention, admiration, and love of virtual millions. I am VERY happy about his being cast as Chewy in Episode 3. Couldn\'t happen to a more deserving...or capable...fellow. Bravo! And James Earl Jones\'s voice being used as the voice of Darth Vader, was pure genius. His commanding voice haunted the dreams of countless thousands of star-struck children for generations to come. I also have to say that this movie would not have had the charm it does had it not been for Anthony Daniels\' C3P0. He is a gift and a joy.\n\nThe musical score by John Williams featured in this masterpiece was one of the contributing factors. But honestly, this movie\'s success was such a total surprise to everyone, including Lucas, that nothing could prepare the world for the aftermath of having witnessed this bona fide legend, first hand.\n\nThe story itself; replete with sub-plot after sub-plot, rich in dialog and detail, was beyond anyone\'s greatest expectations. Everyone, including Lucas, expected this movie to fail. It is a timeless classic, which I will not repeat here. There are too many movie reviews giving full details of the plot, and I won\'t be redundant beyond what I have already said.\n\nHowever, that being said, there are a few points I would like to make concerning the symbolism of this endeavor. The Force is a metaphor for the psychic abilities with which we are all born. It was also a metaphor for hope and faith, dedication and commitment to the greater state of being. The Empire is said to have been a metaphor for the Germanic Nazi "storm troopers." While the Rebellion is said to have been symbolic of (what would later become) the NATO forces who defeated them.\n\nAnd then there are the effects. The effects were, in 1977, so awesome; so creative; so ahead of their time, as to ensure this movie\'s vast success for the next forty years. George Lucas enjoys an almost god-like status among sci-fi/fantasy fans worldwide.\n\nThis movie does not rate a rating. Usually, when I say that, it is because the movie is so bad, or disappointing that I don\'t have the heart to rate it. \n\nBut in this case, it far surpasses any 10/10 rating I could give it.\n\nThe Fiend :.', u'0.193816', u'Star wars made epic fantasy real. For a generation of people it has defined what the cinema experience is meant to be. Today it is probable that pc games will offer a deeper and more satisfying entertainment solution, but for pure visual and aural pleasure, mixed with basic emotional manipulation, there has never and will never be a better example of cinema than when star wars appeared over 25 years ago. When you think of star wars, you must remember what else was happening at the time. In America, the war in Vietnam had been lost. In the U.K economic disaster was occurring(a 3 day working week, and the army collecting rubbish). It was almost like the two most technically advanced countries in the world were going backwards. Star wars let everybody escape from that reality and reach for a future that was uncertain but ultimately good.', u'0.190029', u"\nThere's not much to say about this movie this is *THE* movie that changed it all.\n\nIt's my favourite movie, and not only among the quadrilogy, among all movies; it has everything that can be great in a movie, great characters, great story, great sights, great special effects (they don't show 23 years) and a mythological background that made us dream for decades now, and that'll keep us dreaming for a long, long time. Maybe the characters I liked most in this one are Old Obi-Wan Kenobi, wonderfully portrayed by Alec Guinness, and Han Solo, Harrison Ford's first important role, they're both great.\n\nNot to mention John Williams' wonderful score, without of it, the movie wouldn't have been this great it's a perfect mix, that's what it is!", u'0.561491', u'I can never pick a favorite movie because different movies have different effects. Goodfellas is my favorite drama. Face/Off is my favorite actioner. But when it comes to pure amazement, nothing beats Star Wars. We are introduced to a whole other universe with different creatures, different lifestyles, and different history. We are dropped in the middle of an intergalactic war between an empire and a rebellion that has raged for years and left the universe in ruin. It was the most fascinating thing to see when i was eleven, but to this day i am still a Star Wars nerd.\n\nThe cast of characters includes some of the coolest, funniest, and most tragic in film, and the actors who play them fit seamlessly into this new universe. Alec Guiness is flawless as Obi-Wan Kenobi, a Jedi on the run from the evil Empire. Harrison Ford is awesome as Han Solo, a smuggler and thief who helps the gang rescue the princess. But the my favorite character of all time is Darth Vader. Not only is he the coolest bad guy, but we learn in later films why he is evil and start to feel sympathetic for him. Not to mention that badass booming voice that can make ordering a pizza sound threatening.\n\nThis was not only the beginning of the best movie series ever, but it was the beginning of my love for movies. George Lucas is a genius for being able to come up with a great story and an incredible backdrop for what was supposed to be a flop, but turned into one of the best films ever. \n\n10/10', u'0.196553', u'Here begins the greatest cinematic epic of all time, and arguably one of the greatest stories ever told. Originally conceived as a serialized popcorn movie in the manner of the old action movies that Lucas grew up with, Star Wars surpassed even George\'s keen and bombastic imagination to become a central part of movie history.\n\nThere are countless tales of the making of this movie; how Lucas never believed he would get the chance to complete the series, how it spawned an industry and made the name of nearly everyone who touched it a household word. But what that does not reveal, nor do the much diminished prequels, is the sheer joy and excitement these movies generated.\n\nIt was a once in a lifetime experience. You could feel it from opening day, earlier if you paid attention to such things. We had never seen anything like it, and we are not likely to again.\n\nThis episode finds young Luke Skywalker yearning to leave the agrarian life he has with his aunt and uncle, and chase after adventure as his friends before him have already done. And what adventure there is. The galaxy is in the grip of a massive rebellion against a tyrannical and oppressive empire, but on Luke\'s home planet, it\'s something you only dare speak of in a whisper.\n\nAlong come two robots, "Droids" for short, who inadvertently involve Luke in a stellar attempt to contact an old wizard named Ben Kenobi, who lives in the caves near Luke\'s home.\n\nThe rest is history, and there isn\'t a person alive in the civilized world who doesn\'t have at least some awareness of the epic story that unfolds. Luke\'s rise from adolescent obscurity on Tatooine to a leading role in the greatest struggle of all time is told with humor, action, adventure, and always a sense of story that is unmatched on the screen or on the page.\n\nWith the completion of the prequel trilogy, these films are enjoying a renewed popularity among a generation that never saw the films on the big screen, and the theatric revivals are almost guaranteed. Go. Get some popcorn. And may the Force be with you.', u'0.478596', u'\nIn respect to the many kids of the seventies. I rated this movie as one of the greatest movies ever made. I was thirteen and enjoyed this fantasy getaway more than I could count. Like many other kids of the seventies you left reality before walking into the theatre and escaped into the adventure once the reels begin rolling. It provided the special effects and excitement a kid was looking for. Even today when I watch this movie on VHS I recall those times. Whenever I get the chance to watch it I feel like that eager thirteen year old over and over again. I hope the new movies will meet the same expectations of kids of  this decade and the next.\n', u'0.32374', u'\nWhen you ask casual movie fans (read: any of my friends) what their favorite movie is, you might get an answer like this: "Uh..I dunno...Jurassic Park 2\nwas cooler than the first... but Gladiator had people getting their heads cut off... and Scary Movie rocked, man... that movie is so funny." So what the hell do they mean? Well, beats me. Not too long ago, we were having a "philosophical" conversation about movies, when the subject came to Star Wars and the quels. (Pre and se.) We were arguing which one was the best. One of my friends said, "Well, I gotta admit, the first one is a classic, but the prequel has its moments." I swear a tear came to my eye. I never thought I\'d have this kind of conversation with one of my friends.\n\nMy point here is that Star Wars is a classic even to people who don\'t know Casablanca from Scooby Doo. It has everything you could possibly want: action, romance, midgets, cool creatures, quotable dialogue, midgets in bear suits, a great score and many more midgets. (Seriously, though, I don\'t mind midgets.) All this in a non-violent, non-racy, perfect-for-your-wee-ones package.\n\nFor those of you who haven\'t seen this movie (yes, all 20 of you. I\'m watching you.) I\'ll describe the plot. Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill) is a young man who lives with his uncle and aunt on a desert planet. See. Luke\'s parents are dead. One day, as Luke is... outside, something crashes and he checks it out. It turns out there were two robots in there, namely C-3P0 and R2-D2. They have a message to give to some guy named Obi-Wan Kenobi (which turns out to be Alec Guiness!) from Princess Leia Organa (Carrie Fisher). Luke goes off to find old Ben, who lives close to his uncle. Old Ben gives Luke a long story about how his father was a Jedi and he will be one too, etc. When they come back, Luke\'s uncle and aunt are dead and now, he\'s not safe. So Luke and Ben and the robots head to Nar Shadaa, a hole, basically. There they meet up with Han Solo (Harrison Ford) and his big, uh, ape-like thing called a Wookie.\n\nThere\'s a lot more plot to this movie, and I would pass the limit of 1000 word before I could explain it all. The fact of the matter is, there\'S a lot of backstory to this movie. There\'s probably more backstory to this movie than there is to your LIFE. (Don\'t feel bad...) I used to be a fanatic. I used to know everything there was to know about Star Wars. And you will notice that I didn\'t start my review by saying I was blah blah blah in 1977. Why is that? Because, I wasn\'t at all in 1977. I saw every movie in its special edition form, in 1997. I had seen the movies on TV before, but they never held my attention. Until they were re-released. Just type in Star Wars in a search engine. You\'ll see that this movie has a rabid following and a\ndetailed history to boot.\n\nThe acting here is not what\'s important. It\'s about on the same level as old adventure films of the 30\'s and 40\'s except for a few notable exceptions (Guiness, Ford and a few supporting actors). What makes this movie exceptional is the whole spectacle that unfolds. This is never boring, rarely violent and always a treat to watch. All the creatures, all the characters, all the action scenes, all of this movie is basically perfect. People criticize it as being a kids\' movie, as being just stupid mindless action. Well, you guys are right. But that\'s what this movie was set out to be, that\'s what it is and that\'s why I like it.\n\nLucas borrowed from Kurosawa and Ford to make this movie, and consequently, many have borrowed from his work. This movie deserves to be borrowed from. It shaped American cinema, it shaped the way people think about "action-adventure" movies, it spawned dozens of books, two sequels, one prequel, two TV movies, comic books, action figures and legions of fans. If you haven\'t already seen this... Well ,you probably haven\'t seen much anyway, so rent this. If you have seen this, watch it again. I think I will. 10/10', u'-0.0996289', u'Though now known as "Episode IV-A New Hope," for many of us, namely those of us who first saw this exhilarating entertainment in theaters back in \'77, this will always be the first "Star Wars." We will always think of it as just "Star Wars" - plain & simple, no pretensions, no aspirations to deep film-making or high art. This is where we first met them all: Luke, Han Solo, Princess Leia, Obi-Wan Kenobi (old \'Ben\'), Chewbacca, the 2 robots C3PO & R2D2 and, of course, Darth Vader. They were instant pop culture icons; you got the sense you\'d seen them before somewhere, but were sure this wasn\'t possible. But they\'d been there before in our minds. We\'d read about them constantly in science fiction novels and short stories - tales of outer space civilizations, of spaceships zooming through asteroid belts, of exotic-looking aliens hanging around space ports. We\'d dream about them at night and try to imagine ourselves in their midst; up until then, we could only imagine such things - there were no projected images to realize such dreams. "Forbidden Planet" from 1956 came close, and then there were the "Star Trek" and "Lost in Space" TV series, both hampered by dime store budgets and cheesy sets. We ate \'em up since there was nothing else. Then Lucas made it real.\n\nI remember when I first got wind of the upcoming movie, to open in May of 1977, I think. I saw the first publicized poster and bought the novel adaptation. On the poster, a young man stood with some light sword raised, a princess at his feet, numerous spaceships flying all over the place. I was in my mid-teens and felt the first pulse of building excitement as I realized all those fantastic tales I\'d been reading the past few years were going to come alive on the big screen for me. It didn\'t disappoint. Luke Skywalker, who stood in for all the boys pretending to be on a galactic adventure, gets swept away from his mundane desert home smack dab into the middle of an honest-to-gosh galaxy-wide civil war! The strength of the narrative is / was amazing. There are no slow spots and you can\'t wait for the next scene during the entire experience; and, experience is the better description for it, rather than just \'movie.\' You can\'t wait, for example, for the moment when Luke actually meets the princess; what will happen then? It\'s a textbook case of an exciting narrative and what I believe makes this superior to all the sequels (knowing that many feel "The Empire Strikes Back" is superior - I must disagree).\n\nThe one character you really can\'t wait to see again is the ominous Vader, naturally. The instant he steps into view during the first few minutes of the story, you just know this is the ultimate villain. This is the baddest of the bad, the coolest of the cool, the supreme uber-evildoer of the entire galaxy. You just know it by his stance, by his attitude, and by the electric chill that runs through your frail form as he steps down the corridor, moving into the annals of film history with one fell swoop. You can\'t wait to see what he does next, what nefarious action will send someone or some planet to its doom. Sure, he seems under the control of Tarkin (Cushing) here and later, the Emperor, but you just know he\'s simply biding his time until he takes over the whole damn universe. There is no precedent for Vader, and nothing close to him after. He\'s at his best here where there\'s still much mystery attached to his dark frightful form, a minion of Satan and Nazi stormtroopers all rolled into one.\n\nThis was also the movie-experience which catapulted Harrison Ford (Solo) into superstardom. He seems almost childish here, not really straining to create a character, and it\'s this flip charm that makes it work, against all odds. He really does appear to have stepped out of the pages of some juvenile space opera, laser guns blazing, all snide remarks and foolhardy bravado. But he also becomes the older brother figure to Luke, who cannot carry the story by himself. Hamill, whose movie career began & ended with Luke, epitomizes the center of destiny for a galaxy. Both humble and arrogant, he\'s perfect in the role. Fisher\'s main surprise is that she\'s not all sugar and sweet as one would expect of a princess. These three characters evolved in the next two films, but they were always at their best here, icons given life for a short period - but also forever in film. The same could be said for Alec Guinness as Kenobi, a first class act all the way. You almost believe this elderly warrior could topple an empire, given enough time. Unless he runs into Vader...', u'-0.0899592', u'\nStar Wars is a movie that has had great social impact, a fact that has often gone unnoticed.  A harbinger of a changing mood within the United States, Star Wars was one of the few movies rated General that was released in 1977. Where movies had for a decade been depicting ever more dark topics (Taxi Driver, The Exorcist) Star Wars was a lighthearted adventure.  While some may decry the move back to swashbuckling from social comment, I for one celebrate the fact that Star Wars made it possible for families to go to movies together once again.', u'-0.0622842', u'Spoilers Ahead:\n\nThe masterpiece, the legend that made people, like myself stand in line for two hours at ten at night for the midnight show. People coming out of the theater were telling us,"You will not be sorry, it was fantastic, you will not believe it." The first shot of the star destroyer coming across the face of Tatooine provoked loud gasps of awe from the audience. My big brother looked over at me and said," I told you." In 1977, this was not a movie; this was a cultural event that enveloped the entire country. In our city, only the Westgate with its 1100 seat cinema had the honor of showing the movie. They had showings starting from 11 AM to Midnight. Whenever you drove by, there were lines out to the street. The movie, after a thunderous opening, takes the time to develop the main character Luke. The scene of him looking longingly at the two suns with William\'s music captured the quintessence of youth; the wish to go out there and accomplish something blended with anxiety that time was passing us by. What a scene!! It captured Luke\'s restlessness that spoke to all the young people in the audience. This is the greatness of the work; the development of Luke. Notice, unlike Guardians Of The Galaxy we do not simply jump into mindless action: Lucas took the time to make us get to know and care about Luke. It gives it its depth.\n\nEven Solo is drawn with greater depth than modern movies. We get Greedo trying to shake him down, his open contempt for Obi Wan and his patronizing "Kid" addressed to Luke derisively. We cannot see Chewie\'s expression but even his grunts sound like they are laughing at Luke also. Lucas knew where he was going with Luke and he purposely draws him as a pathetic, ingenuous, bumbling dolt at the first. Contrast to his entrance in Jedi, look how far the characterization has come. This is the core of why this trilogy worked and the prequel did not. In the prequels, there simply is not characterization. The cast here will not win any acting awards, besides Guiness, but there is development of characters. This is the point of Luke\'s humiliation at the Cantina with Kenobi forced to bail his dumb butt out. Lucas wants us to see his development. Even at the end of the movie, Kenobi fires those torpedoes not Luke, he tells Luke to just turn off the computer and use the Force. This, by the way, is what Kenobi meant by,"You can\'t win Darth, if you strike me down, I shall become more powerful than you can possibly imagine."\n\nWhile I prefer Empire, this has the best ending of any movie in the history of film. The audiences I was in, people stood and cheered for five minutes when this ended. The timing, the surprise of Solo\'s intervention, the explosion and the victorious procession: what great writing. It ends with a thunderous crescendo of victory that will lift even the most jaded, world weary person to their feet. It has been forty years now; I still love the movie as much now as I did as that little boy staring up in awe at the screen. We all wanted to be Luke; his nobility was a model to my generation and it molded me into the protector of my family for twenty years. Never underestimate the power of the modeling of good.', u'0.0106993', u"The film turn on the endlessly renewed battle between good and evil, the former represented by the Jedi knights and the mystical Force which they are in touch with, and the latter by the Galactic Empire with its Nazi-like storm-troopers\x85 \n\nLuke Skywalker's simple farming life on a remote planet is dramatically changed when he intercepts a distress call from rebel leader Princess Leia Organa\x85 The message leads him to Ben Obi-Wan Kenobi and with the two droids C3PO and R2D2, and later Chewbacca and Han Solo, their journey to release the princess from the evil Empire begins\x85 \n\nNow a quarter of a century old, Lucas' project has benefited from improvements in special effects technology, but his vision has remained the same: a naive, even childlike belief in absolute good and evil, a preference for action over character and spectacle over everything\x85", u'-0.371194', u"Star Wars is the God of all movies. It is the greatest film to have ever been made, bar none. Nothing can be compared to it, nor should it be. It is definitive to our world, our society. It changed the way movies were made: for the better.\n\nIn the 1970s, there was little unknown director named George Lucas. Little did he know (dispite a nightmarish shoot), that his galactic space opera would literally change the way people lived, worked, played and thought. The secret behind his success? His imagination.\n\nThe script, the characters, the events, the locations, the humour, the opening, the ending... all perfect. \n\nOf course, it's not the most well-shot movie of all time, but there's no denying that nobody actually cares. Star Wars has become a cult and a religion, and earned it's place in my heart as the greatest film to have ever been made...\n\n...Millions will agree.\n\nWhatever I say cannot reach the real truth behind Star Wars: just watch it and you'll know exactly what I mean.\n\nThe force will be with us, always.\n\nOverall: A definitive masterpiece. Will never be forgotten, and will remain in the hearts of young and old for generations. Perfect. (10/10)", u'0.271293', u"This has been by far the greatest movie of all time. The special effects are very fantastic especially when the movie was made before I was even born, even Return of the Jedi was made 7 years before I was born, or should I say it was completed 7 years before I was born. It's like George Lucas who's the Director for all the Star Wars movies including Episode III- Revenge of the Sith, it's like he went back in time a long time ago and he traveled to a galaxy far, far away. I must say George Lucas, I am very impressed. This probably did all happen a long time ago in a galaxy far, far away. I just can't believe it, I mean how did he do it, this film is just ABSOLUTELY INCREDIBLE. George Lucas can make any kind of movie he wants. He can even make a movie about what happens far before Star Wars Episode I- The Phantom Menace and he can even make a movie about what happens far after Star Wars Episode VI- Return of the Jedi. So George Lucas I have been a huge fan of Star Wars since I saw Episode IV when I was 5 and I'll be honest, I didn't really understand the storyline because I was only 5. But I was just amazed on the Special Effects, it was incredible for it's time, 1977. And when I turned 7 my mother bought the Star Wars Trilogy Special Edition and it was even better with all new Advanced Digital Technology and I started to understand the storyline a lot better. And when I turned 14 I bought the Star Wars Trilogy on DVD and it got much better with one of the best pictures I have ever seen in a movie. But the Number 1 thing I hated about the DVD was that in Return of the Jedi at the very end of the movie you see the ghosts of Obi-Wan Kenobi, Yoda and Anakin Skywalker. I hated the fact that in the DVD you replaced Anakin Skywalker's ghost with the Anakin Skywalker from Episode II and Episode III. You shouldn't have done that George. It's great you re-modified the Trilogy and all with new technology but don't destroy the plot, because not even Luke Skywalker is going to have no idea who that person is, and you didn't make Obi-Wan Kenobi look like Ewan McGregor so I don't see why you did that. George try to re-modify Return of the Jedi that way it was before, the face that Luke Skywalker saw him as when he took off that black mask and helmet that Anakin Skywalker needs to live. Alright. That's all I have to say.", u'-0.00304847', u'It is a shame that not any other of George Lucas\'s films were as fun and inspiring as his unforgettable epic "Star Wars: A New Hope". It was a film that has since been spoofed and ripped-off in many forms of media. It has five sequels, and has many branch-off television series. And it is undeniably one of the most financially successful and definitely one of the better science-fiction films of this or any other age.\n\n"Star Wars" has one of the most brilliantly constructed and detailed alternative reality settings ever. Literally everything in it makes the "galaxy" seem like a real place. Not only is there civilizations of humans, but civilizations of other creatures, and there are livestock and other creatures like in our world. Names such as droids, banthas, and wookiees work out. But I do feel that the "sandpeople" could\'ve had a more compelling name. The concept of blasters and lightsabers were pure genius and the effects used on these weapons were state-of-the-art for their time. The props and CGI used for the other creatures, such as Chewbacca, may not be acceptable if "Star Wars" came out today, but were great for back then. Costume design was magnificent, especially the great details put into the villainous character of Darth Vader, who is perhaps the most memorable movie villain ever. Although he wouldn\'t really make his terror so profound and complete until the first sequel "The Empire Strikes Back." The concept of the Death Star is also a fine one.\n\nBut while "Star Wars" most certainly looks great in terms of detail and special effects, and even moreso on the entertainment level, there are some details that I have a really hard time accepting. Mostly, it\'s concerned with the screenplay. George Lucas is truly a great screenwriter when it comes to developing story, but when it comes to dialogue, he\'s not the best there is. Some of the dialogue in the film, mostly the lines spoken by Princess Leia, make me wince. For example her quote "I should have known it was you holding Vader\'s lease. I smelled your foul stench when I was brought onboard." What sensible person would even think of saying a line that dumb? I also personally felt that Luke Skywalker asked WAY too many questions and too many times. In the Tatooine part of the movie, he asks "Do you know what he\'s talking about?" numerous times, more than necessary. And all of the lines featuring the word "sandpeople" just seemed weakening to the script. The "sandpeople" were suppose to sound frightening, but they just sound pathetic.\n\nBasically, the one and only thing that I have wrong with "Star Wars" is its dialogue sequences. And that is because George Lucas\'s weakness at writing is dialogue, which he freely admits to. But that does not make "Star Wars" a bad movie. Perhaps I was disappointed with it, but it\'s still a great movie to watch.', u'-0.0310086', u'It is now 36 years after this movie hit theaters, but it is not too late to write a review! This movie will and already is in the history books as the movie that changed the world! Star Wars, created by George Lucas, is the most iconic, awesome, epic and action-packed space opera ever made. This movie contains everything you want to see in a movie, for example: action, adventure, mystery, humor, emotion and, above all, creativity. The great visual and imaginative mind of George Lucas made it possible for other filmmakers to get from realistic movies to a generation of movies containing imagination and fantasy. \n\nThe beginning of the movie is so perfectly written and makes it almost impossible for people not to like it. Firstly, the title scrawl. Although this scrawl was the same as the Flash Gordon series, in Star Wars this iconic and epic beginning was made great by the extraordinary music by John Williams. The music he composed made this movie what it is today and what it was then. His epic score for this movie was deservedly rewarded with an Academy Award. \n\nThis great creation by George Lucas has influenced me, the American population and the rest of the world completely!!!', u'0.606508'], u'tt0103064': [u'\nDisclaimer: If you are a viewer that mainly prefers arthouse-type movies, then you might as well ignore this review. In addition, if you\'re not able to take a few sci-fi leaps of faith, ignore this review, as well. We\'ll both be better off.\n\nThis is the finest action movie of all time. And, yet, believe it or not, it\'s not the action in the film itself that makes this be the case. This is especially odd in a movie with a $100 million budget (in 1991!), with multiple huge explosions, with thousands of bullets fired, and scores of stuntmen used.\n\nThis movie is what it is, a perfect 10, because it takes the vision of one of the most imaginative directors on Earth, and realizes them almost perfectly with all the tools that fit the task -- actors, stunts, puppetry, models, and CG. Without the vision, this film would be nothing. Without the tools, this film would be nothing.\n\nBut, a little bit of background is due. This is the sequel to the Terminator (1984), whose premise was that a near-indestructible cyborg is sent by evil self-aware machines from the near future to destroy the mother-to-be of the military commander who would lead the humans to a victory over the machines. Oh, and this terminator machine would come from a time of war between men and machines which followed a nuclear exchange that left billions of people dead, first. In Terminator 2, John Connor (the commander-to-be) is about 12 years old, and his mother (Sarah) is feverishly trying to prepare him for his fate, even as she tries to stop the factors that will lead to the nuclear war and the entire terrible future that made all this necessary. The machines now send a superior, more intelligent, shape-shifting cyborg (T1000) into the past, to kill John himself. Meanwhile, future-John reprograms the ex-evil Terminator (T101) from the original film, and sends him into the past to PROTECT John against the T1000.\n\nThat\'s your basic plot. It does involve travel into the past, so it immediately presents a time-travel paradox which can\'t really be resolved. In order to even try watching this movie, you MUST LOOK PAST THE PARADOX. If you don\'t, this movie has zero credibility, and is not worth your time.\n\nWhat happens after the two terminators appear in the past is a wild ride rife with macho action, dark reflection on the nature of man, and a few rays of hope, here and there. Schwarzenegger (the good terminator) and Patrick (the bad one) make for such effective foes that the times they meet on-screen are completely breathtaking (and odd, given that you repeatedly see the relatively slim T1000 through Arnie through a wall or two). Hamilton, as Sarah Connor, is a wonderful character -- tough beyond all belief and completely focussed on preventing the nuclear war and ensuring John\'s safety, yet clearly a little out of her mind with paranoia and anger; amazingly, you see actual character development (specifically, when John and T101 arrive at Dyson\'s house to prevent her from doing what she wants to) in her otherwise 2-dimensional character. And Furlong, as John, is not bad himself as the extroverted kid who\'s confused by the fact that everyone except his mom tell him his entire upbringing was based on a lie. The bit players all do their jobs well, particularly Earl Boen who plays the semi-sadistic mental hospital warden that stands between Sarah Connor and her son (until the T1000 makes a chilling entrance).\n\nWith these players set in motion, it\'s up to the script to deliver the real substance of the movie. (One often sees great performances in mediocre films... here the story transcends the performances -- an impressive feat.) The script delivers. The film is absolutely filled with great, classic moments (I counted TEN all-star ones during my last viewing), and they\'re evenly spaced through the movie. I mean, who doesn\'t cheer (at least inside) when Arnold steps out of the biker bar, fully clad in leather when "Bad to the Bone" music starts to blast? The guy absolutely bleeds coolness. And the T1000 absolutely bleeds evil. But, with so many great moments, you\'d think the pacing would be a little uneven... not really! The film shifts from place to place with an ease that makes perfect sense, never giving you the time to start being a little nitpicking jerk, always driving forward, but always doing so thoughtfully and with attention to detail.\n\nOf course, this wouldn\'t be an action movie without some action. There\'s plenty of it, and it\'s perfectly done. The CG effects for the shape-shifting T1000 were cutting-edge for the time, and still look great (whoever said differently below is simply incorrect) -- even if they\'re completely commonplace today. The stunts are completely insane in scale (at one point, a helicopter flies under a highway overpass; at another, a motorcycle jumps from the 2nd floor of a building into a flying chopper). (Probably, only the Matrix and the Lord of the Rings movies compare in terms of the level of stunt insanity.) And the gunplay is delivered in perfect Cameron-Schwarzenegger style (as opposed to the slo-mo John Woo-style) -- you\'ll see lots of heavy automatic and explosive weapons, and you\'ll see them used well. The film is violent, and somewhat bloody, but ALL of the mean-spirited violence is dealt by the evil characters, not the ones you root for (Quentin Tarantino fans: sorry). And then the truly amazing scenes that bypass acting are shocking and memorable -- just wait until the nuclear detonation sequence.\n\nI\'m not sure what else you would want in a movie. Probably moral content, and the movie has a very clear pro-human, anti-war message. The message is a\nbit stale, and the delivery IS, at times, a little heavy-handed (and some moments with the T101 seem just a bit unrealistic, towards the end), but the movie has heart, and that you cannot deny. Plus, it simply rocks. 10/10', u'-0.0855523', u'A Terminator(Arnold Schwarzenegger) was sent from the future to kill the unborn son of Sarah Connor(Linda Hamilton) in the original. Now, that Terminator has been sent back again but with a different assignment: Protect John Connor. John Connor(Edward Furlong) is now about 10 years of age and must evade a new Terminator sent to kill him;The T-1000(Robert Patrick). Sarah, John, and The Terminator journey together on their quest to stop Judgement Day, with a trailing, shape-shifting Termiantor trailing from behind.\n\nThis is the greatest of the Terminator trilogy. I have watched three times in the past year and have not found anything that Cameron could have improved on. The move is a masterpiece in every aspect of film. Schwarzenegger\'s acting might not be incredible but this is the perfect role for him. He isn\'t supposed to show emotion or feelings. He is a machine. I hate almost every one of his movies besides this trilogy because he is a horrible actor but he works perfectly into this role.\n\nThe special effects are incredible beyond belief. The shape-shifting T-1000 is some of the greatest animation I have witnessed in cinema history. It absolutely blew my mind when I first experienced this visual extravaganza. The animation looked so real(remembering this was a good ten years). The movie included fast-paced action along with some clever sci-fi drama/horror. The idea of a vast army of machines taking over the world after sending off warheads to every major city should be scary enough. But the T-1000 has very little lines and is just creepy enough to make twitch when you see him.\n\nSci-fi movies can rarely be made in such way that can be looked at as works of art. This is one of the few exceptions. The prediction of judgment day with Hamilton watching a playground full of kids be burnt to the ground is an absolute brilliant portrayal of Armageddon. The theme that men will destroy themselves is also shown throughout the movie also and is even said by The Terminator" It\'s in your nature to destroy yourselves". This brings the movie to a whole new level of sci-fi.\n\nOverall, Termiantor II: Judgement Day is an absolute must see classic. If you have not seen it, buy it! Because once you have seen it, you will want to do so anyways. It is fast paced and highly enjoyable for just about every audience.\n\nI highly recommend this movie.', u'0.474404', u"This superb sequel surpasses the excellent original in every department and quite simply you won't see a better action film. Set 15 years after the original Arnie may return as the good Terminator trying to protect John Connor but he's a redundant piece of scrap metal compared to the T-1000.\n\nThe opening hour and the last half hour is absolutely breathtaking with action sequences that still remain unsurpassed. Their's also a wonderful piece of storytelling 3/4 of the way through where Dyson relises the terrifying consequences of the project he's neglecting his family for.\n\nThe performances are memorable particularly Linda Hamilton's Sara Connor and simply put, they'll never make a better action film.", u'0.554522', u'Who said sequels aren\'t any good? "Terminator 2" is the ultimate sequel, a big bad wolf ready to chomp the head off of anyone who crosses its path. It\'s dark, it\'s mean, and it\'s one tough movie. It\'s not as bleak as the first film, at least in terms of visuals, but rather has a new kind of bluish-tint that supplies a great backdrop to the ongoing battle between man and machine.\n\nIf there was ever a contemporary mainstream visionary director, it is James Cameron. Here we\'ve got Cameron\'s real thoughts on the series, those repressed by a low budget in the original film. He lets loose here, filling every frame with hard-boiled action and special effects. He introduces a liquid metal Terminator that he wanted to use in the first film, but graphic processors and CGI were not advanced enough in 1984, at least not advanced enough to work on the low means he had to film the original. So his original dream is finally unveiled, and good golly, is it wonderful.\n\nYeah, he\'s "back." Arnold (like he needs any introduction?) returns as The Terminator, Series T-101, Model T-800, an indestructible cyborg sent from the future to assassinate Sarah Connor (Linda Hamilton) in the first film. Well, it\'s 1991. New film. New mission. He has to save the future resistance leader of mankind who will ultimately defeat the machines of the future, John Connor (Edward Furlong), Sarah\'s 11-year-old son. (Though his age has been switched from 11 to 13 and back to 9 over the years, with no help from the third film that takes place in 2003, yet claims he was 13 in 1991 though his age doesn\'t match with his age in the third. We\'ll just leave it at 11 in this film. Got that?)\n\nAnother model Terminator, the T-1000 (Robert Patrick), has been sent back to 1991 programmed to annihilate John Connor. Which explains Arnold\'s appearance. Arnold, an undoubtedly lesser opponent compared to the T-1000, has to help save the day and learn to appreciate humanity. It won\'t be easy. First, he has to find John Connor, who is a rebellious angst-driven pre-teen living with foster parents. Then, together they have to break into the local loony hospital and release Sarah from the clutches of Dr. Silberman (Earl Boen), who believes Sarah is delusional. (You may remember Silberman as the psychiatrist from the first film, too.) Then, they have to stop a computer chip designer (Joe Morton) from creating the first version of a SkyNet computer, modeled after a destroyed chip his employment company discovered at a large mechanical warehouse. (Which is, of course, the chip from the destroyed T-800 of the first film.)\n\nWhew. On with the film analysis, right? Where to start? This isn\'t as fierce or brutal as the first film, but it\'s got plentiful action sequences, a large budget, great special effects (even compared to those gracing the screen nowadays), not to mention a great character study of the machine we loved to root against in the first film. Of course, this Terminator has no memory of the first film, since he wasn\'t in it--SkyNet creates hordes of the same version machines on a large conveyor belt and ships them off to fight in the war. Some are sent back through time. So, with that in mind, John Connor\'s resistance found an extra Arnold lying around in an abandoned warehouse, programmed him to keep John Connor out of harm, and sent him through the time portal.\n\nSarah doesn\'t trust him. In a deleted scene available on the Ultimate and "Xtreme" edition DVDs, Sarah says, "You don\'t know what it\'s like to try and kill one of these things!" It\'s an important scene that should have been left in the final cut. In it, Sarah is about to destroy the machine\'s central processing chip located inside his head, when John stops her. It\'s important because it focuses on the fact that Sarah still doesn\'t trust him, and came close to destroying him purely out of prejudice, without giving him a chance. As much as I don\'t like it when people go on about hidden meanings in films that obviously are not meant to have hidden meanings and are purely little flubs made by directors unrightfully analyzed for deeper meaning(s), "T2" clearly has an underlying message: One, don\'t judge a book by its cover. Read it first. Two, if an emotionless killing machine can learn to appreciate life, why can\'t everyone? And three, the most important fact of all: Never mess with a muscular man who walks into a bar completely naked and requests your clothes and means of transportation.\n\nI suppose the question on most interested viewers\' minds is this: Is "T2: Judgment Day" better than its predecessor? Well, in some respects, yes. In others, no. It lacks the fierce brutality and darkness of the first film, but makes up for it with spectacular visual effects and action sequences. It lacks the horrific central focus of the first film (futuristic, indestructible cyborgs with no feelings being able to unemotionally kill), but it makes up for this with a new focus of humanity, coming to accept your future, and how it would look if two colossal killing machines entered into an arena together.\n\nIn some ways, I like the first better. But then I think about the second film and I have a hard time choosing. I suppose if I had to choose I\'d choose the first film. And let me just state for the record that I\'m glad I don\'t have to choose.\n\n5/5 stars.', u'-0.0326138', u'Normally when people tell you about a sequel that was better than the original or just as good, Terminator 2 is always guaranteed to be in their list; why? Because this is THE action movie of all action movies, next to Die Hard, this is the movie that isn\'t just about the action as well, but has an incredible story and message behind it that will always stay with you. Terminator 2 like the first Terminator film has memorable lines, moments, and incredible effects. This is the film that made you believe in "liquid metal" machines. Robert Patrick\'s performance is flawless, to be honest I found him a million times more terrifying than Arnold in the first Terminator, because Robert looks like this normal average guy, but he\'s not like Arnold where he gets shot and you can clearly see he\'s a terminator, Robert goes back to human looking and won\'t stop. Not only that you don\'t know how to stop him. Linda Hamilton returns and gives a great performance as Sarah Conor who is no longer a meek little girl, she has turned into a strong woman who will do anything to protect her son and the future. Arnold is back and he\'s better then ever! No wonder in the future they made several terminators that look like him, he\'s great entertainment.\n\nEleven years after Sarah Connor destroyed the original Terminator that was programmed to kill her, two Terminators arrive in Los Angeles from the year 2029. The first is a Terminator identical to the one that Sarah first encountered, while the second is a new model which assumes the identity of a police officer. John Connor is now a 10 year old living with foster parents. Sarah\'s experiences have made her tougher and more vigilant, but also desperate to warn humanity about the coming apocalypse. After attempting to bomb a computer factory, Sarah is arrested and remanded to the Pescadero State Hospital for the Criminally Insane under the supervision of Dr. Silberman. Meanwhile, the Terminators locate John Connor in a mall. After John is rescued and a chase through the L.A. storm drain channels, the original Terminator escapes with John on his motorcycle. The Terminator explains that he is reprogrammed by the future John Connor to protect and obey John\'s younger self. The other Terminator is a T-1000, an advanced new prototype programmed to kill John. It is made of "a mimetic polyalloy", a liquid metal that allows it to take the shape and appearance of anything it touches. It can also form into knifes and stabbing weapons. Learning that the T-1000 will likely kill Sarah and then mimic her to lure John, John orders the Terminator to help free her. Initially, Sarah is terrified by the Terminator; but after seeing it fight off the T-1000, she accepts that they need its help. As they escape the city, the Terminator informs John and Sarah about Skynet, the sentient computer system that will nearly wipe out humanity in an apocalyptic nuclear attack on "Judgment Day".\n\nTerminator 2 is one of the best films of all time, this is a film that I absolutely adore and if someone hasn\'t seen it, there\'s something seriously wrong. This story is a special one: humans, are we our own worst enemy? Arnold\'s line "It\'s in your nature to destroy yourselves" is something that always sends chills down my spine because it\'s true. I loved the relationship between Arnold and Eddie Furlong, interesting to see a terminator take the place perfectly of a father and you see the pain in Eddie\'s eyes of never wanting to let go of the terminator. Like Sarah Conor said " The terminator wouldn\'t stop, it would never leave him. It would never hurt him or shout at him or get drunk and hit him or say it was too busy to spend time with him. And it would die to protect him." meant a lot to me. Like I said, if for some odd reason you have seen this movie, do see it! I promise you that it\'s just an excellent film and one that will always stand out against cinematic history.\n\n10/10', u'0.0439198', u"\nTerminator 2 is the best film I have ever seen hands down. It surpasses the original in almost every way except the first film had a darker moodier atmosphere. But Terminator 2 has much much more, more character development, better acting strong direction, and THE most amazing visual effects ever!!! Cameron's and Schwarzenegger's best movie. A true classic. The Best!!!", u'0.328354', u'\nWhat can I say about "Terminator 2: Judgment Day" that hasn\'t been better said already? All I can say is that when I first saw the movie (at only 9 years of age) it had an effect on me. It blew me away! It opened up my eyes, and even at the tender age of 9, made me realize what I wanted to do with my life: I wanted to make movies, and I wanted to make movies like "T2". \n\nAs I\'m watching the film, I glance over at another patron and this woman, her eyes wide, was gripping the arms of her chair so tightly I thought they were going to break. When I saw that reaction, that mind-numbing, adrenaline rush of pure excitement, knowing that that movie had them completely, that is when I knew I wanted to make movies and give people that same reaction.\n\nAnd now, over 10 years later, "T2" is still my favorite film of all time and I watch it religiously. I have written several scripts and treatments all because of "T2" and I have tried to match that exquisite balance of wonderful story/interesting characters/jaw-dropping effects/non-stop action.\n\n"T2" was the sole-guiding factor in my life - because of it, I KNEW I wanted to make movies in any way, shape or form.\n\nIf you\'ll excuse me, I seem to be running out of air. Gotta watch "T2" a little bit more...\n', u'-0.267169', u'Terminator 2 perhaps shows that Cameron was at least was cognizant of life and its meaning. I mean, this IS the movie where the end of the world has the most impact outside of Dr. Strangelove, right? One of those outstanding dream scenes in movies, one of the ones that actually works because it\'s true in its savage simplicity, Linda Hamilton\'s Sarah Connor sees herself in her 1984 waitress get up with baby John in a playground and then everything gets wiped out by the BIG BOMB (Dmitri) that also incinerates Hamilton into BBQ.\n\nSo it\'s with this kind of thought that Terminator 2 means to be the most kick-assingest blockbuster of its (or all?) time while trying to keep the loss of life very small - or, rather, the "Bad" Terminator who was designed by the wizards at ILM can kill to its mission\'s content - I mean, DAMN, it still looks great, and in its silver-liquid-chrome simplicity much more, for me, impressive than the clanging junk of Bay disasters. It\'s arguable, of course, that the Terminator (T-800) does kill some people, incidentally, or, you know, all that gas from the gun he shoots could make some people really screwed up but, hey, "He\'ll live" is enough.\n\nBut if Cameron is "soft" at all here, it doesn\'t show too much... well, okay, Lil\' John (hehe) does squeak and squak those early 90\'s amorphisms "No Problemo - chill out - listen to Kriss Kross - etc", and Edward Furlong is one of the things that just does not hold up here. He\'s serviceable at best, annoying at worst. He can cry okay though.\n\nBut it\'s Arnold, in his swaggering low-key and then with an occasional grin awesome leading man turn, and especially Linda Hamilton who make this tight script so compulsively watchable. Hamilton makes Connor into what Cameron likely saw in his one-time wife/collaborator Bigelow - a take-no-prisoners soldier who can take charge and has muscles and can probably knock you upside the head (maybe that\'s why they divorced, he couldn\'t take all that woman... but I digress, at any rate he moved around a lot till his current wife) And there is also a vulnerability still to Sarah that makes her so endearing. \n\nShe can never be completely hard, though time and experience and the dread of what\'s to come had scarred her, so by the time she has the chance to kill the Man Who Destroys The World, she can\'t do it. A scene like that is probably more emotionally gripping than so many other scenes that try in these blockbusters (something like Days of Future Past, which is a cousin of this flick, gets there). The fact Hamilton wasn\'t able to parlay such high caliber performance work into a better career is kind of sad, but at least this stands as a benchmark of a woman action hero, one of the two Cameron Wonder Women really.\n\nSo, blast your Guns N Roses, say hi to the kid from Salute Your Shorts (that\'s him, right, Connor\'s friend in the first act?) and ride your motorcycle through LA - it\'s a bad mother-jammer of a blockbuster that holds up enough to look over its faults (i.e. some dialog isn\'t tight, like the voice-over, it\'s alright but whatever - perhaps it was ambitious enough to best The Perfect Action Movie, which the first Terminator just was).', u'0.19887', u"\nI am not a big fan of sequels,as most of them disappoint,but T2 certainly does not.In fact,it's a rare case,at least in my opinion, of a sequel actually surpassing the original film in terms of greatness.As in 99.9% of his films,Arnold Schwarzenegger is the good guy once again,but you don't mind once you witness the incredible villain performance of Robert Patrick.This film is nothing short of a beginning to end thrill ride.Let us not forget the talents of Linda Hamilton and Edward Furlong,who gave great supporting efforts.Thumbs up!", u'0.641075', u'A strange lightning forms a circular opening in mid-air, and in the sudden flare of light we see a figure in a sphere of energy... It is the figure of a naked man... \'Terminator\' has come through... He stands, and impassively surveys its surroundings...\n\nHis physique is massive and perfect... His face devoid of emotion... He\'s not here to kill Sara Connor... His mission now is to protect the future savior of mankind, her son John... Thirty years from now, Terminator was reprogrammed to be John Connor\'s protector here, in this time... Terminator would never leave him... Terminator would never hurt him... Terminator would die to defend him against any danger... \n\nBut Skynet, the computer which controlled the Machines, sent an advanced prototype back through time, to destroy the leader of the human Resistance, little John... \n\nT-1000 is very menacing... His features are handsome bordering on severe... Its face is simple, unformed... His eyes are gray ice, penetrating... He is certainly not built like Terminator with complex hydraulics and cables... He is human-shaped but far from human... \n\nArnold Schwarzenegger is perfect as the super-hero... He never threatens, that\'s a human thing! He just takes... He can jerk any knife out without slowing a stride... His hand blurs out like a striking cobra...\n\nWe watch him smashing the cover plate off the phone\'s cash box with the heel of his hand... And when the bullets rake his chest, he doesn\'t even draw back... We observe him in slow motion how he fights for control, how he jumps his bike, sweeps a street kid off his machine with one arm and swings him in front of him... \n\nRobert Patrick is a super-villain, a perfect chameleon... He can change shape and color... He can imitate anything it touches, anything it samples by physical contact, any object of equal size... \n\nHe is a \'killing machine\' with the ultimate skills of mimicry for infiltration of human society... He looks and acts exactly like a \'cop\' but with quite a few surprises... His arms and fingers can be turned smoothly into something else... He spins at a sound... His blow is lighting fast... He pulls the trigger so fast it almost seems like a machine-pistol... He is cool, alert, confident in his power... His expression emotionless and judgmental... \n\nLinda Hamilton is not a mission priority... She is the same woman we remember from last time... Her body is straight and taut... Her arms are lean and muscular... Her eyes peer out through a wild tangle of hair like those of a cornered animal... Her voice is a low and chilling monotone... Her expression cold and impassive... She is defiant and intense... She looks hard... \n\nHamilton seems to have the weight of the whole world on her shoulder.. She draws her knife from its belt sheath, and idly starts to carve something on the table top, the letter "N." Something changes in her eyes... Her face is an impassive mask... We see the forces at war behind her eyes... She has become a \'Terminator,\' intending to change the future somehow... \n\nEdward Furlong is young John Connor... He is a ten-year tough delinquent, targeted for termination... He has short yellowish hair and a sullen mouth... His eyes reveal an intelligence as sharp as a scalpel... His interactions with his \'protector\' give the movie effective moments of psychological depth... \n\nHe reluctantly shows his friend a shot of his mother, pregnant, in a jeep near the Mexican border... John doesn\'t know it now, but he will carry the photo with him for over 30 years, and give it to a young man named Kyle Reese, who will travel back in time to become his father...\n\nJoe Morton is Miles Dyson, the star of the Special Projects at Cyberdyne Systems Corporation... He is a man in a hurry, a man with much to do... He\'s brilliant, aggressive, driven.. In a few months he creates a revolutionary type of microprocessor... He can be the man most directly responsible for 3 billion deaths on August 29th, 1997... The survivors of the nuclear fire called the war Judgment Day, will live only to face a new nightmare, the war against the Machines...\n\nHis face, his posture, his ragged voice express soul-wrenching terror... This is a man ripped out of normal life into a grim world... He looks up, through his pain and incomprehension, and asks himself: Why is this nightmare happening? \n\nThe level of violence in Cameron\'s film is pretty intense... The special effects are outstanding... They look realistic... The action scenes are amazing, very well executed... James Cameron tries to provide a message of peace... The music score is almost perfect... The plot is intriguing... The motion picture features excellent performances... \n\n\'Terminator 2: Judgment Day\' is a blazing big-budget sci-fi thriller, very creative, to be entirely experienced... A definite must-see movie...', u'-0.0913041', u'Greetings from Lithuania.\n\nWOW! The best word that describes this movie is "wow"! Not only to say that this is the best Action movie of all time, this is probably one of the greatest movies ever made . The people in my country watched this film when there where limited VHS cassettes at all. And again, my favorite Director did an timeless epic-masterpiece. Yes, an epic. Every scene in this movie is beyond the perfection. The timeless plot. Groundbreaking effects. Unforgettable "Hasta la vista, baby." .\n\nPerfect direction for a sci-fix action film. When the action starts, you\'re in for the ride of your life. There never be the same movie like T2. What else I can say about this film? A Must see for everyone.', u'0.551799', u'I adore this movie. I could never stand action movies, but T2 is so intelligent and moving that it stands apart from everything else.\n\nFirst, the story - brilliant, smoothly making the necessary transition from T1. The dialogue runs the gamut from hilarious to heartbreaking, but always strikes exactly the right chord.\n\nThe cinematography and effects are stunning, especially the scenes filmed during "magic hour", when the pale gold of sunset casts a meaningful and lovely effect on the scene. Being the first $100 million movie naturally the effects are remarkable for their time, but they hold up wonderfully against anything made today.\n\nIt\'s the actors, however, who steal the show. Linda Hamilton can play insanity and despair like nobody\'s business, and she gave her all here. Robert Patrick was wonderful in the demanding role of the T-1000, creepy and threatening even during the funny finger-wagging moment. Arnold Schwarzenegger balances non-stop action with a machine\'s emerging humanity; frankly this movie cancels out every dumb action flick he ever made. New-comer Edward Furlong carried the film with seeming ease, giving an astonishing performance for his age and lack of experience; the "We\'re not gonna make it, are we?" scene is hauntingly perfect.\n\nJames Cameron and his team have given us a classic that has something for everyone. You\'d never know that this is the guy who made Titanic.', u'0.559657', u'Oh yeah, "Terminator 2: Judgment Day"......The greatest overall action film next to "Die Hard" and the greatest science fiction one next to "Aliens". It is, without a doubt, my favorite movie of all time and I would give this 20 stars if I could and this is a film that everyone recognizes and knows about and this is a film that absolutely gets what it deserves.\n\nIn 1991, Arnold Schwarzenegger had finally cemented his reputation as the world\'s greatest action star after a couple great classics (The Terminator, Predator, Total Recall and the Conan films). This is the movie that defined Schwarzenegger forever as the one and only "Terminator", the cyborg sent from the future to protect the kid (Edward Furlong) who will save the entire world. Even though he\'s a machine, he learns what humans need to do and what they were put on this Earth for. And like what action films lack, T2 develops its characters flawlessly, and yes, EVEN the Terminator is given development as a character! When the T-100 arrives to the mid 1990\'s, he is basically awkward and socially clueless and knows nothing about human emotion or interaction. As the film progresses, he learns how humans behave and learns a few one-liners from John (Hasta la Vista, baby) and Spoilers: at the end before the Terminator melts himself in molten steel, his humanity is completely obvious, "I know now why you cry, for it is something I can never do." And just before he completely disappears in the molten steel, he gives the "thumbs-up" gesture, something that John had taught him before.\n\nIt is also probably the most heart-breaking ending and even the most insensitive guy will cry to that.\n\nAlso, Linda Hamilton makes one of the greatest ever screen performances by a female, and even challenges the performance of Sigourney Weaver in "Aliens". And her character has really developed from the first movie. The main problem with most movie sequels that have been made is that they usually act like the film before it never happened. But Sarah Connor has transformed from a timid waitress into a smart and brutal militaristic woman. And it shows off James Cameron\'s film-making genius and he truly knows how to make a great action film and a great sequel to follow it, because of this and "Aliens" (which I will write up a review soon) 2 of the greatest sequels ever made. During the course of this film, Sarah Connor has already developed a phobia for Terminator\'s due to her experiences in the first movie. And during most of the film, she doesn\'t trust the Terminator at all and even tries to destroy its CPU chip (only in a deleted scene). But at the end, when the Terminator is just about to destroy itself, she shakes hands with him and makes peace with him.....very,very touching moment. Also, Hamilton did a great job at providing the narration, with some greatly written lines, and she utters them with perfect drama and suspense to reveal the story in the beginning and what\'s next for the future at the end.\n\nAlso, Edward Furlong really makes a name for himself in his film debut. He is absolutely perfect as the juvenile offender who is affected by the absence of his mother and biological father. Throughout the film, he becomes attached to the Terminator and teaches him the meaning of human life. And no one else could\'ve done the role better or equally as great. FYI, it\'s not really that easy for a kid with limited acting experience to pull it off.The line, "She\'s not my mother, \'\'Todd\'\'" shows what Furlong can do and says that line with the perfect facial expression and delivery. And Furlong and Hamilton are really the 2 who provide the intense emotion that has capitalized James Cameron\'s films ever since.\n\nThe villainous T-1000 (Robert Patrick) has gotta be the icon for movie villains, \'cause the whole "liquid metal" thing is so cool. And the film was even a landmark for special effects which make the action scenes stand out and make them among the best in the genre.\n\nThis is further proof of why every action fan needs to have James Cameron alive to give em a reason to live. I\'m already looking forward to "Avatar" and "Battle Angel", and I\'m sure those 2 will kick @$$ once they come out.\n\nIf it weren\'t for this film, every other action flick that you see these days wouldn\'t be the same. When you watch it, just keep in mind that this movie changed a lot of things. It\'s not just an excellent action epic, but a very emotionally charged story about human survival.', u'0.205754', u'There are 40 000 movies, or, written in American style: 40,000 movies, made till that very moment by the American film industry, not to mention the international industries. Around 40 of these films, or 0,1%, are films so great, they need not only to be watched by every existing human being - but they need to dwell in the hearts of every human, at any moment, till their last breath. "Terminator 2" is the first of them all.\n\nThis is not only the greatest action movie, but it is the greatest movie ever made. It is a film that treats the highest possible theme in the art sphere - the theme about the self-sacrifice. In this movie everyone of the main characters sacrificed himself for somebody else. The child did it to save his mother, despite what she had told him about his importance. She did it for him and for the rest of the world. And at the end even the machine sacrificed itself, for the humankind - when it understood the value of human life and that its existence was a threat for it. The three of them did that without complaining, without expecting a reward or pretending for something. They did it because it was their duty, and they would fulfill themselves as humans by doing it. Plain, simple and genius.\n\nTo the people, who are dashing pretentiously at the time paradox, and to the other ones, who moan: "I kinda didn\'t like it. I liked (place the name of ANY OTHER action movie here) more. There was more beating and explosions..." - to these ones I say: you have completely and tragically missed the point of "T2", and as a result of this you have deprived yourselves of understanding and embracing the best film ever made into your hearts and souls. The last things "Terminator 2" is about, are pseudo-scientific riddles with time, or creating the best special effects of early 90s in order to make the eyes of the "riping" teenagers open widely in surprise and disbelief.\n\nAs I said, I will repeat again: it is a movie about the personal sacrifice, the duty and the destiny of the strong ones - not the "written by some unseen force" destiny, which you cannot change, only follow; but the destiny of the people who have a strong character. The destiny that they CHOOSE: to sacrifice themselves in order to fulfill their duty, and ultimately - their life; in order to prove themselves as humans. And they make this choice alone, on their own: the weak ones would "duck and cover", and run away in a similar situation.\n\nThere is another character in that movie, who showed human behavior and in the end of the film - as he turned weaker and weaker from a physical point of view, due to the inevitable damage by the superior technology - became more and more human. In the last moments of the film, in one recent Bulgarian voice translation, they translated it a little bit differently, in an artistic way, and I want to translate it "back" and write it here, to show you what I mean. It is a TRANSLATOR HIT: when the Terminator realized that it should sacrifice itself and go against its own nature, and in the moment when John started to cry, because he understood the necessity and the brutal fact that the T-800 WILL NOT OBEY HIM THIS TIME, because IT HAS TAKEN A DECISION ABOUT WHAT WAS THE RIGHT THING TO DO, T-800 said: "Now I know why you cry. I WISH I ALSO COULD." And then, after they hugged, HE - not IT - HE stepped on the chain. He had become human in that moment, in a certain way - as he was taking decisions on his own, and as HE HAD A WISH - a wish, that never turned into a dream, because he had to step on the chain. And if there is only one thing that I want to be remade in the original version, it\'s not all the goofs and inconsistencies, mentioned also in the IMDb trivia of the film - they prove that human beings, including the great directors, make mistakes - and they MUST - that\'s why they are human. What I dream to be changed in my favourite movie, is only this line. The line "but it is something I can never do" looks cold and alien to me now.\n\nIt is a movie that will not be surpassed soon - because a new film needs to find a higher theme than self-sacrifice in order to do it (apart from all the rest, which is needed - a good scenario, which makes everything to cohere in perfect harmony; directing from a genius and a visionary like James Cameron; acting from people BORN FOR THE ROLE - like Linda Hamilton and Schwarzenegger; innovative, but not overdone, or with overexposed and misplaced effects; having well arranged and nicely corresponding music; and so on) - while if it uses the same theme, it will be a REPEAT. "Terminator 2" was THE FIRST ONE, and THE GREATEST. And the way this film is made, the way EVERY FRAME IS SUFFERED THROUGH BY THE PEOPLE WHO MADE IT, makes it both unbeatable and the epitome of all that is good and human in that world. And it is even something more: it shows what we are, IT IS WHAT WE ARE. It\'s so universal and refined, that if aliens come and want to understand us, the humans, in the space of two hours; to find what is our basic philosophy; what our fears and problems, and aspirations are - this is what they have to see. This film.\n\nSuch a movie appears once in fifty years.', u'0.0416516', u'15 years on and still Terminator 2 remains a turning point in cinematic history introducing the world to photo-realistic computer generated 3D rendering. To this day, this is still an astounding achievement, however (ironically) these are the things that re-watching the film now, you notice as not being to the standard we now expect films to be.\n\nAs a result of this, you\'re then forced to look beyond the graphics in search of other quality. When I last watched it (about 3 weeks ago), something stood out to me that never did before because of no longer being mesmerised by the graphics.\n\nThis was the interactions between characters who are gritting, no nonsense, hard edged people, but those who care deeply for one another. In particular, I\'m referring to Sarah and John Connor, but also to the inhuman T-101 in all it\'s programming trying to humanise itself (at the demand if John).\n\nThough these might sound like day to day interactions (pardoning the whole terminator and robotic elements here), but to put them onto film and not have them feel forced or contrived is quite a feat, and all of these were achieved far above the expectation of one watching an "action" movie. You truly believe that John is devastated to have to lose T-101. You can tell he\'s fearful about Sarah going off to kill the man who would kill the world, unwittingly.\n\nI urge you all to sit down and watch this film again. You will remember things you\'ve long since forgotten, and maybe appreciate something you never even noticed was there before.', u'-0.332734'], u'tt0102926': [u'\nSweeping all five major Academy Awards ("Oscars" for Best Movie, Director, Actor, Actress, Screenplay) is quite an accomplishment.  Doing it nearly a year after a film was released is a miracle considering the notoriously short attention span of Oscar voters.  It is a powerful example of how great a movie can be when superb writers, directors, actors, and others work at the top of their craft.\n\n`Silence of the Lambs\' is  the story of a young FBI trainee Clarice Starling (Jodie Foster) who is summoned to help find one serial killer called `Buffalo Bill.\' by interviewing another.  Foster\'s performance is absolutely brilliant.  While Anthony Hopkins receives most of the (well-deserved) praise for his chilling portrayal of incarcerated serial killer `Hannibal \x91the Cannibal\' Lector\', it is Foster\'s performance that holds the movie together.  The fear she shows just behind her eyes makes Clarice\'s outward courage all the more interesting and vulnerable.  This is the perfect way to play the part because it explains Lector\'s interest in Clarice.  Her only bargaining chip in getting Lector\'s help is to let him `feed\' on her innermost secrets and fears in exchange for his brilliant insights into the psychotic mind.  The title of the movie comes from these exchanges and is very poignant.\n\nDirector Jonathan Demme is masterful.  There is one scene late in the movie that I will not spoil.  It is one of the most simply brilliant scenes ever staged in a movie.  I don\'t know if all the credit goes to Demme or the writers, but there is a moment in the film where the suspense builds beautifully to a what seems to be a common movie scene.  However, through skillful timing of the direction, the audiences assumptions are used against them and when the truth is revealed (hint: it involves a doorbell) it is shocking and induced a collective gasp from the audience I saw it with at the theatre.  It set the stage for an edge-of-your seat climax.\n\nDo not miss this movie.\n\nThe movie is incredibly suspenseful and an absolute must see. \n\n', u'0.631943', u'\nI\'ve seen way too many thrillers. You name it: "Identity", "Seven", "The Usual Suspects", etc., etc., etc. I remember my friend being so obsessed with "Silence of the Lambs", that it drove me crazy. And I hated the movie naturally and refused to see it. But everyone told me that I have to see this, so I let my guard down. And had an open mind, and I\'m glad I did. My friend was right, this is a great movie. It is so well acted, I couldn\'t even describe. I loved "Silence of the Lambs" and would recommend it to anyone. It\'s creepy and exciting. Trust me, you\'ll love it.\n\n10/10', u'0.18039', u'\nBrilliant Best Picture of 1991 that never gets old.  "The Silence of the Lambs" deals with a young FBI cadet (Oscar-winner Jodie Foster) who is sent to interview a captured madman (Oscar-winner Anthony Hopkins in one of the greatest performances ever on the screen) to find out about a serial killer (Ted Levine) who is stripping the skin from his female victims after they die.  The FBI has had no luck with the case and agent Scott Glenn tries to throw a curve-ball to Hopkins by sending Foster.  Hopkins is a former doctor of Levine and holds the clues to capturing the unknown criminal.  Needless to say the film takes many twists and turns, creating a suspenseful thriller that has no equal.  At the heart of "The Silence of the Lambs" are the confrontations between Hopkins and Foster.  They play a complicated chess match of words which results in some of the greatest footage ever captured for the cinema.  Hopkins dominates in spite of the fact he has approximately 17 minutes of time in the film.  This is a film that will wrap itself around you and you will likely never be able to shake some of the key elements you have seen in this amazing masterpiece.  5 stars out of 5. \n', u'0.197597', u'The Silence of the Lambs runs two hours.Anthony Hopkins appears for little more than sixteen minutes, yet during those minutes he hasn\'t bored you for a second, not even after the tenth or eleventh viewing. Such is the power of his performance, it\'s absolutely impossible to forget him.His character, Dr.Hannibal"The Cannibal" Lecter, is a brutal killer with revolting methods and habits, but he\'s also very intelligent, charismatic and with good taste(you can interpret that as you like).A clich\xe8 by now, but who cares? He still is one of the key elements in this wonderful thriller, which sees Jodie Foster\'s Clarice Starling asking for Lecter\'s help to catch another killer.The result is a dangerous yet fascinating relationship between the young, unexperienced FBI-agent and the convicted,but basically omnipotent, psychiatrist.He\'s a step ahead of everyone all the time, and makes sure everyone notices, with his witty, unforgettable one-liners.If there had to be only one reason to worship this movie, then it would have to be the chemistry between the two leading actors.Never before has a non-sexual man/woman connection been more thrilling.Never before has a film\'s ending been more unsettling and brilliant and left us asking for more.\n\nBest watched with a nice Chianti...\n\nP.S. dear film-buffs, have the lambs stopped screaming?', u'0.197376', u'I\'ll never forget my first viewing of this movie at the theater and will always look back fondly on it for one reason: helping me quit smoking cigarettes.\n\nI read the book first, was fascinated by it, and couldn\'t wait for the film to come out. That was the day I picked to quit smoking and I knew this movie would take my mind off that matter. I was expecting an intense movie and I got it. Little did I realize how well-received this film would be and how it propelled Anthony Hopkins to super-stardom.\n\nAlthough entertaining, this is not always a fun movie to watch, especially with the scenes with Ted Levine who plays the killer, "Buffalo Bill." "Bill" and his kidnapped young woman are sick and profane people, respectively, and their scenes are very unpleasant. This movie is not for the squeamish with those and other scenes involving the infamous Dr. Hannibal Lecter (Hopkins). There also is some extreme crudeness in the jail/dungeon where Lecter and other inmates are held.\n\nJodie Foster is excellent as the FBI agent "Clarice Starling" and Scott Glenn is low-key and effective as "Jack Crawford." A major part of the film is psychological more than violent as Lecter constantly taunts "Clarice," while she tries her best to manipulate him to help with a case. The by-play between the two is a game in itself.\n\nHopkins, however, is the actor people remember best from this movie. His portrayal of the refined-yet-cannibalistic serial killer-doctor is one viewers will never forget. I\'ve enjoyed watching him in the sequels, too. The looks on his face, his fascinating vocabulary with intelligent sarcasm and frankness, never ceases to entertain.\n\n"Silence Of The Lambs" has turned into a modern-day "classic." If by some odd chance you have never seen this movie, be warned it is a dark, difficult story to watch at times....but it will get your mind off other things.', u'0.0765491', u"\nThis is definitely a film that proves you don't need tons of blood and gore to have a good suspense film.  Anthony Hopkins performance as the deranged genius Lecter earned him a well deserved Academy Award and the same was true of Jodie Foster's performance as Clarice Starling.  This film should go down in history as one of the greatest suspense films in the history of cinema.", u'0.757886', u"\nThe Silence of the Lambs, having accomplished the rare feat of winning all five of the major Academy Award categories, is a remarkable achievement in filmmaking.  Gruesome, pulpish material was transformed by dedicated participants on all levels of production, and a film that would have failed in the hands of many others wound up becoming a modern masterpiece.  Taut direction and a superb screenplay might be the best arguments for the film's power, but the flashiest are certainly delivered in the bravura performances of Hopkins and Foster.  Their interplay -- and remember, they only share a handful of scenes together -- is nothing short of riveting. \n", u'0.740441', u"STAR RATING: ***** The Works **** Just Misses the Mark *** That Little Bit In Between ** Lagging Behind * The Pits \n\nRookie FBI agent Clarice Starling (Jodie Foster) is assigned to get into the mind of notorious incarcerated serial killer Dr Hannibal 'the Cannibal' Lecter (Anthony Hopkins) to get his evaluation on the elusive Buffalo Bill, a serial killer who's been abducting and killing young women. When a prominent senator's daughter is kidnapped, it becomes a race against time to find her before she is killed and all the while Lecter is playing mind-games with Starling as well as any help he can provide...\n\nThe first of Thomas Harris's Hannibal novels to be adapted for the screen, only to be followed some years later with some very lacklustre (but inevitable!) follow-ups, despite it's age this remains one of the most effective chillers of modern times. Despite the mainstream appeal of the film, the grainy lighting and laid-back budget give it an art-house feel that sets it apart from other such films that were as successful. The film manages some effectively disturbing scenes that make it a not altogether pleasant viewing experience.\n\nPerformances wise, in a very early role, a young Foster shows her promise for future roles, with a gripping portrayal of naivety and vulnerability here that is very compelling and convincing, even though there are some plausibility problems with someone as junior as her being assigned to do something like that. Hopkins too is brilliant as Lecter, playing a dangerous man behind bars who's ability to get inside your head and see the things you don't want him to see makes him no less dangerous, if not more so, than if he was on the outside. He's certainly received the most acclaim for his role over the years, but in my humble opinion, he's actually over-shadowed (though only slightly!) by Ted Levine as Buffalo Bill, a truly extraordinary psychopath with an unsettling sexuality disorder that is probably one of the nastiest things ever to be seen in such a mainstream film. As supporting FBI agent Crawford, Scott Glenn is impressive but sort of just faded into DTV land after this film.\n\nIt's easily one of the most popular films ever made, so it's likely a lot of you are familiar with it already, but with reviews on the so-inferior follow-up films Red Dragon and Hannibal, I thought it only right that I'd finally give this first film a mention. Truly remarkable. *****", u'0.30433', u'\nWith Silence of the Lambs comes some much needed recognition for the horror genre.  It is a first-rate production all around.  It boasts a witty and suspenseful script based on the Thomas Harris novel, full of great lines.  It has marvelous direction from Demme.  Demme creates suspense very well throughout and uses some great directorial shots such as the twin frames of Clarice ringing a doorbell and the FBI men breaking into a home.  The two lead actors won oscars for their performances...each deserved.  Foster is very good in her role, but it is Anthony Hopkins that literally lights up the screen with his complex portrayal of a complex serial killer.  Hopkins does the seemingly impossible. He frightens you with his outrageousness and yet illicts some pity/compassion(albeit not a lot) for his situation.  He says his lines with reservedness when needed and brashness when needed.  The rest of the cast is also quite good with Anthony Heald a standout as a unethical, petty doctor in charge of Hopkins.  Of course the story of the other killer is very very chilling as well.  A quality film in all aspects!', u'0.555655', u'It is a creepy and taken-by-storm experience with the film, background music is darker than the film itself and too ominous, plot is brilliantly constructed, conversations are thought-provocative, to crown the whole, Jodie Foster and Anthony Hopkin are the cream. They take ownership of Clarice and Hannibal respectively, transforming them into the most unforgettable screen images.\n\nThe psychological path of Hannibal is hard to trace. He is so odd a mixture of intelligence, cruelty, insanity, grace and charisma. In the depth, fledgling FBI trainee Clarice is no match of him. She is still naive yet very ambitious. On the trail of the serial killer Buffalo Bill, she\'s sent to interview him, a psychiatrist-turned-cannibal. Hannibal is willing to provide clues to finding the killer but only in return for personal information about Clarice herself. He calls it Quid Pro Quo. In those mind games, the two dance backward and forward between cannibal and FBI agent, mentor and student, psychiatrist and patient, father and daughter. It is Clarice who breathes life into the multidimensional sophisticated psychopath and Hannibal who nudges the aspiring student FBI agent and helps her achieve her first success in a world of Y chromosome where her guru Crawford uses her, embarrasses her, excludes her; Doctor Chilton regards her no more than a simple-minded woman and tries to flirt with her. Frankly speaking, though no lack of other impressive scenes, it\'s really the nerves fights between Hannibal and Clarice that carries the film.\n\nSome of the horrible scenes involve Buffalo Bill who, a transvestite, skins his victims, especially woman victims. But the most terrifying one is Clarice\'s single-handed trace in Buffalo Bill\'s gruesome den, which also has become another irony to the self-important testosterone-dominated world. Crawford\'s misjudgment and stubbornness makes him out of the right track, a special anti-terror deployment resulting in vain. But Clarice, though excluded from the business which she should be on, still holds onto her intuition and through on-the-spot investigation finds the serial killer at last. She has to take on him herself. (Demme uses "deceptive cutting" there to enhance the tension.) It is definitely a life-or-death fight, especially when Clarice is in the dark, groping her way in absolute terror. I have no doubt everyone holds the breath when the film rolls to that part.\n\nA gripping film that well deserved its Oscars', u'-0.171095', u'There is little doubt that the most memorable aspect of The Silence of the Lambs is Anthony Hopkins\' incomparable performance as Lecter. Taking over for Brian Cox, who was effective, but not especially memorable, as the good doctor in 1986\'s Manhunter, Hopkins instantly makes the role his own, capturing and conveying the charismatic essence of pure evil. To his dying day, no matter how many roles he plays in the interim, Hopkins will forever be known for this part. (It is a credit to Hopkins\' ability as an actor that this part did not result in stereotyping. His post-Silence career has been greatly varied, with roles as widely diverse as a stodgy butler in Merchant-Ivory\'s The Remains of the Day and an action hero in The Edge.) I can throw out any number of superlatives, but none of them do justice to this chilling performance, which I labeled as the best acting work of the \'90s. Want to feel the icy fingers of terror stroke your heart? Watch this mixture of brilliant eloquence and inhuman cruelty. As portrayed by Hopkins, Hannibal is both a suave, cultured gentleman and an unspeakable fiend. He is gracious and monstrous at the same time. (Hopkins also provided one of the most quotable lines in recent film history with "I ate his liver with some fava beans and a nice Chianti", which was followed by an inimitable slithering slurp.)', u'0.227455', u'Silence of the Lambs is a quintessence of a profound character study and a rare and vivid demonstration of an actor\'s subtle brilliance and his improvisation in manifestation of a nebulous entity (Lecter), almost single-handedly immortalizing it and in the process elevating himself to a position of unqualified envy and ubiquitous acclaim. In fact, one is likely to suffer, either from inarticulacy or verbosity while describing Anthony Hopkins portrayal of sadistically sophisticated Dr. Hannibal Lecter. Lecter\'s trademark, his wide open glacial eyes, devoid of any emotion, not only makes him deviously equanimous, but also egregiously peculiar. The fast, slurping-type sound invented by Hopkins that Lecter does, is as fascinating as it is chilling and Lecter\'s infamous "Good evening, Clarice", is as enthralling as it is vicious. Anthony Hopkins\'s performance is the shortest ever and the most memorable to win an Oscar in the leading category. \n\nHopkins as Lecter, is incontrovertibly and incredibly at the top of his game and it is his brilliance that gets the best out of the other actors, especially Jodie Foster. In fact, it won\'t be a hyperbole, that Anthony Hopkins\'s portrayal of cannibalistic Hannibal Lecter in Silence of the Lambs and more so in its sequel, Hannibal (which is my favorite of the series, as the story completely revolves around Lecter, giving him more exposure), is one of the best, the world of cinema has ever seen or offered. In spite of having some of the most gruesomely disturbing and viciously graphic sequences, Silence of the Lambs, is one of the most decorated and enthralling movies of all time. A must watch for avid fans and eclectic viewers.\n\nhttp://www.apotpourriofvestiges.com/', u'0.503278', u'\nTHE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS (1991) **** Jodie Foster, Anthony Hopkins, Scott Glenn, Ted Levine, Anthony Heald, Brooke Smith, Diane Baker (Cameos: Roger Corman, producer Kenneth Utt, singer Chris Isaak)   Terrifying masterpiece of modern-day horror and the first film since 1975\'s "One Flew Over The Cuckoo\'s Nest" to win all 5 major Oscars (Picture, Director: Jonathan Demme, Actress Foster, Actor Hopkins, and Screenplay Adaptation by Ted Tally of the best-seller by Thomas Harris): novice FBI agent Clarice Starling (a stalwart Foster) begins her career in a manhunt for a serial killer known as "Buffalo Bill", a transsexual wanna-be whose grisly crimes leads to her only source of his trail: imprisoned psychiatrist Hannibal "The Cannibal" Lecter (Hopkins in one chilling and modulated perf) whose mindgames with the rookie agent has her on her toes and running out of time.  Exciting, suspenseful and supremely scary with some truly eye-widening moments of the unexpected.  Best line: Lecter at film\'s end: "I\'m having an old friend for dinner."', u'0.987823', u"Once upon a crime, Hannibal Lecter was a manipulative psycho-killer compensating for his incarceration by messing with people's minds. Then Hannibal happened and he suddenly turned into a dandy anti-hero... Watching The Silence Of The Lambs again really puts things into perspective. Jonathan Demme's astute adaptation of Thomas Harris' last good book entwines the horror and detective genres to enduringly shocking effect, while Anthony Hopkins' Lecter and Jodie Foster's Starling fizz up an unsettling chemistry that was utterly lacking in the sequel.\n\nI haven't seen a movie this perfectly wrapped in a while. I recently re-watched it and it blew me away and it only gets better the more you see it.\n\nThe performances from everyone are great. Foster sold every scene she was in. But, of course, Hopkins stole every scene he was in and was a powerful anti hero who was scary even when concealed because you know his mind is working at every second. Always planning and he's rarely wrong. His escape was an amazing scene. Levine gives a suitably scary performance but just doesn't stand up to the greatness of Foster and Hopkins.\n\nAll the characters main characters are deep people are deep people with clear motivations. The police officers are the complete contradiction to this who abuse their power to do what they believe is right, and end up being wrong. It's clever.\n\nEverything is wrapped together really well, the performances were great and it's full of memorable scenes.\n\nI'm giving The Silence of the Lambs a 10/10.", u'0.261286', u"Agent Clarice Starling is a training FBI agent, hope to work in behavioral sciences with Jack Crawford. Crawford though sends Starling on an assignment, to psychologically exam the insanely intelligent criminal Hannibal Lecter. Crawford had another agenda, to see if Starling can press information out of Lecter to help with the current case of Buffalo Bill. Bill has already killed five girls, skinning off sections of their bodies. Lecter is intrigue by Starling and helps her with the investigation; they start to form a strange friendship.\n\nThe Silence of the Lambs is one of the best psychological thrillers. Thomas Harris's best selling book is faithfully transfered to the screen. It's one dark twisted disturbing ride. The mood is heighten by Demme's great direction, with such detail in all the sets and locations. Demme has used reflective surfaces wonderfully, during one of Starling's and Lecter's talks it used to great extent. One of the final sequences of Clarice walking through the basement of Bill's house is one of the most suspense full scenes i have ever seen.\n\nAll the performances are knock outs. Jodie Foster as always brings the goods and makes Starling the most interesting to watch. At times she makes Starling so fragile, then a second later she's strong as steel. Anthony Hopkins is so disturbing as Lecter. From the first second you see Lecter standing in his cell; just waiting for Starling to show, you can see Hopkins was perfect casting. You cant keep your eyes off Lecter, he's so disturbing and can make your skin crawl every time he speaks. Ted Levine makes the perfect serial killer, you can see from Levine's performance what a torn and damaged soul the killer is; you feel somewhat sympathetic for him.\n\nThe Silence of the Lambs is a must see, one of the best thrillers you'll ever see.", u'0.322139'], u'tt0118799': [u'\nI am surprised about the negative comments that some people made on this web-page.  I can see how some people might not experience the same kind of uplift or joy that most of us lived through when seeing the movie.  But that some viewers felt insulted and betrayed because the movie did not depict "reality" as it really was or is, is not fair.\n\nI must concur with my fellow proponents of the movie -- it was a great and very satisfying movie.  It provided me with something that everyone in one or another shape or form needs -- Hope.  The movie showed the cruelty of life and yet managed to shed some light and insight into the beauty of love and life in general.\n\nI urge anyone who has not seen La Vita \xe8 bella to go out there and watch it. If we all take with us just little bit of that hope and love that this movie is trying to convey; this world would be a much better place.\n\n\nThank you for reading this and I hope you enjoyed or will enjoy the movie as much as I did.\n\n\n\n\n', u'0.297111', u'I can\'t understand how other reviewers see this as a film about the Nazis or the Holocaust. It\'s not!!! "Life is Beautiful" is a film about love, optimism, courage and inner strength.\n\nTo be honest I can\'t get this film out of my thoughts and decided to write this brief review in the hope that I could move on.\n\n"Life is Beautiful" is an unforgettable film. You go through emotions you were surprised could have for a fictional film. The story, although totally implausible, is uplifting and depressing at the same time.\n\nPlease see it for yourself. Have a box of tissues handy.\n\nBest film ever seen!!!', u'0.165886', u"\nThis is one of those movies that have a lasting effect on you.   After watching it, I found that it has less to do with the Holocaust and more to do with the human feelings and the beautiful relationship of a father and his son.  The holocaust provides the ultimate context, that brings and highlights the story and adds yet another deep dimension to the movie.  No such piece of art has ever before combined laughter and tears of sadness in me before and that is the miracle of the movie.  The realism of the movie is not its strong point, but then again it is  not supposed to be; this helps in bringing the audiences to a state of mind away from reality, focusing on the feelings generated by forgetting about all external events and developments of the war.  Despite that, the movie does not fail to point out an element of the nazi psychology demonstrated by the doctor who was obsessed with riddles.  This portrayed the nazi 'state of mind' (if ever such an expression existed) as a sick mentally disturbed state.  Life is really beautiful as you watch Guido's relentless efforts to make a lovely exciting experience of the concentration camp to his son.  You get exhausted just watching him going through his painful day and yet you smile as he speaks to his son and makes him laugh.  One can go on forever  describing the creativity of this movie, but one will not be able to capture all its beauty in writing.  ", u'0.288218', u"\nRoberto Benigni's Vita e bella, is in many ways similar to Chaplin's Great Dictator.  Both are comic attacks on fascism, but the former's is the more successful.  Benigni initially accesses the emotions of his audience through simple comedy, which is a pleasant mix of Keaton and Chaplin.  Romance ensues with his real life wife Nicoletta Braschi.  The first half of this film has been seen by various critics as being inferior to the second, but this is certainly not the case.  In the first section we follow the delightful romance that will eventually lead to marriage and the creation of the wonderful Giosue (Giorgio Cantarini).\n\nIt is the first half where the audience can laugh the loudest and delight at the immense comedy talent of Benigni.  Unlike so many films nowadays there is nothing crude or course, his is simple innocent humour, which is all the more effective.  The way he ties together little strand in the film to create comedy elements shows a great writing ability, and a mastery of timing when it comes to their execution on screen.  Various incidents related to the rise of anti-semitism and fascism in Italy show that there are sinister forces at work which come to the fore in the second segment.\n\nGuido (Benigni) moves events on from Tuscany in 1939 to the last year of the war in a concentration camp.  In this period he and Dora (Braschi) have had their son Giosue (Cantanarini).  The five year old greatly reminds me of Toto in Cinema Paradiso, and plays an equally important role in his prospective film (though in Paradiso's case it is at the beginning of the movie).  The relationship between the two is very similar to that of Jackie Coogan and Charlie Chaplin (though Benigni, unlike Chaplin, keeps the best of the comedy moments).  Guido attempts to keep from the boy the horrors of what is going on, and this eventually manifests itself as a game where the aim is to score 100 points, with the winner winning a real tank (which, of course appeals to the young boy).  Comic moments are still present, that involving Guido's translation of the rules of the camp is particularly notable, but it becomes somewhat more difficult to laugh when we consider the gravity of what is going on.\n\nThe emphasis begins shifts, and we realise that this is a film about human spirit above all else.  Guido not only appeals to the audience due to his comedy and sheer pleasantness, but also in the way that he loves his family and the measures that he will go to to protect them.\n\nThis is certainly no Schindler's List, but it never pretends to be. Occasionally events seem a little contrived, but this does seem to work in the film's favour.  However, this film avoids the tendency of Hollywood to go far over the top in emotional and credibility terms.\n\nBenigni shines like a lantern throughout the picture, showing that he is a talent, not only in comedy terms, that far outshines his peers.  Cantanari is a delight, and Braschi also plays her part well.  There is even an appearance by The Magnificent Seven's Horst Buchholz as Doctor Lessing, a man who events change for the worse.\n\nPlease don't let the fact that it, to all but the Italians, is a foreign language film.  The language itself adds a beauty of form to the film, much as it did in the case of Il Postino.  This has to be a certainty for the Best Foreign Language Film Oscar, though something tells me that it will be overlooked for other awards as it is Italian and not a mainstream English language picture.\n\nPlease see this film, and make up your own mind.  It is appealing in so many different ways that I'm sure that you will not be disappointed.\n", u'0.402377', u"\nI find it sad that so many people are so narrow-minded that they will not watch a movie that is black and white or, in this case, is subtitled. I feel sorry for people who refuse to watch a movie like Life Is Beautiful just because it is a foreign film. They have no idea what a beautifully acted and directed film this is, and they'll never know what an amazing experience they are missing. \n\nLife Is Beautiful manages to walk the extremely thin line between humor, fantasy, and tragedy. Sure, the film is clearly comedic, but nevertheless it manages to very effectively communicate the tremendous losses suffered in the Nazi concentration camps and has scenes at least as intense as any scene in Schindler's List. \n\nThis is one of the best films that I have ever seen. It manages to be so encompassing that you hardly notice the subtitles are even there. I proudly cast my vote of 10.", u'0.146623', u"\nThis may be one of the best films ever made. I've never seen a movie with such a balance of hysterical comedy and serious drama. Roberto Benigni totally deserved his Oscars. People on this site have said such negative things about him and this film. Mr. Benigni had a lot of guts to make this film, and there's not another film like it. He handled both the comedy and drama aspects beautifully. I loved the beautiful cinematography, scenery, and the characters. This movie is magnificent in every way. Don't miss it!", u'0.340175', u'The first time I saw the movie was when I was about seventeen or so, and I never forgot it. The incredibly human characters (such as the doctor who loved riddles), the fantastic script-writing, the amazing acting, and of course the heartwarming story. This movie proves once and for all how strong we are, as humans, that in the face of adversity we can make the best of things. There is so much love in the characters; Dora\'s love for her husband Guido is boundless, as well as Guido\'s love for his son. Sure, it\'s a slightly unrealistic movie, but hey, aren\'t they all a little unrealistic? I\'ve also seen people review this movie and say that it made light of the Holocaust, which was of course a dark point in history. I don\'t think so; I think that it\'s only delicately handled, and because of that, the movie is one that a person can watch in one sitting without being thoroughly disgusted by mankind. I would say that those who think this movie is too "light" are cynical and bitter. The whole point to the movie is to show what love is capable of, and to provide encouragement and perhaps guidance. This movie changed my life from the first time I watched it. I came away with this feeling that no matter what I have to face in life, that I can overcome it. This is a movie that I would recommend to anyone over the age of eleven. The acting is superb (though Roberto Benigni is a little over-the-top, LOL), the story heartwarming and easy to understand. It\'s excellent!', u'0.156286', u"I have never in my life seen a movie that so truly symbolizes its name and its message. Roberto Benigni - 'The Italian Treasure House' has probably given to his viewers his best. The story, the performances, the entire theme of a person performing his duties as a husband, as a father is very 'moving' and inspiring. 'Life is beautiful' as the name goes is about a Jewish man, who falls in love with a non-Jewish lady, marries her, has a kid and who is then taken as a prisoner in a concentration camp along with his wife and kid. But the way he protects his kid from the horrors of the genocide, how he always tries to find ways to make his wife and kid smile and laugh, is what makes the movie, a MUST SEE.\n\nIt is certainly one of the best movies that I have seen.", u'0.658294', u"\nI typically don't care much for sub-titled movies.  Foreign films to me are slow and about nothing.  So I naturally went to see Life is Beautiful with a\nchip on my shoulder.  I wanted to hate it.  I wanted it to be just another movie that Hollywood was praising to show that they were an intelligent bunch of people.  Oh boy was I in for the surprise of my life.  Not only is this film good, I honestly believe that it was the second best film of 98, next to Saving Private Ryan.  The mere fact that Shakespeare in Love won best picture over not only Ryan but over this, is a joke.  It's actually funny.\n\nBenigni did everything in this film.  He wrote, produced, directed and probably swept the floors at night.  There is that much raw energy in this film.  There really is.  For someone to have that kind of vision is truly incredible.  And not only is the film a terrific cinematic experience because of the importance and seriousness of the subject matter, but it is one of the funnier films I've ever seen.  When Roberto is translating the German soldiers insructions to his son so that he isn't scared, it is at that moment that you realize you are under his spell.  He's got you and no matter how much sceptisism you may have about the film you know you're witnessing a classic in every sense of the word.\n\nI loved this film.  Loved everything about it and I am so glad that I got to see it and cheer Benigni at the Oscars.  He certainly deserved his best actor award and he should have gotten more.", u'0.272739', u'Mixing humor and the Holocaust isn\'t anything new: Ernst Lubitsch\'s \'To Be Or Not To Be\' is just one enduring classic; Mel Brooks\' \'The Producers\' is another; and \'Life Is Beautiful\' has the small-town charm and ambiance of \'Amarcord,\' and light-straight satire of \'The Great Dictator.\'\n\nSet against the stark reality of World War II Europe, Roberto Benigni\'s sentimental fable is not a film about the Holocaust, it\'s a film about life and hope merely against the backdrop of the Holocaust... It\'s not a denial of the Holocaust, it is a manifestation that humor itself can be courage... It\'s not about betraying the experience of millions of Jews, it is about the great lengths a father will go to protect his family from the horrors of the Nazis... It\'s a demonstration of the power of cinema, it\'s art without claim, hope without fear, dreams without limitations... It\'s a motion picture about love, not a documentary about the Nazis... It delivers a powerful message that despite everything\x97life is truly beautiful... \n\nThe story begins in 1939 Italy, where a simple, free-spirited Italian Jew Guido Orefice (Benigni) and his poet friend Ferrucio (Sergio Bini Bustic) have dreams of owning their own bookstore... For now, however, Guido must be satisfied to wait tables, while Ferrucio is unable to get a job...\n\nBenigni\'s character is introduced during a long set of fast comedy scenes, particularly when he meets a cute gentile woman, Dora\x97Nicoletta Braschi, Benigni\'s real-life wife... When she \'falls out of the sky,\' and he quickly nicknames her \'Principessa\'... When he rides, in a fascist ball, on a horse painted green... When he turns a gloomy rainy night into a red carpet event... When he is caught by the Nazis as he hurries about securing the safety of his wife and son.. When his car speeds, without brakes, through a village and is mistaken for a king... \n\nGuido falls hard for the radiant schoolteacher, daughter of a wealthy family, and pursues her with all the charm and imagination he can discharge... In one sequence he pretends to be a school inspector and gives an impromptu speech on racial superiority before the assembled students and teachers, ending with a striptease...\n\nThat hilarious side of the film takes up the first half... Benigni (who also wrote and directed) borrows a bit of Chaplin\'s grace and a bit of Groucho Marx charm... All of the action is so neatly contrived that the film essentially ends when it\'s over, and then begins again with the introduction of Guido and Dora\'s cute five-year-old son Giosue (Giorgio Cantarini) few years later... \n\nThere, in 1945, we catch a glimpse of their enchanting household, but things are soon shattered, and the Nazis take Guido, with his tolerant uncle (Giustino Durano) and little Giosue off to an unidentified concentration camp... Dora races to the train station and demands to be put also on the train... \n\nAt the death camp, and in order to protect his son from the nightmare of the place, Guido uses his imagination by creating the illusion that everything that\'s happening is just a game, an epic game that will be exciting and fun...\n\nHe convinces Giosue that by hiding from the Gestapo soldiers (whom he refers to simply as the "men who yell a lot") and maintaining silence, he can gain the necessary points to win a tank... Not a toy tank, but a full-size tank, which they\'ll be free to take home...\n\nAs co-writer, Benigni (with Vincenzo Cerami), doesn\'t just mix drama and comedy, he often hides drama in the comedy... The film does not dwell on the horrors of the camp, nor does it ignore them... \n\nWith a memorable score by Nicola Piovani, "Life Is Beautiful" is an important film, triumphant, timeless, and sublime... It manages to entertain, educate, and move with its potent combination of humor, poignancy, and dignity... Roberto Benigni has taken pure horror and turned it into a love story between a man and a woman, between a father and his son... As an actor, Benigni manages with his wise and simple performance to make us laugh in tragic situations... He was very realistic, natural, distant from great special effects, far from Hollywood style, only nice and beautiful cinema...\n\nThe film won Academy Awards for Best Actor, Best Foreign Film and Best Dramatic Score...', u'0.215289', u"\nLife Is Beautiful takes the premise that love and hope can survive the most trying of conditions, in this case a Nazi concentration camp. Most everyone knows this very popular and honored film, so I won't belabor the story. Briefly, in my humble opinion, this film deserves all the accolades it's been awarded. A near perfect film, my only gripe is that Mr. Benigni's performance could have been more understated, especially the half of the film that's set in the concentration camp. But this is only a slight complaint. For a joyful, life-affirming movie, Life Is Beautiful is tops. But be forewarned, as its principal backdrop of anti-Semitism and Nazi murder, it is not a very happy movie. ", u'0.0948718', u'\nAs a son of Holocaust survivors, I skip movies on this theme.  This is a protective mechanism that I use to avoid painful emotions, but it has denied me the experience of such films as "Schindler\'s List".\n\n"Life is Beautiful", I was told, is not a holocaust film.  It is emotional, but deemed "safe". Well, I saw the film, and find myself strongly ambivalent about its message and content. I would love the oppurtunity to ask the creators:  did you simply use the Holocaust as a convenient backdrop to your story? Was it just stage and scenery for the players (much like the opera depicted in the film)?  Will others find similar Holocaust venues to fit their stories?  I don\'t have the answer.  I personally was hurt by the "Hogans Heroes" type story depicted in the second half of the film. I have been told by my own parents of painful yet poignant stories of parent and child in the Holocaust that contrast by their stark reality, to the fairy tale as depicted in the film. As stated at the top, I am ambivalent.  The film serves our children well.  More than any other film I have seen, it shows us, in a way a four year old understands, the absurdity of treating anyone, even "Visigoths and spiders", differently than we would want to be treated ourselves.  The acting is impeccable, the music uplifting, and the audience walks out greater for having seen the movie.  I only hope the success of this film does not give others the green light in using a very sad part of history in a way that lessens the memory of those who suffered through it.', u'0.0925366', u'When I first saw this film, I was told up front that the first full hour of the film, the first half, was all slapstick comedy and character development, and that the second half was more serious and important. I prepared myself mentally for the first half, but I was still surprised by how annoying the gags and jokes were. We\'re talking cake-in-face, fall-over, slip-on-banana humor. For one full hour. At the end of the first half of this film, I was thinking "this had better get better very soon..." And it did. Right then and there. From the very beginning of the second half, the serious mood enters. And it doesn\'t take long for even the most average minded viewer to realize that the first half of humor and character development was important. It was important for us to ease into a less tense mood, to make the important subject strike even harder, and for us to get to know the characters, to make us care more about what happens to them. I\'ve just finished seeing it for the second time, and I\'ve come to realize that this film is not entirely perfect, as I felt just after seeing it through first time. It does have its flaws, though there aren\'t many of them. The first half, and some parts of the second half, are heavy on humor, which some will mistake for making fun of the subject(which is almost a crime), or trying to make it seem less important. I don\'t believe this to be true, it\'s just a retelling with a more positive message; yes, people do horrible, inhumane things sometimes... but after all, there is beauty, too. The first half will also deter some viewers who will enjoy the second half much more. The plot is very good, though slightly unrealistic. The acting is pretty much all flawless, even in the child actors. The characters are well-written and interesting. The humor is more acceptable in the second part, because it\'s more toned down and not trying way too hard to get a quick laugh out of the audience. All in all, a great film which anyone and everyone should see at least once during their life... you\'ll laugh, you\'ll cry, you\'ll realize that, in the end, Life Is Beautiful. I recommend this to just about anyone, but I know that not everyone will enjoy it equally. A near-perfect film. Keep watching past the first half... you won\'t regret it. 9/10', u'0.204584', u"\nI saw this movie soon after its American release, before the massive wave of buzz set in.  At the time, I remember thinking that America's intelligience level had to be much higher than the level this film speaks to.  I was wrong.  This movie might as well have been directed by Joel Schumacher (who, in my opinion is the worst director in Hollywood)  Pure schlock.  This movie is on the same level of Patch Adams:  cheesy, brainless and horrible.\n\nEverything in this film is weak: the script, the pacing, the cinematography, and especially the acting.  Roberto Benigni winning an Oscar is the equivalent of Danielle Steel winning a Nobel Prize in literature. The only point of this movie is to make the viewer cry.\n\nIf you are interested in a foreign film that shows how the relationship between an doomed father and an unwitting child should be played, watch the Russian film Burnt by the Sun.  This film is just poor.\n", u'-0.466466', u"Wonderful fable plenty of amazing fantasy, lively comedy and sad tragedy . This is a poignant and moving fable about a sacrifice to save a son and a wife . It's an unforgettable story formed by two halves that proves imagination, family and love conquer all ; as Benigni's focus is on the love between daddy , mummy and son . The first part results to be an Italian comedy style , the second is horror along with humor . It concerns upon Guido (Roberto Benigni, a magnificent rubber-faced funny man), a Jewish man who has a wonderful romance with the help of his humour, but must use that same quality to protect his son in a Nazi death camp . He's a madcap romantic man and women wish him . But he falls in love with Dora (Benigni's real-life sweetie Nicoletta Braschi). Every day Guido dreams of marrying her , under Nicola Piovani score . When the Second World War spontaneously breaks out , he and his family is imprisoned at concentration camp . Guido is determined to save his lover and son (Cantarini) from dangers around them . His effort sometimes is pure fantasy , though with ruse he pull off more impetus to keep his son and accomplishes feats no man could realistically execute . Guido fabricates an elaborated game to convince his child that the whole ordeal is an endurance proof to be won with prizes forthcoming , as it turns out to be a special contest to win a tank.\n\nThis is a story about love , war and sacrifice , well starred and directed by Roberto Benigni who develops a fire-line between comedy and tragedy . Inventive gags and wacky humor are splendidly proceeded . At first consideration , the theme of a feel-good holocaust comedy war was a non-sense . However , Benigni doesn't describe a holocaust film but rather a tale of endurance of family love . Benigni tirelessly maintains the humorous ingenuity, even as the horror war escalates. Actor and director Benigni shapes simultaneously haunting and hilarious comedy out of the tragedy of Nazi concentration camp . In a especially humorous scene , Guido translates a guard's barking at the inmates as furthers clarification of the rules of game . The picture is divided into two parts , the first half deals with an entertaining boy-meets-girl tale , a light-weight comedy in which Guido relentlessly pursues Dora ; the second half shifts and depicts the horrors of the concentration camps . Good support cast formed by notorious secondaries as the Spanish Marisa Paredes , Lidia Alfonsi and Horst Buchhold as a Nazi doctor . The film displays an emotive musical score by Nicola Piovani, who deservedly had Oscar winner . Furthermore , it won Academy Award to Foreign film and of course to Benigni ; Roberto Benigni's Oscar for best actor marked only the second time that an actor had directed himself in an Academy Award winning performance , the other was Laurence Olivier for Hamlet . Colorful and glamorous cinematography by Tonino Delli Colli . Effective and appropriate production design by the veteran Danilo Donati . The motion picture was marvelously directed by Benigni. He's a good comedy director (Monster, Johnny Toothpick, Little devil) with some flop (Pinoccio) and usual actor for Jim Jarmusch (Coffee and cigarettes, Night of Earth, Down by law). Rating : Better than average . Well worth seeing .", u'0.528173'], u'tt0057012': [u"\n   What makes this film so powerful is the message that it made at the time  of its release. This film came out at a height of paranoia of the nuclear  age and the Cold War, right around the time of the Cuban Missile Crisis.  This film depicts a horrible, tragic incident in which a breach in the  government and a few diplomatic mistakes result in nuclear holocaust. So,  why didn't this film inspire panic? Because of the brilliant way in which  Kubrick presents it... as a satire. The scariest thing about this film in  retrospect is not how it depicts the impending doom of the Cold War, but  how it makes you laugh at it. By presenting it with humor, it conveys just  how much of a farce the nuclear arms race was in real life. And I don't  think that any other film has captured the absurdity of war nearly as well  as this one has. And I am not likely to believe that one ever will. In my  opinion, Kubrick has never made a better film since. And kudos to George C.  Scott for his astounding performance, as well as Peter Sellers for the most  versatile acting I've seen from an actor in one film, and to Sterling  Hayden, for performing the most serious, yet the most hilarious role in  film with perfect accuracy. Beware of fluoridation!", u'-0.0503874', u'\nThis movie is possibly the best comedy ever made, only with one fact against it: it\'s not very "comical". Hilarious? Yes. Comical? Absolutely not. The horrors of the nuclear war caused by a simple mistake materialize before us, directed with skill by the late maestro, Kubrick.\n\nThere are simply not enough words to describe Peter Sellers\'s BRILLIANT performance in three roles: A british officer, the U.S president and Dr. Strangelove. He is hilarious as the british officer, with his wonderful accent, gloomy and neurotic as the president and simply insane as Dr. Strangelove.\n\nAlso note that this movie includes a performance by very young James Earl Jones, who we now all know as the voice behind Darth Vader.\n\nThe ending scene is also a masterpiece.', u'0.335554', u'\nFew films are able to take a deadly serious issue and place it within the context of a broad comedy successfully.  Dr. Strangelove does exactly that. Kubrick\'s masterpiece illustrates in brilliant fashion the idiocy of nuclear war and the idiots who are orchestrating it. What strikes one most however in this cinematic gem are the individual characterisations of Sellers, Scott, Hayden and Pickens. To refer to them as memorable roles is a gross understatement. With names such as President Merkin Muffley, General "Buck" Turgidson, General Jack D. Ripper and Major T.J. "King" Kong, you know that these characters will not be soon forgotten. Other features of the film such as the remarkably designed "war room" set, the hand-held camera techniques employed by Kubrick and the black and white cinematography of Gilbert Taylor only add to the power and impact of "Strangelove."  Quite simply, the greatest American film by the greatest American director. ', u'0.752825', u"\nStanley Kubrick's first and only comedic masterpiece is still the finest ever made. I love everything in the movie: the brilliant acting, sensational script, flawless direction, and even those quirky visual effects. Not only was this film hilarious, it was a breakthrough for the entire film industry when first released. In addition to it's amazing satirical basis, the film also played a major role in how films were advertised and marketed... as if Peter Seller's performance wasn't enough! The sets were also very convincing and just plain great! So realistic in fact, that the FBI almost investigated how they got the B-52 Bomber replicated to near perfection!\n\nIn the end, 'Dr. Strangelove: or How I Learned to Stop Worrying and Love the Bomb' is the best comedy. It's also another milestone in film making and another reason to be astonished when looking at the work of Stanley Kubrick.\n\nAn obvious perfect ***** / *****", u'0.82375', u"This movie is absolutely brilliant! It might not be THE best movie ever made but it certainly is one of the most entertaining and fun movies ever made. It isn't even Kubrick's best but it certainly is perhaps his most accessible and entertaining movie.\n\nThe movie its story and humor are subtle and perfectly makes fun of the whole Cold War situation in the '60's. With some subtle dialog Kubrick perfectly makes fun of a very serious and relevant topic. I mean, the story of this movie isn't that unlikely and could had actually really happened. As a matter of fact, it could still happen today. It's frightening but thanks to Kubrick's directing the movie never really becomes serious and remains fun, hilarious and entertaining from beginning till end. It is the only movie that makes you laugh at the end of the world.\n\nThe actors are also what makes this movie fun to watch. Peter Sellers is nothing short of brilliant in the three different roles that he plays; Group Captain (G/C) Lionel Mandrake/President Merkin Muffley/Dr. Strangelove. But also George C. Scott is comically brilliant in this movie as Gen. 'Buck' Turgidson and he perhaps plays his very best role. Other actors that stood out were; Slim Pickens and Peter Bull. This movie also marks James Earl Jones his very first appearance in a movie.\n\nThis is perhaps the most subtle and 'darkest' comedies ever made. Everything about it is shear brilliance and even now 40 years later, it hasn't lost any of its power. The movie still looks like it could had been made a couple of months ago. A movie that will never feel outdated or too 'old fashioned' to watch. In 50 years from now, this movie will be just as good and hilarious, as it is now. Mark my words.\n\nThe movie is filled with some truly classic long sequences and has countless unforgettable moments and dialog in it. Especially the last sequence, involving Dr Strangelove, is absolutely priceless and unforgettable.\n\nBrilliant, brilliant, brilliant!\n\n10/10\n\nhttp://bobafett1138.blogspot.com/", u'0.534959', u"I never really bought into the Kubrick hype. I mean: don't get me wrong; I like all of his films very much - but to me, they all feel somewhat over-constructed and lack a natural flow. And then I finally got to see 'Dr.Strangelove'. Wow. What a terrific, pitch black satire. This film is so wild and mean and funny - and Peter Sellers gives THE performance of his career. Unlike in any of Kubrick's later works, there's a sense of playfulness here that gives the whole movie a crazy kind of energy; I'm guessing that Seller's love for improvisation forced Kubrick to ditch his usual perfectionism to a certain degree (and the film is all the better for it). Sharp, outrageously entertaining comedy/satire by one of the most revered directors of the past century. 10 out of 10.\n\nFavorite films: http://www.IMDb.com/list/mkjOKvqlSBs/\n\nLesser-known Masterpieces: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls070242495/\n\nFavorite Low-Budget and B-Movies: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls054808375/\n\nFavorite TV-Shows reviewed: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls075552387/", u'0.491053', u"Who'd have thought that Kubrick had such a great sense of humor? I mean, in most of his films, there are snippets of humor, and Barry Lyndon has a definite irony, but I hadn't expected him to be able to direct such a hilarious and thoroughly entertaining comedy. I had known for a while that this was the highest rated Kubrick film here on IMDb, so naturally, I was excited to find out if it was really his best film. Even though I haven't seen Lolita, Spartacus, Eyes Wide Shut or his first few films(the shorts he made before his feature), and even though I thoroughly enjoyed his other films, this very well may be his best film. Made in a period of time where the thought of nuclear war was a terrifying idea, that was believed to be a reasonable fear, the film takes this idea and turns it around, makes us laugh at it. The film was made during the Cold War, which must have taken quite a lot of guts on Kubrick's side... then again, he did start out, intending to make a thriller/suspense film about the subject, but ultimately realized that a comedy with a lighthearted look on the situation would be a better idea. So, he turned the idea of impending doom from nuclear holocaust into a black comedy. Personally, I think he did a damn good job of it. I haven't laughed that hard and for so long at any one time for quite a while... in fact, I might never have. The comedy isn't overplayed, in fact most of it is presented in a dead-pan, matter-of-fact-like type of way... what's even more hilarious is that the better part of it is completely accurate. No dumb stereotypes, no old clich\xe9s... just logic and simple, good old-fashioned observation. The plot is excellent, and very well-paced. In my opinion, Kubrick's most well-paced film. The plot takes off almost immediately and moves at a great pace throughout the film. The acting is flawless. Absolutely flawless. Not something completely unusual for a Kubrick film, but still. George C. Scott and Peter Sellers are amazing. Normally, I'm not too fond of Sellers, but here he was brilliant. The characters are well-written, diverse and interesting. The cinematography is great. Just like Kubrick's other films, this one has some very memorable scenes, one of which(the bomb-riding sequence) has been referenced and spoofed a huge number of times... possibly more times than any other sequence in Kubrick's films, which is quite impressive. The dialog is well-written, well-delivered and memorable. Plenty of quotable lines. I can't really say much more about the movie without ruining one or more of the innumerable great jokes... so I'll just suggest you see it. Seriously, if you enjoy Kubrick's sense of humor as seen limited in his other movies, you're going to enjoy this film. Maybe not as much as I did, but you'll most likely laugh. A lot. I recommend this to any fan of Kubrick, black comedies, Peter Sellers or just comedies with a dark basic theme to watch this. I can't praise it enough. See it, unless you are offended by the themes the film presents. You won't regret it. I know I didn't. Not by a long shot. Hilarious film with a provocative plot and basic idea. 10/10", u'0.509046', u"\nWhen US General Jack D. Ripper orders wing attack plan R into operation he sets his plane on an irrecoverable bombing run into Russia.  Powerless to stop them with the relevant three letter access code the President of America and his advisors plan to warn Russia as best they can to prevent as many of the planes reaching their targets as possible.  However when the Russian Ambassador warns of the doomsday machine \x96 a machine that will destroy all life on earth in response to a nuclear attack things become desperate.  With one plane making a desperate run to it's target things look bleak.\n\nNow well respected as a superb satire on the arms race this is one of my favourite Kubrick films.  It is less cold than some of this later work and is genuinely funny without losing it's point.  The story focuses on three main areas of the attack \x96 the military base where one crazed man launches the attack, the war room at the pentagon and the plane making the bombing run.  All these have comedy inherent in them \x96 although thew war room is by far the best.  The story is an satire on the futility and danger of the nuclear deterrent while also scattered with fantastic dialogue.  It may not sound funny but trust me \x96 it is.\n\nThe characters are all great and well done by the cast.  Peter Sellers excels in each of his roles and shows his quality.  As Mandrake he is funny in a very British way, as The President he has great one sided conversations with his Russian counterpart as well as great dialogue including the legendary `Gentlemen you can't fight in here \x96 this is the war room'.  However as Dr Strangelove he is hilarious \x96 the character himself is a swipe at those who change political sides but maybe still hold onto their old ideologies.  Sterling Hayden is great as General Ripper \x96 he delivers his madness with a straight face throughout (or maybe no-one told him it was a comedy!).  Slim Pickens is good and has the most famous scene from the film that has been copied in many things including Homer's fantasy in The Simpsons.  However for me the standout is George C. Scott \x96 not exactly a comedy actor he is frantic and over the top with his communist paranoia.\n\nOverall this is a classic and deserves to be.  It is sharp today as it was then and even more relevant.  The comedy is still fresh and the dialogue is great \x96 quite simply, when Scott implores the president to act quickly as `we must not have a mineshaft gap!' then you've arrived!", u'0.176131', u"\nOne of the best films ever made, this remains timeless despite changes in technology, foreign policy and world politics; the military/political madness remains the same.  Gets better all the time, with successive viewings and its luster has not dimmed since its first release.\n\nWith three show-stopping performances from Sellers (amongst his best work, if not THE BEST), and an unexpectedly hilarious turn by George C. Scott (if Sellers weren't SO dead on-target, Scott would easily steal the show), STRANGELOVE is filled with cartoonish, over-the-top characters that, despite the lunacy, still ring true.  Special mention must be made for Sterling Heyden's controlled, brooding paranoia as General Jack D. Ripper.  He's funny, he's scary.\n\nAll-in-all, a brilliant piece of work by all involved. ", u'0.442699', u'Stanley Kubrick always likes to try something new with each movie he does, and this proves it. This is truly one of the grittiest, and best dark comedies I\'ve ever seen with some crude moments and some odd ones (who\'d think to have Slim Pickens riding a bomb on it\'s way down). It turns into a flat out masterpiece though with the spectacular acting by Peter Sellers (in three separate roles), George C. Scott (his facial expressions are a crack up every time), and a supporting cast of crazies in a government of loons, the most impressive of these being the incomparable Sterling Hayden in his best dramatic/funny role. It contains a resonance as well that sticks till today, as corruption and pig-headedness rules in all sorts of governments, but most of all in those with the most power. It\'s almost worth it just for the opening credits and end sequence with "we\'ll meet again".', u'0.662543', u"\nEntertainment Weekly called this one of the funniest 100 movies ever made. It also happens to be one of the most disturbing movies made. The humor is right there in your face, however, there is always an underlining political critique under every character, every line, and every government representation. Slim Pickins is the never quit Airman. He is a representative of our entire military system of the time. The president, played beautifully by Peter Sellers, is a demure, calm presence trying to deal with the Russian premiere. His perfect counterpart is a war hungry General, ready to accuse the Russians of any small infraction. This leads to one of the funniest lines in the whole movie. Sellers also plays a British airman who has to deal with the crazed general in the usual polite British manner. Seller's third role is that of the title character, Dr. Strangelove, a former nazi and weapons designer for the Americans. He represents the scientific community of that time period; those who worked tirelessly to build a better bomb. These characters, all of them strongly parodying a cross section of society make for an odd story. The final scene, while played for laughs, is actually a frightening image of a communist future. The final moments are frightening in their truth leading one to put themselves in a position of the characters. Dr. Strangelove is the funniest disturbing film I've ever seen.", u'0.497166', u"Who else than Stanley Kubrick could take a serious subject like the cold war and tell the story like a comedy ??? He proves his genius in this film more like in any other film of his. It's the story about one general ( with the very appropriate name Jack D. Ripper) gone mad and he launches an attack on Russia all by himself. He's mad, but still smart enough to prevent that anyone can stop him. He's got this strange ( but very funny ) theories about body-fluids, but his men respect him and do everything he says. So 34 fully-armed plains are sent to as many targets. Meanwhile his Colonel, Mandrake, tries to talk sense to him and the president and another General are trying to warn the Russian prime minister. You can have nothing but great respect for Peter Sellers. He plays three roles in this film and every single one of them is flawless. The doctor Strangelove character is hilarious and creepy at the same time. His appearances as the doctor are, along with the telephone conversations between the president and the Russian Prime minister the funniest moments in the film... Also the classic bomb-ride of Major Kong off course. George C. Scott is clearly having fun in his role and the debut of James Earl Jones is also definitely worth mentioning. Like I said already...a must see film if you're a film lover in general.", u'0.454145', u"Maybe there is something wrong with me. I have watched this film twice and I still don't get what all the hoopla is about. I'm not saying that this isn't a dark comedic masterpiece with a first rate cast, director and writing but I don't think it is as funny or dark as it could be. It takes a lot to watch it without being distracted. George C. Scott is brilliant as is Peter Sellers CBE. Sterling Hayden, James Earl Jones ,and Keenan Wynn are also great in the cast. Kubrick was known for his perfectionism and I'm not surprised by this film. It's short and maybe too short. There is a lot going on in the film. There are funny lines like there is no fighting in the war room is classic but that it's about it. The film is too short, too clever for my taste.", u'-0.174759', u'Spoilers Ahead;\n\nFirst, many people who knew Gen. Curtis LeMay said that Kubrick\'s Gen. Ripper is quite a credible likeness of his personality. The core of the film is contained, in microcosm, within Ripper\'s show stopping lecture on precious bodily fluids. Freudianism was in its heyday notice all the phallic imagery of the plane at the beginning. Here, Gen. Ripper arrived at his hypothesis during the act of love when he failed to perform. From this tiny personal failing, the world comes to an end. As he is speaking, notice how reason is a slave to his sex drive; he is impotent there has to be a rational explanation for it. Normally, he would be considered slightly eccentric. Unfortunately, and this is the key, he happens to be in charge of an air defense wing. This is template for Kubrick: technology in the service of dangerously irrational creatures who are under the deadly delusion they are rational. \n\nWe see the same with Kong\'s survival lecture and all his commands mixed within the rational are bizarre irrationalities like,"boy, a guy could have a good weekend in Las Vegas with this stuff." "There are going to be promotions and you all will be up for them regardless of your color, your race or your creed." Gee, could we get back to the mission? Kong and Ripper are mirrors; Kubrick wants you to see that human irrationality mated with atomic technology equals only one thing: THE END OF THE HUMAN RACE. All of Stanley\'s films are studies in human self deception. How we try to conceal from ourselves how dangerously irrational and violent we are. I love the scene where Keenan Wynn is arguing with Mandrake about whether he is allowed to smash a Coke machine to get money to call the president. This is quintessential Stanley. Also, when the Russian Ambassador warns the president that premier KISSOFF has been drinking, watch out. \n\nYet, for all its drop dead funny humor, the film is quite depressing for we see our collective future. We all know what would have happened on 9 11 if those guys had nuclear weapons. Yet, it is so funny and entertaining how can you not see Stanley Kubrick\'s Best Film. It is a real masterpiece of again holding a mirror up to us. Take a good look that is who is going to be in charge of more and more powerful weapons. As time passes, more and more people resembling Major Kong or Gen. Ripper will get their hands on nuclear weapons. You see where we are all going. The core of the movie within the humor is to show you like 2001 how utterly savage, violent and irrational we are. It is the same as CLOCKWORK ORANGE. A non violent Alex let loose in the delusional world these comatose fools think is peaceful. It is a masterpiece from our greatest director. The best from the best.', u'0.096598', u"\nThe film opens with a simple printed disclaimer: `The US army claims to have safeguards in place which render the following events impossible', or words to that effect.  Well, I'm willing to believe that.  Besides, that was 1964.  Things have changed since, and the chances of an accidental nuclear exchange - between the United States and Russia, at any rate - have dropped considerably.  But `Strangelove' STILL gives me a small thrill of panic.  Kubrick plays on our nerves masterfully.  At one moment it seems as if the forces of sanity are going to win, the next minute it seems as though they don't stand a chance: I won't reveal all the cleverly constructed reversals of fortune, but part of me is itching to.\n\nPeter Sellers's performances (all four of them) are gleeful fun to watch.  It was a stroke of genius NOT making the president a buffoon.  In fact he's a decent and intelligent man, by no means a weak leader, and his relationship with Dmitri (the Russian general secretary) is almost touching - not that any of this helps him very much.\n\nI've noticed that a number of people who say they aren't fond of Kubrick in general make an exception for this film.  I can see why - even though I AM fond of Kubrick in general.", u'0.348334'], u'tt0120815': [u'\nI know it\'s fashionable to trash successful movies but at least be honest about the trashing... Pvt. Ryan was fiction but it was pretty good HISTORICAL fiction. The details were well thought out and based on reality.\n\nThere was nothing stupid about the portrayal of the German army... Rommel DID blunder in his placement of force, The high command DID think Calais was going to be the invasion spot, not Normandy. Hitler didn\'t wake up until noon on that day and his aides were afraid to wake him. The Rangers did come in right behind the first wave and did take a beach exit by sheer will to get the hell off the beach. The bluffs were the scene of heavy close fighting. The german defenders were mostly Eastern European conscripts from defeated areas. (note that the 2 men that tried to surrender were NOT speaking German). There WAS a young man rescued from interior Normandy after his brothers were all killed. He WAS an airborne trooper (the difference was that he was found by a chaplain and was removed from the front.)\n\nThe battles inside Normandy were small actions town to town, street to street, house to house. Small actions like taking the radar station happened. Small actions like a handful of men defending a river bridge against odds happened. Small squads of men, formed out of the misdrops banded together ad hoc to fight. There were all enlisted groups and all officer groups. A General did die in the glider assault. FUBAR aptly described much of what happened that day.\n\nAnd there were only Americans in the movie because the Brits and Canadians were many klicks away in a different area... this was Omaha beach. The story was an American one. And Monty DID bog down the advance and everyone knew it. And as for "American Stereotypes"... well those pretty much define America: my college roomie was a wise-ass New York Jew. My best friend was a second generation east coast Sicilian.  My college girlfriend was a third generation German. My first wife was French and English. I\'m Irish, my boss is Norwegian and I work with a Navaho... you get the point?\n\nSo much for it being bad history. It was in fact an excellent way to let a jaded and somewhat ignorant-of-their-past generation *feel* something of what their grandparents (LIVING grandparents) went through. It is perhaps less important that the details be exact as the feel be right. Even now the details are not fully known or knowable about that campaign... it was too big, too complex and too chaotic to be knowable. There is not even an accurate casualty count of D-Day itself.\n\nNow as to the depth of characters. What I saw there was the extraordinary circumstances into which ordinary people were thrown and what happened to them. I saw the things that would mark a generation (I have heard in my elderly male patients sentiments similar to what Cpt. Miller was expressing when he announced his ordinariness) I saw the dehumanization that occurs with war and its mitigation moment to moment, man to man... Cpt. Miller didn\'t know anything about Ryan and he didn\'t care... until Ryan revealed his humanity to him with his story of his brothers. Pvt. Reiban was ready to walk out of the situation until he discoverd his captains ordinariness and his humanity. Then he began to look to him almost as a father. Pvt. Mellish rightfully delights in his revenge for all the times he\'s had to take it because he was Jewish by telling German captives he\'s "Juden!" Nerdish Cpl. Upham can stand alongside his bigger, stronger, braver Ranger compatriots and describe the poetry and melancholy of Edith Piaf\'s song... then face his cowardice, turn around and stand up in the face of danger and finally demonstrate the dehumanization of the enterprise he was enmeshed in by executing Steamboat Willie... even though Willie had no more choice about being there than Upham did and in other circumstances would have made a friend.\n\nI could go on and on with this but enough already. OK, perhaps it is not The Best Movie Ever Made but it is still a good movie. And if one will take the blinders of fashionable negativism off they will see it. Finally, this is not a patriotic story... if anything it is an acknowledgement and thank you to all those old men still out there that did so much for us. To them I say a deep and sincere thank you.\n\n', u'-0.112276', u"\nTo think that this movie did not win Best Picture is a crime. Director Steven Spielberg uses all of his talent and resources to give to the world the greatest war film ever made.\n\nThough it's true that this is not the type of movie you want to sit down with the family and eat popcorn, the emotional drive of the picture, the story's poignant messages, and the fantastic acting of the cast draws you into a world that is both dangerous and unpredictable.\n\nSpielberg is able to take you into action and make you feel as if you are a participant in the movie and not just a viewer. This is Tom Hanks' best movie he ever did. Forget his performances in Philadelphia and Forrest Gump (though they were also good); he should have received another Oscar for the role of Capt. John Miller, a leader who must act strong in front of his men, but must also hide his emotions from them.  It would have been well-deserved if he won again.\n\nI give this movie my highest recommendation. Saving Private Ryan is a movie that makes you realize how life is precious and how honor and duty, though they are deep philosophical concepts that are praised in war, can put you in jeopardy of losing your life for something you may not believe in.", u'0.390566', u'It gives a million reason why no one should go to war and one very powerful reason to go to war. It is a soul numbing realistic depiction of what  our grandfathers, fathers, uncles, brothers and sons have faced in humanities darkest moments. Not just in WWII but in any war. No one can see this movies  without being altered in some way. No one should miss it with the EXCEPTION of those war veterans that have already been there. The surround sound puts the  audience in the middle of the battle. \n\nSteven Spielberg has out done himself and effectively held up a mirror to civilization for events to which we should all be ashamed of, rather than  appalled at the movie for its real life depictions. I suggest that this movie be made standard view for congress as well as the President each and every  time the question of war comes up. This movie would not stop future wars but I would hope the objectives would be much more clearly defined. I say this  as a US Marine.', u'-0.125455', u'\nI\'d heard a couple of startling things about this film before seeing it. I\'d heard that many veterans were having a hard time getting through the film without breaking down. I\'d also seen interviews with veterans who\'d seen the film and found the film to be incredibly realistic and consequently difficult to watch. Intriguing comments, since we all know there is no shortage of films about war from this century.\n\nThere are not many films that I\'ve seen that have actually made me physically react to the action on screen. I\'m not speaking of the three-dimensional variety either. What I mean to say is this film had me contorting and cringing at the gripping, horrifying action on screen. Somehow the extreme violence can be justified as the whole world knows that this is an important chapter in human history and a startling, graphic depiction only adds more weight to the seriousness of the subject matter. I\'d have to say this is probably one of the most important films of the 20th century because of its frank approach to one of the darkest periods of our time on this earth. \n\nI am always deeply moved and fiercely proud when given cause to consider those that gave their lives to protect our way of life and liberate those that already suffered dislocation, imprisonment and attempted genocide. These soldiers were truly noble and deserve our deepest gratitude. This sentiment is a common one, and will go some lengths to explain why this film has meant so much to so many.\n\nEven with the attention to detail and care taken into how it was shot to accentuate to the fullest degree its realistic approach, it is still hard to imagine what it must have been like to be part of a war. But this film goes a long way to help your mind get around it. It\'s hard for me to say what kind of impact the cinematography would have on someone watching it on the small screen of a television versus the big screen, but from my perspective, this film really does benefit from a theatrical presentation.\n\nWhat "Saving Private Ryan" does extremely well, is show the world the harsh reality of war without pulling any punches. The story about a squad of soldiers sent to retrieve the surviving brother of three dead soldiers is told with competency and due reverence from all perspectives of the characters involved. It is an uncommon and intriguing drama, but it serves as an excuse to describe a setting, rather than the other way around. The story manages to move us through all sorts of different landscapes and scenarios, giving us an unforgettable glimpse of a world unknown to most of us, and terrifying to those who are familiar with it from personal experience. \n', u'0.296778', u'\nI have never been affected by a movie the way Saving Private Ryan affected me.  That movie really took me out of my seat in the movie theater and practically had me believing I was really in the battle with John Miller. When somebody was dying in that movie, it felt as if you could almost feel their pain.  Speilberg did an unbelievable job of putting realism into this movie with the camera-work and everything else.  Simply amazing.  An all time great.   ', u'0.180734', u'\nIt\'s been over a year since first seeing Saving Private Ryan -- it\'s a worthy effort by Speilberg--his best since Shindler\'s List by far. You\'ve probably heard about the amount of violence, blood, and gore and that\'s all true--it\'s got the Viet Nam movie style violence (and then some) but it\'s not gratuitous. Were it sanitized like early WWII movies, modern audiences probably wouldn\'t take it as seriously.\n\nThe movie has that trademark Speilberg style--the structure is all tied up and unified from beginning to end, the emotional symbols abound, the music swelling when he\'s working at your emotions, the hand held camera that worked so well in Shindler\'s List to give you a feeling of participation, camera angles and periods of silence to disorient you (like Shindler), suspense techniques learned from Hitch... It\'s a movie that stays with you for a period afterwards.\n\nHanks will be the early front runner for Oscar after this flick--Academy members like him AND it IS his best acting job ever. While Speilberg will likely be criticized for attempting to manipulate the audience\'s emotions while keeping a distance from the inner core of his characters, Tom Hanks reveals a really complex military leader in this story, and does so without overacting--somehow it comes from within. While you may not empathize deeply with many of the platoon, you will still feel something because of the relationship that is formed with Hanks.\n\nAfter the initial set-up, you will have the opportunity to participate in the D-Day operation and experience the horror of it. Those who have been in a real war can comment about how realistic or not Speilberg captures its chaotic horror in this scene.\n\nIn my case I again feel very lucky that my draft number was high, so I never had to face Nam like many of my classmates. Speilberg reminds us brutally in "Saving Private Ryan" that we All have a debt to pay to the brave souls who have sacrificed so much for us. What Tom Hanks does with his performance is to remind us of this debt in a very personal way.\n', u'0.324704', u'Without looking, I am sure other reviewers here have headlined their article "Best War Movie Ever Made"" and I agree. However, before briefly discussing the film, let me just say if you don\'t have a decent 5.1 surround sound system, you aren\'t going to fully appreciate this movie (DVD).\n\nIt\'s a great film to start with, and sitting in a room surrounded by five speakers with bullets flying from all directions around you - as in that spectacular 22- minute opening scene or in the final 45 minutes of action against the Germans in tanks - is an astounding movie experience. The sound in this film elevates it even higher.\n\nThe visuals are outstanding, too. I\'ve never seen so many grays, beiges and olive-greens look this good: perfect colors for the bombed-out French city where the last hour takes place, perfect for the faces and uniforms of the gritty soldiers, for the machinery, the smoke-filled skies, etc.\n\nMy only complaint is the usage of Lord\'s name in vain 25-30 times, but, hey, when you consider it\'s tough men in tough times, that\'s what you are going to hear. In real life, the profanity probably was worse than the film. \n\nIt\'s hard to picture the brutality of war being any worse than you see here, but it probably was. This is about as graphic as it gets. The violence and gore was shocking when this film came out in 1997 and still is when watched almost a decade later. It\'s unbelievable what some of the WWII soldiers went through, but that can be said for any war. I believe the purpose of this film was to pay tribute to the sacrifices these men made, and it succeeds wonderfully. Hats off to Steven Spielberg and to Tom Hanks, the leading actor in here, both of whom have worked hard for WWII vets to get the recognition they deserve, not just on film but in a national memorial.\n\nAnyway, language or blood and guts aside, this is still an incredible portrait of WWII. The almost-three hour film is riveting start-to-finish, especially with that memorable beginning action scene, probably the most dramatic in the history of film.\n\nAs "entertaining" as those action scenes were, I found the lulls, if you will, to be even better. Listening to Hanks and his men discuss various things as they look for Private Ryan, was fascinating to me. Hanks is just superb in here and once again shows why he is considered one of the best actors in his generation.\n\nThe most memorable and powerful moment among the "lulls," is the shot early on of the Ryan mother sinking to her knees on her front porch as she realizes she is about to get disastrous news from the war. Moments later, Harve Presenell, playing Gen. MacArthur, eloquently reads a letter by Abraham Lincoln that is so beautifully written, so profound that it is quoted near the end of the film, too, and I never get tired of hearing it.\n\nThis is a man\'s movie, and shows the horrors of war as few others ever have. To say it is "memorable," just doesn\'t do it justice. It is the greatest war movie ever made....period.', u'0.41553', u"\nThe opening beach assault sequences were the most violent, realistic, and upsetting filming I've ever seen; looked as though the thing was actual combat footage. The shushing noises of rounds cutting through the air was the most chilling part of all. Perfect portrayal of the insane stupidity of war and the anguish of all who enter this most foolish of enterprises. A must see.", u'-0.149547', u"\nDuring the Normandy landings during WW2 two brothers are killed.  In another part of the world another of the Ryan brothers is killed in action, leaving their mother with one remaining son and three telegrams due to be delivered.  A group of men, led by Captain Miller set out to reach Private Ryan and not only break him the news but to safely return him for return to the US.\n\nWhat can I say \x96 it is an excellent film despite some minor flaws.  The plot is based on a real life situation during WW2 and allows for us to follow a group of men as they take part in the horrors (and humanity) of war.  This is the film's strength and it is never stronger than in the first 25 minutes and, to a lesser extent, the final 20 minutes.  The opening of the Normandy landing is simply pure emotional power and is really well done \x96 it is so powerful that the actual plot itself is a bit of a letdown.  I love Band of Brothers because the focus was on the war and what it was like to be involved rather than a sort of soap opera story.  Here the plot is still very good but can't really follow that opening.\n\nIt also sinks into sentiment a tad too often.  For example Ryan's mother lives in this sort of Norman Rockwell painting that is Spielberg's vision of middle America.  Also there is a little too much use of gawkish dialogue as well \x96 although it's hard to criticise the death scenes for being emotional, because they should be.\n\nA minor flaw that is easy to get over is the lack of Brits.  Like Band of Brothers (which had a few cockney accents) this is an AMERICAN film \x96 so of course they will focus on the American experience.  However it would have been nice to have some British (or any other) voices or faces among the Allies.  I can understand why the film opens and closes with the stars and stripes and why the film focuses on the yanks but a little bit of perspective would be useful.  There's nothing wrong with focus \x96 but when it totally excludes huge bits of information then it's a problem.  It always makes me think of the way that Michael Caine took his children back to the UK when they were taught in an US school that WW2 started in the 1940's (ie \x96 when America joined).\n\nHowever this is a minor flaw as, in fairness, it's an American film \x96 why be surprised when it's focus is Americans!  Of the cast Hanks is good \x96 he is much more subtle than his Oscar roles where he played to the crowd.  He benefits from having a great support cast of good actors, current actors, old faces, up and comers etc.  Sizemore, Burns and Farina are the good current actors.  Damon, Ribsi, Diesel, Martini etc are all very good on the way up \x96 although Damon has one of the simplest characters.  They may all be slight stereotypes of Americans but it's not a major flaw \x96 just a screen writer wanting to cover all bases I think, although it does grate that they cover all these backgrounds but can't squeeze any other Allies in to the edges.\n\nOverall it is excellent despite some stereotyping, US flag waving and the usual Spielberg love of sentimentality.  Even if the actual plot is flimsy Spielberg expertly puts us as close to experiencing the horrors and the humanity within war as I hope we'll ever be.", u'0.0261232', u'Steven Spielberg makes a unique motion picture in regards to the D-Day invasion of World War II just in the gritty reality of the detail\x85 For more than twenty minutes he revives for us the landing at Omaha beach\x85 No one was prepared for how horrific it really was\x85 No one understood what was going on: The terror, the chaos, the maelstrom of bullets, the near-deafening explosions\x85You really got a sense of what these guys had to go through\x85 \n\nWithin that perplexity, the focus settles on six soldiers under the command of Capt. Miller (Tom Hanks) after they\'ve survived their terrible hours breaking through the first line of German defense, they\'re given a strange perilous mission, to find one man, Pvt. Ryan (Matt Damon), a paratrooper who\'s somewhere behind German lines\x85 For them, it\'s an abstruse order, but they have to get it done\x85\n\nThroughout the film, Spielberg\'s attention to detail is amazing\x85 For me, the most chilling scene in the movie is the death of an American officer\x85 It\'s one of the most intimate\x85 It\'s also a slightly confusing moment because two German characters resemble each other so greatly\x85\n\nToward the middle, a German soldier called "Steamboat Willie" is introduced\x85 By the end of the film, he has become the \'bad\' German\x85 Later in the movie, another German is involved in the final fight\x85 He takes part in an exceedingly painful scene of hand-to-hand combat with the American soldier\x85 The two German soldiers have similar short haircuts and black uniforms\x85 Because they looked so much alike, many of us have believed that they\'re one character\x85 They\'re not, and the distinction of the two is very significant\x85', u'-0.46063', u'\nAn amazing and compelling insight to warfare. Umbelievable camera shots/angles bring World War 2 to life especially for the US troops on D-Day. The use of flash bullets, and color saturation just add to the effect of a killing ground that not many people survive to come back from.\n', u'0.139697', u'Great film is an illuminating thing: it shines its light into the dark recesses of humanity, revealing the greed, hatred, and hypocrisy that fester there. Bad film is often just as revealing: its existence and reception serve as a mirror reflecting the hearts of its intended audience. Saving Private Ryan is a classic example of the latter, in the flickering light of its propagandistic glow, the American people stand revealed for what they really are: stupid, self-absorbed, morally unsophisticated rubes ready to be fleeced by the first charlatan who comes along and tells them what they want to hear.\n\n"Saving Private Ryan" is typical Steven Spielberg fare: a big budget spectacle, bereft of style, filled to the brim with childishly heavy-handed moralizing and peopled with facile "characters" who exist only as cardboard cutouts for the ensuing morality play. Even the film\'s underlying subtext is an old Spielberg standby - America GOOOOOD, Nazis BAAAAD. \n\nThe plot of Saving Private Ryan revolves around a simple moral question: is saving one life worth potentially sacrificing the lives of many? This fourth grade ethical dilemma is played out for nearly three hours over the background of the brocage of Normandy in the hours and days immediately after the D-Day landings, and is handled with Spielberg\'s usual wandering attention, ham-fisted lack of subtlety and babbling pop psychology. Spielberg being Spielberg, there\'s never any doubt how the question will ultimately be answered (hint: with saccharine sentimentality in front of a tombstone - because, obviously, the same scene wasn\'t manipulative enough when it was used to close Schindler\'s List). \n\nThe film opens with thirty minutes of unremitting carnage as US soldiers assault Omaha Beach. This opening scene has been hailed for its savage realism, but it is in truth one of the more cynically manipulative sequences in recent memory, full of irritating, disorienting jump cuts, pornographically Gibsonesque attention to gory detail, camera tricks and special effects artifices, all accompanied by a deafening soundtrack designed to overwhelm our capacity to think about what is being portrayed on the screen and to push us to simply immerse ourselves in its reductive US vs. Them POV. When I saw this film in the theaters, the audience cheered when the first German soldier was killed, then cheered again when American troops murdered surrendering Germans in cold blood: this, I\'m sure, was Spielberg\'s intent.\n\nHaving bulldozed and buried any hint of the moral ambiguity of war, Spielberg gets around to the heart of the movie. It has been discovered by the War Department that one Private Ryan (Matt Damon) is now the sole surviving son of a family who has sent five sons to war. Unfortunately, Ryan was a part of the paratrooper drop that preceded the Normandy landings and is missing behind enemy lines. In a moment of supreme hokum (complete with a quotation of a letter by Abraham Lincoln that wouldn\'t feel out of place in a Ken Burns documentary), Army Chief of Staff Gen. George Marshall (Harve Presnell) decides that an effort will just have to be made to save Private Ryan.\n\nAt this point, Saving Private Ryan becomes just another motley-crew-of-experts flick. A team of caricatures is assembled: the tough-as-nails seargent; the feisty Italian; the pious Southern sniper with Talent on Loan from God (if the historical setting had been Vietnam, I\'m sure this character would have been replaced by Cuba Gooding Jr. as The Magic Negro); the REMF pussy - all led by Tom Hanks in the role of Tom Hanks, Captain Everyman. Call them the Sanitized Seven. Battles ensue. Some of the caricatures die (does anyone really remember which ones?). The Germans never miss an opportunity to remind us how EVIL they are. One wehrmacht man - having been saved from certain death at the hands our intrepid heroes by the earnest pleas of the REMF - returns only to slowly and sadistically stab an American to death. Oh those tricksy Krauts! In the end, Ryan is saved and Tom Hanks is dying. But it was all worth it. Cue the graveside maundering. USA! USA! USA!\n\nThe problem with Saving Private Ryan is the problem with everything Spielberg touches. More broadly, it is the problem of the American commercial cinema. Lacking the courage of any real conviction, it cannot offer any challenge to its audience. Instead, it panders to that audience with easy answers, impressive effects, a soundtrack that booms and tinkles in all the right places and a nice mom\'s apple pie pat on the back for every red blooded American. What\'s missing is even the faintest glimmer of awareness that the world doesn\'t break down neatly into heroes and villains, cowards and the courageous, us and them. In the place of subtlety, it gives us spectacle, in the place of art, it delivers technically proficient propaganda.', u'-0.296456', u'War films can be broken into two basic categories; the propaganda film, which celebrates bravery and patriotism; and the anti-war film, which shows the suffering and futility of war. The most extreme propaganda films are usually produced when a war is threatened or actually in progress and either demonize or belittle the individual enemy soldier. This is useful for both inspiring the home front and for assuring it that there will be an ultimate victory. While these films play well with a wartime audience they appear somewhat silly when viewed in a post-war environment. \n\nAn exception to this war-in-progress concept was is "Saving Private Ryan". Cloaked in an anti-war facade, this film was more typical of what would have been produced in 1944 (its setting) than 1998 (its year of release). \n\nUnder its thin anti-war facade of realistic looking destruction, Private Ryan breaks with the characterization elements that are essential for classification as an anti-war work. Almost by definition anti-war films use a faceless enemy ("Paths of Glory") or portray the enemy soldier as sharing in the suffering and futility of war ("The Enemy Below"). Often they are portrayed as victims of a fanatical leadership and the audience is invited to identify with or at least understand them ("The Longest Day"). \n\nThis is because after a war, both the victors and the vanquished have an incentive to portray their enemy as brave and determined, otherwise victory is hollow and defeat is humiliating. Not so in Private Ryan; if the German battle performance and basic infantry tactics shown in the film were representative of what was actually practiced, a single allied division could have occupied all of Germany by the end of June 1944. The final battle scene alone makes the viewer wonder how, facing such a totally inept enemy, the war could have gone on more than a few days after the D-Day Landings. Among the most obvious:\n\nA sequence where American soldiers run back and forth in front of a Tiger I tank without drawing the fire of the tank\'s machine guns. These tanks had internally operated machine guns, which would have easily cut down these soldiers. Knowing this the soldiers would not have exposed themselves to this fire. \n\nTanks entering an urban area ahead of infantry, driving down the middle of the town as if on parade. Instead infantry would flank any defensive position on the street and secure the area immediately ahead of the tanks so they do not come into range of anti-tank weapons. These tactics were validated during early fighting on the Russian front and became operational imperatives for all Panzer units. \n\nA Hitler Youth dagger found in the trench right after the first bunker is taken on the beach. The men in these bunkers were mostly older second-tier draftees and Ukrainian conscripts. Normandy was not expected to be the invasion target and it\'s highly unlikely that a member or former member of the Hitler Youth would have been assigned to these marginal units. But it was an excellent way to make the audience less squeamish about the brutality inflicted by the allied soldiers when these German units attempted to surrender.\n\nSo just what is "Saving Private Ryan"? The first 24 minutes are a high budget remake of the "Longest Day" whose less expensive landing sequence conveyed more tactical believability about the process of securing a beachhead. The next 90 minutes are a mistake-ridden, choppy, and contrived remake of "The Big Red One". Ultimately, this overlong odyssey said less about patrolling behind enemy lines than "Kelly\'s Heroes"- a counterculture comedy whose serious scenes and character development were superior in almost every way. \n\nThen there is the finale, a total rip-off of Arthur Pohl\'s "The Bridge" (1949), which focused on a handful of recently conscripted German schoolboys who fight for control of an inconsequential bridge during the last weeks of the war. They were at the bridge because of a series of accidents and they naively stayed there because of their youthful idealism and sense of duty. Like Private Ryan, most do not survive the engagement. What is notable is not that Pohl was able to make a much better film for a fraction of the cost (that is not particularly unusual), but that he was able to convey more perspective four years after the event than Spielberg could manage 50 years later.\n\nBut these criticisms of Private Ryan are based on the assumption that Spielberg\'s intent was to make a worthwhile war film and there is simply nothing to support this assumption. More likely Spielberg\'s agenda was make money while subtly refuting post-war portrayals (such as "Das Boot" and "Cross of Iron") of the German soldier as something more than the sub- human creature of WWII propaganda days or the cartoon villains of his own "Raiders of the Lost Ark" series. \n\nThe genius of Private Ryan is its success in packaging this sick message inside a commercially successful film. At the time of its release and its almost universal acclaim, this aspect of the film was largely unrecognized (and unexamined) by both audiences and critics. In this respect it owes less to the war films it shamelessly plagiarizes than to early 1950\'s cinema, where McCarthy-paralyzed Hollywood directors resorted to subtle themes that went undetected by studio executives and regulators. Only recently has its status begun to erode as individual critics more carefully examine its elements, away from the euphoria that surrounded its initial release\n\nAlthough "Saving Private Ryan was popular, remember that the "Rat Patrol" ran for 58 episodes, watched by television audiences who were also entertained by similar silly nonsense.\n\nThen again, what do I know? I\'m only a child.', u'-0.504154', u'\n  I was hoping for an accurate war film for a change (take  a look at the Battle of the Bulge for a really bad example). What Spielberg shows us in his Omaha Beach scenes makes me wonder\n\nwhich Omaha Beach assault he is trying to portray. Those who know little about the battle (that\'s almost everyone who\'s in the theater) probably now have the idea that every other soldier who landed on the beach before noon was either blown to smithereens or badly wounded.\n\nBelieve me, the 1st and 29th Divisions would have been annihilated if it\n\nwere as bad as it\'s portrayed and would never have been able to scale the cliffs and rout the enemy by early afternoon, which they did. I wonder, for example, how wide most viewers think Omaha beach actually was. In the film it looks about a couple hundred yards. It was, in actuality, almost ten miles wide. The timing was also inaccurate - Hanks goes up the cliffs at what appears to be 8AM. Nobody made it before 11AM.    Another historical error is the implication that the events at Omaha were similar to those on the other four assualt beaches (Juno, Sword, Gold and Utah). That\'s totally incorrect. Utah Beach, for example, the other US assault beach, took about a dozen casualties - many of those due to accidents during the landing rather than from enemy action.    But the worst part of the movie was the completely idiotic script. Here we have the US Army sending a squad(a squad!!!) to march straight thru the entire German 7th Army (something two Divisions, with total air superiority couldn\'t do for weeks), waltz around an area of 300 square miles, and expect to find a guy named Ryan. If they wanted to do any of this nonsense, the Army would have sent them in on the gliders that flew into the area the very next morning. "Gliders, what gliders"?  said Spielberg. That\'s what happens when you have a scriptwriter who doesn\'t know very much about his subject.  A stupid, stupid film. What a waste of $100M or so. ', u'-0.543748', u'In a historic and artistic context, here\'s a question that would bother Spielberg if he thought about it for a second: what if there was no such thing as special effects? If we take the special effects from his movies, would they still be great? What, you\'re waiting for an answer? Just like every Spielberg movie, we find Steve desperately clinging to special effects like a fish to water. Like Bush to oil. Like Uwe Boll to a video game-to-movie conversion (last one is not necessarily bad, by the way).\n\nJust like everybody else, I was amazed by the "realism" of the first 5 minutes. Once you get past the battle scenes, there\'s not much to work with. I\'m glad people (as manifest in the growing number of low reviews here) are starting to realize this.\n\nLet\'s set aside the absurdity of the "plot" (I use \'plot\' very loosely). That\'s just a vehicle; a pretext; an excuse to use special effects (Spielberg\'s one and only leverage). The main plot is that a mother lost a number of her sons, so the general (or whatever his rank was) thinks she shouldn\'t lose her last remaining son, Ryan. He reads a letter Abraham Lincoln sent to a mother who went through a similar experience during the civil war. Using musical cues and closeups, Spielberg is not trying to tell us how to feel; he\'s practically *begging* us to do so. After all, he knows better than anybody that people will - during the course of the movie - realize that the battle scenes aren\'t that numerous or long, so there better be some story to back the movie up.\n\nSince he knows that he\'s addressing a crowd that made movies like Armageddon and Independence Day box office hits, he (correctly) realized that the script needs to be comprised of one element only: text. So long as the script contained text, it was good enough. And he was right. With enough flash and special effects, he was able to appeal to the idiocy of the average American, a tactic mastered by Jerry Bruckheimer, Michael Bay and their likes.\n\nNow, back to the \'plot\': once you set it aside, you\'ll realize that this movie is trying to instill many ideas into the minds of the movie goers. When he shows German soldiers, he shows them from a distance, so by not giving them a face, a human side, he teaches us that it\'s totally OK to thrill at killing them. Bad German bad! After our heroes free a German, Spielberg makes is very clear that he came back later to kill Tom Hanks. Spielberg is saying: they should\'ve killed him the first time. The only good German is a dead one, apparently. Astonishing dishonesty and malice on the part of Spielberg. Not a trick was a spared to demonize every single one of them.\n\nUnlike masters of movie making (a title Spielberg will never come close to) like Scorsese and Coppola, he desperately needs musical cues to tell when to feel sad, fearful, excited, etc. His approach to emotion is so utterly sappy, shallow and downright laughable that it\'s virtually impossible for him to let the scenes and the story speak for themselves. He must have very clear cues to give the viewers signals. The music is like a slap in the face. Spielberg manifests in moments like "tell me I lived a good life", grabs you by the throat and ORDERS you to shed a few tears. Insulting. Pathetic.\n\nThe only good part in the movie is the whole scene of the mistaken identity, where they realize this whining little weakling crying his eyes out is not the Ryan they wanted. Other than that, and looking at the chutzpah of the musical cues, the absurdity of the plot, the dehumanization of the Germans and the hilarious warfare errors, the movie is only good for another laugh, albeit not one Spielberg was aiming for.', u'-0.250827'], u'tt0137523': [u"\nWhen I first saw the previews for this movie, it had me interested.  A movie about guys who fight - it didn't seem to deep, but I thought it would provide entertainment.  I had heard buzz about, a few of my friends raved about it for a few days, and I was convinced.  I should see this movie.  I went to my local video store and picked up the last remaining DVD.  I popped it in, sat in amazement until the last credit rolled, and then watched it again.  And again.  And again.\n\nThis movie is dark and disturbing, however, it is equally smart and stylistic.  I found it hard to watch at points, but I couldn't turn my eyes away.  Fight Club makes many bold statements against the modern consumer-driven society, and produces Norton's best performance and Pitt's second best (12 Monkeys).\n\nNorton plays an average-Joe who is living a dead-end life.  He needs something to change his life.  Tyler and Marla will take care of this, and that is all I want to give away.  Other comments will tell you more, but I suggest you let it all sink in while watching.  As for it's ending, it doesn't rival 'The Sixth Sense' - it blows it away.  One of the best movie endings I've seen.  Even better if you're a Pixies fan.\n\nAs for it being important, don't worry.  You will be hearing about this movie.  When 'A Clockwork Orange' came out, it was met with mixed reviews, deemed too dark and violent, and is now considered a classic.  These two movies share quite a bit in common - both were based on great books.  If you haven't read either, get to it.  Politicians will use this movie as a demonstration of careless and consequenceless violence in movies, and as a perfect example of what today's youth are being influenced by.\n\nWatch this movie, and watch it again with some of your more intelligent friends.  10 out of 10.\n", u'0.152685', u"\nI am, unfortunately, not one of the faithful Chuck Palahniuk readers who had read the book BEFORE they saw the movie. I, however, couldn't wait to read the book after seeing this film. I've read the book 5 times since and seen the movie more times than I can remember.\n\n Simply put, this movie changed my life. Not just on a personal level (on which I will not comment here except to say I'm now a major Palahniuk fan) but also as a movie-watcher. I view movies differently after seeing this movie, because it broke down doors.\n\n This movie is literally the first time I ever came upon something that, at first sight seemed incredibly stylish, sophisticated and entertaining. The plot lured you in before turning you upside down, the acting was nothing short of perfect (has there ever been a more memorable character than Brad Pitt as Tyler Durden?), the music, the screenplay (based on what is now my all-time favorite book), the lighting, the pacing, the everything! Virtually everything about this movie took my by surprise, save for one man.\n\n David Fincher, director, was probably the only reason I went to see this movie in the first place. His work on 'Seven' and 'The Game' had me excited to see what he would do next, but I came to this movie expecting a stylish flick that offered a good plot and hopefully some good acting but what I got was so much, much more.\n\n Honestly, how many times have you seen a movie that, with every viewing, gets even more complicated yet so simple that you can't help but laugh. Every time I watch this movie I notice something new about it, such is the depth of what is on the screen. Then there's the tiny issue of the story of Fight Club, penned by Chuck Palahniuk (who has one of the most fertile imaginations around. Don't believe me? Read 'Survivor' and weep!) the story is nothing short of incredible, a pure shock-value social commentary on the state of the world at the end of the century. You'll cry, you'll laugh, you'll do all the clich\xe9s but most importantly you'll identify with every single thing on the screen.\n\n This movie rates as one of my all-time favorite movies and, simply put, if you haven't seen it yet then quit wasting your time OnLine and get to the nearest videostore!\n\n 5/5", u'0.325662', u'\nFight Club is one of the most unique films I have ever seen. In addition to presenting a rather fresh take on life, FC also presents its material in a fresh way. My main interest in the film is in that, in my opinion, it does not present characters for us to think about. Rather, it presents actions for us to think about. I will say that I cannot recall *ever* having been "asked" by a film to both suspend my disbelief the way this film asks in its third act AND at the same time come to terms with an understanding that there is no room--or need--for disbelief.\n\nPerhaps these comments will not make sense to the average movie goer who will dismiss this film--and, unfortunately, its premise--as another hollywood flick filled with gratuitous violence. I\'d go as far as to say that this film is not about violence. It is about choices. It is about activity. It is about lethargy. It is about waking up and realizing that at some point in the past we\'ve gone to the toilet and thrown up our dreams without even realizing that society has stuck its fingers down our throat.\n\nI would argue that anyone caught, at some point in their lives, between a rock and a hard place--anyone who has reached bottom on a mental level--anyone who has uttered to themselves "Wait, this isn\'t right. I would not do/say/feel what it is that I just did/said/felt... I do not like this. I must change before I am forever stuck being the person that I am not." These people, they will know what I\'m talking about. These people will not only recognize the similarities between Edward Norton\'s character and themselves--they will be uncomfortably familiar with him. These people will appreciate Fight Club for what it is: a wake up call that we are not alone.\n\nAs David Berman once said: "I\'m afraid I\'ve got more in common with who I was than who I am becoming." If this sentence makes any sense to you, go see Fight Club. You won\'t regret it.\n\nL.\n', u'-0.309897', u'\n"Fight Club" an aggressive, confrontational, often brutal satire that is quite possibly a brilliant masterpiece. Taking the "Choose life," anti-consumerism rant at the beginning of "Trainspotting," and carrying it to its logical -- albeit extreme -- conclusion this is a big budget, mainstream film that takes a lot of risks by biting the hand that feeds it. The film\'s narrator (Edward Norton) is an insignificant cog in the drab, corporate machine, dutifully doing his job and what he\'s told without question. He\'s an insomniac slave to his IKEA possessions and only finds joy in going to as many self-help/dealing with terminal diseases sessions as he can. It provides him with an escape from his sleepless nights. That is, until Marla Singer (Helena Bonham Carter), a trashy chain-smoking poser, enters his life and upsets his routine. The narrator also meets Tyler Durden (Brad Pitt), a charismatic soap salesman whose straightforward honesty, candor and sleazy lounge-lizard outfits are a breath of fresh air. One night, after the two men have bonded over beers, Tyler asks the narrator to hit him. At first, it seems like an absurd request but after they pound on each other for a bit, a strange feeling overcomes them. They feel a kind of release and satisfaction at inflicting pain on one another. In a world where people are desensitized to everything around them, the physical contact of fighting wakes them up and makes them feel truly alive. Others soon join in and pretty soon Fight Club becomes an underground sensation. However, it becomes readily apparent that Tyler has more elaborate plans than just organizing brawls at the local bar. David Fincher has taken the dark, pessimistic worldview of "Seven" and married it with the clever plot twists and turns of "The Game" and assembled his strongest effort to date. "Fight Club" is a $50+ million studio film that remains true to its anti-consumer, anti-society, anti-everything message -- right up to the last, sneaky subliminal frame. What makes "Fight Club" a subversive delight is not only its refreshing anti-corporate message but how it delivers said message. As Fincher has explained in interviews, you don\'t really watch the film but rather download it. Its structure is extremely playful as it messes around with linear time to an incredible degree. The narrative bounces back and forth all over the place like a novel, or surfing on the Internet -- even making a hilarious dead stop to draw attention to itself in a funny, interesting way that completely works. Yet Norton\'s deadpanned narration holds everything together and allows the viewer to get a handle on what\'s happening. This is the way films should be made. Why must we always have to go through the A+B+C formula? "Fight Club" openly rejects this tired, clearly outdated structure in favour of a stylized frenzy of jump cuts, freeze frames, slow motion and every other film technique in the book that only reinforces its anarchistic message. A film like this would have never been greenlighted by a major studio if Brad Pitt had not been attached to the project. Once you see the film, it becomes obvious that he was the only choice for Tyler Durden. Like he did with "Kalifornia" and "Twelve Monkeys", Pitt grunges himself down and disappears completely into his role to a frighteningly convincing degree. During many of the brutal fight scenes, he is transformed into a bloody, pulpy mess that\'ll surely have the "Legends of the Fall" fans running for the exits. It is an incredible performance -- probably his best -- for the simple fact that he becomes the character so completely. If Pitt has the flashy, gonzo role, Edward Norton is his perfect foil as the seemingly meek yet sardonic narrator. It\'s a deceptively understated performance as the last third of the film reveals but Norton nails it perfectly. He is clearly our surrogate, our introduction into this strange world and his wry observations on our consumer-obsessed culture are right on the money. They are the perfect setup for Tyler\'s introduction and his view on the world which is clearly a call to arms of sorts, a manifesto that rejects the notion that we are what we own. And ultimately, that is what "Fight Club" tries to do. The film is a cinematic punch to the head as it challenges the status quo and offers a wakeup call to people immersed in a materialistic world where those who have the most stuff, "win." I think that Fincher\'s film wants us to tear all that down, reject corporate monsters like Starbucks and Blockbuster, and try to figure out what we really want out of life. It\'s almost as if the film is suggesting salvation through self-destruction. And it is these thought-provoking ideas that makes "Fight Club" a dangerously brilliant film that entertains as well as enlightens.', u'0.222648', u"\nThe script was tight, the theme fascinating, the acting incredible (especially Edward Norton, as one might expect), the direction inspired, and the cinematography stunning. It is one of the few films of the past five years that deserves to be seen multiple times.  In fact, if you have seen it only once, you have missed something.  I was seriously hoping the movie would receive Oscar nominations for Best Actor (Norton), Best Screenplay, Best Director, Best Cinematography and Best Picture.\n\nSo, how is it that the film received no nominations? Unfortunately, it had a\nmismatched ad campaign.  The ads made it seem like the movie was about street boxing, instead of a intellectual and emotional ride through a man's psyche as he takes a strange path toward rebellion against consumer society. As a result, most who went to see it were disappointed, and those who would recognize its brilliance stayed far away from the movie theaters.  This is one of the most underrated movies I know.\n\nI always love movies that keep you entertained and keep you guessing, and this movie scores a 10 in both.  Those who enjoyed The Game, Memento, or The Matrix really should check it out.", u'0.213897', u'\nSimilar in idea to \'American Beauty\' but certainly not in style or content this bleak look at underground culture and the spiritual redemption it brings is easily one of the most intelligent films I\'ve ever seen. Directed by the same man who brought us the superb \'The Game\' this is another film which you\'ll have to see more than once to truly understand.  Focusing on sad white-collar, middle-class Norton whose only real dream in life is to own all the contents of an IKEA catalogue it follows him through a chance meeting with charismatic stranger Pitt and the unfortunate events which conspire to draw them together. After a nights hard drinking they start a friendly-ish scrap which is viewed by a couple of others and from that small acorn a mighty oak called Fight Club grows. This is the point around which the whole film revolves with Norton and Pitt forming an underground club which draws more and more disillusioned young men to join it. Based on firm \'Queensbury Rules\' it is a cathartic if bloody way to spend your night. Eventually as it becomes a huge operation Pitt, the de facto leader, moves it up a gear and creates his own cult from this secret society. This is where the film becomes brilliant and the twist near the end is magnificent, better even than the much talked about \'The Sixth Sense\'. It just has so much to say about things: the emasculation of an entire generation of young men ("No great war to fight, no great depression"), the growing isolation we all feel from one another and the need to find something to draw us back together and most importantly, the power of an exciting, challenging idea and it\'s fermentation into cultism. However, where many films would just say \'This is a bad thing\' \'Fight Club\' doesn\'t. It is more a condemnation of a materialistic society which has forgotten about a large section of itself. You can empathise with these men completely, even when they band together against this uncaring society that has reared them to be something their instincts don\'t understand. It\'s as close to genius as you\'ll get and one film you\'ll talk about and think about for days.', u'0.274007', u"\nFaithfully following Chuck Palahniuk's acerbic satire, Fight Club presents the vast emptiness of modern existence- ridden as it is with shallow values, rampant consumerism, empty of meaning, feeling and life itself- in a slick and ironically consumer oriented fashion.  In a different vein from American Beauty, Fight Club explores the solutions to the veritable sleepwalking existence that plagues modern life.  The film is violent, but it is not gratuitous violence, and any reviewer who claims that the film is promoting violence has missed the entire point of the film. A very black comedy, it is sure to provoke much conversation- it is definitely a film to see with friends.  The film is fast-paced, densely packed and merits a second viewing, just to take it all in, especially if you haven't read the book. In typical Fincher style, you the viewer are left to draw your own conclusions. He feels no impetus to tell you how to interpret what you've seen, appropriate since the film condemns falling victim to the strictures of what society tells us to think and to value.  My only criticism is that the editing is not as tight as it could be in the middle section of the film, it drags just a bit then picks up again. Other than that, it should definitely be an Oscar contender.", u'0.0489715', u'Let\'s ignore the advice and talk about "Fight Club". This film was a milestone; although it bombed at the box office, Fincher\'s cinematic language left a mark that can still be felt now, 14 years later, on many current releases. Despite the risky \'cutting edge\' nature of the film, Fincher got a huge budget for this and it shows: the camera effects and the whole production design are amazing.\n\nThis movie has a raw energy that grips me every time I watch it. What a crazy, fun ride! Whether it is a very clever satire or pure testosterone going on a rampage - both are fine by me. A film so visually stunning and sexy, with career best performances by all involved - welcome to movie heaven.\n\nMy vote: 10 out of 10\n\nFavorite films: http://www.IMDb.com/list/mkjOKvqlSBs/\n\nLesser-known Masterpieces: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls070242495/\n\nFavorite Low-Budget and B-Movies: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls054808375/\n\nFavorite TV-Shows reviewed: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls075552387/', u'0.29084', u"\nAfter watching this movie I was totally filled with enthusiasm. Fight Club is definitly Fincher's best movie even better than se7en. It's not only the story but the optics which fascinated me. When I had seen it for the second time I could see this movie with the knowledge of the conclusion which is really fascinating as you'll see Fight Club in a totally different perspective. Also great about Fight Club is its soundtrack performed by the Dust Brothers and especially the song 'Where is my mind' by the Pixies which really fit to the end of the movie. Unfortunately Fight Club didn't have much success in Germany but anyway the movie got best reviews of the German press. I also have to mention the brilliance of Ed Norton and Brad Pitt who plays best in roles in which he performs the villain. But it's quiet amazing what Edward Norton is able to do - he is just overwhelming. For that role he has to get the oscar.", u'0.71018', u"\nFight Club is a brash slap in the face of consumerism and the working dead. It questions reality. It is strikingly thought provoking and visually stimulating. The direction is incredibly brilliant. Director David Fincher (Aliens, Se7en and The Game) is at his finest here warping both space and time, dropping in things here and there to make things clear. Edward Norton is excellent as Jack, the narrator of the movie. He is a nerdy insomniac who catalog shops at Ikea and has a going nowhere job. Brad Pitt is dynamic as Tyler Durden, an anarchistic man who lives in a run-down abandoned house and makes and sells soap for a living. Helen Bonham Carter is also great as Marla Singer, the manic-depressive chain-smoking woman in both their lives. Her role is critical and she plays it well.\n\nThere has been some controversy about the violence in this film but it is not gratuitous violence, it is part of the story and serves it well. It is much less than what you would see in your average Hollywood blockbuster. This is actually an insightful film and in many ways similar to American Beauty, although this film is much more in your face about it's message. If you are squeamish, you may not want to see it. There are some very painful bloody scenes, but if you can stomach it, then check it out. There is also a\nhuge twist in this film that almost rivals the twist at the end of The Sixth Sense. And I must admit, it is the twist in this film that made me really love it. The best audience for this film is men in their 20's or 30's, but anyone that can appreciate film as a modern art should like it. One of the best films of 1999.", u'0.250744', u'\nThis film, is basically, at least in my opinion, one of the greatest films ever, period.  I read the book afterwards, and equally enjoyed the book. The film is definitely for younger people, the critics of films, in general are older, so they cannot appreciate this film.  The film defines the younger generation, only younger people can relate to it, however, older people(middle aged+) can appreciate the art of the film, the beauty of the camera work, as well as the excellent acting.  The film, in every aspect is fantastic, it begins with a rather humorous narration, from a person we grow to know as, "narrator".  It goes about to show how he lives, and his way of life.  In these scenes alone, movie lines that will go down in history are said, and it\'s only the first twenty minutes.  The film tends to progress faster and faster as the film continues.  We delve into the narrators psyche, and find that he is not unlike most people in this world, he has a tendency to say to people what they want to hear, even if it is not the truth in it\'s entirety.  Almost all folks can relate to the main character, and he feels to be a real human, not a character in a story.  This, is partially due to the excellent directing, as well as book, but it is mostly due to the fantastic performance by Edward Norton. It, in my opinion is an Oscar performance.  Bradd Pitt gives his best performance to date, he is definitely an excellent coworker with David Fincher, they seem to share a common thread when it comes to film making I suppose.  I have full intention of purchasing this film when it is released on VHS and DVD.  Do yourself a favour, see this film, if that is not an option, at least read the book.  If you are younger and feel unrest with society, this is the film.\n', u'0.285839', u'Surrender to FIGHT CLUB...A No-Holds-Barred Knockout! If you haven\'t seen it...See it! If you HAVE...See it again! In the weeks after its release, either the critics just plain DIDN\'T GET IT...Or shrewdly pretended not to! Considering Fight Club\'s tauntingly in-your-face Political INcorrectness, it\'s easy to see why most critics opted to play it safe! Here is a film that almost cries out, "HATE ME! DESPISE ME!" An occasional film will step gingerly on the toes of audience sensibilities. Fight Club drop kicks them! Yet, it is so relentlessly and quirkily original, so pathologically tantalizing...you will LOVE it...and then HATE yourself for it! Make no mistake, however, Fight Club always shows its audience ample respect. It never pontificates nor proselytizes, as would your typical formulaic Hollywood film.\n\nThe term "Ride" is employed so freely to movies today, that it has become rather meaningless. Fight Club re-invents the word! Literally, from the DNA Roller-coaster opening Credits (Accompanied by the DUST BROTHERS musical equivalent of a sustained amyl-nitrate rush!), to the metaphoric wailing ("We\'re still men!") of castrated testicular cancer victims, to the mesmerizing and deftly parlayed 3-way screen chemistry of Norton- Bonham Carter-Pitt, to the sharply focused pointlessness of our cruise- control, hyper-consumeristic lifestyles...\n\n...Fight Club synthesizes both our pent-up frustration and our self- induced reluctance to communicate it, in RULE #1..."You DO NOT talk about Fight Club!" This, Ladies and Gentlemen, is one "RIDE" you DO NOT want to miss! 10*.....ENJOY/DISFRUTELA! Any comments, questions or observations, in English or Espa\xf1ol, are most welcome!', u'-0.137524', u'Fight club is made by one of my favorite film-maker David Fincher. It is based on the novel written by Chuck Palahniuk. Edward Norton & Brad Pitt have acted in this film.\n\nI love this film because of its philosophy. Probably this is one film which is very close to my heart. I am addicted to this film, in a way it motivates me; therefore whenever I feel low I choose to watch this film.\n\nI also love this film for its motivational quotes, its unconventional characters, stylized treatment, and dripping background scores\x85\n\nHowever, I don\'t think that any conscious reason will justify my explanation behind taking this film as a topic for film analysis; hence I will only say that this is my kind of cinema. Story:- Fight Club is a fascinating story of an Edward Norton and his world, his inner as well as outer world. This is a story of Tyler Durden. Edward Norton is a social animal who lives a monotonous life. He buys everything of which he sees an advertisement, however at the end of the day he also knows that nothing is worth buying. He is bored of his routine and flat life. He is bored of his falsehood, the artificiality in him have created all the complication in the story. On one not so fine day his fully furnished and occupied complex caught fire, he felt so lost and depressed. He just wanted to share his grief to anybody, hence he called Tyler Durden to whom he has recently met in an airplane and with whom he has also exchanged a number. This was his greatest mistake. Tyler was smart, dynamic and everything that Edward Norton has always aspires to be. Tyler was free from all kind of obligation and responsibilities. Edward Norton collaborated with Tyler and starts a club known as Fight Club. Fight Club is the way to break free. It is a club where two people will fight with each other. It is a club with the certain set of rules. Members of fight club are obliged to these rules. Tyler was the mentor, motivator and inspiration for the club member, they respect Tyler. This brought Tyler an opportunity to initiate project "Mayhem" (I am not going to disclose the details of Project Mayhem as it will be spoiler). However I will like to tell that Project Mayhem was all about destruction, it was all about economic equilibrium. Edward Norton didn\'t want this to happen as it will create havoc, and thus he fought against Project Mayhem, he fought against Tyler. But how can you defeat the animal within? Fight Club is a social film which deals with metaphysical plot.\n\n"Tyler Durden" is one of my favorite characters in the history of cinema, and Brad Pitt has excellently portrayed the character of Tyler Durden. I don\'t think that any other Actor other than Brad Pitt would have done justice to this character. Brad Pitt has given style to the character which was needed. I think Brad Pitt was most appropriate for the role of Tyler Durden however I will also say that the character of Tyler Durden was such a well written character half the job of the actor was done while writing it.\n\nEdward Norton is a fantastic actor, he have a capability to get into the skin of the character. In this film he has played a narrator and story was said from his point of view. I will say that Edward Norton have done a great job, as his character was recognized even after the presence of the strong character of Tyler Durden.\n\nDavid Fincher is a great storyteller he had courage to tell this complicated story with such a style and elegance. I have watched this film hundreds of time, and after watching and re-watching this film again and again I can say that this may be one of flawless film that I have watched. I respect the director for his detailing on the script, on his characters. I respect him for the style that he put in the film. I respect him for the subject of the film. Dialogues is also one of the most important part of this film, every time Tyler Durden speaks his words punches the viewer on their face. This film is full of quote and I will like to mention some of it over here.\n\n"Things that you own ends up owning you"\n\n"You are not the content of the wallet, You are not your job, You are not the car that you own, You are all the singing and dancing crab of this world"\n\nAnd many more\x85\n\nHypnotic background score and cinematography have done its job. On a whole I love this film as it motivates me every time I watch this.\n\nStrongly Recommended...', u'0.229989', u"\nAlthough this film was watchable for the first hour or so, it goes very rapidly downhill for the sorry remainder of it's duration. There are simply too many different ideas vying for the viewers attention. Intellectuals have found acres and acres of meaning, which David Fincher wanted them too, although he knows that he has simply made an extremely pretentious and boring mess. It's not all doom and gloom though - there are some very good set pieces in the first half of the film that actually entertained me for a while.", u'-0.219744', u'Is it possible to tell the truth and lie at the same time? Here is the lie: You can pretend special awareness and moral superiority even as you demonstrate a complete adherence to the system you condemn\x85and be found honest and heroic in the process.\n\nIs there irony in the fact that George A. Romero\'s supposed jab at consumerism (Dawn of the Dead) was marketed to consumers, and has since become a trendy tool for industry profit? Is it ironic that this satire of corporate soullessness is a corporate product itself? David Fincher is a commercial director. He directs commercials. Even his films are commercials. The style you see is only the transference of corporate technique into the realm of fantasy for entertainment. This film hasn\'t done anything socially other than amuse, negatively influence and accrue interest.\n\nI apologize if Fight Club has opened your eyes. I am sorry that you do not realize the truth: that you are just a sheep. We are all sheep. None of us are free in thought or action. We are all selectively intelligent. Some of us are aware, and some of us are more aware. Some are aware enough to see a problem and exploit it. Some are aware enough to see a problem and imagine themselves not an intimate part of it. Some of us know that the most deceptive form of \'evil\' is that which makes us feel superior even as we wallow in comfort.\n\nFight Club is not a bad film because it uses the system to pretend to fight the system. Fight Club is not a bad film at all. It is just an expensive lie packaged for consumers to blindly eat and feel that they are doing something other than consuming, other than feeding the system. Eat the rich, my ass.\n\nTalk about how cool Fight Club is. Talk about how funny you find it. Talk about how a little girl crying at the sight of a grown man\'s penis is biting social commentary. Just don\'t kid yourself that Fight Club is anything more than an amusing diversion from the actual truth of the human condition. Just tell yourself that you are not that gullible. Or in Fight Club speak: "You are not your gullibility".\n\nThis is what you get when the morally dead take a faux moral perch and attempt to laugh at the carcasses below. You can kick a corpse and pretend that it is dancing. But in realty, it is just dead meat. Want to be an actual rebel? Work with the homeless.', u'-0.232062'], u'tt0021749': [u"If there is one Charlie Chaplin film to recommend, as others have pointed to in the past, City Lights is the one. Though Chaplin played his Tramp character superbly in other movies, like Modern Times and The Gold Rush, City Lights displays the Tramp at his funniest, his bravest, his most romantic, and his most sympathetic. It's tough for filmmakers in recent days to bring the audience so close emotionally with the characters, but it's pulled off. \n\nThe film centers on three characters- the Tramp, the quintessential, funny homeless man who blends into the crowd, but gets caught in predicaments. He helps a drunken businessman (Myers, a fine performance in his own right) from suicide, and becomes his on and off again friend (that is, when it suits him and doesn't notice his 'friend's' state). The other person in the Tramp's life is the Blind Flower Girl (Virginia Cherrill, one of the most absorbing, beautiful, and key female performances in silent film), who are quite fond of each other despite the lack of total perception. The emotional centerpiece comes in obtaining rent and eye surgery money, which leads to a (how else can I put it) magical boxing match where it's basically a 180 from the brutality and viscerality of a match in say Raging Bull. \n\nThough there is no dialog, the film achieves a timelessness- it's essentially a tale of two loners who find each other, lose each other, and find each other again (the last scene, widely discussed by critics for decades, is moving if not tear-inducing). And it's never, ever boring- once you get along with the Tramp, you find the little things about him, the reaction shots, the little things he does after the usual big gag (look to the ballroom scene for examples of this, or when he gets a bottle of wine poured down his pants without the other guy noticing). Truth be told, if this film makes you indifferent, never watch Chaplin again. But if you give yourself to the film, you may find it's one of the most charming from the era, or perhaps any era.", u'0.166043', u"\nChaplin takes himself a little more seriously in City Lights, and the results are spectacular. The musical score which Chaplin composed for the film was one of the many highlights, and even though Charlie's performance is much more dramatic than usual in some scenes, the hilarious comedy for which he is known and loved is still abundant. \n\nCity Lights is so well made that it is one of the very few movies in which the obvious flaws can be gladly overlooked. Yes, you can clearly see the string holding Chaplin up in the sidesplittingly funny boxing scene, but who cares? That is such classic slapstick that little things like that really don't matter. Besides, let's keep in mind that this movie was made seventy years ago. \n\nChaplin does a phenomenal job in his traditional role of the tramp, and develops a perfectly convincing romantic relationship with the blind flower girl on the sidewalk. His friendship with the drunken rich guy is hilarious, but it also makes a significant comment about the problems of alcohol. This is truly a great film, which should not be forgotten. ", u'0.5667', u'Once again Chaplin plays his famous creation, the beloved Tramp\x85 The noble Little Fellow meets and falls in love with a blind flower girl\x85 She assumes he is wealthy man and offers him a flower, which he attentively accepts with his last penny\x85 \n\nOne night by chance he rescues a drunken millionaire from drowning\x85 The rich gentleman becomes a generous friend when drunk but doesn\'t recognize the tramp when sober\x85 Chaplin takes the blind girl under his wing, and takes flight with the millionaire\'s money to cure her blindness\x85 \n\n"City Lights" engaged a true genius in a graceful and touching performance which arouses profound feelings and joy with great simplicity of style and tragic tale\x85 Each scene was the result of hard-working detail and planning\x85', u'0.987906', u"This is my favorite Chaplin film, but I don't want that to diminish his other work, either. MODERN TIMES was an outstanding work of social satire, THE GOLD RUSH was great slapstick, and even the largely-neglected MONSIEUR VERDOUX strikes a certain unforgettable tone. Chaplin didn't make a bad movie, and I'm not even sure that CL is his best, exactly. But it IS my favorite, if only for the ending.\n\nThat ending has been the subject of much comment here. I think it's a masterpiece in a single scene. Chaplin's little tramp has never seemed less like a character and more like a living, breathing human being. It's a monument to understated sentimentality.\n\nTo me, the rest of the film exists largely to set the context for that one magnificent piece of celluloid. Yes, the boxing scene is great, and the scene where he rescues the millionaire is also wonderful, but it's that ending that makes us all love this movie.", u'0.342966', u'Let me join the consensus and call Charlie Chaplin\'s "City Lights" a masterpiece. It\'s only 81 minutes long, but they are among the best 81 minutes you could spend at the movies, and the last five minutes are simply exquisite. Keep your Kleenex box at arm\'s length as I doubt if there has been a more honestly heartbreaking scene captured on film. When the formerly blind girl gives the Little Tramp a flower and ultimately says "Yes, I can see now", the scene takes on such emotional gravity as to defy explanation.\n\nChaplin was at his zenith in 1928 when he started a journey of more than two years to develop and film this story, and the Little Tramp had already been a familiar character to audiences for over a decade. He had already made the classics "The Gold Rush" (1925) and "The Circus" (1928) starring his character, so it\'s obvious he felt a need to take a slightly different direction and deepen the character this time. The advent of talkies didn\'t stop Chaplin from making this "Comedy Romance in Pantomime" (as he subtitled it), as he knew giving the Little Tramp a voice would limit his appeal as a universal character. What I particularly enjoyed in this film is how the Little Tramp fancies himself as a well-mannered gentleman in spite of all the circumstances that bring him down, even going to prison for love. It is this self-delusion and his subsequent mistaken identity as a millionaire that leads him to the blind flower girl, played in an effectively plaintive manner by Virginia Cherrill. Her performance is a greatly underrated element in this film, as she displays the right amount of vacant innocence to make the last minutes so memorable. Simply compare her to the screen test shown of Georgia Hale, Chaplin\'s leading lady in "The Gold Rush" and an obviously more experienced actress than Cherrill, as Hale struggles to show the right balance between condescension and beatific revelation when she realizes the Little Tramp is the "wealthy" gentleman who paid for the restoration of her sight.\n\nOf course, this would not be a Chaplin film without the brilliance of his comedy routines and there is a treasure trove of classic scenes - the rising and lowering of the street elevator, the shifting musical chairs scene at the nightclub, the mock suicide at the canal and especially the boxing scene, which has been imitated by so many lesser filmmakers (and was according to the footage included as a DVD extra, inspired by an earlier Chaplin short "The Champion" from 1915). Even a simple moment, for example, when the Little Tramp mistakes a piece of thread from his vest for a ball of twine, is impressive for the sheer delicacy of the moment. And special mention needs to go to Chaplin\'s musical score, where he beautifully interweaves Jos\xe9 Padilla\'s "La Violetta" as his love theme.\n\nThe transfer to DVD is very good, and the 2-DVD set has plenty of extras though they vary in quality. The Serge Bromberg documentary provides an informative supplement to the film, and the footage of Chaplin from a Vienna press tour is fascinating since it captures the long-forgotten worldwide frenzy he created back then. The aforementioned Georgia Hale screen test is a worthwhile addition but runs on a bit too long. The 10-minute home movie of Chaplin\'s trip to Bali has a certain anthropological interest but seems rather pointless otherwise. Regardless, the movie itself is rewarding enough and an exquisite jewel that completely justifies Chaplin\'s reputation as one of the world\'s leading filmmakers.', u'0.597488', u'CITY LIGHTS (United Artists, 1931), written, directed and starring Charlie Chaplin (1889- l977), is a silent comedy-drama released at the height of the sound era. Distributing a movie in the silent film tradition at the time when silents were considered a fad, Chaplin gambled with this production, and made it pay off. Although Chaplin hails THE GOLD RUSH (1925) as the one movie he would most want to be remembered, CITY LIGHTS nearly dims out his GOLD RUSH and at the same time, practically places his other silent masterpiece, THE CIRCUS (1928) to oblivion. CITY LIGHTS has stood the test of time, balancing perfectly a mixture of comedy and drama, but in Chaplin\'s case, pathos.\n\nSubtitled, "A comedy romance in pantomime," the story opens in the early morning where the mayor is dedicating a statue to the citizens of the city. After the unveiling, the crowd finds a little tramp (Charlie Chaplin) sleeping on the lap of one of the figures. As he tries to climb down, he encounters one problem after another. This opening scene alone is priceless. With such a great beginning, Chaplin adds in more comedic insertions blended into the plot. The theme to CITY LIGHTS is remembered mainly about a tramp\'s love for a blind girl. However, there is a subplot, involving the tramp\'s involvement with a millionaire drunk, which, by far, takes up more time than the sentimental love story. These two segments actually set the pattern. First segment, set in the afternoon, finds Charlie walking down the street, examining a nude statue in a shop, being annoyed by some newsboys making fun of his tattered clothing. He encounters a beautiful blonde girl (Virginia Cherrill) selling flowers. After she drops one of her flowers, Charlie notices her feeling about the sidewalk for it, thus, realizing she\'s blind. Smitten by her beauty, he picks it up and pays her for it. Minutes later, the slamming of a limousine door is heard, with the girl believing the kind gentleman, Charlie, to be a millionaire. Second segment, set at night, finds Charlie encountering a drunk (Harry Myers) trying to commit suicide by drowning himself. Just as Charlie is about to save him, he in turn falls into the river. The drunk, in gratitude for saving his life, takes Charlie under his wing to accompany him to various night clubs until dawn. By morning, the millionaire, now sober, fails to recognize or remember Charlie and orders orders his butler to escort this stranger out of his mansion. This running gag that\'s repeated in the story might play itself as repetitious, but Chaplin manages to breathe new life and funnier routines through his encounters with the drunk and their all night binges. By day, Charlie looks after the blind girl and worries when she\'s not at her usual corner selling flowers. Finding that she\'s ill and being cared by her grandmother (Florence Lee), whose behind with her rent and threatened with eviction, Charlie offers to help by obtaining and losing various jobs, ranging from street-cleaning to fighting in a boxing match. Reading in a newspaper of a European doctor who restores sight for the blind, Charlie gives the girl $1,000 for an operation, the money offered to him by the drunken millionaire, who, after sober, accuses Charlie of robbing him, has his arrested and serving jail time. The climatic finish is truly the best thing Chaplin has ever done and certainly one not to be missed.\n\nFeatured in the supporting cast are Henry Bergman, Allan Garcia, Albert Austin, and Hank Mann. While much has been discussed about Chaplin\'s performance, his co-star, Virginia Cherrill, as the blind girl (no name given), should not go without mention. Even though her future film career consisted of forgettable programmers, and at one time being one of the future wives of film actor, Cary Grant, her performance is excellent by all means. Although it\'s been said that future film star Jean Harlow (1911-1937) appears as an unbilled extra in the night club sequence, she is visible in a surviving still photograph, but no such scene appears in the finished product. \n\nUnlike THE GOLD RUSH, CITY LIGHTS had limited showings in revival houses in later years, and was never allowed to be distributed to television. Being first introduced to CITY LIGHTS at New York City\'s revival movie house, The Regency Theater, formerly located on Broadway and 67th Street, in 1979, the memorable thing about this event are the roars of laughter from its theater packed audience. There was one man, probably a big fan reliving his childhood memories, whose laughter almost drowned out the underscoring of the film. No doubt he was having more fun watching this movie than anyone else. Watching CITY LIGHTS surrounded by an appreciative audience theater is one way to truly appreciate and experience the feel of silent film comedy, and to think back as to how the audience reacted in same back in 1931.\n\nAfter Chaplin\'s death in December of 1977, CITY LIGHTS, along with his other silent features, were not only resurrected for a new generation to endure, but became readily available on video cassette at the time of Chaplin\'s 100th birthday, 1989. In later years, CITY LIGHTS was frequently revived on various cable channels, ranging from Turner Network Television (TNT) in the early 1990s, American Movie Classics up to 2001, and finally Turner Classic Movies. The complete musical soundtrack that accompanies CITY LIGHTS happens to be the original score composed to perfection by Chaplin himself. \n\nMuch has been written and said about CITY LIGHTS over the years. To learn more about the making, difficulties and long term preparations to CITY LIGHTS, either watch Kevin Blownlow\'s 1980 documentary, Hollywood: A Celebration of the American Silent Film, as narrated by James Mason, or Brownlow\'s other documentaries dedicated entirely to Chaplin\'s career, including outtakes to CITY LIGHTS as well as scenes involving Virginia Cherrill\'s temporary replacement, Georgia Hale, Chaplin\'s co-star in THE GOLD RUSH. (****)', u'0.158115', u"City Lights is simply put one of the best movies out there. Every scene is classic and had a huge impact on the history of film-making. Chaplin's last 'silent' film tells the story of a poor little man the tramp played by Chaplin who falls in love with a blind flower girl. He becomes friends with a wealthy man who constantly tries to commit suicide. The man only recognizes the tramp character when he is drunk. To impress the flower girl the tramp uses the man's wealth to make her fall in love with him. The only problem is that when the man is sober he doesn't recognize the tramp anymore. On top of this the flower girl has to pay 22 dollars of rent or she will be thrown out of her apartment. Now the tramp desperately seeks for jobs in the city to help his love. Out of this simple plot great comedy and heart breaking moments come forth.\n\nThe outcome of the movie is to almost all people known. It is regarded as one of the best endings ever taped on film. The movie itself still is masterpiece more than 70 years after it's release. I personally rate this as Chaplin's second best I have seen so far. My favorite remains The Gold Rush. Still this movie gets 5/5 stars from me.", u'0.268536', u'\nCharlie Chaplin\'s "City Lights" contains a blend of humor and humanity that make it memorable for everyone who watches it.  Although made very much in the old-fashioned silent film tradition, much of it is timeless, too.\n\nAfter a few minutes of slapstick at the beginning, Charlie\'s "little tramp" character makes two acquaintances.  He meets a blind girl selling flowers, who mistakes him for a rich man, and the two become very fond of each other.  Then he meets a real millionaire, who is drunk, depressed, and about to commit suicide.  In a comic scene, the tramp persuades the millionaire not to go through with it, making himself a devoted friend.\n\nThe tramp soon learns that there is an operation that could give the girl her sight, and tries to think of some way he could help.  His scenes with the girl and her grandmother are moving, while his determination to help lead him into some comic escapades - his attempt to win money in a boxing match being particularly funny, and one of Chaplin\'s best comic pieces.  Meanwhile, when his millionaire friend is drunk, he dotes on the tramp, but when sober he forgets who the tramp is, leading to more amusing scenes and occasional trouble for Charlie.\n\nAll of the comedy leads up to a finale that is one of the best-remembered scenes in any film.  "City Lights" shows the power of the camera in the hands of a master, who without words can move his audience or make them laugh.  Anyone who appreciates good cinema should see it at least once.\n', u'0.195684', u'I always thought this was one of Charlie Chaplin\'s nicest, most under-appreciated silent movie gems. Then I discovered it really wasn\'t underrated; it\'s rated very high on most critics\' lists. It may be that I usually hear about some of his other movies than I do this one.\n\nPart of the reason I think so highly of this is simply that I\'m a sentimentalist and story in this film is a very touching one. It\'s a romance between Charlie\'s tramp character (no name) and a blind girl, who also had no name in this film. Virginia Cherill, who played the blind woman and had a wholesome, pretty face which I found very attractive.\n\nI\'m not always a huge fan of pantomime except for some great comedians of the era like Chaplin, Harold Lloyd and Buster Keaton, but Chaplin was so good at it and this is one of the last of dying breed as "talkies" were out in full force by 1931. Chaplin was at his best in silent movies, anyway, and his comedy routines are legendary. He gave me a lot of laughs in this film, as always, and I particularly laughed (I love slapstick) at the boxing scene. Kudos, too, to Harry Myers as the "eccentric millionaire."\n\nThere\'s a lot of drama as well as humor in this 86-minute gem as the Tramp tries to aid a blind girl, raising money so she can get an operation to restore her sight.\n\nComedy, romance, drama (with suffering) all combine to make this an extraordinary piece of entertainment. It\'s hard to believe this movie was not up for one, single Academy Award.', u'0.380658', u"\nFilm has become a medium that is strongly influenced by nostalgia.  Old films have become journeys to the past; ways to visit times and people that no longer are.  Since film is an art that is based on the innovation of previous works, it has an element of nostalgia in its foundation.  We look on the old to find what elements should make up the new.  In City Lights, and other silent works of film, a passion emerges that is uniquely honest and sincere.  While watching the film, I was impressed that Chaplin really did love the story, the sets, the crew; the whole project.  While this may not have been the complete reality, it felt that way, and thus made the film more enjoyable.  In silent films the audience is forced to be completely reliable on the visual elements of the film; there are no elaborate sound effects or dialogue to provoke an emotional response.\n\nSince film is at its very core a visual medium, I find silent films to be the basic form of the medium.  I don't use the word basic here in a demeaning sense, but I compare the beauty of silent films to the beauty of early European art, before the concept of perspective was developed in the Renaissance.  Many books and tomes featured people as tall as the castles they stood in; these works of art were not technologically advanced, but they were, and are, beautiful.  The same example is found when comparing early darreographs of wild animals to contemporary photographs found in National Geographic. There is a warmth found in City Lights, and other Chaplin films (The Kid, Modern Times) that would be lost in the sea of cinematic technology that floods films today.  Maybe it's just that with simplicity comes honesty, and honesty is perhaps the most powerful emotion that can cross through the screen and be felt by the viewer.\n", u'0.673993', u"\nSpoilers herein.\n\nFor me, this film falls not into the category of favorite films (I'm a Marx brothers kind of guy) but earns instead a place on a very short list of most important movies.\n\nThat's because it has two features that I truly appreciate.\n\nIt is as pure a vision of its creator as is possible. Nearly all other films are engineered from prior work. Not so with a small list of projects from Welles, Kurosawa, Eisenstein, ... and this one project of Chaplin's. They are wholly original, springing from some nether world.\n\nBut the other element is the one that impresses the most. This film is about itself, about the art of visual narrative. Chaplin was intelligent enough to know that what he was doing was new. The issues are centered on what the audience `sees,' so while he struggles with what and how the audience sees, he builds that into the fabric of the story.\n\nThe primary framing is about the blind girl who falls in love with him by `seeing' him in her own way. Then `sees' him at the end in a different way.  The rich man recognizes the tramp when drunk but does not when he is not. Nearly all the jokes, indeed every element of the film is about this same dynamic: the elevator which is not seen but then was, the burglars the same, the Tramp on the statue, on the barrel. Even seeing the cigar before the bum does. Even us seeing the soap and the foreman not.\n\nThe `seeing' is carried over to `hearing' with the politician and whistle jokes. And then even further as Charlie turns his back on the new technology of giving us speech and instead `shows' us something else: he writes and conducts an amazing score instead. This is truly amazing (and one reason to take Mike Figgis seriously).\n\nNo wonder Orson Welles considered this the most important film ever made. But as to the best to watch? Because film is so derivative, my own gold standard for the Tramp is Robert Downey's (and to some extent Depp's). Comic timing is something that evolves, and those men make a more effective Tramp for my modern ability to see.\n\nTrivia: Chaplin found the `blind' girl in a group of spectators at a fight and was struck with how her expressions reflected what she saw. She's pretty as well of course, but certainly not the prettiest Chaplin knew. See how Chaplin separately works in both the fight (a performance) and her reaction to his performance in the film.", u'0.213323', u'Waddling along with his cane and derby hat, and that tiny mustache, the little tramp (Charles Chaplin) is visually unlike any character in film history. The tramp is kind-hearted, always dignified. He\'s a simple soul who in "City Lights" tries to help out a young blind woman (well played by Virginia Cherrill). This is a silent film, of course, but the tramp\'s body language is his speech.\n\nThe really noticeable feature of the tramp character is how he blends into everyday life. He\'s more or less ignored by many, laughed at by others. The girl\'s grandmother never "sees" him at all. And only when the millionaire is drunk does he "see" the tramp as a friend. Curious ... and deep.\n\nThe tramp gets into his fair share of trouble, but only through his bumbling efforts to help the girl. The boxing match is a hoot, and very well choreographed, as are all the skits. And what a beginning for a film, with city leaders spouting gibberish, probably as Chaplin\'s dig at the "talkies". Then the way Chaplin makes his grand entrance ... just terrific!\n\nMelancholy at times, the film\'s music really tugs at your heartstrings. Maybe it\'s sentimental and manipulative. But given the abiding and Zen-like qualities of the tramp, some sentimentality is quite appropriate. And the music is choreographed totally in sync with the plot action.\n\nProduction design is sparse and at times drab. That the film was made during the Great Depression is beyond obvious.\n\nComedy here is simple and effective. The main character expresses heart and humanity. The little tramp is an unforgettable character. And "City Lights" is a wonderful film.', u'0.250376', u'\nChaplin was a unique presence in the history of the early cinema.  Coming up through the ranks, he gradually achieved a god-like stature, being awarded total control of every facet of the production.\n\nNot only was he often the sole person who knew what the end product was to be (as in "The Kid") but he was also allowed to elaborately improvise in the creative process.  This often meant doing countless scores of retakes over days, weeks and even months; holding up the cast and crew for days while he brooded over just what to do next; and even (in the case of "The Gold Rush") cancelling expensive weeks of location shooting and returning to the studio to start all over again.\n\nHe cleverly duped chief studio- and bank chiefs into somehow going along with his free-wheeling and gross inclinations, thus mesmerizing their conservative senses into supporting his hit-and-miss schemes and trial-and-error "madness."\n\nIn other words, Chaplin used the entire productional company as merely as his paintbrush, with which he toyed at his pleasure to create his personal canvases.  Fortunately, he was a genius, and at the right place in time to be allowed to get away with such unprecedented extravagence.\n\nIt was a young and growing industry when Chaplin began emerging, and there were no set rules.  People were still trying to figure out just what could be done with the medium -- and Chaplin helped to establish its early parameters.\n\nHe was certainly and autocrat, yet that doesn\'t really matter when it comes to film works.  It\'s the product that counts.  In the case of "City Lights," all the blood-sweat-and-tears that it took to achieve the finished product was more than worth the effort.  \n\nNow that all the frustration, anger, and outrage associated with the behind-the-scenes unfoldment of this highly troubled production are well in the past, what remains is a genuinely moving film classic.\n\n\nSometimes great enterprises require considerable hardship to forge them into being.  The greater the achievement, often the greater the challenge and period of endurance. Whatever the case, we are the appreciative recipients of this masterwork, which takes its place besides "Modern Times" and "The Gold Rush" as one of Chaplin\'s consummate expressions.\n', u'0.556881', u"The tramp tries to nurture and help a blind flower girl regain sight despite scant resources and the prejudices and graft of the big city. Although the physical gags lack the large-scale invention of the factory scenes in Modern Times and the criticism of the wealthy doesn't transcend an admittedly witty recurring joke\x97the aristocrat friend can only demonstrate compassion and friendliness in an inebriated state; he's always inviting the tramp in, only to incredulously throw him out the next sober morning\x97the tramp's touching earnestness in rescuing his angel from a life of abjection is simple and selfless and deeply moving. I would say it also fades out at the perfect moment of open-ended ambiguity\x97the viewer is forced to make resonant meaning out of the final troublingly cathartic shot, even as the film articulates a consistent worldview in relation to what has come before. In my eyes, Modern Times is Chaplin's masterpiece, but City Lights would probably better merit repeat viewings, which is as much a testament to the film's power as anything else.", u'0.33198', u"... it's perhaps a test of a person's outlook to ask them what they see in the final scene. If they've never seen City Lights before and they instantly notice the major continuity issue (Chaplin holds a flower to his lapel from the rear shot, it's up to his mouth on his close up) then maybe they've placed film studies over romance.\n\nIt took a few viewings before I spotted this, and once I did I can't help but notice it. Yet even despite this, I never fail to get choked up on the beauty of that final scene. If you want to impress the right kind of girl, put it on and show her what a sensitive soul you are during those final moments.\n\nAs for the rest of the film, then while the final five minutes are classic and perhaps the best thing Chaplin ever did, the rest of it is episodic and patchy, necessitating my relatively low score. Still a fine film, but never a completely great one, what presages those beautiful final moments is merely fine entertainment.", u'0.0552963'], u'tt0073486': [u'I went into this film with the knowledge that it had been the second film in history to win the \'top five\' Oscars (for Best Picture, Best actor, Best actress, Best director and best screenplay) and has been praised as "one of Jack Nicholson\'s finest roles" and "one of the classics of the 70\'s". Naturally, after hearing all this, I had high expectations for One Flew over the Cuckoo\'s Nest. But nonetheless, I was surprised at how easily the film surpassed my expectations and easily led me to understand how it merited all that praise.\n\nBased on the novel by Ken Kesey, the story follows Randle Patrick McMurphy (Jack Nicholson), who, in an attempt to get out of spending more time in prison, pleads insanity for his crime, and is therefore sentenced to time in a mental institution. This was McMurphy\'s intention, as he believes the conditions in a "crazy house" will be significantly easier to contend with than another harsh stay in prison. However, he quickly finds out that surviving the institution with it\'s desolate patients (including Christopher Lloyd, Danny DeVito, Vincent Schiavelli and an absolutely brilliant Brad Dourif as the stuttering Billy Bibbit) and the monstrously repressive Nurse Ratchet (Louise Fletcher, in a career defining role) is considerably harder than he imagined. McMurphy plays pranks, horseplay, and is generally defiant to the rules of the institution in an attempt to raise spirits. His constant optimism and reckless defiance to the out of date rules in the institution can be very uplifting, and often quite funny as well, but much of the movie can be very depressing - the generally decrepit state of the institution is a consistently (and intentionally) bleak background to a superb story with a truly bittersweet ending.\n\nJack Nicholson is at his best here, head and shoulders above other excellent performances such as in \'Chinatown\' or \'As Good as it Gets\'. McMurphy is an apparently unquenchable optimist, refusing to succumb to the defeated spirit of all the other patients. His livewire antics, inspiring the patients are generally uplifting, and when his indomitable spirit is finally broken, we really feel for him and his fellow patients. Nicholson conveys the essence of McMurphy to perfection, demonstrating his excellent understanding and interpretation of the character. When McMurphy announces that he is going to lift a huge stone fountain and hurl it through the window to escape, the other patients are so caught up in his intoxicating spirit of freedom that they honestly believe he can do it, despite the fact it would be impossible for a man much stronger than him. When McMurphy finally discovers that despite his best efforts, he cannot lift the fountain, he is so openly crushed that we can\'t help but feel for him. Beneath the frequent profanities and livewire antics, there are real human emotions, which come across as truly touching.\n\nWhat can be said about One Flew over the Cuckoo\'s Nest which hasn\'t already been said? It has an excellent storyline, top notch acting, painfully bleak visuals, perfectly setting the tone for the movie, and alternates between being truly uplifting to devastatingly depressing. It features perhaps the most memorable film ending ever, next to a man on his horse riding off into the sunset, and leaves the viewer beaten down by the conflicting emotions, unaware what to think of the picture next to reveling in it\'s glorious entirety. It\'s hard to produce a final outcome any better than this.\n\n-10/10', u'0.231446', u"Jack Nicholson is a great actor. No, not a great actor, a spectacular actor. This is a film from fairly early in his career, as well as it is for several other actors in this film, who later have had long, great careers too, including Danny DeVito, Christopher Lloyd and Brad Dourif. The film has some unforgettable moments... who could forget Louise Fletcher's icy stare, Jack Nicholson's smart-aleck remarks or Will Sampson's impressive, almost entirely silent performance? The film portrays the horrible truth about how patients were treated in mental institutions back then, and tells the story of someone who desperately wanted to break out, to rebel, to change things, for himself and for the others. I was compelled by this film, from the very first frame. I never took my eyes off it, and I will definitely be thinking about this film for a while. I thought it was great the way one of the very first frames depicted the institution as something far more similar to a prison than a hospital. Milos Forman did a great job of making that contrast very powerful to the viewer. The film is very moving and a truly beautiful cinematic experience. Every single actor gives a stellar performance, every single character is perfectly written, every single line, every single frame is absolutely perfect. I wouldn't change a thing in this film. It has a great pace, you never lose interest, but it never seems to be rushing to get through it, either. It's simply perfect. I have not read the original book, but if I ever come across it, I might check it out. I have only seen this film once, but I will definitely watch it many times in years to come. I recommend this amazing piece of great cinema to anyone who has at least a slight interest in the drama genre, or any fan of any of the actors, as they are all in their absolute prime in this film. 10/10", u'0.506053', u'\nThe opening shot of ONE FLEW OVER THE CUCKOO\'S NEST is a bleak  glance at an Oregon morning.  Stirring, haunting music plays gracefully on the soundtrack and a car approaches.  Inside the car is one of film history\'s most remarkable characters.   "Randle McMurphy" is about to bring hope, humor, and a glimmer of reality to some disturbed people in a mental hospital.  Jack Nicholson as "McMurphy", is something of a paradox.  Is this guy crazy or is he really the lazy, conniving criminal most believe him to be?  That is the magical mystery and start to a journey into mental illness and the effect this man will have on some truly messed up men.\n\nMilos Forman directs this all-time classic, which swept the Oscars deservedly, and holds up so well 25 years later.  It is a simplistic film about small people living in their own small worlds.  Manic moments are mixed with poignant acting all leading to an astounding climax.  Not before or since CUCKOO\'S NEST has a collection of different characters had such an impact on me.  You could write a book report about each of the patients in the ward.  The two most important people here are, of course, Jack Nicholson and Louise Fletcher.\n\nNicholson has his greatest moments in this picture.  One brilliant scene has him doing an imaginary play-by-play commentary of the 1963 World Series to the group, who are not allowed to watch the game on TV.  It is a poetic sequence and Nicholson goes crazy with his delivery, describing baseball with colorful anecdotes and profanity.  "McMurphy" immediately makes an impression on the crazies and shows them how they don\'t have to stick to the "normal routine".  He knows their names right away, he sprays them with water, he makes impossible bets with them, he introduces them to fishing, and he even gets a suffering young kid (played well by Brad Dourif) a "date".  \n\nLouise Fletcher plays one of the more reprehensible human beings in film as "Nurse Mildred Ratched".  She is a hardened woman, one who makes the daily meetings with the group a contest to see who will win.  Her stubbornness and lack of compassion for the poor guys is rather one dimensional.  That\'s perfect because that is exactly who she is.  Her strong will to keep things monotonous leads to a final showdown with the free spirited "McMurphy" in what is easily one of the most shocking and disturbing climaxes in recent memory.\n\nONE FLEW OVER THE CUCKOO\'S NEST does not try to make a statement about mental illness or how the unstable should be treated.  Rather, it is a very simple portrait of the long days and hilarious scenarios that can come about when a mixed bag of suffering people are thrown together.  Mental illness is nothing to laugh about, but the fact that Nicholson is not really crazy (at least in my opinion) allows us to be amused.  He seems to love his compadres in the hospital.  He is mislead, however, into thinking he can do as he pleases.\n\nThere is no denying the power of CUCKOO\'S NEST.  The two main powerhouse performances are golden, the cinematography is morbid and gritty like it should be, the "Chief" is great as Nicholson\'s right hand, ah, protagonist, and you care a lot about what will happen as the film moves on.  The famous, final shot ironically happens to be an exit of a major character into that bleak, Oregon morning. \n\nNOTE: I have never read the book and I find it hard to believe author Ken Kesey has never watched the filmed version.  Comparing a book to a movie is impossible.  They are 2 distinctly different artistic methods of story-telling.', u'0.11399', u'Based on the amazing novel by Ken Kesey, Randall Patrick McMurphy is an antisocial and dangerous man no different than a petty criminal, placed in a mental ward to have his behavior studied. He makes friends with lunatics and starts his own circle of admiration within the hospital, much to the dismay of Nurse Ratched, the central authority figure in the story and one of the greatest movie villains ever.\n\nThe movie exists to show not only how corrupt and poorly-constructed society\'s approach to the "mentally unstable" is, but it creates characters that we have all met in life and shows how the McMurphy-like figure that we all wish we had fights for freedom of choice and basic human rights. In addition to the movie\'s great spirit, the acting is fantastic. Jack Nicholson is at his best and Danny DeVito can be seen in his very first acting role ( which he absolutely triumphs in ). And of course, there\'s the unforgettable Chief Bromden. The directing by Milos Forman is very well-done, as the camera-work is excellent and follows the pace of the movie perfectly in how it is used. What really impressed me was the editing, especially as far as the use of audio goes: some parts just made me go "...wow."\n\nMy only complaint is that I believe the movie could\'ve been slightly more effective if it were based more closely on the novel at certain points, but the modified point of view of the film does make a great point; anyone who has ever hated their job, been accused of something, had some person so self-righteous and convinced of their own authority and dependency on order get in your way, or attended the American public school system at any point in their life should be able to identify with this movie.', u'0.582605', u"What a movie, what an excellent movie!!! That is what first went through my mind after seeing this masterpiece. I've seen many movies, but there aren't much movies which had such an impact on me. Nowadays almost all filmmakers believe they can only make a good movie by adding loads of special effects and lots of huge explosions ... This movie is so good, so convincing without them. The actors played their roles in such a convincing way that you would think these weren't actors at all, but real psychiatric patients.\n\nThis movie may be 30 years old, but it hasn't lost any of its relevancy. OK, we don't put our mentally ill people in that kind of prisons anymore, the bars in front of the windows have gone and now we call it hospitals in stead of nut houses. But the treatment hasn't changed all that much. I once worked in such a hospital as a volunteer and still saw things like forced feeding, giving people so much medication until they no longer know who or where they are,...\n\nWhen the movie first came out, some people were shocked because when you watch the movie, you can't help it feeling more attached to the patients than to the doctors and nurses. This movie shows that cinema can make a difference. It can help to open people's eyes. If there is a movie that should be seen by everyone, this sure is the one. I give it a well deserved 10/10.", u'0.0140138', u"\nIt's tough to really judge this movie. Is it Milos  Forman's greatest directorial masterpiece or  Jack Nicholson's best performance. Tough to  say, but the marriage between both director  and actor are quite phenomenal. From the first  time we see Jack Nicholson to the sad, yet  uplifting ending, one cannot escape the sheer  power of the film. When a film is parodied as  many times as this one has been, typically,  greatness can be associated. Well, greatness  was achieved, and let's hope this one never  falls through the cracks.", u'0.0504363', u"Milos Forman's One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest is a landmark (one of the few I might add) in cinema. Pretty much everything in this film is at or close to perfection. And rightfully so, it became only the 2nd (1 in 3 films in history along with It Happened One Night and Silence of the Lambs) film to win the top five Oscars- Best Picture, Actor (Jack Nicholson), Actress (Louise Fletcher), Director (Forman), and Screenplay (Bo Goldman).\n\nThe story (based on Ken Kessey's astounding, though not too similar, novel) focuses on a rowdy misfit named Randle Patrick McMurphy (Nicholson) who is put in a mental hospital with other people (some voluntarily in) who are not all there. Some of these guys include Danny DeVito (in his first role), Christopher Lloyd, Brad Dourif (in his Oscar nominated role) and the never forgettable Will Sampson who played the Chief. The film, It's actors and scenes will always be terrific achievements in cinema and is one of my favorites.", u'0.386431', u'\nJack Nicholson had been nominated four times, he had lost four times.  Each time he probably should have won, but he never did.  Just when you thought there was no justice in the world, Jack finally came through with "One Flew Over the Cuckoo\'s Nest".  The film is exceptional in every sense imaginable.  Nicholson stars as a prisoner who is sent to an insane asylum.  While there, Nicholson creates an atmosphere which gives his fellow inmates a sense of self-worth and a glimmer of happiness.  Throughout, it is never made clear whether Nicholson is truly insane or just acting crazy to get out of manual labor at the regular prison.  Whatever the case, Nicholson is creating a place that head-nurse Louise Fletcher (Oscar-winning) is finding unsuitable for the other patients.  She is quietly evil and amazingly cruel to those within the asylum.  Nicholson and Fletcher are getting ready for a head-on-collision that will prove to be the decisive factor at the end of the movie.  Will Sampson, Danny DeVito, Christopher Lloyd, and Brad Dourif (Oscar-nominated) are all great in supporting turns as Nicholson\'s fellow inmates.  An excellent film.  5 stars out of 5.       \n', u'0.29136', u"\nFirst thing's first, while I watched this movie, I found myself stunned. This movie so entertained the viewer, as it did fascinate, and inform. A chilling, disturbing, and revealing look into the mental institutions as seen through the eyes of a con. Jack Nicholson, Louise Fletcher, Brad Dourif, Danny DeVito, and Christopher Lloyd, round out the excellent, and very well casted cast.\n\nJack Nicholson brilliantly plays Randall Patrick McMurphy, an ex-con, who fakes being mentally insane, to enter the institution. As he goes to the hospital, he doesn't realize, that the people, and the atmosphere there is so out there. The patients are really psycho, and creepy. Randall, must try and survive these days, before he has to go to Jail. He has to entertain himself while at the same time, find good in this place of craziness.\n\nLousie Fletcher plays Nurse Ratched, a soft; but strong willed nurse, who will not take anything from anyone, or put up with misbehavior. She watches Randall, and notices something different about him, he's not as psycho as the others, but he is a little out there. Her job is tough indeed, having to put up with all these men, who don't listen, some go crazy and throw fits, and others just sit there and don't do anything.\n\nRandall meets many new friends in this place, Brad Dourif who plays Billy Bibbit, is a mentally unstable, but voluntarily institutionalized person. Danny DeVito plays Martini, a slow but charming and sweet man, who means know harm in what he does or say. Christopher Lloyd plays Taber, a man, who also voluntarily institutionalized himself. He also meets Chief, a big 'dumb, and deaf' Indian, who happens to like to play basketball. Randall must try and survive these days with his new friends, and the hospital, as well as an everlasting war as to which they can watch the world series on TV. Put up with Nurse Ratched, and the other patients, doctors, vistors, and nurses. Ultimately leading up to a dramatic finale, that makes you want to stand up and cheer.\n\nI think what was best about this film was the realism. I had no problem believing that this was happening. Almost like a documentary, it was striking and powerful, making the viewer not want to stop watching till the end. Some of the sequences are memorable as the basketball game, and the fishing trip. Jack Nicholson, who as always plays his character absolutely excellent, and makes the viewer want to hand him an Oscar himself.\n\nThe supporting cast, Louise Fletcher, Danny DeVito, Christopher Lloyd, and Brad Dourif also give terrific performances. Danny, Christopher, and Brad's careers all were made with this superb movie. It's all sentimental, funny, dramatic, intense, chilling, disturbing, diverting, and tragic. The finale leaves the viewer stunned and sitting there thinking about what he just saw. See this film, and believe it. I think you will find, its one of the BEST ever.\n\nThe second film to win all five major Oscars: Best Picture, Best Actor (Nicholson), Best Actress (Fletcher), Director, and Screenplay. And it deserved all of them.\n\nRated R for language, violence, sexual content, and brief nudity.", u'0.377427', u'Czech director Milos Forman seems to be obsessed with rebellious characters that don\'t like to go with the flow. Just think about Larry Flynt in "The People vs. Larry Flynt" or Andy Kaufman in "Man on the Moon", in the two most recent movies of Forman. The central character in "One Flew Over the Cuckoo\'s Nest" played by Jack Nicholson is also one of those characters, that wants to break the routine and even starts a revolt against the staff and nurse Ratchett in particular, in a mental institution.\n\nThe movie is perhaps more comedy and entertainment than heavy drama. Still that doesn\'t mean that the movie isn\'t filled with some powerful emotional sequences. The tension between the patients and the staff gets more and more notable and grows throughout the movie, which eventually leads to a \'wonderful\' ending which I\'m not going to spoil.\n\nYes, Jack Nicholson is truly splendid in his role and it seemed like he was improvising all his lines and actions during the entire movie. It was a really Oscar worthy performances, which he also received. Another Oscar winner for her performance was Louise Fletcher, which in my opinion is a bit too much credit. She plays her role well but nothing more than that. She did not deeply impressed me or anything. This movie also marks the debut for some today well known actors such as Danny DeVito (he looked so young and different!), Christopher Lloyd and Brad Dourif, who also received an Oscar nomination.\n\nReally one of those movies that you must have seen at least once in your life.\n\n9/10\n\nhttp://bobafett1138.blogspot.com/', u'0.016622', u'This is undeniably one of the best films ever made in the history of movie making.. In 1975, "One Flew Over The Cuckoo\'s Nest" swept all four major academy awards... Best Actor (Jack Nicholson) Best Actress (Louise Fletcher) Best Direstor (Milos Foreman) and, of course, Best Picture!! Only on very rare occasion does this occur... Only a handful of films may lay claim to such an honor!! "One Flew Over The Cuckoo\'s Nest" is a stunning portrayal of mental illness, and how even the most affluent nation on earth (The U.S.A.) is totally unequipped to deal with it properly!! Jack Nicholson\'s performance in this movie is one of the greatest performances ever by an actor... The array of all the psychologically debilitating diseases was itemized to a flawless state of depressing realism.. The emotional explanations for the dysfunctional dispositions with everyone in "One Flew Over The Cuckoo\'s Nest" were so astutely broken down that it evoked a concise indication that not just any producers, directors, actors or actresses could partake in this film!! Such a depiction upholds the proverbial contention that if you are not mentally disturbed when you go into the "Booby Hatch" you will be when you get out of it!! In the case of Jack Nicholson\'s character, he seemed relatively non-culpable for any intense psychiatric affliction, it was a matter of slight discrepancies!! It is as if he was severely punished for not finishing his cereal at breakfast time!! The talent in this movie is incredible.. I liked the television show "Taxi" and it stands to reason why... So many of the actors who starred in "One Flew Over The Cuckoo\'s Nest" were in the T.V. Show "Taxi" too!! The gripping conversation which dealt with a man who was impotent was perhaps the single most poignant part of this film!! The line I remember in particular was "Do me a favor and don\'t be on my side, okay"... In the "normal" world, the average person is burdened in his ability to communicate with someone else due to a conflict of interests!! In the case of a poorly funded mental health facility, this apocalyptic predicament manifests itself horrendously, and thus has an intolerable proliferation!! Authorities in the mental hospital are restricted by a serious lack of funding, so they are quick to generalize!! The overall situation which garners societal sympathy at a mental health facility is categorized as "sad" and platitudes such as "we will do all we can" are everybody\'s precarious form of consolation!!! Mental illness gets a generic label, and, from there, becomes something which is basically swept under the rug!! Here is where the film "One Flew Over The Cuckoo\'s Nest" expounds on their abysmal dissertation concerning mental illness!!\n\n"One Flew Over The Cuckoo\'s Nest" was based on a true story!! Mr McMurphy (Jack Nicholson) was a lone rebel from start to finish with this film!! Whatever the orderlies or the nurses would say, he would disagree with!! It was always an issue that could not be looked at rationally by one patient or the other that compounded the dilemma of mental anguish... Such a plight became the culprit to a lack of thorough communication, and thus invoked an overreaction from the administration of the hospital!! You are branded mentally ill and that is all anyone has to know!! The total lack of egalitarian commiseration with administration was why McMurphy was so belligerent!! The status quo was to subject patients to grave consequences for their actions... Are the nurses and administrators wrong for doing this? Usually not!! It was the gray matter in this film that made it so intellectually riveting!! Mental health patients are often times aware of the fact that they are vilified in the same manner you would a bunch of seven year old kids for not doing their school work!! Their self respect gets relegated to a bureaucratic mandate, and all of this is subconsciously and consciously demoralizing!! If someone were to have a conversation with Charles Manson, they would realize so many depraved patterns of illogical behavior to him, however, if Charles Manson were to say that two plus two equals four, the correct answer does not get changed to five!! What is the point of this example? Mental health patients are not inaccurate in every assessment that they make, just because they are labeled mentally challenged!! What was Mr McMurphy\'s contention with so many issues is that he would assume a premise of mutual self respect when engaging in an argument with an orderly... This is not a case of defiance, rather an instance of a one on one debate... How quickly the administration would then resort to the cop out of "Well!!" "What do you expect!!" "This guy is mentally ill"\n\nI have never seen a film like this one!! "Woman Under The Influence" which was made around the same time was incredibly spellbinding as well... "One Flew Over The Cuckoo\'s Nest" however, is something which should be put in a category all by itself!! Director, Milos Foreman articulates cerebral despondence to a state of dissonant plausibility with this film!! This becomes an avenue for political debate... Foreman\'s movie breaks ground on mental illness being one big cacophony of our nation\'s failure to communicate!! Louise Fletcher is tremendous as Nurse Ratched, her dedication to the tenets of disciplinary policy became vicariously ruthless, her devotion to this standard was extremely deep rooted!! Nurse Ratched\'s insolence was an aspect of infuriation that was in of itself amazingly thought provoking!! As I have previously mentioned, Jack Nicholson was excellent as McMurphy, the mental health patient who reoriented the ideology of what it means to deal with mental illness... Tremendous film, maybe the best American film ever made... Do you think that sounds strong? Watch the movie first and then tell me I am exaggerating!! REMARKABLE!! UTTERLY REMARKABLE!!', u'-0.0787654', u'\'One Flew Over the Cuckoo\'s Nest\' (1975), based on the novel by Ken Kesey and directed by Milos Forman, centers around R.P McMurphy (Jack Nicholson) a prisoner serving time for the statutory rape of a 15 year old, among other things. In an attempt to escape from the work yards in the penitentiary, McMurphy fakes a mental illness, leading to him being admitted into a mental hospital. There, he befriends many of the other patients in the ward and attempts to break them out of the strict and monotonous routine set by Head Nurse Ratched (Louise Fletcher).\n\nOK, first of all, it has to be said, I had quite high expectations for this movie. It came highly recommend by both my parents, is number 8 on IMDb\'s Top 250 list, and won the grand slam at the 1975 Oscars (Best Picture, Director, Actor and Actress). However, I was left extremely disappointed with this film.\n\nWhile the first 20 minutes seem promising, showcasing Nicholsons immense talent, the film drags for the next hour, trying to convince you to love McMurphy and loathe Nurse Ratchet, unsuccessfully, I will add. Which brings me to my first and largest problem with this film. On the back of my DVD case it states that "\x85Nurse Ratchet is among the coldly monstrous villains in film history". Based upon that assessment, I expected numerous unnecessary, unethical punishments, and a complete lack of care for her patients. Well I did not receive that, no instead we got a firm, cold, woman that takes charge of her ward, filled with mentally unstable and perhaps dangerous people, with an iron fist, being nothing but a true reflection of the mental health system at the time. That being said, I am not in anyway completely condoning her behavior. She is far too cold to be an effective nurse and her use of manipulation would not be accepted in today\'s society. However to asses her as being the one of most wicked, evil, heartless is completely and utter over exaggeration and unfortunately paints the film in a \'State vs Rebel\' way.\n\nWhich leads also to my other major problem with this film. McMurphy, is not likable. At least not to me. He is an arrogant, self-centered \'rebel\', who has made the rather laughable decision to get himself committed to this mental hospital as he is tired of the prison work yard. But no, we are supposed to cheer him on in his attempts to rid the ward of rules and boundaries, in other words, \'fight the system\'. Perhaps it was \'in\' to rebel against the state in the 70\'s? To me this film reeked of this ideology, spoiling much of it.\n\nThere are certainly positives to \'One Flew Over\x85\' and I can understand on one level why is rated so highly by many critics and audiences. It is well directed, the acting by the two leads, regardless of my objection of the use of their characters, is extremely well done but I do not believe it to be Nicholsons best work, as many praise it to be. There are genuine funny moments to be had and a certain scene revolving around cigarettes is the perfect example of acting at its best. The last 20 minutes is also very well executed and left me somewhat vindicated.\n\nOverall however, the particular framing of the 2 leads left me simply annoyed with this film and as such, I was left underwhelmed.', u'-0.276418', u'Not many movies have won the "big five" in the academy awards. It\'s enough to win just best picture for a lot of movies. This movie portrays every film element to the highest degree, from the beautiful panoramic shots of the mountains outside of the mental institution to the story of ultimate redemption McMurphy and Chief find at the end.\n\nThe movie is seen through the eyes of Randle McMurphy (Nicholson). He is sent to the mental institution because he would rather be considered "insane" and live in "luxury" other than being a jailbird in prison. Once he gets into the actual living area where the insane are, he looks up at this tall, native looking man they call "Chief". McMurphy\'s initial reaction to Chief was his little Indian dance he did to mock him, but once Chief didn\'t react McMurphy asked him if he played football and says to chief, "God damn, boy, you\'re as big as a mountain." Little by little, you could see their friendship start to unfold out throughout the movie.\n\nIn One Flew Over the Cuckoo\'s Nest, the title "villain" would definitely belong to Nurse Ratched. She gave threats to the patients, she was even friends with one of the patient\'s (Billy) mom. She also tries to toy with McMurphy\'s mind by trying to get him to conform with the customs of mental facility. It doesn\'t work out for her as planned. Including a classic scene where Nurse Ratched\'s threats cause little Billy to commit suicide. In rage, McMurphy has seen enough and actually chokes her out. This causes McMurphy to go through a lobotomy and become a vegetable at his stay at the clinic.\n\nI know many people probably disagree with this but, I think Chief killing McMurphy at the end was beautiful as much as it was heartbreaking. It symbolized that McMurphy, still had a chance to redeem himself and become a hero, even if it were death. It also gave Chief clearance to finally "escape" the premises and "fly from the cuckoo\'s nest", and how he did it at the end was classic. That\'s what makes this movie one of the greatest of all time, not only because of the sensational acting and the sociological significance, but because of the message and symbolism of the story.\n\nThe directing by Milos Foreman was phenomenal, not only with the memorable acting by Jack Nicholson, but with the camera shots he used in certain scenes. For example, the scene before McMurphy was about to get electro-shock therapy they show a very close up angle of him to show the intensity and crowdedness he had to go through while getting the shock treatment. Nicholson also makes it pretty believable that he is actually getting shocked, by making "gurgling" noises and such.\n\nThey actually go back to the "lying down" closed angle shot at the end of the movie when Nicholson passes away. I thought it was very brave of the director to keep that long shot of McMurphy\'s dead self, because by making it last as though it were a still shot, to me it seemed more and more believable that McMurphy was actually dead. I don\'t know how Nicholson just lied there stiff as a board. I know he may have won his Oscar because of his heroic and charismatic character, but how he dealt with himself in those two scenes is what tickles my fancy.\n\nThe ideology of this film is, in my opinion, what makes it one of the greatest of all time. The story brings up the question of who\'s actually the insane; McMurphy and his patients, or Nurse Ratched and the staff? Clinically, McMurphy was not insane. Even the doctors and professors stated that, but since he didn\'t follow the norms and the dictatorship of Nurse Ratched, he had to stay at the sanitarium longer. I also loved the allusion of Chief, by acting deaf and dumb. He played the omniscient or "god-like" role of hearing and seeing everything, yet not saying anything himself. It almost seems as he was the narrating the story until he befriended McMurphy.\n\nI don\'t know if I could think of a more evil villain in a movie other than Nurse Ratched (Louise Fletcher). The evil looks she gave to her patients when they were doing something wrong was as cold-hearted as one could get. Also her audacity to tell Billy\'s mother about his sexual deviance is as sinister as you can get. She knew that it would hurt Billy deeply, which was a major reason he was "insane" is because of his relationship with his mother. He eventually killed himself, angering McMurphy.\n\nI never thought I would cheer out loud when a grown man was choking out a little woman, but I did here. This scene did a fantastic job of not making it taboo, but making you want her dead even more. This did change Nurse Ratched however, it made her a little nicer to the patients at the end and made her realize that if she abuses her power as a nurse, it can come back to haunt her.\n\nThe meaning of this story is wonderful and helped Jack Nicholson set the bar for acting. The symbolism of Chief\'s and McMurphy\'s redemption serves as a corner stone for many many movies today. Whether it be the costumes of the patients, the crazy acting, or even the beautiful classic shot at the end of the movie where Chief runs out to freedom; This movie will never be forgotten. And it serves as a good lesson for everyone out there who feels left out can all come together and get freedom. I advise anybody who says they love movies to watch this film, because it will not only change your views, it will change your life and you can\'t say that about a lot of movies.', u'-0.155003', u'I cannot overrate this movie. I watched it last night so I\'m writing this review with it still fresh in mind. I had high expectations knowing all the rewards that rained down on it, but the film and Jack Nicholson\'s performance in particular still managed to surprise me.\n\nR.P. McMurphy (Jack Nicholson) is transferred to a mental institution for evaluation after given a short sentence on a prison farm for statutory rape charges. He tries to make the most of his suspected short stay in the hospital and challenges the head nurse (Louise Fletcher) at every chance he gets.\n\nAnthony Hopkins has done a great intelligent psychopath, but no one does crazy better than Nicholson. I loved his performance in "The Shining" and am ashamed to say I have yet to see "As Good as it Gets" (one of three movies he won best actor Oscars for). He delivered an average performance in "The Departed" and isn\'t getting any younger, but I do hope he gives us at least one more role that comes close to the show he put on in Cuckoo\'s Nest. Watching his interaction with the other patients made me believe on some occasions I was seeing a comedy, but the movie quickly reminds us it can be just as depressing as it is funny.\n\nIt\'s hard to find fault with "One Flew Over the Cuckoo\'s Nest". Louise Fletcher did a great job as the leading actress and strong performances by all the supporting characters made the movie brilliant. Good screenplay, good directing and the music by Jack Nitzsche played nicely with the film.\n\nI\'ve seen some hate about the ending, but in my opinion it couldn\'t have been better. McMurthy could have jump out of the window when he had the chance and I think most of us were rooting for him to do so, but what he does next shows the strong bond formed with his odd friends inside the hospital.\n\nThe movie left me emotionally blank for a while and then I just felt sad. I\'m not going to drop any major spoilers on this site as I know some of you still haven\'t seen it, but it\'s one of the few movies that have truly left me staring at the end credits in awe.\n\nConclusion:\n\nIt ranks as one of the best in my book alongside "The Shawshank Redemption" and "Pulp Fiction". See this movie with the highest expectations and chances are it will surpass them!\n\n250moviereviews.wordpress.com', u'0.178261', u"It took a dozen years for One Flew Over The Cuckoo's Nest to make it to the big screen from Broadway. In 1962 Kirk Douglas made his one and only return to Broadway to star as Randall P. McMurphy on stage with Joan Tetzel as his nemesis, nurse Ratched. Douglas bought the screen rights, but by the time anyone was interested in doing the film version, Kirk was too old for the part.\n\nThat may have been a break for the movie fans because as much as I like Kirk Douglas, I can't see anyone but Jack Nicholson doing this role as the free spirited McMurphy. McMurphy's a low level career criminal type who statutorily raped a girl as he put it '15 going on 35'. He decides to fake a crazy act while in prison to get out of the work farm he's assigned to.\n\nSo Nicholson's goes to the mental hospital where he meets an odd assortment of people whom he discovers voluntarily checked themselves in there, mainly because it's easier to stay there and not take all your psychological baggage into society. That's a crucial difference that Nicholson finds out the hard way, his new friends most of them can pack up and leave anytime they want. He's sent there by the state and the state determines when he's ready to go even if it's past the allotted jail time he was sentenced to.\n\nThe state in this case is Louise Fletcher as Nurse Ratched, one of the great Dickensian names ever given a movie character. Louise is the ultimate control freak and these people who've shut themselves away from life are her ultimate tools. When Nicholson comes in, he hasn't given up on life like the rest of these poor souls, he becomes a threat to Fletcher's little empire.\n\nIt's hard to believe that such a smart guy like McMurphy would not have known the rules about commitment. Still it doesn't detract a bit from the overall quality of One Flew Over The Cuckoo's Nest.\n\nThough the topic is not a fixed one to any era, the script does leave many oblique references to the Sixties in the film. The electroshock treatment and the lobotomy operations depicted here were by 1975 no longer in use. They were pretty barbaric and the mental health profession discarded these, but not before too many lives were shattered with them. \n\nOne Flew Over The Cuckoo's Nest swept the main Oscar categories, it won for Best Picture, Best Director for Milos Forman, Best Actor for Jack Nicholson, Best Actress for Louise Fletcher and Best Adapted Screenplay to Lawrence Hauban and Bo Goldman. Brad Dourif was nominated for Best Supporting Actor, but he lost to George Burns in The Sunshine Boys.\n\nLouise Fletcher never got the career mileage she should have for playing Nurse Ratched. It took her years, but she did get another career role in television as the ruler of Bejor, Kai Winn on Star Trek Deep Space Nine.\n\nOne Flew Over The Cuckoo's Nest is one timeless classic, it will be popular a millenia from now.", u'-0.108615'], u'tt0209144': [u"\nThank Goodness I didn't read the reviews posted before I saw the film!! Most reviews (including ones on this site) will tell you waaayyyy too much about the movie, and that's just plain frustrating.  But, as an avid cinephile, I promise not to do the same.\n\nMemento is one of those pictures that will have you sitting in the theater after the lights come up so you can talk to everyone else about what they thought of the movie.  This is a highly intelligent and original brain teaser that will have you guessing from beginning to end, and even afterwards.  The story and the direction are the best I've seen so far this year, and it deserves all the kudos it gets.\n\nPlainly put, the film tells the story of Leonard Shelby:  a man who lost his short term memory in an assault where his wife was raped and murdered;  now he's looking for the killer, despite his handicap.  Simple as that.  You don't need to know anymore.\n\nThe film is constructed and told in such a way that you are constantly put into the shoes of Leonard Shelby, beautifully played by Guy Pierce. Carrie-Ann Moss gives an equally mysterious and complex performance.  This film is well-made all the way around--from the direction, to the editing, and especially the unique story that is rarely found in Hollywood these days.  Four Stars!\n\nThis review may have been a little dry on the details, but go see the movie--you'll be thanking me later.\n\nPS: Only go to the official website AFTER you've seen the movie.  It too will give too much away.  Afterwards, though, go and look at it--it's pretty impressive.\n\n", u'0.324553', u'If you\'re looking for something intense, suspenseful, and different than your usual effects-packed thriller, this is the best movie you will see all year. You will be talking about Memento at work, at the grocery store (to total strangers!), and you will find yourself joining conversations when you hear the word "Memento." That\'s why this little film that received almost no marketing stayed in theaters for months and was in the top 10 money makers for several weeks.\n\nThe movie starts with a murder -- a revenge killing, in fact. But was the right person killed?\n\nLeonard Shelby (Guy Pearce) is a man with no short-term memory. He hasn\'t been able to form new memories since the night his wife was murdered. Now he\'s on a hunt to find the murderer but with no way of remembering names, dates, places, facts and faces. Instead he tattoos himself with mementos of his search. When someone knows his name, he checks Polaroids to see if he knows them. Does he like this person? Does he trust this person? Is this the killer? He doesn\'t know unless he\'s scribbled a note.\n\nDon\'t worry about trying to empathize with Leonard because Writer/Director Christopher Nolan puts you right in Leonard\'s shoes. You live the story in reverse order so that you never know more than Leonard does. In one scene you see Leonard getting information from a person who knows him -- maybe a good person; maybe bad. In the next scene you see a previous meeting between the two which sheds more light on their relationship. Later still you see how they met. But is that all of the story? You\'ve yet to find out... and you won\'t know everything until the last scene. By living it backwards, you, like Leonard, have no knowledge of what came before.\n\nIt\'s brilliant story telling. But you might get frustrated because you don\'t know what\'s going on. That\'s normal. In fact, that\'s the whole idea. Just sit back, try to relax (though that\'s difficult in this movie), and find out just how twisted and complex Leonard\'s world is.\n\nThis film will leave its own memento on your mind, and you\'ll have a hard time forgetting how much you enjoyed it.', u'0.047831', u'\nChristopher Nolan\'s "Memento" is truly a rare and exceptional achievement in modern filmmaking in that it manages to be new, fresh, hip, and exciting without ever tiring its audience out - unless you\'re walking into this film without the desire to participate and actively analyze the mysterious details.\n\nIf that\'s the case, then this is DEFINITELY not a movie you should see. If, on the other hand, you are open-minded, creative, and alert, you\'ll definitely appreciate and get a kick out of this one. "Memento" is an old-fashioned "film noir"-type mystery thriller with an intriguing, ingenious twist: outfitting the entire film with a style that mirrors the protagonist\'s own mental condition while giving the poor viewer(s) his own perspective as well. It is masterfully filmed and edited in such a way that it is chronologically presented backwards (with two initially separate, parallel storylines - the main one, shot in colour, is the chronologically-backwards story with scenes that intercut with those of the other story, which is filmed more like a documentary, shot in black & white, and mostly takes place inside a motel room with the main character narrating, talking about the effects of his condition, etc.) While the average viewer may already be put off by such a complicated, confusing format, it is a very original premise that is well worth the struggle to figure out.\n\nActing is solid across the board, as is the writing, directing, etc., but special kudos must be extended to the very talented editor Dody Dorn, who successfully managed to put all of these fragments together and help them flow in a smooth, healthy manner that is not easy to pull off.\n\nOne of the most "memorable" (sorry, couldn\'t help slipping in the bad joke) films you\'re likely to ever see, "Memento" is an instant classic due to its groundbreaking narrative style and impressive dramatic undertones. For those jaded moviegoers who seek something to keep them awake, interested, and constantly thinking, there couldn\'t be a better choice than this film.\n\n', u'0.684698', u'\nSo the "innovative" concept of filming out of sequence has been cliche for at least a few years now, but here\'s a film that makes it work far better than its been shown in a while.\n\nHaving read the reviews and talked to others who saw it, I thought that I\'d go into the movie figuring everything out right away and declaring the concept unworkable.  I couldn\'t be further from the truth.  This movie does things to your head that are illegal in some countries.  Portrayed (for all intents and purposes) backwards, it forces you to think in the same way that our lead character, Leonard Shelby (Guy Pearce being more brilliant than usual) does.  Suffering from a condition that renders him unable to remember anything for more than a few minutes, he is searching for the man who raped and killed his wife.  Since each seen lasts no more than 15 minutes before jumping back to the what happened before that, our perceptions are shattered in the same way.\n\nCarrie-Anne Moss and Joe Pantoliano (both of The Matrix) put in great performances that leave you guessing; simultaneously endearing and revolting.\n\nOverall I left the film trying to figure out what was what, and I\'m still not sure.  This film noir concept shouldn\'t work, but it does so wonderfully.', u'-0.0737055', u"\nA man with no short term memory tries to solve a murder.  The scenes in the movie are played in reverse.  Sounds like yet another run of the mill comedy but in reality is one of the best suspense/dramas I've seen in years.\n\nWhile some may claim showing the scenes in reverse is just an annoying trick to make a simple plot confusing and add a plethora of twists, I wholeheartedly disagree.  Any good story teller knows it's not what you say, but how you say it.\n\nBy playing the scenes in reverse you experience the confusion Lenny undergoes throughout the film.  Showing some of the scenes in chronological order (BTW, the use of B&W instead of color to make the time distinction was ingenious) creates suspense which builds as the two timelines converge.  The somewhat rushed pace (compared to a written format) doesn't give you enough time to adequately analyze the events during the movie.  This has two advantages: firstly you're going to talk about it after you leave the theater adding to experience immensely,   and secondly  you don't have time to think about what has happened (will happen) so you're experience better follows that of Lenny.\n\nWhile many might find the movie rather confusing, it flows wonderfully for anyone familiar with writing styles that constantly jump around a timeline (e.g. Catch 22).", u'-0.124373', u"\nIf I told you the entire plot of this film it really wouldn't matter as it is an exquisite paean to the subjectivity of memory and therefore is in itself ambiguous; the \x91truth' of it is up to you. You come out of the cinema questioning yourself, your memories, your truths. Nothing in this film is as it seems, and yet paradoxically everything is as it seems. We see everything through Guy Pearce's characters' (Lenny) eyes, unfortunately he has no short-term memory so cannot form new memories. He would have already forgotten the first sentence of this review. He lives in snapshots of life; his only form of memory is his Polaroid camera, just like in the excellent German film Wintersleepers; also (partly) about a short-term memory disorder.\n\nIn this film Lenny takes snapshots to remember who people are, where he now lives, his car, everything. As you can imagine this is perfect for paranoia, suspicion, uncertainty, confusion, and betrayal. And that's exactly what you get in extreme doses. The difference between this film and Wintersleepers however is that Memento is entirely from Lenny's perspective. This therefore creates an imaginative, creatively unsurpassable film. The film begins where it should end, so far so trite, but here's the beauty, we, like Guy Pearce, learn in fragments what's going on. It is therefore perfect for those who love to second guess what's going to happen, who did what, who's doing what and why. The beauty of this film though is that my interpretation could be so different from yours, and neither of us could be sure whose interpretation is the right one; if there is a right one at all. Nothing is certain, nothing is clear. Another beauty of this film is the way it is filmed and edited. Pieces are shown a number of times with no real linear link between them, just like it would be if we ourselves had a memory disorder, and then they are cut up and edited next to things that happen either before or after it. It's just like holding ten different and linearly distinct Polaroids in your hand and having a short-term memory disorder. Excellent.\n\nI'm not even sure if watching it again will make things any less ambiguous, but then who cares? The ambiguity is what makes this a great film, if it wasn't so cut up, or from Lenny's perspective it would be both very short and trite; and lacking in tension, suspense and interest. But as it stands it has all three, isn't trite and says so much about humanity. Oh, and the plot? It really doesn't matter, all you need to know is that everything about this film is indicative of the subjectivity of memory, of our experiences and interpretations of all that happens to us. Nothing will seem as black and white as it did beforehand. It will make you question every memory you have, almost as much as possessing a psychology degree, as I do! So, go and see it: be confused, acknowledge the frailty of all you know to be true, and then imagine the freedom of actually being Lenny, and then the horror of having nothing, nothing but the reliance of a pen and a Polaroid camera to know who you are.\n", u'0.10377', u'\nIf you hate reality-based film-making this is awful. If you hate Film Noir, this is ugly. But for me, Nolan has convinced me he is one of the most important directors out there. I was even thinking, "It must be easy to edit a movie so that it\'s all backwards." But it\'s not, it\'s not any easier - and he leaves you straining and watching from scene to scene, searching for the truth. Even the final revelation will affect each viewer and leaves them searching for their own "ultimate truth" according to their own experience.\n\nMost people comment about manipulation in connection with this movie, but after watching the last scene, I\'m convinced that manipulation is not the main theme at all. I don\'t want to spoil it for you, but the basis of unfolding backwards in time is that you are enlisted to scrutinize the film trying to discover some set of motivations behind each character\'s actions later in time that makes sense. If you think you would enjoy this sort of puzzle, I think you will enjoy this excellently crafted film.', u'-0.194087', u"\nYes, it's true.  The entire movie is based on a gimmick.  However, I honestly feel that this does not cheapen the picture in the slightest bit. I loved every scene; discovering information as our lead character discovered it. It demands a second and third viewing, as there are many subtleties and quick flashes that may not be picked up on the first time around.  Its one of the most original films ever made, and for people who scoff at the concept of not having a short-term memory, it actually is a real condition. Watch this movie. And, please pay attention. The performances are wonderful, and its structured magnificently.\n", u'0.293671', u'\nIncredible, riveting and powerful.  What else could I say?  This movie has all of the qualities of classic film noir as well as the magnitude of an original, unique concept that has been tried and tired before but works here.  \n\nGuy Pearce has been underrated for years (just think back now to Priscilla and can you believe this is the same guy) and finally might get the recognition here that was at least well-deserved of him back for LA Confidential.  Powerful perfomances, well developed story with suspensful buildup of what our main character pieces together little by little makes this a must see.\n\nEasily in my top 100 of all time.', u'0.33983', u'\nMEMENTO / (2001) ***1/2 (out of four)\n\nBy Blake French:\n\n\tHow is this for a scenario? A man breaks into your house in the middle of the night. He kills your wife and leaves you with brain injuries. Furious, you pledge your life to track down and kill whoever is responsible. There is just one problem: after the head injury, you are no longer capable of creating new memories; everything before the accident is crystal clear, but now you cannot remember anything past several minutes.\n\n\tNow chew on this: what happens to guilt if you cannot remember what you did? How can a person have emotions if he does not know where they came from? How can we learn from our experiences if we cannot remember them. What is the purpose of revenge if someone cannot recollect or prosper from it?\n\n\n\t"Memento" wins this year\'s prize for inducing the most audience participation. Not only is the film thought-provoking and unusually absorbing, but it also places us in the main character\'s shoes. How can we be in the same mental status with the main character when he cannot remember anything? Writer/director Christopher Nolan has that answer: he tells the story backwards. We begin at the end and work our way towards the beginning. However, each individual scene plays running forward, often overlapping, providing us with clear, constructive transitions. The main character, Leonard, is confused in prospects of time and experience, and so are we.\n\n\tOther characters include Natalie (Carrie-Anne Moss, from "The Matrix"), who also lost someone close and can help Leonard, and Teddy (Joe Pantoliano, also from "The Matrix"), whose identity often shifts mysteriously. Then there is the series of flashbacks of Leonard\'s experiences while working as an insurance agent. The situation involves an individual named Sammy, who has a memory disorder similar to Leonard\'s. His diabetic spouse is not sure whether her husband is faking his condition or not. To prove it to herself she arranges a test I dare not reveal. Leonard is more intricately involved in this story than he even believes.  \n\n\t"Memento" is smart and imaginative. It doesn\'t pass up little details of the characters. Leonard is constantly jotting himself notes and taking Polaroid pictures so his life can make some sense. He even gets permanent tattoos all over his body so he does not lose or forget some of the most important information. \n\nIn a movie like this, it would be almost impossible to make without leaving some information out; even some of the film\'s actors were confused and requested a script told in sequence order. But these filmmakers have constructed a movie with a plot hole big enough to drive a semi through: If Leonard cannot remember anything after the accident, then how can he remember that he has a memory condition? There are no tattoos or notes to remind him, and whenever he meets someone he explains his condition thoroughly. This is necessary information he reveals, but there are better ways to do so. We could be there when his doctor explains the condition to him, or see his friends talking about it. The sky is the limit in a movie like this. It was not essential to leave such a massive, obvious hole in the plot. \n\n"Memento" is still a unique mystery thriller. It is a tantalizing experience we do not often come across at the movies. For audiences who like to sit back and relax, this film is a waste of time. It requires us to follow along, participate, fit puzzle pieces together-"Memento" doesn\'t provide any easy or obvious answers. All but the most intelligent and thoughtful kids will not be able to follow this film; it is intended for adult audiences. "Memento" is one of the year\'s most challenging movies, not to be missed if you are looking for something clever and original. \n', u'-0.0265105', u'\nLosing your memory would have to go close to one of the worst experience anyone could ever suffer from. In the movie \x91Memento\', we get to see how bad it is to suffer from short term memory loss. It also gives us the chance to see how far a patient of such a disease will go to remember what is most important to him. In the vain of \x91Pulp Fiction\', Memento is a movie that has to be seen to be believed. It is no wonder that this movie is so popular with the movie going public around the world. \n\nLeonard Shelby wears expensive, tailored suits, drives a late model Jaguar sedan, but lives in cheap, anonymous motels, paying his way with thick wads of cash. Although he looks like a successful businessman, his only work is the pursuit of vengeance: tracking and punishing the man who raped and murdered his wife. The difficulty of locating his wife\'s killer is compounded by the fact that Leonard suffers from a rare, untreatable form of \x91amnesia\'. Although he can recall details of life before his \x91accident\' Leonard cannot remember what happened fifteen minutes ago, where he is, where he is going, or why.\n\nChristopher Nolan has made one great (but confusing) movie. His style in directing and editing \x91Memento\' is quite unique, as no movie has ever been made quite like it before. The story being told in a backward kind of motion makes the audience have to think hard about what they are watching. It also makes the audience feel for a guy like Leonard, whose condition only gets worse and worse as the movie goes on. I am almost 100% sure that Nolan and his brother Jonathan, made up this story in the realisation that it was meant to be confusing. What is also cleverly done by Nolan is the use of black and white and then colour shots. In my opinion, the variations in these shots are used so it confuses the audience even more. \n\n\nGuy Pearce\'s role in \x91Memento\' shows me why he is so successful in Hollywood today. Pearce plays Leonard Shelby, a man on the hunt for his wife\'s killer. The only problem is that Shelby is suffering from \x91anterior-grade amnesia\', a disease that cannot be treated. With \x91Lenny\', I feel the audience suffers partly the same condition as he does, and partly does not, as we can remember what has happened in the present. \n\nMemento\'s other main stars include corrupt cop \x91Teddy\' (Joe Pantoliano). A friend said of Pantoliano\'s performance in Memento, \x91he was perfect for the role of \x91Teddy\', as he comes across as the mysterious bad guy\'. I could not agree more. There is also the character of Natalie (Carrie-Anne Moss) who is a lot like Teddy in her own way. What is similar about these characters is the way they use Leonard\'s condition to advantage their own situations.\n\n\nOther characters include Sammy Jenkis (Stephen Tobolowsky), who is a victim we learn about from an old case when Leonard Shelby was an insurance investigator. There is Leonard\'s wife, Catherine (C.S.I.\'s Jorja Fox) who is another fascinating character. Although we do not hear her say much, she is a vital part of this most confusing story. Add in the funny role of Burt (Mark Boone Jnr.), the motel clerk, who openly admits to Lenny that he is ripping him off, by giving him two rooms, but that he will not remember it happening anyway.\n\nYet in no way do any of the characters in \x91Memento\' realise they are in a time reversed movie. I am sure that many of the performers would have had to read their scripts many times to understand what was happening from a cinematic point of view. But from an acting prospective, this would have been an easy experience to be part of. Memento also has some interesting devices to tell the story. The way Leonard tries to remember things in the present and the future, via notes tattoos and photographs, making them an important element within the movie. Without them, our hero would not be able to remember anything. \n\nNonetheless, memory is the most vital element in this movie, because without it, people are confused, isolated and abused, which is what happens to our \x91hero\', Leonard.  As Lenny mentions early on in the film, "Memory\'s unreliable ... Memory\'s not perfect. It\'s not even that good. Ask the police; eyewitness testimony is unreliable ... Memory can change the shape of a room or the colour of a car. It\'s an interpretation, not a record. Memories can be changed or distorted, and they\'re irrelevant if you have the facts."  But it has to be ironic that Leonard is the one who narrates \x91Memento\', when his recollections and memories of events are inaccurate and jaded. There are also some powerful scenes in \x91Memento\'. The one \x91which sticks in my mind the most\' has to be where Natalie abuses Leonard, calling his dead wife a \x91whore\', snorting smartly \x91that you won\'t be even able to remember what I have said\'.  \n\nSo, if you watch this movie and it confuses you the first or even the second time, I can assure you that is how you are meant to feel, confused. If you hated watching \x91Memento\' the way Christopher Nolan intended, then I can only recommend that you get a hold of the DVD and watch it in chronological order, as it will really help you. Memento also shows how bad \x91mental disease\' patients can be abused by healthy people and what lengths sick patients will go to try and keep \x91sane\'. Also, if a movie makes you think, then in some way it has been successful in doing something that many movies do not do \x96 making you think. Those sorts of cinematic experiences are the ones that we need to cherish for life, as they are few and far between. Memento is one such experience. \n\nCMRS gives \x91Memento\': 5 (Brilliant Movie)\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n', u'-0.253264', u'\nFACT ONE: "Just because there are things I don\'t remember doesn\'t make my actions meaningless."\n\nFACT TWO: "Your notes could be unreliable."\n\nFACT THREE: "Memories can be distorted."\n\nFACT FOUR: "But, even if you get your revenge, you won\'t remember it.  You won\'t even know it\'s happened."\n\nFACT FIVE: "I want time to pass, but it won\'t. How can I heal if I can\'t feel time?"\n\nFACT SIX: "We all need mirrors to remind ourselves who we are."\n\nWhen life becomes incomprehensible human beings tend to simplify things, revise memories, select facts that may or may not be representative of "the truth."  We strive to make events as intelligible as possible but that act often has unintended consequences.  Now, if you can capture this existential human reality on film in such a way as to allow the viewer to experience this struggle for understanding, for the placement of private aspirations into the context of the moment even as the primary character makes this same struggle, then you have connected our hearts and minds seamlessly with the film\'s lifeworld.  That is a rarity indeed.\n\nSuch is Memento, a brilliantly conceived and executed work of art that has its audience literally at their wits end (just like the film\'s main character) trying to understand it all.  The great debate of whether Teddy\'s version of the truth at the end is really "the truth" is symptomatic of director Christopher Nolan\'s purposeful craftsmanship.  The very fact that we are as uncertain throughout most of the film as to the context of Leonard Shelby\'s actions as Leonard himself signifies that Nolan has succeeded in not just telling us Leonard\'s story put allowing us to know what it is like to *be* Leonard.  This allows the film to work at a much deeper, almost subconscious, level scarcely achieved on film.\n\nGuy Pierce, Carrie-Anne Moss and Joe Pantoliano all deliver terrific performances with some of the most original material I\'ve seen in years.  This film grabs your brain and won\'t let go.  It twists and turns and \x96 just when you think you\'ve got things figured out \x96 Nolan whips the rug out from under your feet.  You are left totally involved and struggling with creating some sense of closure out of the infinite loop of the film\'s structure.\n\nYou can debate endlessly whether Teddy\'s final summary of events is the truth.  You can argue both sides of whether Leonard killed his wife or invented Sammy Jankis out of thin air.  In the end these are open questions.  In the end there are no definitive answers.  In fact, in the end ANY answer is plausible, just choose the one that sits best in your mind.  Make that the truth.  Because THAT is what this film is all about.  It\'s about a man who can remember who he is but not what he has done and, to that extend, it is the prefect postmodern critique.  We are often forced to act without sufficient information.  The accelerating rush of our lives sends us headlong into our present without full consideration of where we\'ve been.  And on that level Memento provides a bold, compelling narrative that connects Leonard with every person.  It is the mirror image of our divided selves.\n\nNo matter how much his audience might disagree with the film\'s conclusion, Nolan understands that - in the end - truth doesn\'t matter.  It is what we choose to do with what we think is the truth that\'s important.  And that can mean anything at all.\n', u'0.0784488', u'\nI saw "Memento" in the early afternoon, a fact for which I am thankful.  Why?  Because it then proceeded to dominate the majority of my thoughts for the rest of the day.  That night I lay in bed, tossing and turning, my mind trying to wrap itself around the story, and I absolutely could not GO TO SLEEP!  \n\nI finally just gave up on sleep, got up around midnight, and watched "Election" to cleanse my palate.  Then I went back to bed and starting contemplating "Memento" AGAIN.  Finally, out of sheer exhaustion, I went to sleep.\n\nThis is a movie that gets in your head and will not get out until you figure it all out.  And that can only be done with extensive internet research.  Reading "Memento Mori", the short story upon which the movie is "based" helped, too.\n\n"Memento" is nothing short of a phenomenon.  And a brilliant one at that.', u'-0.065115', u"Revising such film noir conventions as a story told through the unreliable point of view and voice-over narration of a morally flawed investigator-protagonist, the pervasive infusion of a dark past into the narrative present, and the use of a femme fatale as an embodiment of evil allure, Memento is perhaps the most original and intriguing revision of the genre since Welles' Touch of Evil.\n\nAs almost every commentator has noted, the most startling (or 'gimmicky') feature of Memento - and one with obvious roots in the film noir tradition - is its inverted/contorted plot structure. The film loops backwards episodically to present a series of revelations about the main character, Lenny (Guy Pearce), about the motives of his antagonists 'Teddy' (Joe Pantolino) and 'Natalie' (Carrie Ann Moss), and about the nature of Lenny's memory-loss condition. His condition 'isn't amnesia' (or so Lenny tells everyone he meets) but rather such severe short term memory loss that he is unable to assimilate and retain experience - in other words, to make new memories. Consequently, Lenny's identity, or more precisely his self-knowledge, is arrested at the moment he received a blow to his head while trying to stop intruders from raping his wife.\n\nEverything that has happened thereafter has no subjective reality for Lenny, only whatever 'objective' reality he can forge using instant photos, notes to himself, and - for the really important stuff - tattoos. But matters are even more complex and paradoxical than this setup might lead one to expect. Gradually, the viewer learns that even the clear memories that Lenny claims to have from before the assault are, like dreams, colored by protective distortions and selectivity. Moreover the so-called facts he has assembled in his investigation and that he defensively claims are more reliable than memory turn out to be irretrievably entangled in subjective motives: his own, Teddy's, and Natalie's. Thus the viewer's initial sympathy for Lenny as a justifiable victim/avenger transforms to horror as Lenny's true current identity becomes clear.\n\nImportantly, Memento's regressive plot structure is punctuated and counter-pointed by a series of noirish black and white flashbacks in which Lenny relates to an anonymous phone caller the story of Sammy Jankis, another sufferer of short term memory loss who, ironically, was Lenny's big case in his pre-trauma life as an insurance investigator. Unlike the main narrative, the Sammy sequences are told in chronological order, strategically intersecting and organizing the narrative as it wends its way backwards to the moment when Lenny decides to set in motion the data trail that will lead to the murder we see him commit in the film's opening sequence. In addition, Lenny's reconstruction of the Sammy sequences is itself dreamlike and unreliable since he attributes to Sammy characteristics that (if we can believe Teddy, an utterly corrupt cop) are Lenny's own.\n\nIn addition to providing plot exposition and a recurring visual/narrative reference point, the Sammy sequences also bring into clear thematic focus the existential implications of memory loss. Like Sammy's, Lenny's 'condition' is a reduction to the most minimal and absurd level of the human mental processes for constructing meaning (in life, in film) out of fragmentary phenomena and evanescent recollections. In an age of Alzheimer's, deconstruction, and ego-fictions, most viewers will all-too-easily identify with Lenny's painfully hopeless and terrifyingly arbitrary quest to hold reality steady as is it fizzles and flits away.", u'-0.190353', u'9) And that\'s when we realize we could never be sure of anything to begin with.\n\n8) When Leonard eventually thinks he has found his wife\'s killer, eleventh-hour reveals shock us with the possibility that his whole crisis may be nothing more than delusion.\n\n7) Editing this movie must have been like navigating inside Las Vegas hotels with no watch or compass: sex and drug distractions, deprivation of day or night, no signposts or exit signs, and of course, nauseous on cheap shrimp and hairy tequila. Untold credit to editor, Dody Dorn, for shuffling the deck as confusingly as possible, yet weaving the tale as tightly as a sanitarium wicker basket.\n\n6) But every few minutes, the movie twists back on itself, each flashback a segment of Leonard\'s life that happened just before the segment we have just seen \x96 and with each flashback, we realize just how wrong Leonard is about who his friends are, his past life, clues to the killer, his quest *in toto.* By about the fourth paragraph we realize: this piece is running backwards.\n\n5) From Jonathan Nolan\'s short story, *Memento Mori*, we meet Leonard mid-investigation, slumming it in a cockroach motel, having lost his job as insurance consultant, looking disheveled (as Guy Pierce can do so natchelly), and optimistically on the trail of the murderer; hanging with gregarious Teddy (Joe Pantoliano), and involved with hot bod, Natalie (Carrie-Anne Moss), both of whom seem to be aiding Leonard catch his killer.\n\n4) Leonard\'s last "new memory" was the murder of his wife. During the scuffle with his wife\'s killer, a blow to the head caused his memory faculty to shut down. Whether this is truly biologically possible (if you cannot make new memories, how do you even shop for food and water or pay the rent?), for the movie\'s purposes, it means Leonard must piece together clues to his wife\'s killer through copious notes, tattoos on his own body and Polaroids. But the truth will forever elude him and the clues that lead to the killer are mere wraiths, the products of his own "selective" reasoning.\n\n3) The harder you strive for something, the harder it is to grasp. But what you care least about - or that you were never striving for \x96 falls into your lap. Some call this the path of least resistance, but it\'s actually called The Reverse Genius Principle. And Leonard - all ephemeral ideas and misplaced action \x96 is a Reverse Genius in full throttle.\n\n2) Guy Pearce is the memory-challenged Leonard, who is trying so hard to move forward \x96 to find his wife\'s killer, but unable to create "new memories" to retain info - that he ends up moving backward. Thusly, writer-director Christopher Nolan has crafted a film where the clues to a murder fall neatly OUT of place. Backwards.\n\n1) *Memento* opens with a killing. We don\'t know why. We don\'t know who.', u'-0.392315'], u'tt0088763': [u"\nBack To The Future is such an inventive and exciting piece of filmmaking that it is impossible to forget about it. The casting of every character involved was absolutely perfect, and the performances were spectacular. I first saw this film when I was six years old, and it is the only movie that I know of that I don't think I could ever get sick of.\n\n\nOne of the best things about Back To The Future is that it really makes you think. You can have in-depth conversations about the plausibility of the story-line and spend hours discussing the film. The story is awesome, it is delivered cleverly and entertainingly, and the movie as a whole is just so much FUN that it can be forgiven whatever number of time-travel discrepancies that may be found in the plot. \n\nI cannot recommend this movie enough. I have never found a movie other than this one that provides such a huge dose of great fun, and it has the desirable quality where you are able to see something new each time you see it. The only problem is that they stopped at part III.", u'0.300786', u'\nBack To The Future (1985) is my all time favourite movie. It\'s a thoroughly feel good film, accessible to all ages and enjoyable from the 1st to the 45th time of watching and never fails to bring a smile.  Humour for all ages and a kick-ass car to boot, what more could a young kid want? Or those young at heart?\n\nFrom Marty\'s "Johnny B Goode" to Doc\'s classic "Run For It Marty!" You\'ll find that even though you know what\'s coming next, you\'ll still laugh. It is the ultimate feel good movie, the weed overcomes the bully, the dreamers wishes come true and all because a nosey old bird thrusts for a nickel "Save The Clock Tower!"\n\nIt\'s popularity spawned 2 sequels and although it got decreasingly good in terms of quality as a film, Back To The Future remains the best film in my repetoire and a safe bet when you need to feel good.\n\nIt gets a solid 9 out of 10, comedy, fantasy, the gorgeous Lea Thompson, the insane but comic Doc and the typical teenager Marty make this film a must for all young at heart.', u'0.601727', u'\nA funny sci-fi? Unusual but here it not only works but does so spectacularly. A whimsical but very clever time travel story that bedazzles you leaving you wanting more.\n\nThe charasmatic Michael J Fox plays a wonderful bumbling high schooler searching for love, a guitar gig and his existence which he himself threatens to erase.\n\nClever and humourous references litter this fun flick; references which are further improved upon in the sequels. Views of the same scenes from different angles, different perspectives and different timelines abound.\n\nFun for the entire family.', u'0.624651', u'One of the last movies I went with sister to see back in 86. The film blew my mind. My friends never wanted to see this one. I was happy I went. Many year\'s latter, I bought "Back to the Future" at Mc Donalds for $2.99 or for some other low price with a meal. The film ages well, and I love it just the same. The director and screen writer mixes science fiction, humor, and action perfectly. A big component of the script is time line theory which drives the story. Marty has many problems to fix, and finds out more than anyone wants to know about their parents. Michael J Fox and Christopher Loyd were excellently casted. Marty and Doc what a chemistry. With the film series one see the many dualities with time travel, that become a constant with the movie. The town clock, being awoke in a strange place, and letters. Keep this in mind when watching the 2 other sequels. The theory that time repeats itself is evident. What a time machine, the Delorian adds to this movie. Worth watch over again. 10 out of 10! Thank you TBS for showing all 3 films.', u'0.225459', u"\nBack to the Future is one of those rare, almost forgotten, pieces of pop culture that, surprisingly, draws little attention to itself.  Unlike such notable gimmicks as Star Wars, Indiana Jones, Jaws, and Independence Day, there aren't any low-budget leeches trying to imitate off this work and cash-in on its success. This is due to the near flawless script.  Why it didn't win an Oscar, you're guess is as good as mine.  Making a time-travel storyline as in this movie that doesn't fall into plot holes the size of Terminator's is exceptionally difficult.  I'd know.\n\nThe film starts slow, and gradually accelerates as it progresses.  You could almost call it a Jerry Bruckheimer movie for kids with Spielberg's trademark nostalgia.  The characters themselves are typical stereotypes for a movie like this and none of them, not even Marty himself, gel with potential.  In some ways it's as if MAD magazine made the film in an attempt to be serious.\n\nWith such an automotive obsession as this film has, one must wonder if George Lucas was involved.\n\nOverall, I have to praise this movie for its inventiveness and originality, even if it created most of our time-travel cliches.  4 out of 5 stars.  Well worth your time.", u'-0.19018', u"\nTime travel movies never disappoint-that is because the concept of time travel is a very interesting one which most people must have thought about at one time or another. What would happen if you went back in time and an innocuous act changed the course of history for better or worse? It's something to think about.\n\nI won't reveal any plot details for this movie because it will spoil it for those who haven't seen it. Let's just say that Michael J. Fox as Marty McFly ends up back in 1955 where a sequence of events inadvertently orchestrated by Marty threaten his very existence. He is aided by Doc Brown played brilliantly by Christopher Lloyd who tries to get him back to 1985 without causing any damage to the fabric of time.\n\nThe movie is great-and I feel it can be enjoyed by anyone regardless of their individual tastes in film genres. In fact, I find it hard to believe anyone could dislike a film like this. It has action, adventure, plenty of humour and some cool moments. All the actors involved in the movie play their parts great.\n\nAnyone who watches this movie will love it.", u'-0.0371848', u"Zemeckis's 'Back To The Future' trilogy has been a childhood favourite for a long time. Having revisited it today, brought me to a nostalgic state. The 80's saw a lot of excellent original fun 'young' films like 'Back To The Future' (of course), 'Better Off Dead', 'Heathers', 'The Breakfast Club' etc. What really made these films immensely enjoyable then, and classics today, is that they really reflected what it was like being a young person in the 80s. The movies themselves were well written, well executed, well acted and they cut straight to the point.\n\nBack to 'Back To The Future'. This one is sheer fun, even today. There's an incredible energy about it but it still manages to stay an 'innocent' film. The music is very effective. It's slick and follows a steady pace. The special effects are decent. Though people might pick on the plausibility of the time travelling, I think this is really a very minor flaw because it is overall a well written movie and the point was to entertain. Yet, this is not to say that it's brainless entertainment. I think it cleverly brings forth some interesting themes and I liked how they funnily used some ideas of Oedipus Rex's story.\n\nThe acting is superb overall. Christopher Lloyd as the over-the-top mad scientist is a laugh riot. Michael J. Fox totally owns Marty McFly with his natural charisma, raw energy and brilliant dialogue delivery. Lea Thompson is cute and vivacious and Crispin Glover is good.\n\n'Back To The Future' is one of the most enjoyable time-travelling classics. It's over 23 years old and it still hasn't gotten old. Sadly, they don't make it like this these days but then again we always can revisit them. That's why they're classics.", u'0.533225', u'\nBACK TO THE FUTURE (1985) **** Michael J. Fox, Christopher Lloyd, Lea Thompson, Crispin Glover, Thomas F. Wilson, Marc McClure, Wendy Jo Sperber.  This generation\'s "It\'s a Wonderful Life"?  Think about it.  Very popular and very entertaining sci-fi comedy that made Fox a movie star after success with tv\'s "Family Ties", casting him, after Eric Stoltz was dropped, as Marty McFly who winds up in a nuclear-powered DeLorean time-machine and is sent back in time to 1955 by his quintessentially eccentric friend Dr. Emmet Brown (Lloyd doing a fine Art Carney).  There he meets up with his parents to be and realizes his chance encounters have changed his future and he must see history repeat itself or perish.  High-concept hilarity and some truly ingenious schematics thanks to screenwriter Bob Gale and director Bob Zemeckis.  Wondering what it would be like to never be born and/or what it would be like if things were different...see what I mean.  Oscar-nominated song "The Power of Love" by Huey Lewis (who has a fun cameo) fuels this dynamo gem of a film.  Classic.', u'0.52122', u'\n"Back to the Future" is a very smart film that benefits from likeable characters and an insightful screenplay.  Michael J. Fox accidently goes back to 1955 in a DeLorean that has been turned into a time machine by the wacky Christopher Lloyd.  Now Fox must bring his parents together after he inadvertently changes the future.  It is not quite as complicated as it sounds.  The film is great fun that seems brand new 15 years later.  A great movie by Robert Zemeckis.  4.5 out of 5 stars.', u'0.370307', u'I just asked my friend that I\'m speaking with through instant messenger if he had ever seen "Back to the Future" and he said "Yeah, who hasn\'t?", sadly, I never had the opportunity until tonite and he called me a failure as a movie buff, well, at least I\'ve seen the movies now! Ha ha! I\'m back on track! Well, obviously, this is my first review for the first Back to the Future and when I came her to IMDb, I knew this was a well loved movie, I was just amazed at it being on the top 250, but I can\'t give it a lower rating because Back to the Future was an excellent film that was ground breaking for it\'s time and still today.\n\nMarty McFly and his good friend, The Doc, are two science nuts. Marty isn\'t really happy with his home life and the fact that he and his parents are very square and strict, The Doc calls Marty and shows him his latest invention, his De Lauren that he built into a time machine. When the government go after The Doc and Marty has to get away, he jumps in the car and goes back to the year of 1955, when his parents met. Instead of the way his mom and dad met happening to his dad, he ends up being in the position and mom ends up falling for her son, not even knowing! But he has to make sure his parents are together in time so he can get back without altering the future.\n\nBack to the Future to this day is still a timeless treasure that I notice more and more is becoming part of a newer generation. Michael J. Fox should be proud, his work will be remembered for a long time. Back to the Future worked so well because of the great story and the humor was great, the whole cast worked together and made a terrific movie that will be looked back on thirty years from now and still be considered cool.\n\n10/10', u'0.108744', u'This film is just one of a kind. The charm and wit are so good it will have you wonder how they came up with such a concept, Michael J Fox is at his best as are the rest of the cast. Humour,comedy, science fiction, this film has it all. This film will remain timeless,I would urge anyone who loves films to add this one to their list now. The special effects are still great looking and look far better then most effects today, your heart will still be in your mouth when Marty races towards the clock tower in a bid to get struck by lightning, this is a film you will watch again and again and will always put a smile on your face.', u'0.608784', u"Back to the future is probably one of the best movies if not the best movie I have ever seen. This movie is just fantastic, awesome and flawless. The action and suspense of this movie still excites to this day. You can watch this movie over and over again and still be thrilled. Most likely This is easily one of the best movies ever made. A must watch movie for anybody, any age, even if they aren't a very big movie person. Not much more to say.The movie has almost no flaws at all, and will not disappoint anybody who views it. A true classic that will endlessly entertain anyone. Overall a truly entertaining, memorable and amazing movie with very few flaws. Ten out of Ten stars.", u'0.535303', u'\nI feel that there is no such thing as a perfect film,but in today\'s  cinema,"Back to the Future" comes amazingly close.It has laughs, AND thrills,always a great combination.I am amazed at the attention paid to nearly every single detail here.For example,at the start of the film,Doc and Marty are in the parking lot of the "Twin Pines Mall".Then,shortly after Marty arrives in 1955,he accidently runs over one of old man Peabody\'s beloved pine trees.Toward the end, after Marty returns,the name of the mall changes.This is something you just don\'t notice until you see the film several times as I have. Excellent casting,particularly Christopher Lloyd as the unforgettable Doc Brown,the humor of the Ronald Reagan bit and the Johnny B. Goode sequence,along with the ultimate heart pounding ending and the attention to detail as I mentioned make this film as close to perfect as you will see in modern cinema.The sequels? Forget them.This is the only one of the trilogy you need to see. ', u'0.289328', u"There are though films, that you need to force yourself to pay attention to, before the payoff (the ultimate example being Tarkovsky's Andrei Rublev) and there are films that you can simply enjoy effortlessly, such as Back to the Future, one of the best films ever made! Yes, that's right, it surely belongs to the top 100 best films ever, perhaps top 30. I would rank it as among the top 5 comedies ever made and among the top 10 science fiction films ever made as well!\n\nWhy? It is so freaking good! The 1980's were indeed the peak of pop culture: films and music only got better and better until they peaked in the mid 1980's and this is the peak right now: the coolest film ever made. It is way better than Raider of the Lost Ark in delivering fun!", u'0.450589', u"When you talk about Back to the Future, you have to talk about the whole trilogy. Because Zemeckis and Gale didn't make sequels they extended the length of one film, which is very different than a sequel.\n\nThe ultimate film must allow the audience feel part of the film and relate to the characters. This film is the best because it takes a fantasy story and makes it adaptable to real-life. I don't know how soon anyone will be able to time-travel, but you can relate to Marty McFly's (Michael J. Fox) reaction to the change. Even if you're not a teenager you can believe it in someway. Back to the Future is the perfect and its been extended into a masterpiece with 2 sequels or extensions as I see it. Definitely a must see, if your pathetic enough not to have seen in at least the last 8 years.\n\nAmazing story by Gale and Zemeckis. Great acting especially by Michael J. Fox, but also great work by Christopher Lloyd, Lea Thompson and Tom Wilson. Such an exciting an involved story.", u'0.48854'], u'tt0482571': [u'What "The Prestige" does very well is recreate a period of show business history near the turn of the century in which competition between magicians was serious and intense. The workings of the complicated illusions are gorgeously brought to life via smartly detailed apparatus that replicate the actual mechanics of Victorian legerdemain. \n\nMuch of the film rings very true, such as the all-consuming obsessions of the lead characters to be the best and outdo all others. It\'s an easy step to accept that such unwavering determination spills over into deadly territory, as rival magicians suave Rupert Angier (a riveting performance by Hugh Jackman) and audacious Alfred Borden (Christian Bale effortlessly playing a brooding lower-class Brit) each seek to wreak continuing revenge upon the other.\n\nThe story, though adapted from a novel, feels like a perfect fit for director Nolan\'s sensibilities, as the machinations of the two men become increasingly convoluted during a back-and-forth tug of wits that keeps you guessing in the style of Nolan\'s "Memento." As the game grows increasingly deadly, and threatens to consume all they love, the film becomes a fascinating study in single-mindedness.\n\nThe work is epic in sweep, beautifully filmed, and strongly acted. The only odd note in casting is David Bowie as Nikola Tesla (he looks nothing like the actual Tesla, if you care about these sort of things, and his appearance calls attention to itself as superstar casting often does), but Mr. Bowie holds his own. Solid performances are all around, with Michael Caine adding dignity and depth as the old master, Scarlett Johanssen as the as the lovely stage assistant who becomes the third point in a twisted love triangle, and even Andy Serkis (Gollum!) in a memorable supporting role.\n\nThe introduction of Tesla adds yet another twist, as the film shifts from real-but-possible stage illusion to steam-punkish sci-fi. This transition is a hard note to pull off, since the beginning of the film doesn\'t quite suggest such a direction, but if you\'re willing to let Nolan lead you on the journey into increasingly fantastic realms, the narrative rewards you with thought-provoking moral and dramatic exploration of the issues raised.\n\nA truly entertaining movie, and an original, unusual, dark ride -- well worth seeing in a theater for its grand scope and vision.', u'0.81889', u'I\'ve said it before, but I\'ll say it again. Christopher Nolan can do no \r wrong.\r \r\nTeaming up again with his Batman Begins cast of Christian Bale and \r Michael Caine, and joined with the Scoop team consisting of X-Men\'s \r Wolverinie Hugh Jackman and Scarlett Johansson, the stellar (eye candy) \r cast already set tongues wagging as to whether they\'ll be able to live \r up to the hype of Nolan\'s long awaited movie directly challenging the \r other picture about Victorian magicians, The Illusionist.\r \r\nThe Prestige is the third act of any magic trick, with the first and \r second acts being the Pledge and the Turn. And this movie lives up to \r its namesake to a T. The way the movie plays out, it\'s like a huge \r magic trick, with the audience waiting to see how it unfolds, getting \r the suspicion on how it\'s done, but yet sitting through it thorough \r engaged to discover how everything will be revealed and resolved. It \r tells the story of how two magicians, fellow apprentices turned \r unfortunate rivals, plod down the slow path of jealous obsession, \r revenge, and the deliberate attempts to go at lengths to steal each \r other\'s ideas, to go one up against the other, a fight in romance, life \r and the long held passionate drive to discredit each other. There are \r perfect explanations of the value of secrets, and how secrets can \r sometimes be used as tools for deceit.\r \r\nWhat I thought was valuable in the movie was the reinforcement of the \r notion of how "magic" actually worked. Besides the better understanding \r of the common body of scientific knowledge, things like having pretty \r assistants to distract, and having planted staff amongst the audience, \r somehow made me a sceptic to tricks and illusions, and try harder to \r spot at which stage had things undergone a sleight of hand. More \r importantly, it introduced me to the notion and importance of a loyal \r engineer behind the scenes who designs elaborate contraptions solely \r for the magician\'s use, and how having disloyal staff can indeed be \r detrimental to any leaks of secrets.\r \r\nAnd Michael Caine took on this engineering role as Cutter, responsible \r for assisting Rupert Angier (Hugh Jackman) with loyalty and conviction \r that they could, as a team, beat Christian Bale\'s Alfred Borden. I \r thought the cast in general were superb, with Christian Bale leading \r the charge. Hugh Jackman too showed that he could play a dark \r character, as the two leads tackled their characters\' theme of \r sacrifice, arrogance, and ultimately redemption, especially for Rupert \r Angier. I thought he did what he did towards the end was a kind of \r penance to what happened in the beginning, hoping to kill two birds \r with a single stone, to exact the sweetest revenge he could possibly \r muster. What also was intriguing about the two lead characters was that \r there is no right or wrong, no hero or villain. It\'s always a shade of \r grey in what they do, and for Alfred Borden, I felt it\'s more for \r survival and the provision for family, which is a strong subplot \r running through the film. I just have to mention though, that Scarlett \r Johansson being Esquire\'s Sexiest Woman Alive, gets to play a flower \r vase role here as a magician\'s assistant, though her role as the pawn \r between the rivals added a little gravitas.\r \r\nThe atmosphere was set up great, and so were the costumes and sets. The \r soundtrack was hauntingly mesmerizing, capturing the look and mood \r appropriately. Look out too for David Bowie\'s appearance as a Serbian \r scientist! \r \r\nI was floored by the deftness of how Nolan weaved and juxtaposed the \r non linear narrative so flawlessly. While the usual techniques is to \r use placeholders, or flashback sequences, colours etc, here, time is so \r fluid, but yet the audience will know precisely which era they\'re in, \r without being explicitly told, or working too much of the noodle. You \r just know, and it\'s just that feeling of being totally transparent with \r time. Even though the movie clocked in at slightly more than 2 hours, \r you don\'t feel its length at all.\r \r\nAt the end of the movie, one quote popped into mind: Misdirection - \r what the eyes see and the ears hear, the mind believes. Quite apt to \r describe how things work out during the movie, or to describe in \r general, Nolan \'s films so far. That added richness to lift the movie \r to a superior plane. Do yourself a favour, if there\'s one movie you \r absolutely must watch this week, then Prestige must be your natural \r choice. It\'s smart in delivery and slick in presentation. There is none \r other.\r \r\nP.S. Is it just me, or are notebooks a common feature in Nolan\'s \r movies?', u'0.296437', u'I went to see a critics preview of The Prestige this afternoon and to \r my surprise I found the film to be one of the best I have seen all year \r so far, and that writers can come up with an excellent script it they \r would only try a little harder. The acting performances by Hugh \r Jackman, Christian Bale and Michael Caine were the best I have see in \r a long while. The only objection I had to the film was that it was a \r little long, but once you leave the theater you will discuss the film \r and it many twists and turns. My wife and myself discussed it all the \r way home from the movie theater. This is a winner and should be up for \r some academy award statues, and my recommendation is go see this as \r soon as you can, you will not be disappointed.', u'0.424882', u"What makes this movie so incredible is that while it is indeed a movie about magicians (or illusionists) it is also a complex character study about how self destructive obsessions are with a sideline love story and a sci-fi twist. A unique plot with an amazing cast--any of whom could believably garner an Oscar nomination. Christian Bale was amazing in one of his rare cockney performances. We already know from Kate and Leopold how well Hugh Jackman plays a distinguished English gent. He's absolutely priceless. Is there any point in discussing Sir Michael Caine? He brings polish to the movie. \n\nThis is the kind of flick that you can discuss for weeks after. The plot is so detailed and complete and open to interpretation. My friend and I have been discussing various nuances of this film for the past 3 weeks. It definitely stays with you.", u'0.641521', u'I couldn\'t help myself. I just kept saying "wow, what a beautifully crafted film," all the way home, and around my house when I arrived home. I have not been so captured and entertained in a long time. I was especially enamored with the screen writing and how tightly and beautifully the visual metaphors tied in with the writing, and with the impact of the human message about obsession, competition and retribution carried to the extreme. \n\nOne can relate to this personal human struggle for victory over another at all costs on a much grander scale, as the two magicians could easily be symbolic of how leaders of countries come to blows with each other, at the expense of their women and children -- something we struggle with right now in our world. There are deeper layers of this film that will be uncovered over time.\n\nHugh Jackman, Christian Bale and Sir Michael Caine all contributed stunning, emotional performances. Rebecca Hall, who played Sarah to Bale\'s Alfred Borden, turned in a highly charged performance as well, making Scarlett Johansson\'s Olivia flat in comparison. And although some people thought the plot line a bit tedious, I found it to be refreshingly complex and engaging, while not being so complex as to lose you. If you can\'t follow this one, you\'ve been watching television too long. And who cares if the illusions are mundane or scientifically unbelievable? Isn\'t that what both movies and illusions ask us to do? To suspend disbelief? Meantime, there\'s a message in its madness. Hello.\n\nThe film is visually moody and evocative, easily transporting you into the time period. What more could you ask for? A film is a visual medium and this one is a visual ten. The acting is superb as well as the plot. It keeps you interested; it keeps you guessing right to the shocking but most appropriate end.\n\nIt asks you, what is one willing to sacrifice for the "prestige?"\n\nI think this one\'s an Oscar definite.', u'0.281846', u"I have to say this is one of the best movies i have seen this year, i was not expecting it to be that good. There's twist after twist, and when you think there is no more, there will be. Great performances and ever better plot. I highly recommend this movie to all ages.\n\nNew idea for a movie, and they succeeded it at it greatly. It will have you thinking every time you see a magician on TV!\n\ni had to give this movie a 10/10, and i only have 4 movies that i would rate that way in my life time. If there is anything you do this year, make it a trip to watch this movie!\n\nI hope you enjoy it as much as i did.", u'0.366291', u"The Prestige is a masterful exercise in storytelling with superb direction and powerful performances by a grand ensemble cast. From set and production design to cinematography, from script to presentation, Christopher Nolan has once again demonstrated why he is one of the film world's brightest up and coming directors. The Prestige only helps solidify his standing as one of the landmark directors of his generation.\n\nTold in a narrative that jumps between various points along its time line, playing out like a magic act itself, the story is that of two magicians on the rise in their careers. The first -- played by Christian Bale -- is an expert in understanding the fundamentals of any trick, but lacks showmanship. The second -- played by Hugh Jackman -- is a master showman who is more entertaining than technical. A tragic series of events pits the two performers against each other in a battle of wits that spirals further and further out of control, consuming both of them and everything and everyone they care about.\n\nWith a story that requires actors with a great deal of emotive range, Nolan has assembled what could be described as a dream cast. Both Bale and Jackman suit their respective roles perfectly, and pitting these two performers against each other was a stroke of casting genius. Michael Caine takes what could have been a forgettable role by any lesser actor and elevates it with his demanding screen presence. Probably the most surprising performance comes from David Bowie whose unforgettable turn as master physicist Nikola Tesla absolutely shines. Add Andy Serkis to the mix, and what is assembled is a group of performers who know how to fully engage the audience.\n\nThe Prestige is hard to pigeonhole into any specific genre as it walks the fine line between mystery, drama, suspense and fantasy. In that, the story becomes a never-ending stream of wonder for the mind: one can never tell exactly where the story is going to lead next, becoming more and more as time goes on. This gives Christopher Nolan ample opportunity to play. And play he does. With narration by several characters, each adding their own viewpoint to the events, and with a direction that moves between time to mystify and distract, the end result is a climax that itself is a series of puzzles that each unravel beautifully.\n\nThe only major criticisms that can be leveled at the Prestige are a confusing play with the seasons during Tesla's introduction (winter suddenly becomes spring/summer and back again) and a strange choice of music for the closing credits (a pop song at the end of a film such as this seems tacky). However, neither is significant enough of a problem to warrant any need to avoid the film at all.\n\nIn the end, the Prestige is a fantastic display of what can be accomplished when you bring together superior talent. It is certainly worth the price of admission and as good as any magic show you are to come across.", u'0.270288', u"The Prestige. I am impressed. I am a HUGE fan of Hugh Jackman and bought the book as soon as I heard he would be in this movie. I read it and enjoyed it, but wasn't especially fond of it. But I still had been really looking forward to this movie.\n\nI went to the first showing opening day (Friday, Oct. 20th) with 2 friends and sat a row behind them, alone, to enjoy it peacefully. I loved it all.\n\nChristopher Nolan really has a gift at directing. The way the movie cuts back and forth between different places and times is clever. Although some might be confused or left stupefied, others will be happy and glorified. The movie will keep you guessing the whole time until the very end. The script, acting, settings, props, everything was so well-done.\n\nHugh Jackman was excellent as the angry, obsessive magician trying to gain back his life by revenge. Christian Bale was equally impressive as the mystifying, secretive showman, never letting out his secrets until necessary. Michael Caine rocked in supporting everyone else's parts with his curiosity. The rest of the cast rounded out nicely and helped out where need be. I really recommend this movie to a sophisticated audience who doesn't mind a long, mysterious movie.\n\nAnd man, what an ending.", u'0.492809', u"This was the best movie I have seen in at least the past two years. Most movies have me leave the theater feeling like I wasted 8 dollars or so. So many movies lately have left me feeling like I wasted away precious hors of my life that could have been spent doing better things. Yet this movie was truly a masterpiece and kept me guessing the whole time. The acting was superb and so was the plot. I usually can predict the outcomes of movies pretty early on. And usually I can see the twist the writer planned. With this movie I was still left wondering into the last 5 minutes of the movie. I can't wait to own this on DVD.", u'-0.394739', u'Director Christopher Nolan has a proclivity for warped narratives (Memento) and in The Prestige he serves up a deliciously twisty tale, puffed full of magic theatricality and inventive cinematic devices. With his remarkably sleight-of-hand direction, he spins the tale of two rivaling magicians in Victorian-era London, creating a cerebrally stimulating 2 hour long mise-en-scene in which the audience is literally left guessing and gasping at its rare uniqueness through magic acts and bitter behind-the-stage intrigue.\n\nThe final pay-off of any magic act \x96 the prestige \x96 is of the essence, and preluding it is the pledge, followed by the turn. Together these three key components are slotted in unique positions in \'The Prestige\'s arrestingly clever script but it is the titular act that propels the film. The pledge introduces our main characters: magicians Alfred Borden (Christian Bale) and Robert Angier (Hugh Jackman) in turn-of-the-century London and we see how their friendship abruptly becomes a fully-fledged rivalry and hostility with a magic act gone horribly wrong in front of an audience. There is a death, and it lights the fuse of an onslaught of reel revelations and the one-upmanship that will ensue between the two competitors. \'The turn\' comes to offers twists by the bucketload in the form of love-interests, and technologically marvelous magic acts. I gasped, I scratched my head, I watched on in awe. No description will do it justice.\n\nThe prestige as the end note to the show \x96 in which, for example, the disappearer reappears to the deafening applause of the crowd \x96 is so meticulously composed in the film through foreshadowing and fractured chronology that rigorously intersects, intertwines, intercuts, fast-forwards, rewinds and replays key parts of the story that the whole spectacle floors you. Christopher Nolan and his brother Jonathan have worked out a template script that is more twisty and turny than a mountain road and for that reason I am very reluctant to spoil even the slightest detail of the story of \'The Prestige\'\x96 of all of its acts, in fact. If you are shaking your head thinking a clever twist ending does not make the movie (and I agree), know that this is not a "gotcha"-kind of Shyamalan trick where you want to stop the film, rewind it and watch it meticulous foreshadowing up to the cheap pay-off, but a tightly-written ever-shifting hall of mirrors with so many intrinsic twists that on your way home you will still be scratching you head and searching for clues.\n\nOur two magicians are perfectly-cast with Hugh Jackman capturing the showy, slick, ambition-driven nature of his character Angier in contrast to Bale\'s technique-driven purist who may be well on his way to perfecting the craft, but lacks the \'Abracadabra\' entertainment value. I had always crowned the latter the more capable actor of the two, but the fact is that Jackman performs just as well in the film. Having said that, Borden has more layers to his complex, contradictory (keyword) persona than the flashy, greedy Angier which perhaps begs more weight from the actor behind the role, shifting more demand on Christian Bale. The sad fact of it is that neither of these two men are likable characters and elicit nothing more than temporary sympathy. However, the secrecy with which the intricate story approaches them makes it impossible for the viewer to slot them in protagonist vs. antagonist positions, and indeed they are given almost the exact same screen-time and voice-over narration throughout, a subtle and brilliant accolade of Nolan\'s.\n\nTo further evaluate the cast of The Prestige, David Bowie and Michael Caine undoubtedly merit a great deal of praise for supporting the two moody, unlikeable leading men. It is a crying shame then that Scarlett Johansson \x96 always an incapable actress except for the rare occasions in which she plays a sultry American vixen (Match Point) \x96 performs so badly in the role of Olivia Wenscombe, a magic assistant pending between Borden and Angier. Here she is actually given a very good and important character who is not necessarily bad like the rest, but botches her interpretation by giving an unspeakably hammy London accent. Nolan picks up on her shortcomings as an actress, and resorts to boob-shots en masse. This he should be fully entitled to do as a director, for a beautiful diversion will always camouflage the process and any of its potential missteps, as Michael Caine\'s character puts forward.\n\nWith Scarlett as a pleasurable paint-job, twists by the bucket-load and flashy magic tricks as windowdressing to a solid mystery film, there is little or no need to delve deeper into the psyches of its characters to keep our attention. Yet this is done, and superbly so, by Christopher Nolan. \'Antihero\' gets a whole new spin to it in The Prestige with two friends-turned-rivals so bitterly poised on the brink of obsession of outshining the other that succeeding with the ultimate \'prestige\' of magic followed by applause is enough to drive them to murder, bankruptcy, deceit and sabotage. Borden simply wants to be better on a technical level, while Angier wants the public\'s recognition and wide-spread fame. Their ambition is in effect largely the same: create the definitive deceptive illusion and do it through any means necessary.\n\n\'The Prestige\' is a majestic film that nevertheless spans across too long a running time. Condensation would have done wonders and surely bumped it up a notch, as would underpinning some humour at one or two points (it is VERY gloomy), but it truly is a great cinematic achievement and a shoe-in for my top 10 of 1006, and easily the most inventive film I have seen in years. I am eagerly anticipated director Christopher Nolan\'s next sleight-of-hand direction, and it looks like the closest is The Dark Knight (2008).\n\n9 out of 10', u'0.196544', u'The Prestige, adapted from an award winning novel of the same name by Christopher Priest, is an intricate tale of passion, intrigue, deceit and obsession about two illusionists, whose morbid covetousness for absolute supremacy in their profession engenders a fierce rivalry that turns internecine and ultimately consumes them. Alfred Borden (Christian Bale) and Robert Angier (Hugh Jackman) at the start of their careers are highly ambitious young men assisting an elderly illusionist named Milton. Borden\'s incessant longing for innovation leads to the accidental death of Angier\'s wife. Borden marries Sarah and his apparent happiness further aggravates the sense of revulsion in Angier\'s heart. Angier\'s vindictive intervention during a bullet catch trick causes Borden to lose his two fingers. Though these events sowed the seeds of implacable hatred, but it is the unremitting yearning of their perpetually insatiable egos to outperform each other that eventually drives them to perdition.\n\nAngier starts performing with the sobriquet "The Great Danton" with Cutter (Michael Caine) as his illusion engineer, while Borden with the stage name "The Professor" with Fellon as his engineer. Angier is an adept showman, but lacks the technical prowess. On the contrary, Borden is highly skillful, but lacks the taste for grandeur and showmanship. Each regards the other as his only obstacle (owing to their bitterly intertwined past) and this starts a series of events in which each tries to stymie the other by any means possible (sabotage, abduction, incrimination and even killings). Awed by the apparent genuineness of Borden\'s version of "The Transported Man" and inveigled by Borden\'s deliberate misdirection, Angier travels miles and spends a fortune to approach an ingenious scientist named Nikola Tesla (David Bowie) in order to cajole him into building a machine for him (a machine that could help him outperform Borden). Nikola Tesla is an apostle of Alternating Current (and rightly thinks it to be superior to Direct Current), and is under immense pressure imparted by Thomas Edison (ruthless advocator of Direct Current) and his men, who are after Tesla. As Edison\'s men close in on him, Tesla runs out of time and hence funds for his research and is forced to oblige Angier, who is his very last client. Tesla flees the scene shortly after fulfilling his promise to Angier (not without leaving him a strong note of caution against the use of his invention), whose ever increasing skepticism in Tesla is placated by the efficacy of his masterful invention. Using Tesla\'s machine, Angier introduces his own version of "The Transported Man", which becomes an instant success, but in lieu of a terrible self-sacrifice (that Angier has to make every night while performing). As the story culminates, the viewer is startled with many revelations including the mental and physical torments that Borden\'s complex character undergoes owing to his total devotion towards his art.\n\nThe success of an act of illusion solely depends upon the deftness with which its three parts viz. the Pledge, the Turn, and the Prestige are performed. Similarly, for a movie to be a success, its three main aspects i.e. screenplay, direction, and acting are ought to be top-notch. Christopher Nolan incredibly manages to strike all the right cords with The Prestige. His riveting maneuvers coupled with his ingenious auteur skills aggrandize the brilliance of the movie ten-fold. Nolan succeeds in having a dream assemblage of actors with almost everyone giving a memorable performance. Christian Bale and Hugh Jackman are superb in their lead roles. Michael Caine shines in his low-key portrayal of Cutter, an ordinary part made to appear extraordinary through sheer brilliance; vintage Caine. David Bowie as Nikola Tesla and Andy Serkis (Gollum of LOTR) as Alley (Tesla\'s assistant) are stupendous in their cameos. Scarlet Johansson also manages to give a scintillating portrayal as Borden\'s paramour, Olivia.\n\nThe movie is a roller-coaster of a ride with intriguingly intertwined subplots and masterful time switching, which makes it one of a kind and an ultimate masterpiece. The uncanny feat of Nolan to manifest a motion picture, which forays the realms of Mystery, Thrill, Sci-fi and Fantasy, is truly exemplary and makes the movie a contemporary classic. The movie is a tapestry of twists and turns, which evinces its overwhelming potential to bewitch the masses and satiate even the most esoteric viewers. The questions that it incessantly asks of the viewers can only be answered after repetitive viewings, with each viewing seeking utmost attention of the viewer. The only question that I would ask of the viewer is: "Are you watching closely?" \n\nA must watch for anyone, who has nothing against giving his mind a rigorous exercise and his body an adrenaline rush. 10/10', u'0.248852', u"I've seen this film twice now - about a year ago and then yesterday - and thoroughly enjoyed it both times, even the second time when I remembered some of those fantastic twists in the last half hour. Sometimes it's even more fun to view a film like this when you know a few things, because earlier scenes take on new meaning.\n\nIt's not an easy film to totally digest, even with two viewings, because that ending has some mind-boggling revelations. Without having to resort to spoilers, let me just say the story is extremely interesting, the acting very good, the period pieces fun to view and it's a pretty clean movie so grandma can also enjoy it, too, without language or sex concerns.\n\nBasically, it's a story about obsession between two magicians in the last decade of the 19th century. They continually try to top one another and things get nasty along the way. Hugh Jackman and Christian Bale are both fun to watch in those roles, as are Michael Caine and Scarlett Johansson in supporting roles.\n\nThis is one movie guaranteed to have you thinking about it when it's over!", u'0.424824', u'Reading these drooling reviews, I have to wonder what has gone wrong with the movie-viewing community of late.\n\nThis film is nothing more than a very expensive exercise in overstatement. How many times can we possibly hit our audience over the head with the same exact symbolism? How blatantly obvious can we make our "elaborate plot twists" by the end of the film? Hugh Jackman\'s closing speech is perfectly typical of this film. Shot and dying on the floor, he suddenly comes to this very drawn out and very boringly shot epiphany about how he was never REALLY obsessed with finding out his opponent\'s secrets. He actually traveled thousands of miles, spent countless amounts of money, (How did he have this, by the way?) shot, stalked, kidnapped, and did his very best to destroy his opponent\'s life, but he actually did it for "the look on their (the audience) faces." Please.\n\nAnd plot twists? No no no, my friends. There is precisely one plot twist, and it is given away by the "tease" at the beginning of the film. As soon as you see that the hat doesn\'t leave, you know the rest of the movie. Okay, it clones things. He makes new and kills one of himself every time. It\'s not a huge leap in logic, but the filmmakers see fit to treat the audience like a bunch of Neanderthal second graders.\n\nFinally, we are supposed to like the magician/twin that makes it back to his daughter in the end. Forgetting of course, the fact that he broke Hugh Jackman\'s legs, killed his wife, crushed that innocent woman\'s hand, and oh yes, shot and killed his rival. But he was justified, right? WRONG. Once again, Hollywood comes out with the kind of ambiguous, almost-moral movie that makes you just cringe with the pansy-butt quality of their statements.\n\nPlease do both me and yourself a favor and skip this tripe.', u'-0.327307', u'I love a film that doesn\'t spoonfeed the plot and the story and the interest in it to the audience. This one takes you along if you are smart enough to go and if you are not so dumbed down by most entertainment that you can stay steadily involved.\n\nI wanted to love it to death...it has everything I think a film should have, including a wonderfully rich atmosphere, a great cast and excellent direction. Through most of it, it dares the audience to be intelligent and to have an attention span longer than a fruit fly. It had all the makings of a great film, but I kept looking for (and longing for) the greatness to impact me. It never did.\n\nIt fell flat for me by the end. I really didn\'t care about any of them by then. I wasn\'t even sure I cared about the little girl. I certainly didn\'t care how anyone did any of the illusions; I was sick to death of their obsession with each other and just wanted them to move on already. Although there would be no film without it, it all seemed to be \'too much trouble to go through\' and obsession is about getting caught up in it...for me, I couldn\'t get caught up in itnor could I quite get their obsession. Although Iam a big fan of the long, thinking person\'s film, I have to say I thought it dragged on and on by the end and I just wanted it over. It definitely did not leave me wanting more. I just wanted different.\n\nI had paid attention all along, I was impressed with the film and thought the acting, the cinematography and the direction were all superb. Even though some of the twists seem unnecessary, I thought many were brilliant and I kept trying to will myself to care about it, to care about them, but I didn\'t.\n\nIt was a very good film in a detached sort of "viewing art" way but as far as feeling "wow"\'d by the end, not so much.', u'-0.224865', u"This film really annoyed the hell out of me. It is definitely an entry into the oeuvre of movies that are so obsessed by how clever its twists are that it forgets to worry about things such as sympathetic characterisation, naturalistic expositional dialogue, and, most crucially, the effective execution of said oh-so-clever twists.\n\nFirst, a few points about the script. The script is dreadful in parts, with exposition that may as well be spoken directly to camera. The characters, Hugh Jackman's in particular, seem unrounded and without any kind of back story - seemingly plopped into the middle of an obsessive pursuit without any explanation as to where said obsessions may have originated. As happens in so many Hollywood movies, the female roles are perfunctory up to the point of pastiche - did anyone else groan with anticipation of how banal and run-of-the-mill Scarlett Johansson would be? I'd like to see a studio movie that, in the absence of an integral love story, crowbars in some half-assed romance entirely for the sake of some demograph of dubious existence who are believed to not want to see a movie without some histrionic sexual politics.\n\nNow, on to those twists, of which there are two major ones. The first, whose set up is established very early on, is glaringly obvious. I spent most of the film seething with frustration as lines that, in what i guess the makers hoped would be in hindsight, are massively irritating 'clues' to the audience. All this is abrogated by the fact that it was all clear to me from the off (and i wasn't aware there was a twist to the film so i wasn't looking out for one), all due to the fact that essential production values fail to adequately disguise the twist. The second twist, which acts not only as plot but supposedly as a thematic comparison to the first, is what left me wanting my money back. The filmmakers seemed to have forgotten that suspension of disbelief must be eared through establishing what can an cannot happen in the world they have created. For example, in The Matrix, when we shown that it is Trinity's love for Neo that brings him back from the dead, the audience is able to accept this because the reality that has been established is one of sci-fi machines-rule-the-world type. We have been prepared to be asked to go along with the possible. The Prestige, a film that throughout its running time shows and tells us that the magic in the film is one rooted in realistic trickery and that the rivalry between the two main characters is based on which can come up with the cleverest ruse, believes that it does not need to ask the audience to suspend its disbelief before laying down the biggest of deus ex machina macguffins seen in recent cinema. We are expected to believe that within this realistic turn of the century world that a machine is invented that (through science, not magic) can do what remains impossible in the present. This 'twist' represents lazy, lazy storytelling - it is like the writers could not come up with an actual clever ending so just used their get out of jail free card instead.\n\nOn the side, there are some very pretty things to look at, with impressive period detail and some imaginative compositions from Nolan. Michael Caine and Andy Serkis are both excellent, and its always nice to see David Bowie on screen, but thats where the acting plaudits stop. Bale and Jackman give in uncharismatic and unlikeable performances and Johanssen floats along on a wave of arbitrariness.\n\nI would say to avoid this film, unless you enjoy the energy that truly hating a film can give you, as it has to me.", u'-0.377084']}